 American Telephone & Telegraph Co. said it signed five-year telecommunications contracts totaling $100 million with Kemper Financial Co. and PaineWebber Inc.  The contracts follow filings AT&T made last Friday with the Federal Communications Commission under a special arrangement called Tariff 12.  The tariff, which has been fought by AT&T's competitors, is a regulatory device that enables AT&T to sell custom-designed phone and computer networks to big customers.  The announcements also mark the beginning of a marketing effort by AT&T to get more media attention for large contracts it signs.  An AT&T spokesman said the company is trying to persuade more big customers to participate in making such announcements.  "When MCI or the other guys make a sale, they stand up and say so," said James Byrnes, an AT&T spokesman.  "Now we want to, too."  MCI Communications Corp. and US Sprint Communications Co. have received much attention, mostly in the trade press, whenever they sign up a big customer.  Contracts with big customers have helped AT&T's competitors gain credibility in the market.  AT&T also wants to time its announcements when contracts are signed instead of when filings are made at the FCC. Fearing red tape and public disclosure, some customers have shied away from ordering custom services from AT&T because AT&T, unlike its competitors, must get them approved by the FCC.  To gain more residential customers, AT&T also said it will waive the $5 sign-up fee for its Reach Out America discount plan until the end of the year.  The telephone giant said it is also increasing discounts under the plan.  Reach Out America customers pay $8.70 a month for an hour of weekend and night out-of-state calling.  Customers also get discounts on evening and daytime calls.  Separately, US Sprint said it will reduce rates for its digital private line service by 28% beginning Nov. 1.  The service, called T-1 in industry jargon, gives customers the equivalent of 24 voice channels on a single line.  The U.S. Food and Drug Administration asked several companies to stop promoting milk suppressants for new mothers who don't breast-feed.  The drugs, given to about 700,000 women a year, block milk production following birth and are used to prevent potentially painful swelling of the breasts.  But the FDA says the drugs, which have other uses, rarely are needed to suppress lactation and have potentially serious side effects.  In recent weeks, the FDA has asked three drug makers to voluntarily stop marketing the drugs for use as lactation suppressants.  Squibb Corp., which sells Deladumone, and Dow Chemical Co., which sells Tace, have agreed to comply with the FDA's request.  But Sandoz Pharmaceuticals Corp., whose drug Parlodel is by far the most commonly used medicine for the condition, is balking at the voluntary action.  Sandoz, the U.S. unit of the Swiss drug maker, Sandoz Ltd., sells about $40 million of Parlodel a year, mostly as a lactation suppressant.  Company officials maintain that Parlodel is safe and effective.  At a meeting in June, an FDA committee of outside consultants concluded that Parlodel and the other two drugs are prescribed to many women who never would develop the painful swelling problem.  The committee also was presented data indicating that the drugs' use was associated with a low but still higher than normal incidence of strokes and seizures.  "The committee ruled that the risk, while low, wasn't worth taking since the drugs are rarely needed, or at least not needed to the degree they are being prescribed," an FDA staff member said.  The FDA was investigating the issue last year.  Its inquiry was publicized after the Public Citizen Health Research Group asked the agency to remove the drugs from the market.  In a letter to the group's director last week, the FDA commissioner, Frank Young, said the agency agreed with the advisory committee's recommendation.  "We estimate that, if 100 women are given these drugs, at best 10 may benefit, which means that at least 90% of the women who receive the drugs are exposed to possible side effects from these agents but are not benefited," Dr. Young wrote in the letter to Sidney Wolfe, director of the Washington-based consumer organization.  The FDA apparently hopes Sandoz will join the other companies in taking voluntary action because it wants to avoid a lengthy formal banning procedure.  The FDA isn't asking the companies to pull the drugs off the market since they have other uses.  Doctors, in fact, could continue using the drugs to prevent milk production.  But by taking the voluntary action, the companies would agree to end all promotional activities related to the lactation-prevention use.  In East Hanover, N.J., a Sandoz spokesman said the company will meet with the FDA tomorrow to discuss the marketing ban.  "Sandoz disagrees with the committee's ruling," the spokesman said.  "We think the drug works and doctors should be allowed to make their own decisions about whether they want to use it."  Remember the first rush of excitement over cellular telephones?  Early converts would rhapsodize about the new worlds suddenly opened: trading options from poolside, touching base with the decorator during a shopping safari, conference-calling the time away from the middle of a traffic jam.  Well, Angelenos, who have long been on the cutting edge of portable-phone use, are starting to suffer from cellular fatigue.  Some five years after the revolution began, non-users here are getting tired of listening to all the chatter.  Many of the yakkers themselves are realizing that the technology has limits.  And many, too, are whining that their link to a high-speed life style can turn out to be little more than a ball and chain with automatic redial.  Consider the plight of Steve Hayden, an executive vice president of BBDO Worldwide.  He was driving his Porsche at 7:30 a.m. when the phone rang.  Assuming it was his wife, he answered sweetly, "Hi, Binkie."  It was his boss, Philip Dusenberry, chairman at the advertising agency's New York office.  Later, Mr. Hayden's briefcase phone rang.  It was a drunken dialer in Australia, who insisted on knowing what kind of beer Mr. Hayden drinks.  Then, while cruising around northern California, he talked on his portable phone the entire trip.  "It's one of the most beautiful drives in the world, and I had this stupid phone glued to my ear," he says.  "The phone was overheated.  It was an endless stream of phone calls about insignificant nonsense."  Last month, Mr. Hayden handed the portable over to his wife.  "It was getting to be pathological," he says.  "I was one of those people talking on a briefcase phone in line at the airport."  The number of cellular phones in this city of sprawling freeways has climbed to about 250,000, or 10% of the nation's total, as the wealthy spend more and more time stuck in traffic.  Some drivers even have two.  "That way, if I'm on the phone and I have another agent with me, and he or she is panicking, they can be on the other phone," explains Robert Lee, an agent at Triad Artists Inc.  "I can't drive and enjoy the radio," he adds.  "I have to be on the phone."  Such habits can get expensive.  Rosemarie Stack, the wife of actor Robert Stack, ran up a $500 car-phone bill in May.  "I love that phone," she says, even as she concedes that the bill "was kind of staggering."  Now, she adds, she is using more restraint (though she still makes appointments with her interior decorator from the car) and has cut the bill to $300 a month.  Given the level of chatter, it isn't surprising that the cellular systems have become as gridlocked as the city's roadways.  Many conversations are interrupted as signals cross -- creating an unintended broadcast into an unknown car.  And many car chats end abruptly as a driver moves into a congested area, such as Beverly Hills, or into a valley or canyon.  Yappers call the silent areas "cellular hell."  The two competing cellular services here, Pacific Telesis Group and L.A. Cellular Telephone Co., are both rushing to ease the congestion problem by upgrading their equipment and adding more "cells," the relay stations that provide coverage to a given area.  "It's a radio technology, and it's not perfect," says Betty Bienstadt, a spokeswoman for Pacific Telesis.  In the meantime, users are growing impatient.  "It's obviously out of control," says Terry Christensen, a Los Angeles lawyer.  "The phones are practically useless.  We all drive in and out of Beverly Hills, and it's rare to complete a conversation."  Mr. Christensen adds that he was recently chatting on his car phone when he found himself listening to a stockbroker giving his client a tip.  "I avoided the temptation to buy the stock," he says.  Of course, some crossed conversations are far more tantalizing.  James K. Agnew, executive vice president of the ad agency J. Walter Thompson Co., was talking with a client on his car phone when he suddenly heard an extremely angry woman berating a man for standing her up.  The woman, he says, seemed to be the man's mistress.  "I can't believe you haven't said anything," she finally screamed -- at Mr. Agnew.  "I was so involved," Mr. Agnew admits, "I really didn't want to hang up."  Some users are so nervous about cross talk that they won't discuss anything important on their car phones.  Actress Donna Mills says that when her agent rang her in her Jaguar to go over the contract for her new TV movie, "The Lady Forgets," they kept mum about the actual terms.  "It's just so weird," says Ms. Mills.  "Someone else could get into your conversation.  You just don't know."  Still, Ms. Mills says that when she's driving, she's "almost always on the phone with friends."  But she often discovers that she has been gabbing long after her call has been cut off.  "The technology hasn't kept up," she says.  "Sometimes, you are talking away, and the person doesn't answer.  That happens a lot."  New forms of rudeness are another common complaint.  Mr. Agnew, for instance, says he was driving on the freeway recently and talking to a real-estate executive when the man snapped, "Hold on, my other phone is ringing."  Mr. Agnew wasn't thrilled about being placed on hold in his car.  "It's the most absurd thing," he says.  "He doesn't want to miss a deal."  But those who have two phones insist that both are necessary.  Hard-core chatterers have pinpointed areas where they believe one of the cellular services is clearer than the other.  Budd Holden, a local designer, has two phones in his gold BMW, one for each system.  "PacTel doesn't work when I'm driving to the beach," he says from his car with a sigh -- seconds before his voice disappears in a burst of static.  Fanatics are also taking their new toys into restaurants -- much to the dismay of diners and restaurateurs.  The Bistro Garden in Beverly Hills sees 10 portable phones a day at lunch.  "We frown upon them," says Christopher Niklas, the restaurant's operator.  "It's a bit of a difficult situation.  It's a new phenomenon."  And Tom Kaplan, manager of Spago, frets that "no one will want to come into a restaurant and be surrounded by people on the telephone."  In fact, small battles have been erupting between diners.  Robert Shafton, a lawyer, was lunching with a client at a restaurant called Angie's when a man sat down alone -- well, almost alone -- at the next table.  His portable phone began ringing repeatedly, with calls that had him doggedly negotiating printing prices for stationery.  "He was talking loudly, and he was doing a lot of the talking," says Mr. Shafton.  "It was very irritating.  There was a showoff aspect to it."  After Mr. Shafton complained, the maitre d' asked the offender if he would mind eating in silence.  "Of course I would mind," the man replied, and he continued with his calls.  Eventually, Mr. Shafton and his guest changed tables.  "I wasn't going to get into a fight," he says.  For some users who have reached the end of their cord, the solution is obvious.  Hiram Willis, a director for business development at Interstate Electronics Corp., recalls heading home one rainy evening with the car phone ringing incessantly.  "I grabbed the device and yanked it out" at the end of the ride, he says.  "I was angry at the people who insisted on calling.  You reach a saturation point."  Wouldn't it have been simpler just to turn the phone off?  Whenever he did that, he explains, everyone said, "Gee, we know you were in the car.  Are you trying to avoid our calls?"  American Express Co. named Joan Edelman Spero to the post of senior vice president and treasurer.  Ms. Spero, 45 years old, had been senior vice president for international corporate affairs and retains those duties.  She succeeds John R. Laird, who was named senior executive vice president of Boston Co., a unit of Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc., which is controlled by American Express.  American Express is a financial and travel services concern.  Mr. Laird's post is new and makes him responsible for corporate support and capital management.  Mr. Laird, 47, also was named to the board of Boston Co. as well as its principal subsidiary, Boston Safe Deposit & Trust Co.  The first session of the latest round of U.S.-Japan trade talks ended amicably, but the rosy glow may merely be masking pitfalls ahead.  The success of the talks, which seek to break down structural impediments built into the Japanese economy that the U.S. says curtail Japan's imports and keep its trade surplus high, have been described by both sides as "crucial."  But the discussions are so wide-ranging that talking about changes may prove a great deal easier than making them, officials on both sides say.  And many economists say that any changes wouldn't affect the bottom line for a long time.  "Politically, the talks are very important," says Masaru Yoshitomi, a senior official at Japan's Economic Planning Agency.  "Economically, they won't produce much."  The talks grew out of the realization that despite changes in exchange rates and years of haggling over Japanese market access for foreign products, the $50 billion bilateral trade imbalance hadn't shrunk.  Inspired by a relatively successful series of negotiations on expanding and opening Japan's capital markets, the U.S. proposed to look at deeper "structural" aspects of Japan's economy.  President Bush and Japan's former prime minister Sosuke Uno agreed in July to begin talks in which each side would point out problems in the other's economy.  The goal was to develop a concrete plan for dismantling barriers and counteracting systems that both sides agree stand in the way of improving the trade imbalance.  The U.S. focused on such Japanese problems as the tendency to save a lot but not invest enough on infrastructure, an inefficient distribution system that involves countless middlemen, and business practices that effectively exclude newcomers.  Japan's delegation responded with its list of American ills: the tendency to consume a lot but not save enough, a lack of emphasis on exporting and inadequate worker education, and business planning that focuses on short-term profits rather than long-term productivity.  Few economists question the importance of such moves in the long run, and each side basically agreed with the other's criticism.  But the U.S. is looking for measurable change, and quickly.  "It's essential that we have results," said Michael Farren, the U.S. undersecretary for international trade.  "I can't say what they'll be, but they must come sooner rather than later and have a very specific impact on the trade imbalance."  Many problems stand in the way of speed.  On both sides, the issues are so complex that finding solutions will be especially difficult, involving study that takes time and patience that "we don't always prove to have," said one American familiar with the talks.  Also, unlike the successful capital market liberalization talks which featured streamlined negotiating teams, this time representatives from seven U.S. and at least three Japanese agencies and organizations are involved.  Japan also faces difficulties because the U.S. demands attack powerful entrenched interests, including some major supporters of the besieged ruling party.  Knowing this, U.S. negotiators emphasized that all their suggestions would be good for the Japanese consumer.  The Japanese economy generally has favored producers, but the perception is growing that the consumer should be reaping more benefits from Japan's recent surging wealth.  "We want to work hard to bring Japan in line with international methods," says a leading ruling party politician.  "But to say that Japan's distribution system is strange is to say that Japanese society is strange, that our culture and traditions are strange, that the Japanese themselves are strange."  Although the U.S. approach struck some Japanese as paternalistic, some of Washington's demands may be met because they are recognized by the Japanese as problems.  To the extent that the U.S. focuses on areas where voices within Japan are already seeking change, it has a fair chance of success, trade experts say.  One such area is the distribution system.  In the past week, the Ministry of International Trade and Industry and the Economic Planning Agency proposed reforms to streamline the system.  Major stores are outspoken in urging changes in laws restricting their business, and the Japanese Fair Trade Commission has been flexing its muscles, cracking down on cases of bid-rigging and collusion.  Such changes could be articulated in an interim statement next spring, Japanese officials indicated, and Japan will be watching for the U.S. to make progress on its own problems.  In the meantime, some Japanese officials are beginning to talk quietly about the possibility of emergency actions, perhaps tax incentives or governmental guidance to discourage exports, to quickly deflate the trade surplus and help the talks appear successful next year.  Annualized interest rates on certain investments as reported by the Federal Reserve Board on a weekly-average basis:  @ Week Ended:  @ Sep. 1, Aug. 25,  @ 1989 1989  @ Treasury bills (90 day)-a 7.90 7.98  @ Commrcl paper (Dealer, 90 day)-a 8.69 8.66  @ Certfs of Deposit (Resale, 90 day) 8.79 8.76  @ Federal funds (Overnight)-b 8.96 9.01  @ Eurodollars (90 day)-b 8.85 8.83  @ Treasury bills (one year)-c 8.32 8.36  @ Treasury notes (three year)-c 8.37 8.33  @ Treasury notes (five year)-c 8.26 8.26  @ Treasury notes (ten year)-c 8.25 8.23  @ Treasury bonds (30 year)-c 8.20 8.19  a-Discounted rate. b-Week ended Wednesday, August 30, 1989 and Wednesday August 23, 1989. c-Yields, adjusted for constant maturity.  If you thought Americans considered thrift a virtue, think again.  These days they say it's a Japanese vice.  At least that's one way of interpreting the message U.S. negotiators have brought with them to talks this week in cash-conserving Japan: save less, spend more.  Japan's reply?  The U.S. should save more and spend less.  In what is turning into a minor battle of savings rates, Japan and the U.S. have outlined broadly divergent philosophies on national savings at negotiations this week.  The talks are aimed at lowering economic barriers that prevent Japan from trimming its trade and current-account surpluses.  For most of the past decade, Japan's savings rate has stayed above 20%, while the U.S. savings rate has dropped below 5% -- ending 1988 at 4.2%.  Japan's household savings rate is 15.1%, while the U.S. household rate is 6.3%.  Japanese savings habits aren't letting up, either: A survey released this week by the prime minister's office shows that 52.2% of Japanese over the age of 20 try to squirrel away as much as they can.  That worries the U.S., which figures Japan should channel more public money into infrastructure investment and more private money into consumer spending.  This would spur domestic demand, could help imports and might trim Japan's nagging trade surpluses.  "People are a little uncomfortable saying savings is a bad thing," one U.S. observer says.  But, he adds, "Japan has a massive supply of uninvested savings, and the savings excess fosters and supports their trade surplus."  Meanwhile, Tokyo officials argue that if the U.S. would sock away more money, interest rates in the U.S. would fall, demand for Japanese imports would slacken and the trade and current-account imbalances might flatten out.  The U.S. doesn't necessarily disagree.  "When our Japanese colleagues stated that they thought our savings rate was insufficient, we were in total agreement with them," says Richard McCormack, U.S. undersecretary of state.  He says the U.S. is looking at ways to boost its savings rate.  While the trans-Pacific gap is under discussion, at least one outside economist thinks the bilateral argument is built on artificial struts.  Fumio Hayashi, a professor of economics at the University of Pennsylvania, says the U.S. and Japan calculate savings in such different ways that neither side has it quite right.  Noting that Japan doesn't depreciate national investment at the same rate the U.S. does, Mr. Hayashi is sympathetic with Japan's defense of its savings rate, saying the rate appears much higher than it really is.  In the U.S., he says, investments are valued at market value; in Japan, they're calculated at book value.  "Much of the gap betwen the U.S. and Japanese savings rates is an illusion," Mr. Hayashi says.  But even after adjustment, Japan's savings rate still is about 10 percentage points above the U.S. rate.  Tuesday, September 5, 1989  The key U.S. and foreign annual interest rates below are a guide to general levels but don't always represent actual transactions.  PRIME RATE: 10 1/2%.  The base rate on corporate loans at large U.S. money center commercial banks.  FEDERAL FUNDS: 8 15/16% high, 8 13/16% low, 8 13/16% near closing bid, 8 7/8% offered.  Reserves traded among commercial banks for overnight use in amounts of $1 million or more.  Source: Fulton Prebon (U.S.A.) Inc.  DISCOUNT RATE: 7%.  The charge on loans to depository institutions by the New York Federal Reserve Bank.  CALL MONEY: 9 3/4% to 10%.  The charge on loans to brokers on stock exchange collateral.  COMMERCIAL PAPER placed directly by General Motors Acceptance Corp.: 8.80% 28 to 44 days; 8.75% 45 to 59 days; 8.625% 60 to 89 days; 8.25% 90 to 119 days; 8.125% 120 to 149 days; 8% 150 to 179 days; 7.625% 180 to 270 days.  COMMERCIAL PAPER: High-grade unsecured notes sold through dealers by major corporations in multiples of $1,000:8.87% 30 days; 8.79% 60 days; 8.72% 90 days.  CERTIFICATES OF DEPOSIT: 8.29% one month; 8.30% two months; 8.30% three months; 8.28% six months; 8.28% one year.  Average of top rates paid by major New York banks on primary new issues of negotiable C.D.s, usually on amounts of $1 million and more.  The minimum unit is $100,000.  Typical rates in the secondary market:8.83% one month; 8.77% three months; 8.77% six months.  BANKERS ACCEPTANCES: 8.75% 30 days; 8.65% 60 days; 8.60% 90 days; 8.55% 120 days; 8.43% 150 days; 8.38% 180 days.  Negotiable, bank-backed business credit instruments typically financing an import order.  LONDON LATE EURODOLLARS: 9% to 8 7/8% one month; 9% to 8 7/8% two months; 9% to 8 7/8% three months; 9% to 8 7/8% four months; 9% to 8 7/8% five months; 9% to 8 7/8% six months.  LONDON INTERBANK OFFERED RATES (LIBOR): 9% one month; 9% three months; 9% six months; 8 15/16% one year.  The average of interbank offered rates for dollar deposits in the London market based on quotations at five major banks.  FOREIGN PRIME RATES: Canada 13.50%; Germany 8.50%; Japan 4.875%; Switzerland 8.50%; Britain 14%.  These rate indications aren't directly comparable; lending practices vary widely by location.  TREASURY BILLS: Results of the Tuesday, September 5, 1989, auction of short-term U.S. government bills, sold at a discount from face value in units of $10,000 to $1 million: 7.88%, 13 weeks; 7.87%, 26 weeks.  FEDERAL HOME LOAN MORTGAGE CORP. (Freddie Mac): Posted yields on 30-year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days. 10.13%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.25%, 2% rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  FEDERAL NATIONAL MORTGAGE ASSOCIATION (Fannie Mae): Posted yields on 30 year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days (priced at par).10.06%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 9.10%, 6/2 rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  MERRILL LYNCH READY ASSETS TRUST: 7.95%.  Annualized average rate of return after expenses for the past 30 days; not a forecast of future returns.  A federal jury convicted a Malibu, Calif., man of defrauding lending institutions of $4.5 million, which he obtained ostensibly for real estate projects but used instead to buy expensive cars, a condominium, and a polo pony from actor Sylvester Stallone.  The jury found Michael Saul Scherzer, 45 years old, guilty of six counts of wire fraud for two loan schemes in 1983 and 1984.  He faces a possibile 30 years in prison and a $1.5 million fine, said Terree A. Bowers, assistant U.S. attorney.  Sentencing is set for Nov. 13.  In the first scheme, Mr. Scherzer used falsified financial statements to borrow $1.5 million from E.F. Hutton for a dummy real estate development firm called MicSa International.  He used some of the money to buy a condominium, 11 polo ponies, a 1984 Mercedes 380SL and a Jeep Wagoneer.  In the second scheme, he borrowed nearly $3 million from several out-of-state savings institutions and used the money to buy a Cadillac for co-defendant Alex Tillman, who pleaded guilty to two federal counts and cooperated with the government in its investigation, and the polo pony from Mr. Stallone, the U.S. Attorney's office said.  SAHARA CASINO PARTNERS Limited Partnership, Las Vegas, Nev., said it completed $116.2 million of 12 1/8%, seven-year first mortgage financing secured by its Sahara Hotel & Casino in Las Vegas.  Proceeds will be used to build a 600-room guest tower and a parking garage at the Sahara and to complete a renovation and expansion of the Hacienda Resort Hotel & Casino in Las Vegas to add a 400-room guest tower, a new casino and restaurants.  Part of the proceeds will be used to partially fund construction of a new resort hotel that will cater to the local Las Vegas market.  Salomon Brothers Inc. arranged the financing.  CMS Energy Corp. said it will receive notes with a face value that could go as high as $1.57 billion in its sale of Midland, Mich., plant assets to the Midland Cogeneration Venture.  The venture is converting CMS Energy's mothballed, $4.1 billion Midland nuclear power plant to a gas-fired, cogeneration facility.  Commercial operation is slated to begin the first quarter of 1990.  CMS Energy owns 49% of the venture; other major partners are Dow Chemical Co., Panhandle Eastern Corp. and Coastal Corp.  CMS Energy said it will receive $1.21 billion of notes, subject to certain upward or downward adjustments that the company expects won't exceed $25 million in the aggregate.  An additional amount of notes is being deferred and will be issued if the venture's final, approved capacity rate is more than 3.77 cents a kilowatt-hour.  The venture partners have agreed that the maximum value of the notes cannot exceed $1.57 billion.  The amounts are in line with expectations CMS announced last year.  The utility concern said that currently it plans to sell the notes during the second quarter of 1990.  A CMS Energy spokesman said the company doesn't know yet whether it will take any charges as a result of the sale of plant assets to the venture.  CMS Energy has so far written off roughly $500 million of the Midland plant's $4.1 billion in costs.  ESTATE-FREEZE RULES, out at last, won't placate family-business owners.  IRS Notice 89-99, expected since December, offers crucial guidance on a vexing issue: how to cope with Congress's 1987 blast at techniques, called valuation freezes, for limiting estate tax in passing ownership of a concern to the next generation.  Critics say the law's remedies are worse than the perceived abuses.  While the notice answers many questions, some favorably to families, its complexity shows the law is unworkable, William Diss of Ernst & Young argues.  One favorable step: The notice removes life-insurance trusts from the law's coverage.  It also provides some guidance for correcting past transgressions before a statutory deadline next Dec. 31, says Ross Nager of Arthur Andersen & Co.  But time is short, and many points haven't been clarified.  So family-business owners and tax lawyers and accountants will continue to press for an overhaul of the law or even repeal, CPAs Diss and Nager say.  The Senate Finance Committee staff is reported to be working on a major proposal to revise the law.  DON'T WITHHOLD TAX from unverified expense payments, the IRS says.  Employers are required to report as wages on Form W-2 their unsubstantiated expense payments to employees and their excess expense advances that aren't returned if unused (except for certain perdiem allowances).  These unaccounted-for expenses also have become subject generally to withholding of income, Social Security, and unemployment taxes.  But as the rules are new, the IRS offers employers a break for 1989.  Notice 894, going to employers with the quarterly withholding forms, says the payments aren't subject to 1989 withholding if employers "reasonably believe" that employees used the cash for business purposes.  It also explains adjustments for taxes already withheld.  Unfortunately, there is little guidance on the meaning of "reasonable belief," says Eric Raps of Arthur Andersen.  The notice says the IRS will issue guidance later for 1990 and thereafter.  PRUDENTIAL WINS a mortgage-gain appeal that clarifies a bond-call issue.  Prudential Insurance Co. listed as long-term capital gain its 1972-73 income from prepayment charges to corporations that paid off certain mortgage loans early.  The IRS balked, and the Tax Court upheld its claim that such charges are equivalent to interest income.  Now the third-circuit appeals court has reversed the Tax Court's decision as being based on a misconception about the economic workings of interest rates.  More importantly, says Robert Willens of Shearson Lehman Hutton, the IRS had stipulated that the charges are the equivalent of premiums paid to bondholders when corporations call in bonds early.  The appellate judges agree -- and add that call premiums aren't interest equivalents.  Willens says that should resolve an issue created by IRS-proposed original-issue-discount rules that appear to treat call premiums as interest.  This is important because of proposals to cut capital-gains-tax rates and because individuals may use capital losses to offset such capital gains.  EMPLOYEE BENEFIT and pension plans would pay fees for filing required annual and other reports and for terminating defined-benefit plans, under proposals by the House and Senate Labor committees.  That is like requiring individuals to pay fees for filing Form 1040 returns, protests Hewitt Associates, benefits consultants.  ADS SOLD FOR CHARITY year-round by a commercial firm under contract created taxable business income for an exempt group of volunteers, says IRS private ruling 8932004.  This was true even though the tournament-program advertising proceeds supported exempt youth-athletic meets that the group organized.  A CHARITABLE BEQUEST to an organization that had lost exempt status isn't deductible, the Tax Court tells the estate of Sally H. Clopton, although the IRS didn't announce the revocation of exemption in its weekly bulletin.  The estate trustees should have known through other means.  CHARITY NEED NOT BEGIN at home, but can a foreign country be a charity?  In fact, if a gift to another nation is limited to charitable ends, you may deduct it.  A U.S. resident we'll call Pablo was advised that after he bequeathed his entire estate to a foreign land, but he put no such restriction in his will before he died.  Still, the unidentified country has procedures requiring all bequests to it to go to charitable government or nongovernment programs, so Pablo's estate claimed a charitable deduction, wiping out its estate tax.  But an IRS auditor questioned the deduction; now private ruling 8929001 has denied it.  Because Pablo's bequest wasn't specifically limited to charitable purposes, the ruling says, the foreign government could use the funds for its own aims.  For example, it could substitute the funds for a charitable government appropriation and apply its savings to noncharitable programs.  The ruling questions whether the government's procedures actually benefit charities.  It may even be, the IRS suggests, that Pablo meant to share his estate with the U.S. by paying estate tax.  BRIEFS: The U.S. and West Germany signed revisions to their income-tax treaty, subject to ratification by both. . . .  The U.S. signed an agreement to exchange tax data with the Dominican Republic, subject to ratification by that country, which will gain certain economic benefits as well.  Occidental Petroleum Corp. said it will restructure its flagging domestic oil and gas business, eliminating 900 jobs and aiming to save $100 million a year in the process.  Wall Street was generally upbeat about the move, which analysts described as part of a continuing restructuring process throughout the industry.  "Oxy is one of the more realistic companies in dealing with a relatively long period of low oil prices," said Curt Launer, of Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette.  Still, some questioned how much of an initial savings the company will achieve, given the lucrative severance payments that often come with such reorganizations.  "I think there are going to be some costs associated with putting in the plan that the company didn't identify," said Salomon Brothers' Bernard Picchi.  In fact, Occidental has instituted a retirement-incentive program for the salaried personnel at its Occidental Oil & Gas Corp. division.  The restructuring is expected to be completed by early next year.  Yesterday, in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, Occidental common, ex-dividend, closed at $29.375, up 12.5 cents, on volume of 873,000 shares.  Overall, Occidental's oil and gas division has a work force of about 9,000, half of which is located in the U.S. Total corporate employment stands at 52,500.  More than two-thirds of the job cuts will occur at the main offices of the oil and gas division in Tulsa, Okla.  In turn, field offices in Oklahoma City, Houston and Midland, Texas, will assume some of the paper-pushing responsibilities formerly handled out of divisional headquarters.  In addition to this decentralization, Occidental Oil & Gas said it will consolidate.  The field offices, which now handle only energy production, will begin to oversee processing operations as well.  In another step, the company will combine the management of its domestic and international exploration activities.  "This should put us in the position of what I would consider is a low-cost producer," David A. Hentschel, chairman and chief executive officer of the oil and gas division, said in an interview.  A number of major industrial companies in a range of industries have slashed their work forces recently.  In the past few weeks, Campbell Soup Co. said it would shutter four U.S. plants and do away with about 2,800 jobs; Eastman Kodak Co. said it would dispose of 4,500 jobs and sell off some businesses.  The oil industry has long been enduring a shake-out of its own, trying to regroup after prices tumbled in 1986.  "We're still going through it," asserted Rodger Randle, the mayor of Tulsa, who has watched his city transformed to the point that aerospace and aviation now accounts for the bulk of employment there.  "There are bound to be continued adjustments," he added.  Indeed, although oil prices have rebounded considerably from their nadir, they are still far below their 1981 highs.  Natural gas prices remain soft, too.  Earnings have fallen accordingly.  For the second quarter, Occidental's oil and gas division posted net income of $26 million, down almost 67% from $78 million a year ago.  For the six months, divisional profit fell to $61 million from $233 million.  Sales in the first half slumped to $1.41 billion from $1.5 billion the year before.  Earnings were hurt somewhat by the July 1988 explosion of Occidental's Piper Alpha production platform in the North Sea.  "If you look at the fluctuating price of crude, it forces you to look at the cost of your operations," Mr. Hentschel said.  Occidental, moreover, has always been an active company, regularly paring assets and adding others, including a chemcial unit and a gas pipeline business.  "Oxy," said Mr. Launer, "is a continuing restructuring story."  Mr. Picchi said he also wasn't surprised by yesterday's announcement given that a number of oil companies have begun to re-evaluate domestic exploration in light of high U.S. drilling costs and a tough regulatory environment stemming from the Exxon Valdez spill.  Instead, companies such as Occidental are concentrating on exploration opportunities in Latin America, Southeast Asia and the Middle East.  But Mr. Hentschel insisted that the company is hardly turning it's back on its domestic oil and gas business, which was acquired in 1982 with the takeover of Cities Service Co.  "This doesn't decrease the potential domestically," he said.  "It's just a straight reduction in the cost of doing business."  Cetus Corp. said Ireland approved its Proleukin interleukin-2 drug for use as anti-cancer treatment, joining two other European nations that have cleared the experimental drug.  The Ireland National Drugs Advisory Board approved Cetus's IL-2 drug for use as a treatment for advanced renal cell carcinoma, or kidney cancer, Cetus said.  There has been no effective treatment for the ailment, which kills most patients within 12 months of diagnosis.  The move is a boost for the biotechnology concern, which has had heavy losses while developing new drugs, including IL-2.  Denmark and the Netherlands granted approval in July for IL-2, and "Ireland was one of the important steps we had to go through," said Hollings Renton, Cetus's executive vice president and chief executive officer.  Cetus's way was paved in Europe earlier this year, when an advisory review panel for the European Community recommended that its 12 member nations approve the genetically engineered IL-2 drug as a cancer treatment.  Cetus has set up sales branches in Britain, Italy, France, West Germany and Spain to prepare for the drug's European marketing.  "We should be getting approvals regularly, beginning with more this month," said Mr. Renton.  Cetus expects the rest of the EC to approve IL-2 within six months, he said.  The Irish approval and those before it should also set a precedent around the world, he said.  British Commonwealth countries "really look to regulatory approval in Europe and the U.S." before granting their own approval, he said.  Cetus applied for marketing approval with the U.S. Food and Drug Administration last November.  Cetus says it expects FDA approval in the first half of 1990.  Cetus blamed drug-development expenses for its net loss of $49.9 million in the year ended June 30.  In national over-the-counter trading yesterday, Cetus shares rose 25 cents to close at $16.625.  Warner Bros., which is enjoying its best performance in years as Hollywood's hottest studio with "Batman" and "Lethal Weapon II," promoted three key movie executives.  Warner, a unit of Time-Warner Inc., named Mark Canton, 40 years old, to the newly created post of executive vice president of Warner's world-wide motion picture production.  Bruce Berman, 38, who had been a senior vice president of production, succeeded Mr. Canton as president of the studio's theatrical production division, and Lucy Fisher, 39, who was a senior vice president, was named to the newly created post of executive vice president of theatrical production.  Rumors about the changes at Warner Bros. had circulated for some time.  Executives close to the company say that while the promotions enable Warner to reward three of its top movie executives, the moves aren't likely to change much about the way the studio does business.  Despite the promotions, they noted, Warner Bros.  Chief Executive Robert Daly and President Terry Semel are still the most important players in determining what movies get made at Warner.  Warner said Mr. Canton will work closely with Messrs.  Daly and Semel, overseeing production operations in the U.S. and abroad, including casting and music.  Mr. Berman will run the day-to-day aspects of theatrical production, aided by Ms. Fisher, Warner said.  Mr. Berman came to Warner in 1984 from MCA Inc.'s Universal Studios unit.  Ms. Fisher, who joined Warner in 1981, previously worked at 20th Century Fox Film Co. and Zoetrope Studios.  A former president of the defunct Vernon Savings & Loan Association was convicted of conspiracy and 12 other criminal charges after a trial in which witnesses described the use of thrift funds to pay for women escorts and campaign contributions.  Ex-president Patrick G. King, who denied knowledge of the illicit use of Vernon's funds, was found innocent of 24 other charges against him.  The federal court jury convicted Mr. King of conspiring to defraud Vernon, six counts of making false entries in the thrift's books and six counts of misapplication of funds.  He faces a maximum possible sentence of 65 years in federal prison and a $500,000 fine.  Mr. King became the fifth former officer of Vernon Savings to be convicted of charges resulting from the two-year investigation by the Dallas Bank Fraud Task Force.  Most of the convictions were the result of guilty pleas.  In addition to the officers, one consultant and a former president of a Vernon subsidiary have pleaded guilty to federal criminal charges.  Before joining Vernon Savings in 1983, Mr. King was director of supervision for the Texas Savings and Loan Department, which oversees state-chartered thrifts.  He is scheduled for sentencing Nov. 2 by Judge Robert Maloney of Dallas.  Honeywell Inc. received $115 million in Army contracts for anti-tank weapons and anti-personnel mines.  Exxon Co. USA, a unit of Exxon Corp., and El Paso Refining Co. were awarded Defense Logistics Agency contracts of $87.3 million and $14.1 million, respectively, for jet fuel.  General Dynamics Corp. won an $82.5 million Air Force contract for F-16 aircraft equipment.  Sikorsky International Products Inc., a unit of United Technologies Corp., received a $42 million Army contract for helicopter training of the Royal Saudi Aviation Command.  Boeing Co. was issued $39.4 million in Air Force contracts for aircraft support, Minuteman missile services and B-1B aircraft flight tests.  Ford Aerospace Corp., a unit of Ford Motor Co., got a $23.8 million Air Force contract for TR-1 aircraft ground equipment.  Aeromet Inc. was given a $22.9 million Army contract for meterological and optical test support.  Ingalls Shipbuilding Inc., a unit of Litton Industries Inc., received a $13.8 million Navy contract for cruiser spare parts.  Computer Sciences Corp. received a $12 million Air Force contract for software development.  FMC Corp. won a $10.5 million Army contract for testing an electrothermal gun.  Precision Castparts Corp. was awarded a $10 million Air Force contract for engine parts.  There's a wave of insider selling at Liz Claiborne Inc.  Five insiders, including the company's new chairman and its president, have sold chunks of Liz Claiborne stock since May, according to reports submitted to the Securities and Exchange Commission.  And a company spokeswoman said there have been subsequent sales by insiders that haven't yet shown up in SEC filings.  Do these corporate insiders know something the legions of investors bullish on this apparel maker don't?  Analysts say no.  Glowing reports have been issued in the past two months by Kidder, Peabody & Co., First Boston Corp. and Prudential-Bache Securities Inc., which rated the company an "aggressive buy" for both the short- and long-term.  Despite initial nervousness about what would happen after founder Liz Claiborne retired from the management of the company in May, the stock has "a lot of momentum," said Barbara L. Kahn, analyst at Kidder Peabody.  Ms. Claiborne's absence "in the day to day operations hasn't caused the hiccup in the stock that skeptics had anticipated."  The company's rosy outlook isn't without some thorns, however.  Some analysts fret about its move to broaden its base out of apparel sales and manufacturing into retailing, with its own stores.  The move could end up undercutting the company's revenues from department stores, they say.  But "earnings growth alone should support continued appreciation," according to Ms. Kahn.  In the second quarter, New York City-based Claiborne said its net rose 57% to 33 cents a share from 21 cents a year earlier.  What, then, accounts for the wave of insider selling?  Chairman Jerome Chazen sold 100,000 shares, or 3% of his company stock, a week before Ms. Claiborne formally stepped down.  "Basically, the sales that I've made have been for a combination of taxes and estate planning," said Mr. Chazen.  The company's president, Harvey Falk, sold half his stake in the firm, 30,000 shares for $667,500, shortly before being elected to the top position in May, according to SEC filings.  Mr. Falk couldn't be reached for comment.  Sam Miller, chief financial officer for the company, said Mr. Falk and two vice presidents who also sold shares were "largely selling stakes they acquired through options."  After a holding period, they sold the shares to pay taxes or to pay off loans originally taken to purchase those options from the company, he said.  In the most recent insider sales reported to the SEC, Leonard Boxer, a director, sold 20,000 Liz Claiborne shares for $488,800 in separate sales on July 7 and July 20.  The sale brought the total number of shares Mr. Boxer sold since the beginning of the year to 140,000, or 7% of his holdings in the company.  Mr. Miller said Mr. Boxer was a founder of the company and had a very large Liz Claiborne stake.  He sold to diversify his assets, according to Mr. Miller.  Liz Claiborne closed yesterday at $27, down 50 cents in national over-the-counter trading.  ---  THE TAXMAN COMETH?  Joe C. Davis, a director of Mapco Inc., sold 50,000 shares of the Tulsa, Okla., oil and gas concern for $1.9 million on July 27.  Since May, Mr. Davis has sold a total of 432,500 Mapco shares, or 27% of his stake in the firm.  Mr. Davis declined to comment on the sale, but a spokesman for the company said Mr. Davis had a series of stock sales "for tax reasons having to do with the dissolution of his coal company," Nashville-based Davis Coal.  Mr. Davis received $39.13 per share in his most recent sale.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, Mapco closed at $38.50, up 25 cents.  ---  STEEL SALES: There's been active buying by insiders in Birmingham Steel Corp. shares for the past two years.  But recently, two insiders sold shares, the first sale by insiders since January of 1988, according to SEC filings.  The sales came shortly after Birmingham, which is based in Birmingham, Ala., reported on Aug. 1, that fourth-quarter earnings were down to 59 cents a share from 76 cents a share.  In a July 18 report, Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette Inc. assigned a "hold/sell" rating to the stock.  Robert Powell, controller of the company, sold 3,500 shares on Aug. 3, for $21 each.  The sale represented 32% of his stake in the company.  Mr. Powell said he has been waiting to sell his shares, to meet personal needs, for some time, but that company policy allows such transactions only after earnings have been reported.  M. Monroe Fields Jr., vice president of human resources, sold 12,000 shares on Aug. 8, or 33% of his stake.  Mr. Fields said he sold his shares for personal reasons, rather than any "perception of the way the company is doing."  He added that he had optioned the shares nine months ago and had been waiting for the right time to sell.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, Birmingham Steel closed at $23.75, down 12.5 cents.  ---  PRESIDENT SELLS: James H. Levergood, president of Scientific-Atlanta Inc. sold 45% of his stake in the telecommunications company in August, according to SEC filings.  He received $479,370 for his 25,000 shares.  Mr. Levergood said he sold the shares to pay back a loan he had taken to play the stock market in 1987.  "Then we crashed and burned," he said.  "It's a sad story."  He is the fifth officer of the company to sell large chunks of Scientific-Atlanta stock this year.  The other insiders sold from 44% to 100% of their holdings in the company, in sales ranging from 500 to 14,251 shares.  The sale price ranged from $15 to $21.25 per share.  Robert Meyers, spokesman for the company, said "a significant portion of our officer compensation is in options, so a significant portion of their net worth" is in company stock.  "At times, they have financial needs, or wish to purchase additional options."  The sales don't "indicate any lack of confidence on their part in the company."  Mr. Meyers added that Mr. Levergood has options to purchase about another 110,000 shares.  Two weeks ago, Merrill Lynch & Co. upgraded its investment rating of ScientificAtlanta stock to "above average" from "neutral."  Among other things, the firm said, Scientific-Atlanta's business should benefit from deregulation of cable television.  Still, Merrill calls the stock "speculative."  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, the stock closed at $21.25, up 25 cents.  ---  Peter Pae in Pittsburgh contributed to this article.  Corona Corp. said it ended negotiations to acquire a controlling interest in Bond International Gold Inc. and exercised its right to sell a recently acquired 7% interest in the company.  Corona, a major Toronto gold producer, acquired the interest in June for about $30 million, with an option to increase its stake by a further 20% under an agreement with Dallhold Investments Pty.  Ltd. Dallhold, Bond International's controlling shareholder, is the family holding company of Australian financier Allan Bond, who is also Bond International's chairman.  Corona said the companies couldn't agree on a price for a controlling interest in the company.  In a statement, Peter Steen, Corona's president and chief executive, said: "After not being able to reach an amicable and mutually acceptable price agreement on purchase of control, Corona decided to eliminate its position."  He said "a minority share investment in Bond International Gold was never in our plans."  Corona and Bond International officials declined to comment on the price Bond was seeking for the interest.  Under terms of the agreement, Corona said it will sell its 7% stake to Bell Resources Ltd. of Australia, a company associated with Mr. Bond.  The holdings consist of about four million Bond International ordinary shares and 800,000 ordinary-share purchase warrants, which will be sold at the acquisition price of $7.25 per share and $1 per warrant plus carrying charges.  Bond International, which has interests in 11 mines in several countries, produced about 500,000 ounces of gold in its fiscal year ended June 30.  Corona forecast 1989 gold production at about 635,000 ounces.  Ohio Mattress Co. said Malcolm Candlish, president and chief operating officer, was given the additional position of chief executive officer nine months earlier than had been expected.  As chief executive, Mr. Candlish, 54 years old, succeeds Ernest M. Wuliger, 68.  Mr. Wuliger will continue as chairman until Oct. 11, the date at which he completes 50 years with the mattress manufacturer, the company said.  Mr. Wuliger, whose grandfather founded the company, late last year put Ohio Mattress up for bids, and in April it was sold for $980 million to an investor group led by Gibbons, Green, van Amerongen, a New York merchant banking concern.  Mr. Candlish was recruited by the new owners in June from a position as chairman and chief executive of Samsonite Corp.  Mr. Candlish said he "is hoping that {Mr.  Wuliger} will stay heavily involved" with the company, following his retirement from the chairmanship.  Mr. Wuliger has "valuable contacts" in the bedding industry because of his long service with the company, Mr. Candlish said.  Mr. Wuliger is "a substantial stockholder" in the restructured company and will continue on the board.  The succession occurred ahead of schedule because Mr. Candlish has "taken a quick hold of the company's operations," and is implementing changes to reduce costs and improve cash flow, said Edward W. Gibbons, a partner of Gibbons Green.  Mr. Candlish and Mr. Gibbons said discussions continue with First Boston Corp. on a permanent financing of Ohio Mattress.  A proposed $475 million public bond offering was withdrawn in mid-August because of lack of investor interest.  At the time of the purchase, Gibbons Green invested $170 million of equity, arranged $450 million of bank debt and obtained a $475 million bridge loan from First Boston.  The bond issue was proposed to refinance the bridge loan.  The financing included refunding of some existing Ohio Mattress debt.  Mr. Gibbons declined to predict when another bond issue will be proposed, pending further progress on the cost-reduction program and additional discussions with First Boston.  Curtice Burns Foods Inc. said its board proposed a 3-for-2 stock split, subject to shareholder approval.  The additional shares will be distributed Dec. 20 to stockholders of record Nov. 20 if the split is approved by shareholders at the annual meeting to be held Nov. 15.  The plan calls for exchanging two shares each of Class A and Class B common stock, with par value of $1.48 a share, for three shares of Class A and Class B common, with par value of 99 cents a share, respectively.  This would raise the number of authorized Class A and Class B shares to 14.175 million from 9.45 million.  The total Class A and B shares outstanding would increase to 8.46 million from 5.64 million.  Officials at the food processor and marketer, based here, said the split will make the stock more accessible to investors.  Separately, Curtice Burns said it agreed to buy Brockport Cold Storage Co., Brockport, N.Y., a frozen-foods warehousing concern, but declined to disclose the price.  Curtice Burns is Brockport's principal customer, but the unit will continue public warehousing operations, the company said.  A former broker for First Jersey Securities Inc. pleaded guilty to federal money-laundering charges, according to Samuel Alito Jr., the U.S. Attorney in Newark, N.J.  Kevin O'Donohue, 31, of Cherry Hill, N.J., admitted that he engaged in a money-laundering scheme in which $450,000 was hidden from the Internal Revenue Service, Mr. Alito said.  Mr. O'Donohue and two other former First Jersey brokers, Arthur Basmajan and Dominic Padula, were indicted last May.  Mr. O'Donohue said yesterday that he and Mr. Basmajan concealed cash from the IRS by converting customers' cash deposits into cashier's checks at local banks in amounts less than $10,000 and then depositing those checks into the customers' accounts at First Jersey.  Mr. O'Donohue, formerly a broker at First Jersey's Cherry Hill office, also claimed that Jack Mondel, whom he identified as a branch manager, was aware of the scheme, Mr. Alito said.  First Jersey executives couldn't be reached for comment.  But according to a receptionist at First Jersey in New York City, Mr. Mondel no longer works for the firm.  Mr. O'Donohue will be sentenced Nov. 8 by U.S. District Judge John W. Bissel.  He faces a maximum of five years in prison and $250,000 in fines.  Mr. Basmajan faces a maximimum of 15 years in jail and $500,000 in fines if convicted.  His trial is scheduled to begin Sept. 16.  The current investigation into money-laundering conducted by the U.S. Attorney's Office in Newark is unrelated to five prosecutions brought against First Jersey executives in May 1986.  Two think tanks, Yamaichi Research Institute and Sanyo Investment Research Institute, predicted record earnings for Japanese corporations in the fiscal year ending next March 31.  Yamaichi and Sanyo said strong domestic demand and the yen's decline will help Japanese companies boost earnings to record levels for the third consecutive year.  Japan's economy, drawing strength from robust domestic demand, has been expanding for 33 months in a row.  The yen's slide has been helping Japanese companies improve export profits.  In making the latest projections, Yamaichi assumed that the dollar will average 137 yen, in contrast with 128.3 yen during the prior fiscal year.  Investors didn't return from their Labor Day holiday with any bold new initiatives.  The stock and bond markets both gave a little ground in the same sort of sluggish trading that marked many August sessions on Wall Street.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average closed at 2744.68, down 7.41 points from Friday's record close.  But the Dow Jones Transportation Average hit a new high of 1532.01 as UAL rose 3 3/4 to 290 3/4 on the strength of a $300-a-share bid from an employee group and British Airways.  Long-term bond prices posted modest losses.  Analysts who had predicted the end of summer would bring renewed trading activity were puzzled by the lackluster session.  But they said a lack of major U.S. economic reports this week may have damped enthusiasm.  Instead, portfolio managers apparently are using this quiet time to plot strategy for the remainder of the year.  Stocks and bonds both opened lower in response to a Wall Street Journal article saying the Federal Reserve won't push interest rates down further unless substantial signs of economic weakness appear.  Stock and bond prices recovered at midday but eased again in the afternoon session.  Suresh Bhirud, chief portfolio strategist at Oppenheimer & Co., said that predicting the stock market's course from its current level is difficult.  That, he said, is because stock prices are at lofty levels as a result of the prolonged summer rally, yet the economy appears to be sound and may even grow more strongly than many people expect in the next few months.  The problem with such economic growth, Mr. Bhirud said, is that inflation may heat up along with it.  "I'm predicting that we'll see a strong economy and a moderately inflationary environment," he said.  "At some point the bond market will recognize this.  Interest rates could go higher and cause some consolidation in the stock market."  In major market activity:  Stock prices slipped in light trading.  Volume on the New York Stock Exchange came to 145.2 million shares.  Declining issues on the Big Board were ahead of gainers, 826-618.  Bond prices eased.  The Treasury's benchmark 30-year bond lost less than one-eighth of a point, or $1.25 for each $1,000 face amount.  The yield on the issue rose to 8.13%.  For the first eight months of the year, South Korea exported 216,025 motor vehicles, a decrease of 38% from a year ago, auto makers reported.  The drop was attributed mainly to lost production during labor strikes for higher wages and to sluggish sales in the U.S.  The industry predicted the country's exports will reach about 400,000 by year end, down 30% from last year's 575,000.  South Korean auto makers initially projected exports would reach 650,000 for the year.  Advanced Medical Technologies Inc. said its Fidata Trust Co. subsidiary agreed to an approximate $11.5 million settlement of a lawsuit stemming from its role in the 1985 collapse of the Bevill, Bresler & Schulman government securities firm.  Advanced Medical said Fidata would bear about $6 million of the settlement with the balance covered by insurance.  It said the definitive agreement was subject to approval of a New Jersey federal court overseeing Bevill Bresler's bankruptcy-law proceedings, among other conditions.  Fidata, once known as Bradford Trust Co., along with a unit of Los Angeles-based Security Pacific Corp. acted as clearing agents for Bevill Bresler and were sued and charged with negligence by the failed bond firm's bankruptcy trustee in 1985.  The trustee originally sought damages of $159 million.  A spokesman for Security Pacific said that company hadn't settled the case.  Fidata has basically been in liquidation since the Bevill Bresler litigation began.  Advanced Medical acquired Fidata earlier this year, in what was essentially a bet on the outcome of the suit.  Advanced Medical said it hopes to soon clear Fidata's formal liquidation with a New York state court, which would result in the release to it of cash and investment securities valued at $38.4 million at June 30.  Mitchell Energy & Development Corp. said it increased its capital budget for the fiscal year ending Jan. 31, 1990, by 25% to $172 million from $138 million.  The energy concern said it increased, among other things, its exploration and production division's budget to $73 million from $59 million, and its transmission and processing division's budget to $17 million from $13 million.  Mitchell said a $4 million allocation for corporate and other expenses remains unchanged.  B.F. Goodrich Co. said it agreed to buy Culligan International Co.'s Arrowhead Industrial Water subsidiary.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Culligan is a Northbrook, Ill., subsidiary of E-II Holdings Co. of New York.  Arrowhead, based in Lincolnshire, Ill., employs 250 people and has annual sales of about $35 million.  The unit makes water purifier systems for power-generation plants and other industrial facilities.  The sale is subject to a definitive agreement and government approval.  B.F. Goodrich is a plastics, specialty chemicals and aircraft products concern.  INB Financial Corp. said it signed a letter of intent to acquire closely held CSB Inc. for stock valued at $18.2 million.  INB Financial, a multibank holding company, had assets of $5.87 billion as of June 30.  CSB, based in Chesterton, Ind., is the parent of seven-branch Chesterton State Bank and has assets of about $135 million.  The United Auto Workers union said it is creating a department that will coordinate the union's relationships with auto makers owned entirely or in part by foreign companies.  The Transnational and Joint Ventures Department will cover about 8,000 UAW members who are employed by three Japanese-managed vehicle makers at U.S. sites.  The department will come under the direction of UAW President Owen Bieber's office.  The move, which had been rumored for some time, is part of the union's attempt to consolidate its operations related to Japanese and joint-venture auto makers, which are employing a growing number of U.S. workers.  The affected union members all work under contracts that call for "teamwork" and employ participative management principles.  Labor experts said creating the department should help the union deal with a vexing problem: the increasing number of unrepresented workers employed in plants owned solely by Japan-based companies.  About 12,400 people are employed by such auto makers in the U.S.  A decade ago there were none.  In July the UAW suffered a stinging defeat in its attempt to organize workers at Nissan Motor Corp.'s Tennessee plant.  "I am confident that this new department will enhance our ability to represent current and future members employed by the new breed of manufacturers now operating within the U.S.," Mr. Bieber said in a statement.  The UAW members covered under the new department are employed by New United Motor Manufacturing Inc., a joint venture between Toyota Motor Corp. and General Motors Corp.; Mazda Motor Manufacturing Corp., a subsidiary of Mazda Motor Co. that produces cars for Mazda and Ford Motor Co.; and Diamond-Star Motors Corp., a joint venture between Chrysler Corp. and Mitsubishi Motors Corp.  Somerset Bankshares Inc. said it ended its agreement to buy Central Co-operative Bank for $19 a share, or $35.1 million.  Somerset said it was still interested in acquiring Central, which is also based in Somerville, at a lower price.  Somerset has made several proposals to change the agreement, suggesting cash and stock combinations.  It said Central hasn't responded to its proposals.  Central officials failed to return phone calls.  Returning Members of Congress are talking about the level of anger they encountered over the new Medicare surtax on the elderly.  A new study by the National Center for Policy Analysis helps explain what has people so upset.  Some people who thought their tax-deferred savings would be subject to a lower marginal rate realize that combining normal income taxes, taxes on some Social Security benefits and now this surcharge is taking a strong whack at their incomes.  It's little wonder that some old folks are chasing Congressmen down the street to protest.  The cost of living rose 1% in August, bringing the accumulated increase for the first eight months of this year to 11.1%, compared with 6.3% for the like period a year earlier, the Chilean government reported.  The National Statistics Institute said the increase for the latest 12-month period was 18.3%, up from 13.5% a year before.  The cost of living rose 12.7% in all 1988.  The government aimed for an inflation rate of around 15% this year, but experts say it will probably be higher than that.  Paychecks Are Lagging  For Women in Law Firms  LAW FIRMS pay women substantially less than men in equivalent positions, according to a survey by a legal search and consulting firm.  W.H. Eolis International Inc. found that women nationally earn 74% of what their male counterparts at law firms take home.  Wendeen Eolis, the New York company's chairman, said the study is based on the salaries and partnership distributions of 300 lawyers who graduated from law school between 1955 and 1985.  These lawyers work in firms of at least 65 lawyers in 12 cities.  The greatest compensation discrepancies between men and women occurred in the New York metropolitan area, where compensation was based heavily on how much business the lawyer generated.  Of 60 female partners studied, only six were responsible for $2 million or more in client billings.  Of 60 male partners, 18 were responsible for $2 million or more in billings.  Rita Hauser, a partner at Stroock & Stroock & Lavan in New York, wasn't surprised by the results.  "There are very few women who generate a great deal of business now," she said.  "Hopefully it will change.  There's a much greater network of women in business."  Hollywood Smells a Hit  In Lisa Jones Case  COMING SOON: "Lisa Ann Jones," the movie?  The perjury trial of Lisa Ann Jones, the former runaway who earned more than $100,000 a year as a trader's assistant at Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc., was closely watched last spring not only by Wall Street but by Hollywood, as well.  Producers of TV miniseries and feature films have been pestering Ms. Jones and her attorney for interviews and for the legal rights to her story.  Last month, the 26-year-old was sentenced to 18 months in prison and $50,000 in fines for lying to a grand jury looking into allegedly illegal trades involving Drexel.  "I've had in the range of 20 calls from different producers who want to do her story," said Daniel Bookin, Ms. Jones's attorney in San Francisco.  "At this point Lisa wants to get on with her life.  We've not had any discussions" with the producers.  Some producers are more persistent than others.  Nicholas Krantz left a letter on Ms. Jones's doorstep before he finally reached her by telephone and learned that she isn't interested in a movie deal.  "True-life crime stories are of great interest to the networks," says Mr. Krantz of Paradigm Entertainment, a TV production company.  "This one is a particularly fascinating story.  It's the working-girl-gone-bad story."  Yet some producers don't find the Lisa Jones saga so appealing.  "We looked into the story but decided against it," said Deborah Service, director of television development at ITC Productions.  "You don't want to create a sympathetic character when there's not one.  We don't want to glorify criminals."  Falling NASA Satellite  May Have Legal Fallout  AS AN 11-TON NASA satellite falls to earth, U.S. lawyers prepare to explore the next frontier -- the legal one.  NASA says its Long Duration Exposure Facility is expected to re-enter the earth's atmosphere no later than January 1990.  In the event of any damage caused by falling debris, the U.S. would be bound by the 1973 Convention on International Liability for Damage Caused by Space Objects, which holds the state that launched the satellite liable.  Claims would be handled through diplomatic channels.  The treaty doesn't apply to citizens of the nation that launched the satellite.  U.S. citizens can pursue claims in federal courts, but they may need lawyers adept at working on this planet.  Unlike the treaty, federal law requires that claimants show the injury was due to the negligence of the launching state.  Gary L. Tesch, NASA's deputy general counsel, said the agency will honor its legal obligations but the LDEF is unlikely to cause damage.  A mission to retrieve the LDEF is set for December.  Few court precedents exist for determining liability for injury or damage caused by a falling space object, says Peter Nesgos, a New York space law specialist.  Ten years ago, the Skylab space station fell to earth but caused no damage.  In 1978, the Soviets paid $3 million to clean up an area of Canada after the Cosmos 954 satellite crashed.  Racehorse Owner Wins  On the Legal Track  EVEN A HORSE -- or at least its owner -- can come out a big winner in the brave new world of product-liability litigation.  Take the case of Jodevin, a 10-year-old stud harness trotter that died in 1984.  Jodevin had been injected with K-3, a synthetic vitamin made by Wendt Laboratories Inc., Minneapolis.  Kermit Hinshaw claimed the injection fatally damaged his horse's kidneys and sued Wendt for $3 million.  Last week, Wendt agreed to settle the case for $999,042, the amount Wendt's insurer was willing to pay, said John J. Pappas, the lawyer for Mr. Hinshaw.  Wendt's lawyer, Mark E. Parsky of Chicago, said he doubts the settlement will set a precedent for other animal death cases.  Future plaintiffs will have to show that their animal had documented market value, as Jodevin did.  The nearly $1 million price tag is believed to be the second largest for an animal's death in the U.S., Mr. Pappas said.  A Texas court in 1985 awarded the owner of a prize bull $1.5 million in compensatory damages for its death.  Mellon Bank Corp. said it agreed to buy McMahan Real Estate Advisors Inc., a closely held San Francisco real estate investment advisory concern.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Mellon said McMahan will be merged with its real estate investment unit to form a new subsidiary, Mellon/McMahan Real Estate Advisors Inc.  The bank holding company expects the new subsidiary to be ranked among the 20 largest real estate investment advisory firms in the U.S., with more than $1 billion in assets under management.  The acquisition is subject to approval by the comptroller of the currency.  Nursery Numbers Game  My playing the market dilemmas were nil  Back when pork-belly futures arose --  As pigs off to market gave my kids a thrill  In tales told on their tiny toes.  -- Mary Mobilia.  ---  Emotional Outlets  With telecommunication  And less need for human alliances,  You can always call home if you're lonely  And talk to your appliances.  -- Pat D'Amico.  ---  Truth Capsule  An entrepreneur is a crapshooter with financing.  -- Robert Orben.  Jannock Ltd. said it agreed to acquire two vinyl siding manufacturers from Redpath Industries Ltd. for about 37 million Canadian dollars ($31.3 million).  The acquired companies will have combined sales of more than C$80 million for the year ending Sept. 30, Jannock said.  In 1988, Jannock had sales of C$313.7 million.  Jannock is a brick manufacturer.  Redpath is a sugar refiner that also produces automotive, industrial and building products.  Both companies are based in Toronto.  One of the surest bets on Wall Street in recent years is about to become less sure.  Responding to years of complaints and innuendo, Standard & Poor's Corp. is planning to "pre-announce" changes in its S&P 500 index in an experiment starting Oct. 1.  In the experiment, almost all the 25 to 30 annual additions and deletions to the widely followed index will be announced a week ahead of time, rather than the night before.  This change is designed to ease the order imbalances and price run-ups that typically happen to stocks newly added to the S&P.  Until now, it has been almost a given that a stock will rise -- usually about 5% -- on the day that S&P, a McGraw-Hill Inc. unit, adds it to the S&P 500.  That's because about $150 billion is invested in large funds that are designed to emulate the S&P; so, on the day a new stock is added, money managers around the world scramble to buy it.  Although index funds have been around since the early 1970s, the so-called S&P Stampede has been getting worse in recent years, say money managers.  They also raise questions about how easy it would be to make money illegally if someone finds out the day before what stock is about to be added to the index.  The stampede "has been a problem as more and more assets are indexed.  There is also a potential source of shenanigans, if you will," says William Fouse, chairman of Mellon Bank Corp.'s Mellon Capital Management Corp., San Francisco.  Mr. Fouse says the new S&P experiment is "an excellent idea," though he suggests an even longer advance notice of changes.  With a full week in which new additions can be bought, index-fund managers may not be forced to buy a new S&P stock at steep prices.  The only stock in recent memory that declined sharply, rather than rose, on the day it was added to the S&P was Marion Laboratories.  It closed at $17.75 on May 4, 1988; it joined the S&P the next day and plunged more than $2 -- but that was because of a negative news announcement that day.  Trading costs associated with additions to the S&P is the major problem that index funds have in the supposedly easy task of tracking the S&P, says Stephen Manus, managing director of equity index funds at ANB Investment Management Co., a division of American National Bank & Trust Co. of Chicago.  He says S&P's idea "is an improvement.  It'll probably make things better in the long run."  According to S&P, while changes will be announced a week ahead under the new policy, actual changes in the index will continue to be made on Wednesdays after the close, except in "special situations."  S&P isn't doing all this just to be nice.  The company has been trying to make more profit from publishing of the S&P 500 index and related products.  The concern over the stampede effect seems part of an effort to improve relations with big investors.  "This 'S&P effect' is obviously quite noticeable and quite dramatic.  We certainly don't want to do anything to create volatility," says Elliott Shurgin, publisher of S&P index products and services.  Early last month, Kaiser Permanente, the big health-maintenance organization based in Oakland, Calif., abruptly pulled Bolar Pharmaceutical Co.'s generic blood-pressure medicine from its pharmacy shelves, and replaced it with Dyazide, the brand-name version.  Kaiser's action was sparked by the Food and Drug Administration's widening investigation of corruption in the generic drug business.  "Until the FDA clarifies {its position on Bolar's drug} for us," says a Kaiser spokesman, "we're unwilling to continue" dispensing the medication.  Since late June, the FDA has moved to revoke its approval for 30 generic drugs made by three companies; another 141 compounds are under less severe "suspension."  Bolar and other companies that account for about 18% of the generic market are under FDA investigation.  The generic industry says it expects a short-lived controversy.  "We have a solid record of safety and efficacy and a solid base of millions of people walking around benefiting from quality, affordable medicine," says Jay Molishever, a spokesman for the Generic Pharmaceutical Industry Association, a trade group.  Bolar says its version of Dyazide is safe and effective, and it is contesting the FDA's efforts to force the drug from the market.  Although so far there is little evidence that patients or professionals have rebelled against generic drugs, and no proof that generics are unsafe substitutes, the scandal is opening a new chapter in the rivalry between brand-name drug companies and generics.  Publicly, the Pharmaceutical Manufacturers Association, which represents the brand-name side of the industry, is taking a low-profile stance on the FDA investigation.  But its members -- including some of America's top drug makers -- are eagerly using the controversy to renew their attack on generic companies.  SmithKline Beecham PLC, maker of Dyazide, fired off a telegram to pharmacists last month after both of Dyazide's generic competitors were implicated in the inquiry.  The investigation "certainly reaffirms the necessity for dispensing your 'Dyazide' prescriptions with the branded product," the telegram said.  News of the FDA probe has delayed consideration in New Jersey of legislation that would encourage doctors to prescribe generic drugs.  And brand-name companies are likely to get a boost later this month from the American Academy of Family Physicians, which represents 66,000 doctors.  It is expected to approve at its annual meeting a resolution opposing blanket generic substitution and urging the FDA to tighten its review of generic drugs to ensure that they achieve results comparable to brand-name products.  At stake for the drug industry is a $25 billion retail and hospital market.  Brand-name companies, which already produce a big share of generic drugs themselves, would gain even more clout if the scandal results in a shakeout among generic drug companies.  For the generic industry itself, the timing of the controversy is bad: It comes just as new product opportunities loom.  From 1991 to 1995, patents will expire on drugs accounting for $10 billion in annual sales, including some of the industry's largest sellers ever: SmithKline's Tagamet, and Glaxo Group PLC's Zantac, both anti-ulcer drugs.  But the federal government, health insurers and others seeking to control health costs have an enormous interest in a viable generic industry, whose products cost about half as much as their brand-name counterparts.  Thus, unless substantial evidence is amassed that generics are unsafe or ineffective, these powerful forces will keep them thriving in the market.  For consumers who switch to brand-name drugs, by choice or necessity, the probe means immediate price increases, and in the long term it may result in higher prices for all generic drugs.  Uncertainty bred by the investigation could be bad medicine in itself: Some doctors worry that elderly patients in particular may be prompted by doubts or higher costs to cut back on medications they need to control chronic illnesses.  That could worsen their symptoms and their health.  Companies have made generic forms of brand-name drugs for more than two decades, but the industry didn't become a major presence until 1985, after Congress passed the Waxman-Hatch Act, expediting the approval process for the compounds.  Rather than prove the effectiveness of the drugs in lengthy and expensive clinical trials, companies now only have to show the FDA that their product is "bioequivalent" to its brand-name counterpart -- that it acts on the body in the same way.  Since the law became effective, generic drugs' share of all prescriptions issued has soared to one-third from less than 10%, says Hemant K. Shah, a Warren, N.J., analyst who follows the generic industry.  The impact on brand-name companies has been especially pronounced because the number of prescriptions issued has remained essentially flat.  The growth of the generic industry was fueled in part by the expiration of patents in the early 1980s on several popular drugs, and by concern over soaring health costs.  Medicaid programs, state laws and public and private insurance plans contain strong incentives for doctors and patients to choose generic drugs, if available, over brand-name versions.  Twenty-nine states specify that pharmacists dispense generic compounds unless physicians have written "brand name required" or a similar phrase on prescriptions.  Brand-name companies have responded in two ways: by questioning the bioequivalence of many generic drugs -- the FDA allows a 20% variance in dosage and rate of absorption for the compounds -- and by entering the generic business themselves.  The Pharmaceutical Manufacturers Association says that in many cases, generic drugs have produced different clinical results than the original drugs.  But the evidence is mostly anecdotal, and the generic industry says similar variations can occur from batch to batch of brand-name medications.  Still, many doctors insist on brand-name medications for illnesses such as arrhythmia, epilepsy, thyroid conditions and some psychoses, where precision in the dosage is deemed crucial to controlling the disease, says the AMA's Dr. Gifford.  Last year, the FDA issued a report saying there was no scientific basis to challenge the bioequivalency of generics.  But the FDA's own probe may effectively reopen the issue, since some targets of the inquiry falsified bioequivalency data.  Meanwhile, some brand-name companies, particularly Squibb Co., Warner-Lambert Inc., American Cyanamid Co. and Ciba-Geigy Corp., have established generic businesses themselves.  Mr. Shah says those four makers account for 25% of prescriptions for generic versions of drugs that have gone off patent since 1980.  "It's one of those situations where if you can't beat 'em, join 'em and then beat 'em," says David Knapp, acting dean of the University of Maryland's pharmacy school.  Ironically, any shakeout prompted by the FDA investigation could strengthen the brand-name companies' grip on the generic industry.  "The generics left on the marketplace could be the generics made by the innovator houses," says Diane Giaquinta, director of pharmacy and vision at Blue Cross of California.  "Generics made by trade-name houses tend to be more expensive, so prices could go up."  Prices could also rise if the FDA requires a more intensive review before approving generics for the marketplace.  For the elderly, in particular, the cost issue becomes a health issue.  "Price inhibits demand for medication," says Stephen Soumerai of the department of social medicine at Harvard Medical School.  "If it turns out that many poor elderly are prescribed brand-name drugs when the generic drug they are taking is perfectly safe, it could be very problematic."  John McHugh, pharmacy president for the American Association of Retired Persons, says, "If we can't use the generics, {our members} are going to have to pay double or more for the brand names."  AARP members pay $15.95 for a three-month supply of Bolar's version of Dyazide, and $31.95 for SmithKline's brand-name product.  One arthritis medication, he adds, costs $75 in its brand-name form but just $7 as a generic drug.  Until the government actually orders the withdrawal of generic drugs from the market, some price-conscious consumers aren't likely to switch to brand-name drugs.  Despite the FDA investigation, AARP, which dispenses 15 million Bolar blood pressure tablets to its members annually, continues to ship them through its mail-order pharmacy.  Says Mr. McHugh: "If doctors still prescribe it, we can still dispense it, and we will."  Commercial Intertech said it authorized an odd-lot share repurchase program between Sept. 16 and Oct. 20.  The program allows shareholders owning fewer than 100 shares to sell their stock without paying brokerage commissions or other costs.  The per-share purchase price will be the closing price of the stock on the date share certificates are received by the company's transfer agent.  Commercial, a maker of fluid purification systems, hydraulic components and other metal products, said the repurchase program will help it reduce costs of maintaining shareholder accounts and communications.  Sometimes, not even a home run is good enough.  James H. Morgan, who has hit more than his share of home runs in this column's stock-picking contest, did it again last month.  Porta Systems Inc., his August selection, soared 23% during the month.  That gave Mr. Morgan, president of Morgan Investments Inc. in Greenville, S.C., his sixth victory in seven tries.  But it wasn't enough to keep Mr. Morgan and the three other investment professionals in the contest from losing out to a group of dart-throwing amateurs.  Four stocks "selected" by Wall Street Journal staffers hurling darts at the stock listings outgained (on average) a quaret of stocks carefully chosen by the four pros.  This is the fourth time the darts have beaten the pros during the 11 months the stock-picking contest has been running.  The dart-throwing brigade was helped in August by a lucky hit: Walt Disney Co.  While Disney executives enjoyed the acquisition of the Muppets last month, Disney stock rose more than 9%.  In addition, the dart board portfolio had no losers in August, while two of the pros' picks declined, one of them by more than 14% (see table).  The pros get a chance to redeem themselves this month.  Mr. Morgan's September selection is a stock he hopes is a turnaround situation: Whitehall Corp., a Dallas-based defense-electronics and oil exploration-equipment company.  Whitehall "had a couple of lousy years," Mr. Morgan says, losing money for six consecutive quarters through this spring.  But it made a small profit in the June quarter, and Mr. Morgan thinks a comeback is beginning.  A Whitehall subsidiary, Aero Corp., was convicted in 1988 of conspiring to defraud the government and falsifying labor costs.  Aero was barred from dealing with the Defense Department until October 1990.  But Mr. Morgan notes that charges against the parent company were dropped, and that the suspension has forced Aero to beef up its aerospace work for non-government clients.  More important, he says, the company's oil exploration-equipment units chip in about 40% of revenue, making Whitehall a "backdoor play" on an incipient revival in the Oil Patch.  Seismic Engineering Co. makes acoustic sensors used to detect promising formations for drilling offshore.  Seismic Explorations International owns four survey vessels that serve major oil companies.  Whitehall's balance sheet doesn't look like that of "a company that just had two or three hard years," says Mr. Morgan.  "There's no long term debt -- zero."  He would buy the stock, recently selling at about $15.75 a share, for any price "up to about $18 or $20."  The other professional investor returning to the contest this month is James P. Craig, portfolio manager for Janus Fund in Denver.  Back in April, he recommended Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp., familiarly known as Freddie Mac.  It had risen more than 38% through Aug. 31, earning Mr. Craig another pick.  His new choice, defying several Wall Street sell recommendations, is Federal Express Corp.  What worries brokerage-house analysts, Mr. Craig says, is that Federal Express is still losing money abroad and that integrating its recent acquisition, Flying Tiger Line, will be "slow and cumbersome."  But Mr. Craig thinks Flying Tiger was a terrific prize.  "Tiger has routes that cannot be duplicated," he says.  "It has landing rights and facilities in Tokyo that no one else has," as well as similar footholds in places such as India, Singapore and China.  Federal Express currently enjoys about a 12% profit margin on its U.S. business.  With time, Mr. Craig figures foreign operations will round into similar shape, enabling Federal to earn $6.50 to $7 a share per year.  Once investors realize what's coming, he says, they'll push the stock (which has recently sold for about $55 a share) to $70 or more.  However, he wouldn't chase the stock at prices above $55, reasoning that there are enough "bear stories" around (including concern about unionization of pilots) to give investors entry points at $55 or below.  Joining Messrs.  Morgan and Craig are a pair of new contestants.  One is Sarah A. Stack, associate director of research at Bateman Eichler, Hill Richards Inc., a Los Angeles brokerage firm.  She picks Countrywide Credit Industries Inc., which issues and services home mortgages.  Ms. Stack figures that competition in mortgage lending may diminish, as savings and loan associations are closed or merged into commercial banks.  Furthermore, Bateman Eichler sees a fundamental trend to lower interest rates.  That could fatten profit margins for mortgage lenders: The rate they pay to get money will probably drop faster than the rate they charge to lend it out.  She likes Countrywide because its large size makes it a "low-cost producer" of mortgages.  That is important, she believes, because mortgages will become more of a uniform product: "Fewer bells and whistles will be attached to mortgage financing."  In particular, customers are showing a clear preference for fixed-rate mortgages rather than adjustable ones.  Countrywide already has fixed rates on more than 80% of its mortgages.  Accordingly, Ms. Stack would buy Countrywide at prices up to $10 a share or so.  The shares recently have sold for about $9.375, and she thinks they "should be valued at $13 to $14."  The other new contestant is Neil T. Eigen, portfolio manager for the Integrated Resources Aggressive Growth Fund and two other mutual funds at Integrated Resources Inc. in New York.  Mr. Eigen selects Wolohan Lumber Co., whose stock is traded over the counter.  The stock has recently sold for around $17.50 a share; Mr. Eigen recommends buying it at any price up to about $21.  Wolohan operates about 50 building-supply centers in the upper Midwest.  Mr. Eigen likes it because it carries a more modest price tag than better-known companies in the same business, such as Hechinger Co., Lowes Cos. and Home Depot Inc.  Those stocks sell for 14 times earnings per share or more.  Wolohan goes for a mere 8.5 times earnings.  Mr. Eigen maintains that Wolohan doesn't have any hidden defects that account for its modest valuation: "It's just unrecognized."  The company, he says, is "only followed by one or two analysts in the entire country," but has "a good mix of business" (about 45% professional builders, 55% do-it-yourselfers) and is "very, very service-oriented."  With interest rates down a few pegs this year, Mr. Eigen figures more people will be buying homes (old and new) and turning to building supply stores like Wolohan for the materials to apply the finishing touches.  ---  @ Experts vs.  Darts in August  @ PERFORMANCE*  @ JULY 31-  @EXPERT AFFILIATION RECOMMENDATION AUG. 31, 1988  @James Morgan Buy: Porta +23.6%  @Morgan Investments, Inc. Systems Inc.  @Greta Marshall Plan Buy: Fedders Corp. + 5.4  @Marshall  @Jack Associated Family Buy: Gillette Co. - 2.5  @Orben Services Inc.  @Theodore Sage Rutty & Co. Buy: National Computer  @Levy Systems Inc. -14.7  @Experts as a group + 2.9  @Dartboard Portfolio** + 4.7  @Dow Jones Industrial Average + 2.9  @*Capital gain or loss only  @**Four stocks picked by throw of darts: Walt Disney Co., up 9.6%; Vulcan Materials Co., up 5.4%; J.P. Industries Inc., 2.5%; Hopper Soliday Corp., 1.4%.  The scandal surrounding unauthorized transactions with Iraq by Banca Nazionale del Lavoro's Atlanta branch widened.  The lion's share of the BNL branch's export letters of credit to Iraq had only the backing of that country's central bank, according to a Moody's Investors Service Inc. credit analyst who cited talks with the state-owned Italian bank.  That would leave Italy's largest bank with a potential exposure of between $1 billion and $2 billion if war-weakened Iraq should fail to pay its debts, said Katy Rossow, assistant vice president at Moody's in New York.  BNL says that "most" of the branch's letters of credit were backed by the U.S. Agriculture Department's Commodity Credit Corp.  In addition, the potential scope of the scam was broadened last night as a prominent BNL client said that a request made in Italy to have Iraqi letters of credit guaranteed was carried out by BNL's Atlanta branch.  The Bank of Italy said it is investigating BNL's activities in Italy, as well as in the U.S.  Meanwhile, BNL's nonvoting savings shares were suspended from trading on the Milan Stock Exchange after plunging nearly 10% Monday.  And political pressure grew for the ouster of BNL's chairman, Nerio Nesi.  In August, BNL had announced that it was under investigation by U.S. and Italian banking authorities for "unauthorized" transactions carried out by its Atlanta branch.  The branch issued letters of credit for an unspecified sum to finance the export of agricultural products and machinery to Iraq, without seeking the required approval from New York and its Rome headquarters, BNL said.  The bank still hasn't given a figure on the unauthorized lending, citing internal and bank-authority investigations that are under way.  BNL's spokesman said reports that the letters of credit totaled $3 billion, were "too high."  He added, however, that the bank had discovered at least 2,500 unauthorized operations in the scam.  Nonetheless, BNL asserts that the scam won't affect its earnings because a large part of the letters of credit were backed by the Commodity Credit Corp.  The agency guarantees payment of 98% of the principal should a borrower default.  But "it's the other part that concerns me, obviously," said Moody's Ms. Rossow, who has put BNL's senior debt on review for a possible downgrade.  She says Iraq is considered a poor credit risk following its long war with Iran.  Whether the letters of credit result in losses or not, the size of the scam and the fact that it apparently went undetected for several years have sparked sharp criticism for the bank and its management in Italy.  Some newspapers reported that the government might even suspend management and appoint commissioners to run the bank while investigations -- which are also being carried out by the Federal Bureau of Investigation and a Rome magistrate -- continue.  In Rome, politicians from two governing parties and the opposition Communists demanded that the government take disciplinary action against top officials of the bank, which is controlled by the Italian Treasury.  Even the normally sedate business paper Il Sole-24 Ore, published by Italy's employers confederation, called in a scathing front-page editorial for the resignation of Mr. Nesi.  Mr. Nesi, a Socialist, has called an emergency board meeting of the bank for tomorrow to discuss the Atlanta affair, but a BNL spokesman said it was unlikely that Mr. Nesi would offer his resignation.  The Atlanta scam isn't the first time BNL's management practices have been called into question.  In 1986, after completing a routine inspection of the big bank, Bank of Italy concluded among other things that BNL lacked professional management and adequate internal controls on the granting of credit.  The central bank also complained, in a confidential report that was leaked to the Italian press, that branch managers had too much freedom in granting credit and that they had breached credit ceilings.  The report did not single out the Atlanta branch, however.  Separately, a disclosure by Cecilia Danieli, chairman of steel-plant maker Danieli S.p.A., a leading BNL customer, may broaden the geographical scope of the investigations.  Ms. Danieli said last night that in May, her company had asked the Udine, Italy, branch of BNL to guarantee an Iraqi letter of credit for about 100 billion lire ($71 million) of steelmaking equipment.  The Udine branch received confirmation, she added, but from BNL's branch in Atlanta.  There's a strong political impulse to launch U.S. military and technological power against drug problems in Latin America.  But some here say the U.S. would be wise to control such urges.  "Say we sprayed all the coca plants and devastated the countryside and just ended coca traffic," says Rence Lee, an analyst of Third World economies who has just written a book on cocaine traffic entitled "White Labyrinth."  What would follow, he asserts, is political and economic chaos in Colombia, Peru and Bolivia, coupled with a rise in left-wing guerrilla groups.  Meanwhile, unabated cocaine demand from the U.S., he adds, would result in fresh plantings of coca, the resilient, woody plant that is being grown increasingly throughout the Amazonian jungle and in Andean valleys.  At the moment, the threat of Yankee military power intimidates the Latin American drug lords less than the jurisdiction of the U.S. court system.  Last week major drug traffickers escalated a bombing campaign in Colombia, seeking to have the Colombian government negotiate amnesties to block their extradition to the U.S.  Still, some U.S. officials -- most notably, drug czar William Bennett -- openly muse about the potential of military action in or against the drug-producing countries.  He is intent on deploying U.S. military advisers for "low intensity" warfare in Colombia, as well as tapping the Pentagon for more logistical and intelligence support for anti-drug forces.  Over the weekend, in fact, replacement parts for U.S. Blackhawk helicopters began arriving in the jungles for use in the drug war.  U.S. helicopter instructors have also landed in recent days.  But there's plenty of risk even in such limited excursions; after all, the use of military advisers teaching "low intensity" warfare accounted for the nation's first involvement in Vietnam in the early 1960s.  Mr. Bennett is quick to say that he has no plans to "send in the 82nd Airborne next week."  But he does say he will look for more from "this enormous resource, this thing we spend $300 billion on" -- the Pentagon.  The eventual massive use of U.S. power in Vietnam ultimately failed from a misunderstanding of local politics -- just as it would falter in South America, critics say, unless the U.S. gets a better grasp on the political and economic stakes in the drug trade.  Although roughly 90% of the profit from cocaine is earned after it reaches the U.S., the 10% or so earned in the exporting countries accounts for upwards of half their foreign-exchange earnings.  "You would be talking about destroying the resources of people who don't have any other income," says Gregory Treverton, an analyst for the U.S. Council on Foreign Relations.  He argues that the U.S. must find ways to attack the drug traffickers and, at the same time, apply economic aid that can lure as many as a million poor farmers out of the coca fields and back to growing legitimate crops, such as coffee.  The cocaine trade begins with these farmers, who are busy tearing up the Amazon jungle and Andean valleys to grow coca, which is transformed there into a crude paste.  Coca paste becomes cocaine in more sophisticated chemical processing plants in Colombia.  Tampering with a cash crop like coca -- which is grown legally in Peru and Bolivia -- will be especially tricky because the prices of traditional income earners, such as tin and coffee, have been falling.  To a small degree, at least, the U.S. already has conducted an attack on coca production.  According to the U.S. State Department, the herbicide Spike and a similar chemical have been sprayed from the air on a patch of the coca-rich Upper Huallaga Valley of Peru as part of a joint U.S.-Peruvian government experiment.  Sendero Luminoso (the Shining Path), a violent, Maoist, drug-dealing guerrilla group, has begun to organize Peruvian farmers, blaming health problems from allegedly widespread U.S.-sponsored aerial spraying.  "We anticipated there would be a backlash," says Catherine Shaw, spokeswoman for the Bureau of International Narcotics Matters.  She says the matter of whether to use the chemicals on broader areas is still subject to environmental study.  U.S. environmental groups, such as Greenpeace, have protested the Peruvian use of Spike, which is used in the U.S. to kill brush-like plants while leaving other types of vegetation.  ---  Peter Truell contributed to this article.  ---  @ The Profit in Cocaine  @ One kilogram (2.2 lbs.) of  @ cocaine in Bogota = $ 2,000  @ One kilogram of cocaine  @ sold at wholesale in Miami = 14,000  @ One kilogram of cocaine  @ transformed into crack and  @ sold at retail in U.S. inner  @ cities (@$10 a dose) = 140,000  @ Source: Inter-American Drug Abuse Control Commission of the Organization of American States  Measured in media time, the HUD scandals are now four months old.  Measured in real time, this story is at least 24 years old.  Congressional hearings into the "HUD scandal" will resume this month as Members compete to register their shock that something called influence peddling has been taking place in the environs of Washington.  But the Department of Housing and Urban Development was created in 1965, an event that might as well have been an engraved invitation to every potential influence peddler in America.  Instead of giving the poor housing vouchers to buy their own shelter, Congress decided that it would involve itself heavily in the residential real-estate business.  Congress accomplished this by making sure that the housing money flowed through and to middlemen.  The middlemen, of course, included everyone connected with the wonderful world of subsidized real-estate development -- Congressmen themselves, federal bureaucrats, state and local politicians, bankers, unions and the developers.  Somewhere at the bottom of this long, trickle-down funnel, no doubt, would be the genuinely poor.  This system essentially guaranteed that throughout HUD's existence, someone -- whether Congressmen or the consultants -- would be lobbying the department for contracts.  Maybe it's theoretically possible to set up a more pristine system for doling out HUD's millions, but there is zero talk in Congress of such reform.  That would diminish Congress's ability to win favors for constituents, and to get political contributions from some of those constituents.  Under Jimmy Carter's presidency, for example, Section 8 HUD spending soared and much of it flowed to developers with Democratic ties.  One major Carter contributor, Thomas Rosenberg of Chicago, won HUD funding for no less than 35 housing projects.  According to a 1980 study by the Boston Herald, 70% of the campaign money Mr. Carter raised in Massachusetts in 1979 came from Section 8 developers, who in turn got 90% of all Section 8 grants in the state.  One developer told the Herald, "We've been rowing the boat for Carter in Massachusetts.  In return, the President has been generous, to say the least."  None of this "influence peddling," all well known at the time, attracted any Congressional or media outrage.  Why should it, since Members were often the ones lobbying HUD for projects on behalf of developers?  One Member whose interest in HUD was, until recently, limited to shoveling pork back home is Rep. Barney Frank (D., Mass.), chairman of the housing oversight panel until 1987.  Former HUD officials say Rep. Frank constantly demanded bigger grants for his district, including one for $500,000 for which he personally thanked HUD Secretary Sam Pierce.  Mr. Frank explains that lobbying by Members is totally different from that of HUD consultants because the Members don't profit directly from the grants and are merely providing "constituent service."  All this time spent with HUD on "constituent service" must be the reason Members in the 1970s and early 1980s didn't notice a mounting pile of reports by then HUD Inspector General Charles Dempsey detailing corruption and abuses in HUD programs.  "HUD has over the years been a very political agency, and it's bipartisan," Mr. Dempsey told Human Events magazine.  "Many congressmen wanted things to go on the way they were because the developers and home builders were very interested in having these programs go on.  It didn't bother them that much."  Now that some HUD officials have dared to steer some housing funds to their friends, instead of letting the Members parcel them out, Congress is steaming.  Rep. Marty Martinez (D., Calif.) publicly lectured HUD Secretary Jack Kemp on proper Beltway etiquette.  He said that under Sam Pierce he was irritated "that it was so difficult for many of us in Congress to open the doors for our constituents to the opportunities that should have existed there for them.  And I have full confidence now that the situation will be remedied."  For all his shortcomings, Sam Pierce did try to close down the most abused programs and expand the use of vouchers.  But Congress still insists that none of the scandal-tarred programs be cut.  Perhaps the one obvious lesson to be drawn from all this is that if you are truly put off by the sight of political influence peddling, don't create subsidized programs in the first place.  But it looks as if Congress is drawing a somewhat different lesson from the HUD affair: Never leave a paper trail.  The new appropriations bill for the Interior Department actually has a provision that prohibits Interior employees from keeping any record of contacts with "Members and Commitees of Congress and their staff."  It will be interesting to see if this anti-accountability measure spreads to other appropriations bills, including HUD's.  Cooper Industries Inc. said it agreed to end talks to be acquired by the Dual-Lite Inc. unit of Insilco Corp. of Midland, Texas.  Cooper said the companies couldn't reach an agreement.  Dual-Lite is a maker of emergency lighting products and systems.  Cooper is a diversified manufacturing concern.  Johnson Worldwide Associates Inc. said its Sweden-based Swedpoint AB unit was merged with Boras Stampelfabrik AB, with Johnson holding a majority stake in the new company.  Johnson, a holding company for a number of manufacturing concerns, didn't disclose terms.  An official said the merger will strengthen Johnson's position in the Swedish market and "give us an opportunity to more fully develop the market in Europe."  Swedpoint makes inking and stamping equipment; Boras makes stamps and related products in Sweden and Britain.  The new company will be known as Unigraphics AB.  Plains Petroleum Co. said it reached an agreement calling for KN Energy Inc. to pay 5.75% more for natural gas bought from Plains in 1990.  Under the one-year contract, KN will pay about $1.84 per million British thermal units next year, up from about $1.74 in 1989.  KN, a Lakewood, Colo., gas distribution concern, purchases about 92% of the natural gas produced by Plains.  Plains said the higher price will raise its 1990 revenue by about $2 million.  Under a separate agreement, KN agreed to end certain contracts and allow Plains to sell natural gas previously dedicated to KN. Plains said the amount of reserves released from the contracts represents about 6% of its total volume.  DSP Technology Inc., an electronics concern, said its net income for the second quarter ended July 31 rose 5% to $120,000, or six cents a share, from $114,000, also six cents a share, in the year-ago period.  Sales increased to $1.6 million from $1.5 million a year ago.  DSP makes high-speed data acquisition equipment, which include devices placed in automobiles to gather information during crash tests.  United Airlines's largest union, the machinists, attacked a proposed $6.75 billion leveraged buy-out led by management and the rival pilot union, but didn't rule out participating.  John Peterpaul, general vice president of the International Association of Machinists and Aerospace Workers, said that piling extra debt on the airline at a price he described as $2 billion over "fair market value" could threaten the survival of UAL Corp., the airline's parent.  "Placing billions of dollars of additional debt on the carrier with any purchase of United Airlines would seriously jeopardize the carrier's operation, safety and future existence," Mr. Peterpaul said.  "We are very skeptical that United Airlines could survive in today's marketplace" under the proposal.  The union leader's remarks were the opening salvo in negotiations, which are expected to begin soon and which could take weeks, over terms of possible machinist participation in the employee buy-out.  The pilots, offering to make $250 million in annual contract concessions to help finance a bid that would be 75% employee-owned, are hoping other employee groups will join and fund another $120 million in concessions.  The talks promise to be stormy.  The machinists blocked a 1987 takeover bid by the pilots, and the two unions have feuded steadily since.  The machinists could threaten to join forces with a rival bidder, Los Angeles investor Marvin Davis, to foil the pilot-led bid.  Or they could merely threaten to make trouble, such as striking when their contract expires in November, to hinder the pilots' effort to obtain bank financing.  But some people say an amicable resolution is possible, particularly if the pilots get less than majority ownership.  The machinists have vowed to block a purchase giving the pilots 51% or more.  The pilots' exact percentage hasn't been disclosed, and is subject to other employees' participation.  The machinists might ultimately accept stock and a board seat in exchange for their support.  Mr. Peterpaul said his experts value the airline at $195 to $240 a share, or $4.39 billion to $5.4 billion, without factoring in the chance of a recession.  He said the pilot proposal "is based upon the anticipated record of profitability of the past year, which is not apt to be sustainable over the long term."  But Mr. Peterpaul closed his statement by acknowledging that the machinists may join the other employees.  "Nevertheless, in our initial viewpoint opposing any transactions, the IAM will keep all its options open and not hesitate to meet with the appropriate parties."  UAL shares rose just $3.75 to $290.75 yesterday, despite disclosure after the market closed Friday of the pilot-management bid and the possibility that Mr. Davis will raise his $275-a-share bid to $300 or more.  Some traders said the stock's movement reflected skepticism that the bidding will go far beyond $300, and an apreciation of the difficulty the pilot-management group will have in remaining unified.  Mr. Davis, meanwhile, was said to be continuing an effort he has conducted throughout the four-week contest: finding an airline partner to counter the involvement of British Airways PLC in the labor-management bid.  Speculation focused on such flag carriers as Lufthansa, the German airline, and Air France, as well as one of the large Japanese airlines.  The Davis camp was apparently hoping potential partners that had held back before management committed itself to one carrier would be less reluctant if they realize that "Davis is the alternative they have to work with if they want to participate in this thing," one observer said.  But some traders and analysts were skeptical that Mr. Davis will be able to forge such an alliance soon enough, and on favorable enough terms, to make a difference.  Many of the possible partners, they said, might have qualms about such an aggressive role.  The problem with the French economy and French companies is that they are undercapitalized.  They don't have enough equity.  The only way to attract equity is to remunerate capital.  It is a justification of technocracy to say that capital returns should not be distributed to owners but left in the hands of the managers of the corporation.  In all countries around the world, it's just the opposite.  Even the Germans tax at a higher level when the money stays in the company, and they lower the tax when it's distributed to shareholders -- just the opposite of what the French Socialists are doing.  It's a dirigiste, centralized measure.  That statement from France's former finance minister, Edouard Balladur, came to mind when we read the report last week of the latest corporate tax cuts planned by the current Socialist finance minister, Pierre Beregovoy.  Indeed, one of the more intriguing performances on the world stage now is that of France's Socialist government wrestling with the philosophical legacy of socialism.  Mr. Mitterrand's finance minister has it in mind that the way to solve the country's investment problem is to reduce corporate taxes -- but only on profits that are reinvested.  The truth is that the Socialists have a blind spot.  With the exception of a downward adjustment in some of the most burdensome value-added levies, they just can't see their way to making it easier for individuals to keep their gains from work or investment.  We say this with some sympathy for Mr. Beregovoy and his colleagues, for they have shown a good bit of courage in backing away from Socialist errors of the early Mitterrand years.  But they still are clinging to the vestiges of Socialist income redistribution at the same time that they are trying to understand the supply-side world that is revolutionizing other economies.  The result is the half-a-loaf tax program Mr. Beregovoy is now considering.  The aspect of the supply-side idea that seems to elude them is the relationship between individual incentives and economic growth.  The Reagan tax cuts in America produced gains rapidly because once the new tax system was fully in place, the appropriate incentives were available to individuals.  Similarly, the radical reductions in the top marginal rates of income tax put through in several stages by Mrs. Thatcher's government in Britain are producing a budget surplus that in turn is allowing Britain to start paying off its government debt -- and is doing so undoubtedly because of the individual incentives created by slashing these taxes.  France is fertile ground for a direct, supply-side approach because its top marginal rates of income tax are high -- some 56% on incomes that in the modern world ought to be considered moderate.  The Socialists, moreover, have been handed an opportunity to seize this issue by the failure of the Chirac government to advance the French income tax reform beyond that of West Germany.  The French say they are worried about their trade balance with their awesome neighbor and cite the British trade deficit as one of the ill effects of Mrs. Thatcher's program.  But the trade deficit is the flip side of a rapidly expanding economy.  If the French would restore the incentives -- indeed, produce a more competitive incentive structure than West Germany's -- they most likely would find that the Germans would have to chase them for a change.  Few of us have ever doubted that the people of France can compete and win -- if more of them have reason to do so.  On a May morning in 1979, William Bennett arrived for a visit at the Bedford Hills, N.Y., home of one of his mentors, Charles Frankel.  Mr. Bennett never had a chance to unpack his bags; shortly after arriving, he was summoned back home on urgent business.  Only hours later, Mr. Frankel, a prominent academic, and his wife were murdered by burglars.  The killers, later convicted and sentenced to long prison terms, were high on amphetamines.  Mr. Bennett "was absolutely wiped out," recalls his older brother, Robert.  The killing "confirmed everything Bill believed was bad about drugs."  Last night President Bush, in his first prime-time address to the nation, presented a $7.9 billion federal anti-drug strategy.  But the man behind the plan is Bill Bennett, the White House director of drug policy, who crafted the strategy and for whom the battle is a personal affair as much as a public policy offensive.  Few major government endeavors in memory so clearly bear the stamp of one man's experiences, philosophical beliefs and personal instincts.  Mr. Bennett says his lingering pain over the Frankel murder inspired parts of his plan, which would move the focus of the war on drugs from the nation's borders to its street corners.  Indeed, all of Mr. Bennett's brushes against the drug world figured in the formulation of the nation's new drug strategy.  As a student and professor of philosophy from 1961 to 1975, he witnessed firsthand the spread of drug abuse and "the wreckage" it caused among young people.  As a graduate student at the University of Texas, he once dated the singer Janis Joplin, who became heavily involved with drugs.  At Harvard, he fought lenient faculty colleagues to impose stiff punishment on students caught selling prescription pills.  Years later, as secretary of education, he toured urban high schools besieged by cocaine-dealing gangs.  From these experiences, Mr. Bennett developed a visceral antipathy toward drug use.  This he combines with a conservative political philosophy, but one that stresses government activism rather than passivity.  His friend John Agresto, president of St. John's College in Santa Fe, N.M., calls it a "Madisonian view" that has government not only protecting individual liberties but promoting "civic virtue."  That principle underlies the central theme of the White House's new strategy against drugs: that the appetite for narcotics is the nation's main problem, not the elusive Colombian cocaine lords who feed it.  Specifically, the plan foresees a vast federal and local dragnet against drugs, putting more cops on the streets, building more prisons to house dealers, empowering courts to institutionalize addicts, and requiring schools to expel students who defy anti-drug rules.  The strategy also provides something absent during the Reagan years: specific goals.  It seeks a 50% drop in drug use of all kinds over the next 10 years, and a 10% decrease over the next two.  His critics accuse the "drug czar" of letting his rash personality get in the way of his policies.  "Bill Bennett's bluster may endear him to TV audiences, but his prescription won't defeat drug violence-only prolong it," says Richard Dennis, president of Chicago Resource Center, a civil-rights foundation.  Many Americans, Mr. Dennis insists, "strongly believe that people should be allowed to do what they want, even if it injures themselves, as long as they don't present a clear and present danger to others."  Criticism of Mr. Bennett doesn't just come from liberals; some prominent conservatives, such as Milton Friedman, have even suggested legalizing some drugs.  Since joining the Reagan administration in 1981, Mr. Bennett has focused much of his energy on railing against that very mindset, what he calls "the liberal-moderate establishment of the '60s and '70s."  In his view, this is a network of congressional Democrats, Ivy League mandarins and laid-back middle-class materialists who promote excessive toleration.  He blames them for ills ranging from the decline of public education to the cocaine epidemic.  There is, however, a certain irony in Mr. Bennett's continual hectoring: In 1961, an 18-year-old Bill Bennett flirted with the same liberal protest movement he would later pillory.  As a beefy 6-foot-2-inch football lineman at elite Williams College in Massachusetts, he joined a fraternity and played electric guitar in a band called Plato and the Guardians.  He acquired the nickname "Ram" after smashing his head through a door because a girlfriend had locked him out.  Today he brushes aside questions about whether he ever tried drugs, refusing to "get into that confessional stuff."  His sole admission: "I belonged to a fraternity.  I went to parties.  Beer was served."  While clearly no wallflower, the young Bill Bennett took classes seriously, especially philosophy, and he became involved in early student activism.  He opposed U.S. military involvement in Vietnam and participated in civil-rights protests, later conducting teach-ins in Mississippi after Martin Luther King was killed.  At one point, he was ready to join Students for a Democratic Society, the organization that helped lead the anti-war movement and later splintered into eccentric, radical groups.  His brother, Robert, discouraged him, saying that affiliating with the left could become an "anchor" on his future.  The younger Bennett said that wasn't a good enough reason not to join.  "Do it for me, because I'm your older brother," Robert said.  "I'll do it for you," Bill finally agreed.  Twenty-four years later, after becoming a member of the Reagan cabinet, Bill Bennett called his brother, by then a prominent Washington lawyer.  "Thanks about SDS," he said.  Today, Mr. Bennett, 46 years old and paunchier than in his varsity days, explains that it was precisely his intimate exposure to '60s liberalism that propelled him to the right.  The political and cultural turbulence of the era was generating hostility toward all things American, he says.  "I got off the boat."  He recalls his increasing alienation from what passed for hip in Cambridge, Mass., where, by 1969, he was adding a Harvard law degree to his philosophy doctorate from Texas.  "I'll never forget the day when I was sitting with my roommate and his girlfriend, watching the news," he says.  "A story came on about some radicals -- Weathermen or something -- blowing up a U.S. arsenal.  And this girl cheered.  "I looked at her and said, 'Are you out of your mind?'"  In law school he recalls being one of the few students to speak out in favor of severely punishing convicted criminals.  Alan Dershowitz, a civil liberties advocate, thanked him for at least provoking debate in an otherwise left-leaning class.  Meanwhile, in the undergraduate dormitory he supervised, Bill Bennett became even more convinced of cultural decay.  "I had a room of three freshmen who used to spend their days toking up and watching soap operas instead of taking advantage of freshman year at Harvard," he says.  Later, he caught other students selling barbiturates and amphetamines to local junior high school children.  To get the dealers suspended, he had to fight with senior faculty members, who urged leniency.  "It was perverse," says Mr. Bennett, his fleshy face twisting into an angry scowl.  Mr. Bennett went on to teach philosophy at Boston University, where another of his mentors, John Silber, the school's president, encouraged him to view drug abuse in a broader context.  "I saw too often the juxtaposition of people rejecting work and achievement and traditional values and getting into dope," Mr. Bennett says.  He recalls that on his date with Janis Joplin, "We just talked.  She talked about how lucky I was to be a graduate student, how her life, which everyone thought was so glamorous, was actually horrible."  Last month, while many middle-aged professionals reveled in nostalgia over the 20th anniversary of Woodstock, Mr. Bennett described his own recollections.  He didn't attend the 1969 concert but, in his new anti-drug role, faced TV cameras and enumerated the "casualty list" of Woodstock performers who died drug-related deaths: Paul Butterfield, Keith Moon, Jimi Hendrix -- and, of course, Janis Joplin.  Similarly, Mr. Bennett's call now for stepped-up local enforcement of drug laws is based not only on criminology theory but on his personal familiarity with street cops.  At Boston University, he helped police escort military recruiters through crowds of taunting, spitting students.  "I was ready to go crazy," he recalls.  "But {the police} always stayed cool."  Some of Mr. Bennett's proposals to fight drugs seem based as much on his gut instincts as anything else.  Among the plan's recommendations for swifter, cheaper punishment is sentencing first-time dealers to short terms in "military-style boot camps."  The camps, which now operate in 11 states, stress extreme discipline and strenuous physical exercise as character-building tools.  The General Accounting Office, Congress's investigative arm, says there isn't clear evidence favoring this approach.  "You're right; there isn't any elaborate backdrop of social science research on boot camps, showing that they're more effective," Mr. Bennett says.  But "neither is there any indication that they're less effective."  He likes the idea because of his "hunch" that if former military personnel were hired to run the camps, "it would work out pretty well."  People who have met with Mr. Bennett say that, while he is endlessly curious, he has a distinctive way of seeking advice -- one that tends to elicit responses tailored to his own predispositions.  On the treatment front, for example, Mr. Bennett admits he knew little going into his new post.  But he insists that, contrary to much mainstream thinking, the experts he interviewed agreed with his basic assumption that many voluntary treatment programs don't work because users aren't under real pressure to quit.  Coercion -- even bringing addicts to treatment "in handcuffs" under court order -- may be the only way to help many people, he believes.  Terence Pell, general counsel to Mr. Bennett, describes a typical meeting with a dozen treatment experts: "He sits people down around the table and says, 'To make treatment work you have to have tough accountability and standards.  What do you think?'  "We were gratified and flattered," Mr. Pell continues, "to find that a lot of people had done a lot of thinking and come to the same conclusions we started with."  In contrast to his sharply defined views on domestic matters, Mr. Bennett's inexperience in foreign affairs is revealed in the plan's vague recommendations for international efforts.  For example, the strategy proposes more anti-drug aid to Colombia, Bolivia and Peru, but doesn't specify how the U.S. can put new pressure on governments to crack down.  Mr. Bennett would be happy to foster at least some U.S. military involvement in the battle.  Indeed, even as education secretary he wrote then-Attorney General Edwin Meese, among other officials, urging the Reagan administration to "formulate expanded plans for overt and covert operations" to help Latin American governments capture drug producers.  Says Sam Brunelli, a conservative activist and friend of Mr. Bennett's: "To Bill, it's not a metaphor -- 'war on drugs.'"  The Bush administration's plan for dealing with drug users may be the boldest in years, but it is also largely untested.  "We simply don't have enough knowledge about what works," concedes Dr. Frederick Goodwin, who heads the federal Alcohol, Drug Abuse and Mental Health Administration.  He blames the "start-stop cycle" of earlier federal funding for drug treatment research, as well as the relatively recent emergence of crack as a major problem.  But the administration, experimenting as it goes along, is stressing treatment initiatives designed to deal with two of crack's most destructive characteristics: its rapid, gripping addiction and its wide use in poor, inner city areas.  To combat crack's intense addiction, the administration will step up research on medicines that help control craving for crack.  Some studies -- still incomplete -- show that in the early stages of treatment, drugs can help control craving, greatly improving the prospects for success.  The plan also places new emphasis on compelling more addicts to undergo treatment.  Herbert Kleber, a deputy to drug-control chief William Bennett, says that studies show that mandatory treatment works as well as voluntary treatment and that it may be necessary to get inner city addicts out of drug-infested environments.  "When you're dealing with people who are poor, young, and uneducated, the issue isn't rehabilitation, but habilitation," he says.  Mr. Bennett has suggested sending drug dealers to military-style camps designed to build self-esteem.  Although the evidence isn't conclusive, New York state's experience with such camps suggests that the recidivism rate of camp detainees is about 25% below that of those who went to prison instead.  "Drug abuse is increasingly settling on the more vulnerable parts of the population," the most difficult group to treat, says Dr. Goodwin.  The crisis afflicts people who are young, unemployed, disproportionately black and Hispanic, and frequently from dysfunctional families.  Only about one of every seven people with a serious drug problem receives treatment; the percentage is much smaller among hard-core urban addicts, who often lack stable jobs and close-knit kin.  For inner city drug users, detoxification and abstinence programs aren't seen as sufficient; keeping them "clean" requires assistance that probably can't be delivered by a federal drug plan.  When addicts return to their neighborhoods, they need job training and support from non-drug users in Narcotics Anonymous or other organizations, Dr. Kleber says.  A recent Urban Institute study of adolescents in Washington, D.C., found that drug users tend to be estranged from their families, disengaged from school and have lower aspirations for success in traditional roles.  Giving them opportunities bright enough to discourage drug use could take extensive changes in schooling, the welfare system and employment training.  Because it is dealing with a dearth of good research on the drug problem, the administration intends to turn the drug war into a kind of research laboratory.  For instance, a pilot program in Washington will screen addicts to determine which treatment -- short-term hospitalization, outpatient counseling, or long-term residential treatment -- is best in each case, and track their progress.  In particular, the project will evaluate the use of medication, such as the anti-depressant desipramine, to reduce cocaine craving in the early weeks of treatment, a crucial period.  "We need more study in the field of what kinds of psycho-social approaches are appropriate to different groups," Dr. Goodwin says.  "Restoring self esteem may be more appropriate for an inner city black kid or a newly arrived Hispanic than for an upper class white kid who is estranged from his parents."  The administration will also try to overcome the lack of information by encouraging states to conduct new monitoring of the programs they have in place.  One problem is that treatment techniques haven't kept up with changing drug use patterns.  Most existing programs were designed to treat heroin addiction, although crack is now a bigger problem.  To make treatment easier, the administration also wants to encourage cities and states to combine treatment with general health care.  Among other things, this should make it easier to provide drug treatment and prenatal care to pregnant addicts.  Dr. Goodwin concedes that health officials may oppose expanding general health care to treat drug addicts.  "These are unpleasant people," he says.  "They steal the typewriters."  ---  Peter Truell contributed to this article.  The following issues were recently filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission:  AT&E Corp., shelf registration covering 200,000 common shares that may be issued from time to time over the next two years in payment of dividends accruing on shares of the company's convertible preferred stock sold to investors earlier this year.  Bank of New England Corp., offering of $250,000,000 of debt securities.  Chesapeake Corp., shelf offering of up to $200 million of debt securities, on terms determined at the time of sale, via: Salomon Brothers Inc.; Goldman, Sachs & Co.; and Wheat, First Securities Inc.  Housing and Urban Development Secretary Jack Kemp, in an effort to revise one of the department's more scandal-ridden programs, plans to strengthen capital requirements for so-called coinsurance companies.  In the multibillion-dollar coinsurance program, mortgage companies have taken big fees for underwriting and servicing loans on government-subsidized housing projects.  The federal government, by contract, has been responsible for about 80% of the losses on project defaults.  HUD has found that many of these defaults are on projects run by undercapitalized mortgage companies.  The agency wants to increase capital requirements to try to eliminate the weaker mortgage companies from the program.  Last spring, HUD suspended action on new applications for the program pending a review.  Since the beginning of the coinsurance program in 1983, 1,464 projects have been granted mortgages totaling $9.5 billion, according to HUD figures.  During that period, 151 of those projects failed, resulting in $917 million in defaults.  In a separate, larger effort to move the department beyond the problems that have apparently plagued it for years and that were partly disclosed in an inspector-general's report in April, top HUD officials have proposed a series of changes, including changing the agency's name to the Home Department.  The coinsurance provisions would raise companies' minimum net worth requirements, and a new liquidity requirement would seek to ensure that they maintain a certain amount of cash reserves to protect against loan losses.  Currently, the mortgage companies must have a net worth of $1.5 million plus $1 for each $300 in mortgages.  One plan considered by HUD officials would raise that net worth requirement to at least $2 million.  Bronwyn Morgan, an associate director of the Mortgage Bankers Association of America, said it would be particularly "onerous" if the capital requirements were made retroactive, as HUD officials have discussed doing.  Mr. Kemp plans to strengthen the department's monitoring process by an expansion of the program's staff, a department official said.  The HUD secretary also might require that any loans larger than a certain amount be approved by an appraiser authorized by the department, to try to curb what many critics have called the excessive freedom given to lenders in the program.  "The entire industry is very in favor of strengthened monitoring and enforcement," said Cathy Pharis, vice president of Patrician Mortgage Co. in Washington and chairwoman of the Mortgage Bankers Association's subcommittee on coinsurance.  In a separate effort, the assistant secretary for housing/federal housing commissioner, C. Austin Fitts, and the deputy undersecretary for intergovernmental relations, J. Kenneth Blackwell, have urged Mr. Kemp to take "audacious" initiatives designed to provide housing, not simply reform existing troubled programs.  "Increasingly, HUD has become a symbol of the confusion and despair over how to address our housing problems," said a memo they circulated to top department officials.  They recommended a $10 billion program that largely would use existing resources.  The officials suggested changing HUD's name because every action they want the department to take would be "designed to enhance the possibility of home-ownership, even the rental assistance programs."  Ms. Fitts and Mr. Blackwell suggested using a "clearance sale" approach to eliminate the Federal Housing Administration's inventory of 50,000 houses.  An FHA house would be offered for sale at its appraised value, with the price being be reduced by 1% for each day it remained unsold.  Because the FHA does almost no business in inner cities, the HUD officials recommend the creation of "housing zones" in such neighborhoods, in which mortgage lenders would have higher fee allowances and other incentives for doing business.  The 26-point proposal includes several provisions that the authors say will be "highly controversial."  As one possible example, it urges new publicly financed housing construction, with local and federal governments sharing the cost, something the Reagan and Bush administrations have opposed.  The officials also call on Mr. Kemp to reverse "the shortsighted budget cuts of the prior administration" and suggest he announce a "restructuring and recapitalization of HUD that will, overall, respect the need to reduce the deficit."  Gottschalks Inc. said sales at the regional department-store chain for the four weeks ended Aug. 26 rose 14% from a year earlier, to $16.1 million.  Sales for the 30 weeks through Aug. 26 rose 17% to $107.5 million, it said.  Watkins-Johnson Co., a defense-electronics concern, said it agreed in principle to acquire R.L. Stollar & Associates Inc., a Santa Ana, Calif., environmental-consulting company.  A Watkins-Johnson spokesman said the company is "ironing out the details" with Stollar, including the acquisition price, and expects to complete the transaction by the end of this month.  Stollar has revenue of about $15 million a year, the Watkins-Johnson spokesman said.  Watkins-Johnson, whose main businesses are defense electronics and semiconductor production equipment, had 1988 sales of $292.2 million.  Belgium joined the "front-runner league" of industrial countries in terms of growth, inflation and external accounts in 1988 as its economic performance exceeded expectations, the Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development said in its 1988/1989 economic survey.  According to the study, real growth in Belgium's estimated gross domestic product in 1988 was 4.2%.  Inflation was at an estimated 1.2%.  Belgium's GDP was 5.61 billion Belgian francs ($135.8 million) in 1988, according to the OECD figures, up from 5.32 billion francs a year earlier.  Real growth was 2.1% in each of the previous two years.  But the country's mounting public debt must be stabilized and then reversed for balanced growth to continue, the agency warned.  Belgium's public debt, at 120% of GDP, is the second highest in the OECD area, after Ireland.  The OECD said the debt is "fueled by an excessive budget deficit."  The report also called Belgium's 1988 unemployment rate, at 9.9%, "too high."  Rockwell International Corp.'s Space Transportation Systems division said it formed a contractor team to compete for a National Aeronautics and Space Administration contract to study a space station-crew emergency return vehicle system.  The team includes Honeywell Inc., McDonnell Douglas Corp.'s Space Systems Co. unit and TRW Inc.'s Federal Systems division.  The emergency vehicle concept is to provide NASA's planned space station "Freedom" with an assured crew return capability for medical emergencies or situations where space flights are interrupted for excessive periods of time.  Taiwan has registered its first trade deficit in nine years, the Central Bank reported.  The bank said the deficit of 11.45 billion Taiwan dollars (US$450 million) was recorded in the second quarter of this year, compared with a T$40.01 billion surplus registered for the same period last year.  The bank said the deficit was the result of a stronger Taiwan dollar that encouraged more investment abroad.  Officials said this year's total overseas investment could reach T$254.4 billion.  Taiwan last recorded a trade deficit, totaling T$8.16 billion dollars, in 1980.  The average interest rate fell to 8.6557% at Citicorp's $50 million weekly auction of 91-day commercial paper, or corporate IOUs, from 8.675% at last week's sale.  Bids totaling $598 million were submitted.  Accepted bids ranged from 8.649% to 8.663%.  Citicorp also said that the average rate fell to 8.4740% at its $50 million auction of 182-day commercial paper from 8.491% at last week's sale.  Bids totaling $555 million were submitted.  Accepted bids ranged from 8.469% to 8.479%.  The bank holding company plans another $50 million sale of each maturity next Tuesday.  Sara Lee Corp. agreed not to call its 200-calorie a slice, whipped cheesecake "light" after objections were raised from calorie counting attorneys general in nine states.  Several states have cited Sara Lee's use of the word "light" as an example of mislabeling and misleading advertising, and had sought to get the company to drop the word or change the product.  A spokesman for the food and consumer products concern said the cheesecake and mousse desserts are now called "french style."  He insisted the decision was made "unilaterally" and not because of pressure from the states of California, Iowa, Illinois, Massachusetts, Minnesota, Missouri, New York, Texas and Wisconsin.  The desserts -- which the company describes as "airier, more whipped, taller" -- are indeed lower in calories than Sara Lee's traditional cheesecake, which weighs in at 230 a slice.  But not by enough.  The spokesman said to qualify for the "light" label, the products must have no more than two-thirds the calories of the traditional product, or about 154 calories in this case.  Sara Lee said it agreed not to use the word "light" on other products unless they meet that condition.  Sara Lee said the word "light" was meant to describe the texture of the cheesecakes, not the calorie count, but that it settled the matter to avoid weighty legal bills.  The company said it will reimburse the nine states for $80,000 in legal costs.  Imagine a product that many pet owners suspect killed their dogs and cats.  The manufacturer, while insisting the product is safe, pulls it from the market.  Given how Americans feel about their pets, you would think the product would never see a grocer's shelf again.  But Hartz Mountain Corp. appears to have pulled off what conventional wisdom would have said is impossible.  Hartz has successfully relaunched its Blockade tick and flea spray after a barrage of negative publicity nearly crippled the product two years ago.  The relaunch, which relies on a mix of testimonial advertising and skilled public relations, is perhaps a textbook case of how a company may salvage a seemingly doomed product.  Two years ago, Hartz spent $10 million to launch Blockade, the most successful product ever produced by the company.  Sales for the first year were spectacular -- 5.5 million cans at $5 apiece.  But the product was soon overwhelmed by complaints from some pet owners that it was harming or even killing their dogs and cats.  In 1987, the Illinois Animal Poison Information Center, the largest such facility in the U.S., received more than 500 calls about adverse effects, including reports of several deaths.  The Environmental Protection Agency told Hartz to conduct a battery of toxicity tests on the product.  That December, Hartz pulled Blockade from the market due to what it called "adverse publicity," and laid low.  Rather than kill the product, Hartz ran the tests, which determined the product is safe, Hartz says.  And while Hartz says the chemical makeup of Blockade hasn't changed, it did relabel the cans with new dosage warnings under an agreement with the EPA.  The product was relaunched in January with a new ad campaign.  For the campaign, Hartz chose a common tool employed by companies bruised by bad publicity: the testimonial.  In one, for example, Betty and Bob Dawson from Memphis, Tenn. -- selected because of their letter to the company -- talk about how pleased they are with Blockade's results on Honey and Sugar, their Pomeranians.  In the ads, Mrs. Dawson says, "Since using it we have had great results, and it smells so good."  The "real-life" ads -- grainier than most on TV -- are shot outside without background music.  The Dawsons are each hugging a dog.  To reinforce that image, Hartz ran the ads with pictures shaped like TV screens in magazines including Reader's Digest, Ladies Home Journal and Better Homes and Gardens.  It certainly isn't the sexiest advertising, but many ad executives agree that a conventionally slick campaign wouldn't reassure pet owners who were spooked by the bad publicity.  Cooper Square Advertising created the campaign for Hartz.  To restore faith in the product, you need "real honest-to-God people, people that really own a pet and care about it," adds Steve Novick, director of broadcast production at Grey Advertising Inc., which wasn't involved in the campaign.  In addition to new advertising, Hartz started a letter campaign to veterinarians with a toll-free number for product information.  Those with immediate problems are advised to call an EPA-funded emergency number, which then directs them to the Illinois poison center.  There, animal toxicologists answer questions 24 hours a day, seven days a week.  Follow-up calls are made to owners for study purposes.  Another plus ad consultants give Hartz is the company's separate toll-free number for consumers.  A toll-free number "is the best advertisement for corporations if there are problems with a product.  I think Hartz is realizing if they would have done this earlier it would have saved them a lot of headaches," said William Buck, director of the Illinois center.  Blockade isn't completely out of the woods.  The center has received some complaints since it was reintroduced, but not nearly as many as in the summer of 1987.  Dr. Buck and a colleague continue to study the toxicity of the product on their own.  Meanwhile, a dozen lawsuits by pet owners are still pending in a San Diego Superior Court and two in the U.S. District Court in San Diego.  The federal court refused to grant class-action status to suits by pet owners nationwide.  In addition, many pet owners are outraged that Hartz is relaunching Blockade.  "I was stunned when I saw the commercial," says Joe Gandolfo, a Florida financial planner who says his miniature collie, Laddie, died after being sprayed with Blockade.  "I couldn't believe they were advertising the same product."  But Blockade appears to be making a comeback.  Closely held Hartz, which holds roughly 75% of the pet-supplies market, refuses to say how many cans have sold since Blockade was reintroduced.  But Vice President William Perlberg says the company is "very pleased" with sales.  Competitors say they suspect Blockade has sold well, and some analysts say the product could come close to its original success if there are no more problems.  ---  Stroh Abandons Audubon  Stroh Brewing Co. has pulled out as a sponsor of an upcoming National Audubon Society TV special amid a threatened boycott from the nation's loggers.  The brewer said the move was based strictly on cost-cutting measures and had nothing to do with loggers' concerns that the program was biased in favor of conservation.  But Christopher Palmer, Audubon's top production executive, confirmed that Stroh requested some changes to make it more favorable to loggers.  "They asked if we could re-edit it and shoot some new footage," Mr. Palmer said.  "But I felt the film was fair."  Mr. Palmer said after a conversation with Peter Stroh, the company's chairman and chief executive, that it is unlikely the company will sponsor Audubon specials in the future.  Stroh has been a sponsor on each of its four annual TV specials since 1986.  Stroh had committed about $600,000 in funding to the specials through 1990.  ---  Ad Notes. . . .   NEW ACCOUNT: Pharmavite Corp., Arleta, Calif., named Hal Riney & Partners, San Francisco, agency of record for its $5 million Nature Made Vitamins account.  GLOBAL TV: Cable News Network said Chase Manhattan Bank tonight will become its first advertiser to run a TV commercial globally.  Chase's ad, which touts its global corporate finance capabilities, will be seen in 79 countries simultaneously.  The Nuclear Regulatory Commission said its staff recommended approval for the emergency evacuation plans for Massachusetts towns near the Seabrook nuclear power plant.  The recommendation, which is likely to be challenged by plant opponents, is subject to approval by the Atomic Safety and Licensing Board of the Nuclear Regulatory Commission.  The move comes in the face of strong opposition from state and local officials in Massachusetts who refused to devise their own plan, contending the area is too crowded and roads are too small to permit safe evacuation.  The NRC allowed Seabrook plant operator, New Hampshire Yankee, to devise its own plan, and the one the staff recommended follows that plan, according to Public Service Co. of New Hampshire, which owns 35% of the plant.  The $6.2 billion Seabrook plant has been completed for several years but hasn't operated commercially, in part because of the dispute over emergency evacuation plans.  A New Hampshire Yankee spokesman said the staff recommendation "is a positive step in the licensing process."  Noting that the Atomic Safety Board said it will rule on the recommendation around Nov. 30, the spokesman said it is possible the full NRC could grant a license by year end, allowing the plant to operate by the end of January.  The National Association of Securities Dealers Inc. announced disciplinary actions against firms and individuals for various violations of its rules.  David Lerner Associates Inc., a Syosset, N.Y., municipal-bond dealer, didn't admit or deny charges that some of its advertising was misleading or inappropriate.  "The firm's recruitment advertisements cited earnings figures that were not reasonable," the NASD said.  The firm was fined $10,000 and required for one year to file all media ads with the NASD before publication.  In a statement, David Lerner Associates said much of the dispute concerned ads for "new investment products for which little prior regulatory guidance was available. . . .  We continue to adhere to a philosophy of accurate and complete advertising."  Delta Financial Investment, Little Rock, Ark., was fined $50,000 and expelled from membership in connection with failure to maintain accurate records, engaging in transactions to help an institutional customer conceal trading losses, and other alleged violations.  Representatives of the firm disciplined included William D. Lainhart, Sherwood, Ark., fined $7,500 and suspended four months; Gandy L. Baugh, Little Rock, fined $5,000 and suspended for three months; Jack S. Lewis Jr., North Little Rock, Ark., suspended one month; Robert E. Thomas, Little Rock, fined $3,500 and suspended two weeks; Herbert E. Young, North Little Rock, fined $15,000 and suspended for three months; and David B. Higginbotham, Little Rock, fined $3,500 and suspended for two weeks.  Neither Delta nor the officials admitted or denied the allegations.  They couldn't be reached for comment.  First Interregional Equity Corp., Springfield, N.J., and two principals, Herbert N. Goettlich, Maplewood, N.J., and Anthony L. Gianninoto, Malverne, N.Y., were fined $20,000 each; the men were suspended for 10 business days for various record-keeping and other violations.  They didn't admit or deny the allegations.  Mr. Goettlich, speaking for himself, Mr. Gianninoto and the firm, said, "We had some problems between ourselves and our clearing agent," but "all of these were corrected prior to their being discovered" by the NASD.  He noted that the NASD statement said no customer suffered a monetary loss as a result of the conduct in question.  "What happened was purely an oversight on our part," he said.  Government Securities Dealers Inc., New York, and three principals were fined $20,000 each in connection with alleged record-keeping violations as well as alleged failure to disclose completely its formal disciplinary history and permitting four individuals to be associated with the firm without being registered with the NASD. Joseph Tully Blumstein, New York, and Steven Robert Sheldon, Englewood, N.J., each was suspended for 60 days; the other principal fined was Carl Anthony Torelli.  The firm and the three men didn't admit or deny the allegations.  Hampton Securities Inc., West Palm Beach, Fla., and principal Delores Easthom were fined $15,000 each.  The firm was required to disgorge $209,000 and suspended from solicitation of retail business for five days, while she was suspended for 30 days.  The action involved findings of securities sales with excessive markups.  Wakefield Financial Corp., New York, and principal Alexander Geils Minella, White Plains, N.Y., each were fined $15,000 for allegedly buying securities from public customers at excessive markdowns; they didn't admit or deny the allegations.  Jeffrey Phillip Bohl, Los Angeles, was fined $100,000 and barred, based on findings that he failed to observe industry practice in transferring customer securities accounts from one broker-dealer to another.  He allegedly had 11 customers liquidate their accounts and had the proceeds transferred to new accounts at another broker-dealer where he executed purchases to reinstate the previous positions.  The NASD said he also engaged in unauthorized trades and retained funds in some accounts.  Messrs.  Sheldon, Torelli and Bohl couldn't be reached for comment.  Mr. Minella declined to comment.  Mr. Blumstein said, "The charges by NASD are largely the result of not filing papers on time."  Ms. Easthom, principal of Hampton, said, "We didn't agree with it in the first place.  We fought it to the point where we ran out of money."  Individuals barred and fined included Ernest A. Bartlett III, Little Rock, Ark., $15,000; Gwendolyn Blunt, Roosevelt, N.Y., $50,000; Jesse Ramirez Cano, San Antonio, Texas, $17,000; Ronald G. Caponi, Mount Clemens, Mich., $5,000; Kris John Daugherty, Oklahoma City, $15,000; Frank L. Dowdey, Birmingham, Ala., $15,000; James Robert Helie, Cambridge, Mass., $10,000; Gerald A. Hladky, Tonka Bay, Minn., $15,000; Bradley Merle Hoffman, Manhattan Beach, Calif., $15,000; David E. Lengfelder, Rock Falls, Ill., $30,000; Garold Ernest Maxfield, Meridan, Idaho, $50,000; Marilyn Ann McCurdy, Los Angeles, $15,000; Terrence Lavergne Monroe, Kaneohe, Hawaii, $25,000; and Louis Wellington Moreland Jr., Walnut Creek, Calif., $25,000.  Others barred and fined included John K. Mulvaney, Moravia, N.Y., $10,000; Charles Alan Parbury, Danville, Calif., $171,000; Ricky E. Parker, Birmingham, Ala., $15,000; Jack Donald Prosen, Woodland Hills, Calif., $186,214; Ireneo Acidera Ranches, Honolulu, $61,591; Pamela M. Rybacki, Orland Park, Ill., $15,000; Sandra Lynn Striha, Daly City, Calif., $40,000; Steven I. Weinstein, Shreveport, La., $15,000; Paul Arthur Wilbur, $15,000; Bruce A. Williams, Grand Prairie, Texas, $10,000 (on appeal to Securities and Exchange Commission); and Bruce Wilson, Bourbonnais, Ill., $20,000.  Messrs.  Bartlett, Cano, Caponi, Daugherty, Dowdey, Helie, Hladky, Hoffman, Lengfelder, Maxfield, Monroe, Moreland, Mulvaney, Parbury, Parker, Prosen, Ranches, Weinstein, Wilbur, Williams and Wilson were unreachable for comment.  Ms. Blunt, Ms. McCurdy, Ms. Rybacki and Ms. Striha also could not be reached.  A number of individuals consented to NASD findings without admitting or denying allegations: Keith W. Borgmann, Union, Mo., fined $15,000 and barred; Lawrence J. Dumestre Jr. and Lawrence C. Dumestre, Baton Rouge, La., each fined $5,000 and suspended for one week; Donald L. Gilberg, Pittsburgh, fined $1,000 and suspended for five business days; Richard J. Hlavka, Lake Oswego, Ore., fined $2,500, ordered to disgorge $7,300 and suspended for 15 business days; Roy L. Lawson, Tulsa, Okla., fined $5,000 and suspended for one business day; George O. Otten, East Hampton, Conn., fined $10,000 and barred; Peter Chappell Rosen, New York, fined $20,000 and suspended for 100 business days; Anthony J. Uzwiak, Madison, N.J., fined $15,000 and barred; Jay M. Vermonty, Flushing, N.Y., fined $40,000 and suspended four months and for three years in a principal capacity; William Joseph Mueger, East Meadow, N.Y., $35,000, suspended three months and for three years in a principal capacity; Theodore Len, Manhasset Hills, N.Y., $20,000, suspended two years in a financial and operations principal capacity; and Joseph Francis Messineo, Bethesda, Md., $10,000 and suspended three months.  James P. Visconto, Philadelphia, was fined $15,000 and barred.  Lawrence J. Dumestre said: "Some five or six years ago, a member of the family started a business and sought advice from me and my son.  The mistake I made was using stationery that I paid for but" had the name of his firm on it.  "Five or six years later, this was ruled a violation" of NASD regulations, he said, adding, "We don't think we did anything wrong."  Mr. Otten said, "Unfortunately, all the extenuating circumstances which surrounded the issue aren't for publication."  Messrs.  Borgmann, Gilberg, Hlavka, Lawson, Rosen, Uzwiak, Vermonty, Mueger, Messineo and Visconto declined to comment.  A number of people were fined and suspended: Stephen W. Devanney, Aurora, Colo., was fined $1,000 and suspended as a principal for a year; Dennis J. Kirkman, Denver, fined $5,000 and suspended as a principal for a year; Richard L. Fisher, Adamstown, Pa., fined $5,000 and suspended for 30 days; John R. Geel, St. Anne, Ill., fined $7,500 and suspended for six months; William G. Glenn, Mesa, Ariz., and Timothy A. Blackburn, Tempe, Ariz., each fined $5,000 and suspended six months; Timothy G. Grazioso, Englewood, N.J., fined $50,000 and suspended for a year; Richard D. McGervey, Fort Washington, Md., fined $34,505 and suspended for two years; Cesario Munoz, Fort Collins, Colo., fined $5,000 and suspended for a year; Dale Dwight Schwartzenhauer, Sandy, Ore., fined $50,000 and suspended for 30 days; James Eugene Greenfield, Portland, Ore., fined $10,000 and barred; Freddy Bryan Smith, Dayton, Ohio, fined $15,000 and suspended for two years and one day; and Sondra H. White, Las Vegas, Nev., fined $500 and suspended for three months.  Mr. Fisher declined to comment.  Messrs.  Devanney, Kirkman, Geel, Glenn, Blackburn, Grazioso, McGervey, Munoz, Schwartzenhauer, Greenfield and Smith and Ms. White couldn't be reached for comment.  The following were among yesterday's offerings and pricings in the U.S. and non-U.S. capital markets, with terms and syndicate manager, as compiled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ CORPORATES  El Paso Natural Gas Co. -- $300 million of 9.45% notes, due Sept. 1, 1999, priced at 99.90 to yield 9.465%.  The size of the non-callable issue was increased to $300 million from $200 million.  The issue was priced at a yield spread of 126 basis points above the Treasury's 10-year note.  Rated single-A-3 by Moody's Investors Service Inc. and single-A by Standard & Poor's Corp., the issue will be sold via Morgan Stanley & Co.  General Re Corp. -- $150 million of 9% debentures, due Sept. 12, 2009, priced at par.  The non-callable issue was priced at a yield spread of 85 basis points over the Treasury 8 1/8% issue due 2019.  Rated double-A-1 by Moody's and triple-A by S&P, the issue will be sold through underwriters led by First Boston Corp.  @ OTHERS  Sears Roebuck & Co. -- $500 million of 9% securities backed by credit-card receivables, priced at 99 13/32 to yield 9.07%, via an underwriting group led by Goldman Sachs & Co.  The issue, through Sears Credit Account Trust 1989-C, was priced to yield 78 basis points more than the Treasury four-year note.  The four-year issue uses a senior/subordinated structure.  The senior securities, which are being offered publicly, are supported by a subordinated class, which absorbs losses on the underlying pool of credit-card loans.  Sears isn't guaranteeing the issue.  Based on the credit support of the subordinated class, the issue is rated triple-A by both Moody's and S&P.  @ EUROBONDS  Kansai Electric Power Co. (Japan) -- $350 million of 9 1/8% bonds due Sept. 27, 1996, priced at 101 1/4 to yield 9.25% less full fees, via Nomura International.  Fees 1 7/8.  Mitsui & Co. International (Europe) BV (Japan parent) -- $50 million of 9% bonds due Oct. 13, 1994, priced at 101 7/8 to yield 9% less full fees, via Daiwa Europe Ltd. Fees 1 7/8.  Compagnie Bancaire (France) -- 500 million French francs of 8 7/8% bonds due Sept 27 1994, priced at 101 1/2 to yield 8.97% less full fees, via Credit Lyonnais.  Fees 1 7/8.  Federal National Mortgage Association (U.S.) -- 11.3 billion yen of zero-coupon debentures due March 19, 1992, priced at 98.877, via Mitsui Trust International Ltd.  Koike Sanso Kogyo Co. (Japan) -- 50 million Swiss francs of privately placed convertible notes due March 31, 1994, with a 1/2% indicated coupon at par, via Wirtschafts und Privatbank.  Put option March 31, 1992, at an indicated 109 1/4 to yield 4.10%.  Each 50,000 Swiss franc note convertible from Oct. 9, 1989 to March 24, 1994 at 5% premium over closing share price Sept. 11, when terms are fixed.  Meitec Corp. (Japan) -- 50 million Swiss francs of privately placed convertible notes due Sept. 30, 1993, with an indicated 3/8% coupon at par, via Royal Trust Bank (Switzerland).  Put option on Sept. 30, 1991 at an indicated 107 1/2 to yield 3.97%.  Each 50,000 Swiss franc note convertible from Oct. 11, 1989 to Sept. 17, 1993 at a 5% premium over the closing share price Sept. 12 when terms are fixed.  Japan Electronic Computer Co. (Japan) -- 50 million Swiss francs of 6% bonds due Sept. 28, 1996, priced at 101 3/8 to yield 5.76%, via Banque Paribas Suisse.  Guaranteed by Industrial Bank of Japan.  Early redemption at the issuer's option beginning Sept. 28, 1991 at 102, declining by 1/4 point semi-annually.  Biotechnology-stock strength was one of the few bright spots for the Nasdaq over-the-counter market, which ended nearly flat.  The Nasdaq Composite Index edged up only 0.08 to 471.42, disappointing investors and traders who had hoped for a stronger start after the holiday weekend.  By comparison, the New York Stock Exchange Composite Index dropped 0.3%.  Volume was a little slow, with 121.1 million shares changing hands.  Advancing OTC issues finished narrowly ahead of those that declined, 943 to 937.  "Everybody was expecting to come back from the Labor Day weekend and see some type of explosive market, and that didn't happen," lamented Len Hefter, head of Jefferies & Co.'s OTC trading desk in Dallas.  Traders said concern over the future of interest rates soured the market.  An article in this newspaper yesterday said that, for the first time in months, the presidents of a few regional Federal Reserve banks may be ready to consider raising rates again to suppress inflation.  Recent economic reports have shown that the economy hasn't slowed as sharply as earlier believed.  Mr. Hefter and Robert O'Toole Sr., head of institutional OTC trading at Shearson Lehman Hutton, said the report triggered some selling.  Mr. Hefter worried that "if {the Federal Reserve} were to raise rates, that would kill the market dead in its tracks."  But, he added that the market appears to have some underlying strength, and that most investors are assuming that rates won't go up.  Nasdaq's biotechnology stocks, subjects of recent articles in this newspaper and the New York Times, surged in active trading.  Amgen jumped 1 5/8 to 41 1/4 on 324,300; Genetics Institute rose 1 to 28 1/4 on 84,700 shares, and Biogen gained 3/8 to 13 7/8 on 231,000 shares.  On 277,200 shares, Chiron rose 3/8 to 25 1/8, while Xoma gained 1/2 to 20 3/4 on 159,300 shares.  Centocor improved 1/2 to 19 1/4 on 52,200 shares, and Cetus added 1/4 to 16 5/8 on 355,800 shares.  The Nasdaq 100 Index, which includes Cetus and 99 other nonindustrial issues, rose 0.13 to 447.16.  For the year, the index is up about 26%.  The Nasdaq Financial Index, which has risen about 28% this year, slipped a bit.  It finished off 0.02 to 468.26.  Profit-taking drove cellular stocks down from their Friday advance, traders said.  LIN Broadcasting dropped 1 1/2 to 107, McCaw Cellular Communications dropped 1 to 39 and Cellular Communication was down 5/8 to 39 1/4.  The Nasdaq Utility Index, which includes those issues, dropped 2.82 to 743.10.  Another utility stock, MCI Communications, got a lift yesterday after Moody's Investors Service said it may upgrade the ratings on MCI's subordinated notes.  The stock headed Nasdaq's most-active list with a gain of 3/8 to 39 1/4 on 1.9 million shares.  Moody's said the review of the ratings was "prompted by the likelihood that MCI will continue to generate improving cash flow and profitability."  The rating agency said MCI's strong earnings have recently enabled the company to strengthen its capital structure, and prospects for future profits could permit further improvements.  The Nasdaq Transportation Index was the OTC market's strongest sector, on a percentage basis, rising 2.68 to 470.48.  Traders said talk that either Yellow Freight or Roadway Services, two of the index's biggest stocks, may be added to the Dow Jones Transportation Index helped boost the group.  Traders said the stocks would benefit because any index funds tied to the Dow Transports would be obliged to add positions in those stocks to their portfolios.  Yellow Freight gained 1/8 to 31 5/8, and Roadway added 1/8 to 39.  Kirschner Medical ended with a gain of 1 1/2 at 24 1/2, after rising as much as 1 3/4 during yesterday's trading.  Last Thursday, Alex.  Brown issued a report on the company and repeated its recommendation that investors buy the stock, according to Dow Jones Professional Investor Report.  Optical Radiation rose 1 to 21 3/4.  Montgomery Securities was a heavy buyer of the stock, according to Professional Investor Report.  Montgomery has recently recommended buying the stock.  A reference in Barron's boosted the stock of First Federal Savings Bank of Montana.  The issue jumped 1 1/4 to 12 1/4.  First Federal boasts some of the highest performance ratios in the business and might be a takeover target, according to Barron's.  The publication noted, however, that the company hasn't yet been approached.  Base Ten Systems gained 3/4 to 4 1/2 after the electronics concern reported earnings from continuing operations of $920,000 for its third quarter ended July 31.  For the year-earlier period, the company reported a loss from continuing operations.  Base Ten's revenue grew about 23% in the latest quarter from a year earlier.  The Paris conference on Cambodia has, predictably, failed.  After a month of intensive negotiations involving 19 countries, a comprehensive political settlement appears as distant as ever.  The reasons are not difficult to discern.  Ultimately it results from the unwillingness of either the Vietnamese or the Cambodian Communist parties to compromise their ambitions to impose unwanted totalitarian regimes upon the Cambodian people.  But the prospects for enduring peace also have been diminished by other factors.  One has been tardy and half-hearted American assistance to the non-communist Cambodian resistance; more important has been recent decisions by Thailand to break ranks with its ASEAN allies in order to profit from the Vietnamese-imposed dictatorship.  The Vietnamese communist interest in controlling Cambodia began with the creation by Ho Chi Minh in 1930 of the Indochinese Communist Party, the Cambodian branch of which was renamed the Khmer People's Revolutionary Party (KPRP) in 1951.  Vietnamese ambitions to dominate Indochina were realized in Laos by the successful implantation of the Lao People's Democratic Republic by the North Vietnamese army in 1975.  They were thwarted in Cambodia by the emergence of an ultranationalistic communist faction, led by Pol Pot.  This group refused to play the subservient role of the Laotian communists.  Thus Pol Pot's attacks on Vietnamese border villages after 1975 provided the mere pretext for Vietnam's invasion, the real causes of which lay in the longstanding struggle for Cambodia.  Both Communist parties recognize they have a problem of legitimacy.  The Khmer Rouge problem arises from the holocaust that it unleashed upon the Cambodians from 1975 to 1978.  Vietnam's problem is that it is Cambodia's hereditary enemy, and that the People's Republic of Cambodiachea (PRC) and the KPRP are Vietnamese creations led by former Khmer Rouge, notably party secretary general Heng Samrin and politburo member Hun Sen, the prime minister.  The non-communist Cambodians, led by Prince Norodom Sihanouk and former Prime Minister Son Sann, are neither totalitarians nor agents of Vietnamese colonialism.  They represent traditional Cambodian values, and are therefore preferred by their own people.  But since their inception in 1979, inadequate foreign military support, especially from the U.S., has prevented the non-communists, now 30,000 strong, from raising armies larger than the 40,000-strong Khmer Rouge.  The issue of political legitimacy is the reason each communist faction has sought to establish an alliance with the non-communists, using Prince Sihanouk in particular as a figurehead.  With legitimacy provided by the non-communists, each rival communist faction thinks it can defeat the other, before turning against and eliminating its non-communist allies.  Yet the non-communists are aware of the manipulative plans of their enemies.  This is why they have advocated a political settlement in which power would be adjudicated through a genuine popular ballot, guaranteed by an international peacekeeping force.  Until mid-1988, ASEAN was united in support of this solution.  In early 1988, the political settlement envisaged by the non-communists seemed plausible.  Soviet leader Mikhail Gorbachev was a major reason.  Mr. Gorbachev saw the expansionist ambitions of his predecessors stymied by the resolute containment policy of both China and the pro-Western ASEAN powers.  Support for the Vietnamese occupation of Cambodia cost the Soviet Union economically and diplomatically.  So the Soviets, trying to eliminate the military quagmire in Cambodia, persuaded Hanoi's leaders to negotiate a military withdrawal from Cambodia.  The Soviet assumption of a military quagmire had generated reluctant flexibility in Hanoi.  But change in Thailand's foreign policy undermined that assumption.  Until mid-1988, Thailand had been firm in its support for the Cambodian resistance and its refusal to recognize a government installed by foreign invasion.  It saw an independent Cambodia as a buffer against expansionist Vietnam.  But in late 1988 a newly elected coalition government led by Chatichai Choonhavan gradually initiated a new policy.  A main constituency of the new prime minister's Chat Thai party component is the Bangkok business community.  Buoyed by Thailand's rapid economic growth, Thai businessmen and a circle of young prime ministerial advisers conceived of impoverished and dictatorial Burma and Indochina as zones of Thai economic influence.  Thai security would be guaranteed by a web of commercial ties.  "Turning battlefields into marketplaces" became the new foreign policy slogan.  The slogan found an echo in the proclamations of army commander Chaovalit Yongchaiyut, whose fellow military officers are closely allied with the business community, and whose border units have for 10 years protected -- and profited from -- the smuggling of consumer goods from Bangkok to Phnom Penh.  Against the advice of the Foreign Ministry professionals, led by the statesman Siddhi Savetsila, Mr. Chatichai unilaterally abandoned the ASEAN policy of not recognizing the Vietnamese-installed PRK.  In January and May 1989 he invited the PRK premier, Hun Sen, to Bangkok.  In a further departure from the ASEAN position, Mr. Chatichai's government began to indicate that Thailand would be happy to see the Phnom Penh regime provide the basis for a future political settlement.  It now has gone so far that Thai commanders reportedly have provided Phnom Penh's artillery commanders with precise intelligence on the location of Khmer Rouge units.  Clearly the Thais see a regime installed by Vietnamese troops as more congenial toward Thai economic influence in Indochina than a nationalistic regime, be it of communist or non-communist outlook.  Thus Mr. Gorbachev's original message to Hanoi -- that the military situation in Cambodia is hopeless and negotiating a political settlement with the resistance is the only way out -- has become implausible to Hanoi, and probably to Moscow as well.  The Vietnamese are not compelled to think about giving up Cambodia.  They imagine that their puppet regime led by Hun Sen can survive, with a Sihanoukist fig leaf, once they persuade the Thais to evict the Khmer Rouge from Thai territory and cut off China's supply line.  All of these Vietnamese calculations may be fanciful.  The Thais are under American as well as Chinese pressure not to go all the way with the Vietnamese.  And even if Thailand did what Hanoi wants, there is no guarantee that the Khmer Rouge, operating out of Cambodian mountains and forests with its accumulated arms caches, could not seize power from the PRK once Vietnamese troops have departed.  But whatever Thailand decides, its previous pressures upon Hanoi for peace are no longer there.  Thai avarice has provided Hanoi with a light at the end of the tunnel.  But for the six million people of Cambodia, the tunnel is as long and dark as ever.  ---  Mr. Morris is a fellow at the Russian Research Center and an associate of the Center for International Affairs, both at Harvard University.  London's 11-year-old options market is making a push for greater independence from its parent, the International Stock Exchange, in hopes that a restructuring will lead to livelier trading activity.  Following the recommendations of an internal report, the London Traded Options Market will become a separate subsidiary of the exchange.  The options markets will be run by a separate board, seven of whose 11 members would be nominated by professionals in the options market.  In addition, options exchange members will be able to own and sell their seats, or memberships.  Andrew Hugh Smith, chairman of the ISE, said the market will be in a better position "to develop to its full potential."  After a slow start, the options market experienced a growth spurt in the last five years but has fallen short of early expectations.  Meanwhile, a stock-exchange official noted, the European Options Exchange in Amsterdam, as well as options markets in France and Sweden, "have come on in leaps and bounds."  The London options market expects a total of 10 million contracts to change hands this year, up from 1.1 million in 1984.  About one-quarter of that volume is attributable to an options contract tied to the Financial Times-Stock Exchange 100 Share Index.  In the wake of ever-soaring health-care costs, some entrepreneurs are turning employers' problems into big profits.  Utilization-review firms -- companies that review hospital costs for employers and point out unnecessary treatments -- have exploded in number over the past three years or so.  So many firms -- roughly 150 to 200 -- have popped up so fast that doctors complain they now spend endless hours on phones justifying their treatment plans.  Small firms started just a few years ago have doubled and tripled in size and in revenue.  These are companies -- often started by physicians -- that, for instance, would look at a $5,000, three-day hospital stay for lower back treatment and suggest to a client that the patient could be treated for $500 at home with medication and therapy just as effectively.  But the years of easy growth in this field are partly over.  By the early 1990s, many predict, these firms will follow the same path of other explosive industries -- more intense competition, the emergence of dominant players, specialization in different niches and, ultimately, a shakeout of weaker, less experienced firms.  "You've gone from a market saturation of zero in 1983 to a market saturation of 70% to 90% today.  That growth can't be sustained," says Arnold Milstein, who founded National Medical Audit, a unit of William M. Mercer-Meidinger-Hansen Inc., which evaluates health-care review firms.  And as in any evolving industry, almost as fast as young health-care firms can get a client list, larger companies with deeper pockets buy them out.  This consolidation, many say, will inevitably result in a shakeout of smaller, undercapitalized firms.  "The ones doing the best nowadays are those who spent every dime they had on new technology . . . as opposed to somebody coming in with a personal computer and a telephone," says Jerry Balter, a health-care investment banker with Robertson, Stephens & Co.  He predicts even more consolidation and acquisitions as the gap between newcomers and entrenched firms widens.  Since it was started in 1987, Value Health Inc., a Santa Monica, Calif., health-care review firm, acquired four health-care management companies, each specializing in a different field: podiatry, mental health, prescription drugs and general services.  But HealthCare Compare Corp., Downers Grove, Ill., probably best illustrates one company's rapid rise from entrepreneur to major player in the booming utilization-review market.  If a patient needs a gall bladder removed, for example, one of HealthCare's 600 staff members, including physicians, will call doctors for relevant information on the patient's treatment plan.  Information is reviewed, fed into a computer and compared with national norms on the procedure and the company's own data.  The staff then confers with doctors on whether the patient should be admitted and what treatment is appropriate.  And like many firms the same size, HealthCare claims it can save $4 to $8 for every dollar an employer spends with it.  Robert Becker in 1982 mortgaged his home, sold his allergy practice and used his pension fund for collateral to start HealthCare.  The 67-year-old physician waited 18 months for his first client.  "I saw opportunity," he says.  Today, Dr. Becker's firm is one of the largest health-care review firms in the nation and one of only a few that is publicly held.  The firm's revenue nearly tripled to $32 million in 1989 from $11.6 million in 1987; its client list includes companies like McDonald's Corp., Hyatt Regency and United Airlines.  A key to HealthCare's success, Dr. Becker says, is that all calls are handled by registered nurses, as opposed to clerks.  And roughly 40% of cases are handled by physicians, who confer with the patient's doctor to determine appropriate care.  To set themselves apart from the growing number of competitors, many firms have begun to specialize in certain services.  Psychiatric and substance-abuse treatment -- two areas that have no rigid standardized treatment and have undergone hefty price increases -- have seen the most growth in recent years.  August International Corp., for example, attributes much of its success to a sophisticated computer program that allows its staff to customize services -- such as the dental, chiropractic and mental health fields.  "All big clients want something different," says Blayne Lequeux, who started the Orange, Calif.-based firm in 1985.  The company has tripled its revenue every year since then; last year, gross revenue was roughly $15 million.  Like many others, August International has expanded into two additional services: a preferred provider network -- a group of doctors that is offered exclusive service in return for discounted rates -- and third-party claims administration, which pays a company's insurance claims up to a specific amount.  Still other firms specialize by marketing themselves only in specific regions.  Aside from competition based on niche service and products, independent firms must also compete with huge, insurer-owned review companies, like Cigna Corp. and Metropolitan Life Insurance Co., which usually have a built-in client base and solid financial backing.  So many health-care review firms have popped up that hospital doctors complain they tie up too much time, always second-guessing their medical opinion.  "The staff's priority has become the paper work.  We've turned hospitals and doctors into insurance agents," says Joanne Lamprey, a health-care advocate with InterQual Inc., a consulting firm.  Pan American World Airways is expanding its flights out of Miami International Airport in a move that will likely hinder Eastern Airline's return to a lucrative market it once dominated.  By December, the unit of New York-based Pan Am Corp. plans to increase its number of Miami daily departures to about 62 flights from about 46 in December 1988.  For all of Florida, it plans to expand to about 71 daily flights from about 49 flights during the same month a year ago.  The jump arrives as Miami-based Eastern Airlines, a unit of Texas Air Corp., is struggling to rebuild a domestic system crippled since March by a machinists union strike.  "With their labor problems and bankruptcy {law proceedings}, they left a major void in the Miami market," said Jerry Murphy, vice president and general sales manager at Pan Am.  "We intend to fill it."  The increases are timed to start this month as more people travel to Florida during the peak fall and winter seasons, Mr. Murphy said.  The move was also prompted by recent delivery of 15 Airbus Industrie aircraft and Boeing Co. 727 jets, he said.  Before the strike, Eastern said it relied on the Florida market for about one-third of its business.  Miami was a lucrative part of that business, funneling passengers to the carrier's international destinations and attracting vacation travelers.  But the airline's share of the Miami market has plummeted to 11% in July from 35% a year earlier.  Because of Eastern's slowdown in service since the strike, several carriers have raced to fill the gap.  For example, American Airlines, a unit of AMR Corp., has tripled its share of the Miami market.  In July, it had 12% of total passenger traffic compared with 4% in July 1988.  The competition is bound to complicate Eastern's chances of returning to Miami, industry analysts said.  Pan Am currently holds a 17% share of the Miami market.  "Both Pan Am and American are battling it out for Miami," said Paul Karos, an airline analyst at First Boston Corp. in New York.  "They will make it very difficult for Eastern to return in a very significant way."  In recent weeks, airport officials in Miami, where Eastern is a major employer, have attempted to secure space at the airport if Eastern wants to rebuild further.  For example, they have guaranteed Eastern rights to 12 gates on one concourse and preferential use of 10 gates on another concourse, said Peter Reaveley, the airport's chief of aviation.  But even airport officials aren't overly optimistic about Eastern's return.  "It's a dog-eat-dog business," said Mr. Reaveley.  "It's unlikely that Eastern will ever be the size that it once was in Miami."  In addition to rebuilding Atlanta as its hub of operations under reorganization plans announced during the past several months, Eastern is also trying to regain its Florida markets.  Despite Pan Am's move, Eastern plans to be the bigger of the two in Florida.  By Nov. 1, it plans to offer about 135 daily flights out of the Sunshine State.  Before the strike, it was a dominant carrier in the Florida market with about 204 daily flights.  The airline plans to boost the number of its Miami daily departures to about 47 flights from about 27 flights currently offered.  Before the strike began, Eastern had about 106 departures out of Miami.  The move is part of a broader Eastern plan to rebuild service by December to about 800 daily flights.  Mr. Murphy said Pan Am's action is part of a company strategy to expand the carrier's domestic service, particularly from Florida cities.  The airline will also be expanding its Caribbean routes.  Cie.  Financiere de Suez has done it again.  Only one year after defeating Carlo De Benedetti in an epic takeover battle for holding company Societe Generale de Belgique, Suez has taken a new leap forward with the almost certain acquisition of holding company Cie.  Industrielle and its main asset, insurer Groupe Victoire.  The unexpected development came yesterday when Industrielle Chairman JeanMarc Vernes announced he had reached agreement with Suez to sell them the 25.5% stake in Industrielle held by Societe Centrale d'Investissements after Suez raised its takeover bid for both groups by 13% to 27.2 billion French francs ($4.08 billion).  Industrielle's other shareholders are expected to follow suit, bringing an end to France's biggest-ever takeover battle.  The likely victory completes the French holding company's transformation from a slumbering French financial company to a diversified European powerhouse, with a vast array of banking, industrial, insurance and real estate assets.  By gaining control of Victoire, the real object of this battle, Suez is taking over Europe's sixth-largest insurer following its recent acquisition of West Germany's Colonia Versicherung AG.  The move also attests to the growing aggressiveness and mobility of French capitalism as French concerns seek to build up European market positions ahead of the planned breakdown of European Community trade barriers after 1992.  In the three years since Suez was sold to the public, breaking out of a five-year corset of nationalization, the holding company has nearly tripled in size in terms of assets it manages and has become one of France's largest companies in terms of stock market capitalization.  And all this has come under Chairman Renaud de La Geniere, a former governor of France's central bank, who took over in 1986 amid deep skepticism over whether he was the right man to head a holding company.  But just as it faced a barrage of questions after winning control of Generale de Belgique, Suez is encountering some skepticism over this new victory.  Bankers and analysts wonder what strategy Suez will pursue in the highly competitive world of European insurance and how Suez will finance its double-barreled takeover.  Moreover, some analysts say Suez could become a victim of its own success: By adding an insurance pillar to its list of assets, it's diversifying at a time when other groups are refocusing on a few core activities.  Thus, it could become a tempting takeover target for a raider like Sir James Goldsmith, who recently launched a hostile #13.35 billion bid for the British conglomerate B.A.T Industries PLC.  Aware of these criticisms, Suez officials were modest about their victory.  Unlike Mr. Vernes, who held a news conference yesterday, Suez kept a low profile, issuing only a short communique announcing its accord with Mr. Vernes.  "We've become something of a Japanese group," explained Suez managing director Patrick Ponsolle.  "We have a long-term vision."  Mr. Ponsolle added that Suez was "calm and serene" about the financing of the transaction.  Suez's subdued victory reflects the surprise here over the accord, which cuts short what many thought would develop into a long and bitter U.S.-style proxy fight replete with psychological warfare tactics and legal battles.  Last week, Mr. Vernes had announced he would not launch a counterbid to Suez's initial 23.7 billion franc offer, but vowed he would "do everything within the law to make Suez's bid fail."  Early yesterday, however, after lengthy negotiations, Messrs.  Vernes and de La Geniere agreed to settle their differences after Suez agreed to raise its offer for Industrielle to 14,800 francs a share from 13,000 francs, valuing the entire holding company at 22.19 billion francs.  Suez also agreed to sweeten its tender offer for all outstanding Victoire shares to 2,276 francs per share for common stock, from 2,000 francs previously, and 1,138 francs per share for non-voting shares, up from 1,000 francs.  This values the insurance concern at 36.4 billion francs.  "We could have continued this conflict but I didn't want to take that risk," Mr. Vernes explained yesterday, saying that one of the reasons that led him to give in was that a lengthy fight could have endangered Victoire's acquisition of Colonia, a transaction he said was "of national interest" for France.  During the battle, however, Mr. Vernes disclosed that Suez had offered to buy him out for 16,000 francs a share before the battle began, but he refused at the time.  Mr. Vernes, the scion of a family of bankers, stands to reap a substantial consolation prize: Societe Centrale d'Investissement, whose 25.5% stake in Industrielle is on its books for 350 million francs, will receive about 5.5 billion francs for its shares, and Mr. Vernes and his family control 34% of Societe Centrale d'Investissement.  Societe de Participations Mobilieres, another group in the complex web of companies controlling Industrielle, stands to gain another 1 billion francs for its shares, Mr. Vernes said.  Buying the 81.5% of Industrielle it doesn't already own will cost Suez 18.08 billion francs.  Once it controls Industrielle, Suez will own 70% of Victoire.  But it has also offered to buy all remaining shares outstanding in the insurer, a move that will cost it another 9.1 billion francs.  But Suez says its final outlay is likely to be much less than this because it can recoup a large part of its costs by selling off 49% of Industrielle and Victoire and selling off assets.  One senior financial source said a leading candidate for a large stake in Victoire is France's state-owned Union des Assurances de Paris.  But Suez's Mr. Ponsolle wouldn't confirm this, saying that Suez "is crumbling under candidacies from groups wanting to be associated with us."  London share prices enjoyed a late rally and closed at a new post-crash high as the market received strength from news that Grand Metropolitan PLC has agreed to sell its William Hill/Mecca bookmaking interests to Brent Walker PLC.  Tokyo stocks finished easier in thin trading.  Prior to the announcement of the Grand Metropolitan accord, the London market had dallied in thin, lackluster trading, with a trickle of light selling topping thin buying interest.  The Financial Times-Stock Exchange 100 index ended at an intraday high of 2426, a rise of 6.8 points.  The index touched an intraday low of 2410.4, a fall of 8.8.  Dealers said the London market's late rise owed more to market makers' shifting prices higher to reflect improved sentiment rather than any significant outbreak of buying interest.  "The market makers are dictating the market's movements," one trader said.  "They move their prices in line with market sentiment, which at the moment is very hard to pin down."  Dealers said London shares were little influenced by a tentative early showing on Wall Street.  The narrower Financial Times 30-share index ended up 5 points at 2008.6.  Volume registered 465.1 million shares, compared with 369.9 million Monday.  Despite the rise, dealers said the market's underlying upward momentum was still being tempered by the beginning of the interim earnings season, which has sharpened fears that U.K. corporate profitability might lose its shine.  Grand Metropolitan's announcement that it's selling its betting interests to Brent Walker, a drinks and leisure company, for #685 million ($1.07 billion) led to a 9-pence (14-cent) rise in GrandMet's share price to 657 ($10.24.) Brent Walker, meanwhile, shed 15 pence to 374.  The deal, which had been widely anticipated, is conditional on clearance by the U.K. Office of Fair Trading.  British Airways rallied 10 pence to 218, despite earlier fears that its 15% involvement in the bid for United Airlines might damage its share price.  Dealers pinned the stock's rise to strong U.S demand and a growing appreciation that the company is undervalued by international standards.  "United Airlines is being bought out at around eight times cash flow whereas British Airways is trading at around three times its cash flow," one dealer said.  A number of stocks in the pharmaceutical sector encountered profit-taking after recent strength.  Among these, Fisons fell 8 1/2 to 358 1/2, Amersham retreated 27 to 467 and Glaxo fell 2 to 1622.  Reckitt & Colman, meanwhile, eased 10 to 1222, ahead of the company's interim results due for release tomorrow.  Dealers said the market drew some relief from a number of half-year company earnings reports.  "All the figures were quite reasonable, which helped reassure the market," one trader noted.  At Tokyo, advances led by Sony and others pushed up the key Nikkei index in the morning.  But profit-taking pressured it down toward the end of the day, with the index falling nearly 300 points from its early high.  The Nikkei index of 225 selected issues, a 135.56-point gainer Monday, was down 41.83 points to 34441.95.  In early trading in Tokyo Wednesday, the Nikkei index shed 25.51 points to 34416.44.  Tuesday's volume on the First Section was estimated at 500 million shares, up from 437 million Monday.  Advancing issues outnumbered declining issues by 464 to 443, while 210 remained unchanged.  Tuesday's notable gainer was Sony, which reached an all-time high of 9,070 yen ($62.13) in intraday dealings and finished the day at 8,950 yen ($61.30), up 150 yen ($1.03) from Monday's close.  Buying interest for Sony was sparked by a report in the Nihon Keizai Shimbun that Ines, a data service company listed on the second section, may distribute a one-for-two gratis issue, traders said.  Trade in Ines was suspended Tuesday by the Tokyo Stock Exchange.  But the report rekindled speculation that companies such as Sony, with strong earnings performances, could carry out similarly large gratis issues, traders said.  The Tokyo Stock Price Index (Topix) of all issues listed in the First Section, which gained 12.08 points Monday, was down 1.25 points, or 0.05%, at 2613.34.  The Second Section index, which lost 13.21 points Monday, was up 12.26 points, or 0.36%, to close at 3372.05.  Volume in the second section was estimated at 20 million shares, up from 16.5 million Monday.  Sony's advance also stirred gains for other light electrical issues, traders said.  Pioneer was up 160 to 4,420.  TDK gained 10 to 5,760 and Fanuc advanced 220 to close at 7,120.  Secom and Yakult Honsha were among those bought on speculation for gratis issues, traders said.  In the morning, a broad range of issues were bought as sentiment improved after the Nikkei's Monday advance.  Surges Monday in steels and constructions that have been sluggish for weeks motivated investors to participate in buying activities Tuesday morning, traders said.  In the afternoon, however, investors became cautious because they believed stock prices had soared too rapidly, and some investors retreated, traders said.  Other gaining issues Tuesday included pharmaceuticals, which were down on profit-taking Monday.  As earnings prospects for drug companies remain strong due to newly developed products, the shares keep receiving buy orders whenever their prices go down, traders said.  Eisai was up a sharp 230 to 2,500, Chugai gained 70 to 2,280 and Sankyo advanced 70 to 2,900.  Elsewhere, share prices closed higher in Wellington, Singapore, Hong Kong and Sydney; mixed in Manila and lower in Taipei and Seoul.  Stocks closed higher in Frankfurt, Brussels, Milan and Amsterdam, lower in Stockholm and mixed in Paris and Zurich.  South African gold stocks closed lower.  Here are price trends on the world's major stock markets, as calculated by Morgan Stanley Capital International Perspective, Geneva.  To make them directly comparable, each index is based on the close of 1969 equaling 100.  The percentage change is since year-end.  @ % This  @ Sep 4 Sep 1 Year  @ U.S. .......................... 325.3 325.3 + 27.0  @ Britain ....................... 724.9 721.5 + 32.7  @ Canada ........................ 438.0 438.0 + 19.3  @ Japan ......................... 1536.5 1530.0 + 8.2  @ France ........................ 547.1 543.5 + 23.6  @ Germany ....................... 257.6 254.6 + 23.9  @ Hong Kong ..................... 1901.7 1864.8 - 6.3  @ Switzerland ................... 236.4 235.2 + 36.7  @ Australia ..................... 351.5 349.0 + 21.1  @ World index ................... 534.5 534.9 + 8.1  Palo Verde Nuclear Generating Station said the Nuclear Regulatory Commission proposed $250,000 of civil fines against the plant for various violations.  Palo Verde said it won't contest the NRC's findings.  "We acknowledge the violations and will pay the civil penalty," said William F. Conway, executive vice president of Palo Verde, which is operated by the Arizona Public Service Co. utility unit of Phoenix-based Pinnacle West Capital Corp.  "We have since instituted strict programs and standards to preclude recurrence of similar violations in the future."  The violations were found by an NRC inspection team following the shutdown of Palo Verde Unit 3 on March 3, during which several equipment malfunctions occurred.  The violations included inadequate preventive and corrective actions on equipment in the steam system, for which a $100,000 penalty is proposed; inadequate training and certain operating procedure violations, for which a $50,000 penalty is proposed; and inadequate lighting and failures to inspect and test emergency lighting systems, for which a $100,000 penalty is proposed.  The dollar climbed to its highest levels in 2 1/2 months despite concerted attempts to stem its rise by at least a dozen central banks.  Traders and analysts said the U.S. currency is being propelled by an unexpectedly robust U.S. economy and a growing belief in the market that the Federal Reserve Board won't lower U.S. interest rates anytime soon.  Higher interest rates tend to increase a currency's allure to international investors.  "The dollar is still in an upward direction despite central-bank intervention," said Andre Woerhoff, chief mark trader at DG Bank in Frankfurt, West Germany.  When central banks sold dollars yesterday to slow the U.S. currency's rise, "most people in the market took it as a chance to buy cheap dollars," he said.  He predicted "we will test the two-mark level" for the dollar, possibly as early as this morning.  In late afternoon New York trading, the dollar was at 1.9883 marks, up from 1.9780 marks in Europe Monday and 1.9810 marks in New York late Friday before the threeday holiday weekend.  The dollar rose to 146.84 yen from 146.13 yen in Tokyo Monday and 145.98 yen in New York late Friday.  Meanwhile, the pound fell to $1.5385 from $1.5533 on Monday in London and $1.5500 in New York before the weekend.  The dollar stands well above the upper limits of the trading ranges of 1.70-to-1.90 marks and 120-to-140 yen within which most traders and economists say the Group of Seven major industrial countries have tried to keep the U.S. currency since February 1987.  The G-7 includes the U.S., Japan, West Germany, France, Britain, Italy and Canada.  In Tokyo Wednesday, the dollar opened for trading at 146.90 yen, up from 146.65 yen at Tokyo's Tuesday close.  At one point in late European and early New York activity Tuesday, the dollar traded as high as 1.9938 marks and 147.25 yen before falling back on profit taking.  Those are its highest levels since mid-June.  In intraday trading on June 15, the dollar reached a 31-month high of 2.0475 marks and a 20-month peak of 151.85 yen.  "The mood of the market is to buy dollars and wait for the dollar to go over two marks," said Jack Kessler, senior vice president in charge of Chase Manhattan Bank's New York foreign-exchange operations.  "It appears that the Germans aren't going to raise their interest rates and that the U.S. isn't going to lower its rates -- in fact, some people expect the Fed to tighten a little -- so the market has been aggressively buying dollars."  A rising dollar threatens to undermine the four-year-long effort of the U.S. and its major trading partners to reduce the U.S. trade deficit and correspondingly large Japanese and West German surpluses.  That is because a higher dollar makes U.S. exports more expensive and reduces the price of imports to American consumers.  On the other hand, a rising dollar helps reduce U.S. inflationary pressures.  By keeping a lid on import prices, a strong U.S. currency inhibits the ability of U.S. manufacturers to raise domestic prices.  Conversely, it also adds to inflationary pressures in other countries with weakening currencies.  The dollar began its climb Tuesday in early Far Eastern trading, but really shot up when European markets opened later in the day.  With the dollar trading at 1.9885 marks, the Federal Reserve Bank of New York -- which executes foreign-exchange policy for the U.S. Treasury Department -- and several European central banks began selling dollars for marks in what dealers said was a concerted effort to slow the U.S. currency's ascent.  "Every minute another central bank seemed to come in," said a trader at a big West German bank.  But dollar sales by the central banks of the U.S., West Germany, Britain, France, Canada, Belgium, the Netherlands, Austria, Switzerland, Italy and Spain had only a small effect as the dollar quickly rebounded to more than 1.99 marks.  "There was little impact -- a little correction -- then the market came back to buy dollars," said Mr. Woerhoff of DG Bank.  Earlier in Tokyo, when the dollar was changing hands at 145.95 yen, the Bank of Japan sold about $400 million, according to dealers.  They said the Fed also sold dollars for marks and yen repeatedly during U.S. trading hours.  As is its custom, the Fed declined to confirm or deny whether it had intervened.  But in a rare admission, the West German, French, Austrian and Belgian central banks all confirmed they had sold dollars.  Nonetheless, traders said the intervention appeared to be more an attempt to slow the dollar's rise than cap it.  "It wasn't really a decisive action, but was more or less a warning signal to damp the bullish mood," said Andrew Ruschkowski, a currency-options trader at Dresdner Bank in Frankfurt.  "The market took the dollars immediately and was able to sell them back within 15 to 30 minutes at a profit."  Behind the dollar's recent strength lies a vibrant U.S. economy, relatively firm U.S. interest rates and, as a consequence, a strong appetite by foreign investors for U.S. securities.  Beginning in July, many analysts anticipated the U.S. economy would slow and that the Fed would continue to ease monetary policy.  But "now all the economic data coming out since {early} August suggest that the economy is more resilient than initially thought, and that pretty much wiped out any expectation of additional easing," said Nicholas P. Sargen, an international economist at Salomon Brothers Inc.  Specifically, he pointed to the latest Commerce Department estimate that the economy grew at an annual rate of 2.7% during the second quarter, up from an earlier projection of 1.7%.  He also said the latest figures for employment, consumer spending and housing starts were all stronger than analysts expected.  Some traders also mentioned a story in yesterday's Wall Street Journal that said some regional Fed banks were prepared to consider higher U.S. interest rates to combat potential inflation associated with the economy's vigor.  Despite the stronger dollar's potential to damage U.S. exports, some analysts say they believe the Bush Administration doesn't care to see the currency weaken.  "There's no interest in the U.S. to see it much lower, but they also don't want a wild rally," said a dealer at Commerzbank in Frankfurt.  Seiyu Nakao, chief strategist for Nomura Research Institute's U.S. unit in New York, noted that a rising dollar tempers U.S. inflationary pressures.  He also said there wasn't much more to be gained from its weakening -- especially against the yen -- after the U.S. currency had already declined for the better part of 4 1/2 years.  While the U.S. is currently running a slight trade surplus with the European Community, the U.S. trade deficit with Japan remains extraordinarily large despite the dollar's 44% fall since March 1985 against the yen.  Moreover, Mr. Nakao said a rising U.S. currency might lighten some of the political pressure on the administration by damping the booming foreign appetite for U.S. real estate and corporate acquisitions.  At the same time, currency traders and analysts are beginning to doubt the West German central bank will raise key interest rates at its scheduled meeting tomorrow -- despite the inflationary impact in Germany of a stronger dollar.  Several noted recent comments by Bundesbank President Karl Otto Poehl downplaying the need to raise West German rates.  In a television interview, Mr. Poehl said inflationary pressure in West Germany remained relatively weak despite strong economic growth and that declines in commodity prices -- West Germany is a major oil importer -- were helping to keep inflation down.  In addition, Mr. Sargen of Salomon Brothers said: "Whenever the market has put the most pressure on the Bundesbank to tighten, it has resisted.  Instead, it has opted to tighten when the foreign-exchange and money markets have been relatively calm."  For these reasons, many traders and analysts predict the dollar could continue to rise to about 2.03-to-2.05 marks and 149to-150 yen.  But they also say its upside potential is limited.  "We might test those levels, but now we've got too narrow interest-rate spreads {the difference between U.S. and foreign interest rates} to see the dollar break through" them, Mr. Sargen said.  Other traders also said that European portfolio managers have tended to lock in profits on their U.S. investments by selling dollars when the currency rises above two marks.  On the Commodity Exchange in New York, gold for current delivery settled at $359.60 an ounce, down $1.  Estimated volume was a light 1.1 million ounces.  In early trading in Hong Kong Wednesday, gold was at $358.88 an ounce.  Irving Azoff, the former rock 'n' roll manager who turned around MCA Inc.'s once-moribund music division, resigned as chairman of the company's music entertainment group to start his own independent record company.  MCA has on the table an offer to distribute records from Mr. Azoff's company, which both sides say he isn't obligated to sign.  Nevertheless, industry sources say MCA wouldn't have released Mr. Azoff from his contract if it didn't have a high expectation to be able to distribute his records, and perhaps have an equity interest in Mr. Azoff's company.  Mr. Azoff calls MCA's offer "very generous" but insists, "I'm a free agent."  Mr. Azoff, 41 years old, will be replaced by Al Teller, president of MCA Records since last year and former president of CBS Records.  Mr. Azoff had been negotiating for a year to be released from his contract, which would have expired in April 1991.  Reports had been circulating for some time that Mr. Azoff, after more than six years with the company, was bored, unhappy and eager to go back to entrepreneurial life.  "I'd rather build a company than run one," Mr. Azoff said in an interview.  He said he would spend the coming months studying MCA's offer and begin producing a business plan for his record company, which he said could be launched for $75 million to $150 million early next year.  "Because of the dearth of independent labels, it's the perfect time to start a record company," said David Geffen, chairman of the Geffen Co., "and Irving's the perfect guy to do it."  Mr. Geffen's company soon may be the last major wholly owned independent record company, with all the others being snapped up by the six major companies, controlled by Time-Warner Inc., Bertelsman Music Group, Philips N.V., Thorn EMI PLC, Sony Corp. and MCA.  And the prices have been astronomical: Philips's Polygram unit is said to be close to acquiring A&M Records for $500 million.  So Mr. Azoff, despite a contract from MCA that paid him $5 million in cash and stock last year, stands to build a much larger fortune if he starts a successful company himself.  Mr. Azoff's current efforts on behalf of MCA to keep the Los Angeles Raiders playing at the Los Angeles Coliseum, which MCA manages with a partner, will continue.  He will also continue as a consultant for MCA's facilities management operation.  In a letter to employees distributed yesterday, Mr. Azoff recalled how MCA had once been "the Music Cemetery of America" and "to the record business what strip mining is to the ecology."  When Mr. Azoff took over in 1983, he dumped 41 out of 46 acts and fired most top managers.  The division lost $8 million in 1983; it had operating profit of $60 million last year.  It purchased a 20% stake in Motown Records and built a strong black music and country music presence.  Its acts now include Tom Petty, Fine Young Cannibals and Bobby Brown.  In 1985, Mr. Azoff was the only major distributor to boycott an industry agreement to put labels warning of "obscene" material on albums.  Perhaps the low point of the Azoff years at MCA was the company's involvement with a record distributor, Salvatore Pisello, who was alleged to have longstanding ties to organized crime.  Mr. Azoff has denied that the company knew of the alleged ties.  An Arkansas law firm paid $12 million to settle claims arising from its advice to FirstSouth F.A., a Pine Bluff, Ark., savings and loan association that was felled by speculative real estate loans to stockholders and other borrowers.  The settlement was the latest in a string of agreements resolving claims by the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corp. against law firms that worked closely with now-defunct thrifts.  In the Arkansas case, the FSLIC sought restitution from the 15-lawyer firm of Ramsay, Cox, Bridgforth, Gilbert, Harrelson & Starling, of Pine Bluff, which had been general counsel to FirstSouth from 1919 until late 1986, when the thrift was declared insolvent and closed.  At issue was Ramsay Cox's "failure to provide adequate counseling to FirstSouth with respect to the legality of certain loans," said F. Thomas Hecht, a partner with the Chicago law firm of Hopkins & Sutter, which represents the FSLIC in its role as receiver for FirstSouth.  Mr. Hecht wouldn't specify the loans involved in the agreement with Ramsay Cox, and he declined to say how much the FSLIC originally sought when settlement talks began 18 months ago.  The FSLIC hadn't filed suit against the law firm.  A spokesman for the firm said the settlement was paid by Ramsay Cox's insurer, Valley Forge Insurance Co., a unit of CNA Financial Corp., Chicago.  The FSLIC, through Hopkins & Sutter, previously obtained a $6.6 million settlement from FirstSouth's officers and directors and a separate $9 million settlement from a now-disbanded Dallas mortgage brokerage firm that had placed several loans with the thrift.  FirstSouth was a $1.68 billion thrift when it was declared insolvent in December 1986.  The bulk of FirstSouth's loans had gone to a group of 13 borrowers who owned or controlled more than half of the thrift's stock, federal regulators said at the time.  The regulators cited several instances in which FirstSouth violated limits on loans to one borrower.  A federal criminal investigation into FirstSouth's lending practices led to the indictment in June of Howard J. Wiechern Jr., former chairman and chief executive officer, and Roderick D. Reed III, former president and chief operations officer.  U.S. Attorney Chuck Banks of Little Rock said the investigation is continuing.  Dow Jones & Co. will consider stocks traded over the counter when making future changes in its average of 20 transportation issues.  A decision about whether to add such a stock -- and if so, which stock and when -- hasn't yet been made, however, said Charles N. Stabler, a consultant to Dow Jones, which publishes The Wall Street Journal.  "In the past, we've limited" the average to New York Stock Exchange issues, Mr. Stabler said, "but there isn't any reason to do that any longer."  Mr. Stabler explained that though a number of companies would have qualified for the transporation average based on size and distribution of ownership, the over-the-counter market previously listed only bid and asked quotes rather than actual transaction prices.  But the National Association of Securities Dealers now reports transactions through its National Market System just as the Big Board and the American Stock Exchange do, Mr. Stabler said.  Thus, once computers are reprogrammed to handle it, NMS stocks would be eligible for consideration.  Grand Metropolitan PLC said it agreed to sell its bookmaking interests to Brent Walker PLC for #685 million ($1.06 billion).  The agreement, which was widely anticipated, is conditional on clearance by the U.K. Office of Fair Trading and approval by Brent Walker shareholders.  Separately, Grand Met said it is negotiating to sell to other parties its Irish betting shops and, to meet the requirements of the U.K. Monopolies and Mergers Commission, a further 45 shops in the London area.  Brent Walker, a British leisure and beverage concern, said it would pay cash for the William Hill and Mecca gambling businesses.  The deal is expected to be completed by Oct. 17.  Brent Walker said it will form a new company named William Hill Group Ltd., which will be owned by the banks that are financing the purchase.  The sale is part of a corporate restructuring at Grand Met, which is aiming to focus on its core businesses and to reduce its high level of debt arising from its $5.8 billion acquisition of Pillsbury Co. last January.  In late afternoon trading in London, Grand Met shares rose nine pence to 657 pence, while Brent Walker shares dropped 15 pence to 374 pence.  The William Hill and Mecca gambling businesses total some 1,500 betting shops, together with a range of on-course betting activities.  Esterline Corp. said its fiscal third-quarter earnings rose 29% on falling sales, helped by lower interest expense and a profitable foreign subsidiary.  Esterline, a Bellevue, Wash., maker of factory-automation equipment, said earnings for the quarter ended July 31 were $2.5 million, or 29 cents a share, up from $1.9 million, or 22 cents a share, in the year-ago quarter.  Sales were $67.4 million, down 7.6% from $72.9 million in the 1988 quarter.  The revenue drop reflected a continued slowdown in the electronics industry, a major purchaser of Esterline's equipment for making printed-circuit boards.  But that was offset by the return to profitability of a foreign subsidiary, which the company declined to identify. (Esterline has units in Mexico, Canada and several European countries.) That subsidiary had a loss last year, but the loss wasn't tax deductible, the company said.  The company also said that a positive cash flow over the past 12 months allowed it to cut its debt level, thus decreasing interest outlays.  Two U.S. Department of Agriculture scientists said they isolated a gene that plays a key role in the ripening of fruits and vegetables.  The advance may lead to new ways to reduce spoilage of fruits and vegetables and thus to get fresher produce to consumers.  The new-found gene produces an enzyme that triggers the production of ethylene, the naturally occurring chemical that ripens fruits and vegetables.  It may be possible to block the gene, and thus to halt or slow the ripening of a fruit or vegetable while it is on the plant and in shipment.  The produce could be ripened later -- even at the supermarket, for example -- by applying ethylene externally.  In a report published in the Proceedings of the National Academy of Sciences, Takahide Sato and Athanasios Theologis said the gene produces an enzyme, called ACC synthase, that triggers the production of the chemical 1-aminocyclopropane-1, which is abbreviated ACC. ACC, in turn, controls the production of ethylene.  To prove their findings, the scientists inserted the gene for ACC synthase into a bacterium and a yeast and found that the two micro-organisms produced ethylene, which they normally don't produce.  This, they said, "confirmed the biological activity" of the gene.  The isolation of the mechanism that controls ripening has enormous implications for the agriculture industry.  According to the U.S. Department of Agriculture, about half the produce harvested in the U.S. for sale fresh is lost to spoilage.  To prevent such losses, tomatoes and bananas, for instance, are currently picked green, and ripening later is hastened with ethylene.  But the early harvest doesn't prevent ripening of the produce, which thus gets damaged during shipment.  The researchers, from the USDA Research Service at Albany, Calif., say that if produce can be prevented from ripening altogether until it reaches the supermarket shelf, much of the loss to spoilage can also be prevented.  "By controlling the expression of the gene {for ethylene production} we can grow bananas that simply won't be capable of ripening by themselves," said Joseph Varner, professor of biology at Washington University in St. Louis, who has been following the work of the USDA scientists.  The researchers said it would be possible to genetically engineer plants to inhibit production of ethylene in their fruits.  They emphasized, however, that their research is "preliminary" and that isolation of the gene is only one of many steps toward reducing perishability.  They also said that for fruit or vegetables ripened on command, such other factors as taste, texture and aroma also need to be considered.  DWG Corp.'s vice chairman and director, Leonard H. Roberts, resigned yesterday morning and issued a scathing attack on the company's chairman, Miami Beach financier Victor Posner.  Hours later, Mr. Roberts was fired as president and chief executive officer of Arby's Inc., an Atlanta-based restaurant company controlled by DWG.  The departure of Mr. Roberts, who was widely credited with turning around Arby's in recent years, marked the latest blow to DWG, the crown jewel of Mr. Posner's embattled empire.  For the past five months, the holding company has been fighting a $22-a-share, or $572 million, hostile bid from New York investor Andrew Heine.  Last week, a group of Arby's franchisees bid more than $200 million for Arby's Inc., the marketing, franchising and service company for the 2,100 restaurants in the chain.  Mr. Posner, who has said he holds 46.5% of DWG's common stock, rejected the franchisees' bid.  DWG's stock, however, was relatively unaffected by the latest news, gaining 12.5 cents a share to close at $12 in composite trading on the American Stock Exchange.  A spokesman for Mr. Posner said Mr. Roberts had been fired by Arby's board for insubordination and for failing to follow policies and procedures, including using the titles president and chief executive officer when he was only an executive vice president and chief operating officer.  "Mr.  Roberts resigned for one reason: he knew he was going to be fired," the spokesman said.  The spokesman said prominent New York restaurant executive Murray Riese would be named to succeed Mr. Roberts.  Analysts and consultants, meanwhile, said the management strife was bound to hurt the company.  "It's difficult but not impossible, of course, to operate with this turmoil going on," said Kenneth Franklin, president of Franchise Developments Inc., a franchise-consulting company in Pittsburgh.  Mr. Roberts said in an interview yesterday that he had been considering resigning for some time because of the heavy-handed way in which Mr. Posner ran DWG. Events, he said, came to a head last week after the franchisees made their bid for Arby's.  On Thursday, Mr. Roberts said he recommended to Mr. Posner that he either sell Arby's to the franchisee group or allow Mr. Roberts to find the highest bidder.  "He said, 'I will never sell.  I don't have to sell,'" Mr. Roberts said.  A spokeswoman for Mr. Posner confirmed that Mr. Roberts made such a recommendation, adding: "It wasn't appropriate for him to make this type of recommendation, especially in light of the fact that Mr. Posner has stated that Arby's isn't for sale."  During the Labor Day weekend, according to Mr. Roberts, Mr. Posner, among other things, demanded a pledge of loyalty from him and other Arby's executives.  Mr. Posner also told the executives that they would be demoted and that he wanted to move Arby's headquarters to Miami.  Later, according to Mr. Roberts, Mr. Posner ruminated about replacing Mr. Roberts with Mr. Riese.  Mr. Riese couldn't be reached for comment.  In a letter to Mr. Posner, Mr. Roberts said he had "been a witness to conduct and behavior that I thought I would never experience in all my professional career, particularly as a board member of a public corporation."  Mr. Roberts said in the letter that Mr. Posner intimidated board members and expected them to rubber stamp his decisions.  "I have seen every form of intimidation displayed by you, including vicious personal attacks on certain board members who have tried to express their opinions," Mr. Roberts wrote.  Moreover, Mr. Roberts said he had neither responsibilities nor duties at DWG and couldn't get any information about the company.  "To continue to serve on this board could potentially expose me to significant legal liabilities which I am not willing to accept," Mr. Roberts wrote.  Asked if he was now supporting the franchisee buyout group, Mr. Roberts would say only: "If I'm called upon to help them in this situation, yes, I'd be readily available."  The spokeswoman for Mr. Posner said the allegations in Mr. Roberts' letter were untrue.  Thomas Prendergast, another DWG board member, also denied the charges.  "I personally act as independently as can be on that board," he said.  "It sounds like somebody's mad."  But other longtime watchers of Mr. Posner agreed that the financier can be personally abusive at times.  "If there's a rough way and a nice way of doing something, he generally finds the rough way," said William Paxton, an accounting professor at Cleveland State University.  The spokesman for Mr. Posner disagreed.  "I would say that he's more of a fatherly type to the people he works with," he said, adding that Mr. Posner generally doesn't get involved in day-to-day management of his companies.  Healthcare International Inc. said it missed mortgage and interest payments due last Friday to its HealthVest affiliate and to holders of a $60 million mortgage on an acute-care facility in Hawaii.  The Austin, Texas, health-care concern said it's in default on the mortgage secured by its Pali Momi Medical Center in Honolulu because it failed to make the $628,000 interest payment due Friday and because of its fourth-quarter losses.  However, it said the mortgage holders, several large insurance companies, have said they don't plan to call the loan anytime soon.  Healthcare also said it might not be allowed to pay $3 million on Sept. 30 to redeem some of its 14 3/8% subordinated debentures due 1995.  Under terms of the debentures, it can't redeem the bonds if certain of its debt is past due.  Healthcare said it's in discussions with HealthVest, a real estate investment trust that financed many of its health-care facilities.  Healthcare owes HealthVest $3.9 million in September mortgage and lease payments and $1.4 million in payments that were due Aug. 1.  An unofficial global plebiscite, underway for decades, has climaxed with an historic result: utter repudiation of Marxist socialism and Marxism-Leninism by an almost unanimous vote among hundreds and hundreds of millions of people, victimized for generations by these baneful doctrines.  What is too little realized about the meaning of this daily plebiscite is that it has been a multi-cultural, multi-ethnic, international phenomenon visible and measurable among the peoples on every continent regardless of race, religion, color, language, or previous condition of servitude.  Protestants, Catholics, Jews, Buddhists, Hindus, Moslems, Confucians, believers and nonbelievers, industrial workers, farmers and peasants, literates and illiterates alike have voted to be left alone by their governments.  And when people get the government off their backs, writes Prof.  Kenneth Minogue, they inevitably practice capitalism, which is not an "ism" but really an activity, a pattern of human behavior.  What is noteworthy about the world-wide reprobation of Marxism-Leninism is that it has not been the result of some international capitalist/imperialist conspiracy or some masterminded propaganda coup by the Voice of America or the BBC.  There has not been any democratic Comintern or Cominform seeking to overthrow Marxism-Leninism.  People have not voted in this plebiscite only at the ballot-box.  They have hurdled high voltage fences, sailed in leaky tubs in the South China Sea, risked asphyxiation in crowded freight-cars, flown in home-made planes, doing anything to get away -- to come to the U.S., to awake at four in the morning not to recite the analects of Ho Chi Minh or Pol Pot but, instead, to go to the wholesale market and buy the day's produce for the clientele of their vegetable-markets.  Today we see a world of plenty where market forces operate better than ever before, and a world of planned scarcity, worse than ever before, where politically imposed economic policies dominate.  The countries of Eastern Europe, upon whom Marxism-Leninism was imposed by force, are trying to rid themselves as fast they can of a Marxism in which even the rulers and party bosses have been losing faith -- notably in Yugoslavia, Poland and Hungary.  Mikhail Gorbachev's "perestroika," if given free rein, could well lead to significant alteration in the Soviet Union's economic and, inevitably, its political structure.  Even Mr. Gorbachev, heralding perhaps the Great Turnaround, has voted in this plebiscite: He has asked that the Soviet economy be allowed to join the seven industrial powers in a common economic program, an application equivalent to an abacus trying to program Lotus 1-2-3.  In social democratic countries, privatization of government-owned industries has been under way for sometime.  Even in developing countries, there has been an explosion of resentment against collectivism as the cure-all for man's ills and against what ought to be called the "anti-welfare" state.  Robert Heilbroner, a long-time socialist scholar who used to defend Mao's Great Proletarian Cultural Revolution as encouraging a desirable modernization, informed his New Yorker magazine audience earlier this year that, "Less than seventy-five years after it officially began, the contest between capitalism and socialism is over: capitalism has won."  I would have thought the victory had come a good deal earlier than in the Heilbroner chronology; never mind, the Order of the Fatted Calf for Prof.  Heilbroner.  The British writer, Peter Jenkins, recently published "The Thatcher Revolution."  His book's subtitle tells the story: "The End of the Socialist Era."  In his work of political philosophy, "Radical Principles," Michael Walzer, the social democrat, says that no further illumination can be had from Marxist theory, either in the original or the revision.  Marxism can't explain, says Mr. Walzer, "the outbursts of irrational savagery, the long wars, the failure of working class parties to produce socialist societies, the depth and intensity of nationalist feeling and the draft towards authoritarianism."  The global vote against Marxism and its heirs has occurred not only because of the economic disasters that follow from Marxist economics but also because in every case in which Marxism rules through a single party, imbedded human rights are non-existent.  And yet there are still intellectuals, particularly in the U.S. and Britain, who despite the evidence of Marxist-Leninist catastrophe and carnage before their very eyes, still look upon Marxism as salvation and redemption, and still engage in what has been called "irrationalist prophetism."  Marx, Gertrude Himmelfarb has written, predicted the pauperization of the proletariat, the proletarianization of the petty bourgeoisie, the collapse of capitalism and world-wide revolution.  And yet these passe Victorian doctrines are being taught by social science faculties as eternal verity.  What would we say if the teachers of a great university were to teach alchemy as the New Chemistry, Lysenkoism as the new Genetics and Ptolemaic astronomy as the New Astrophysics?  What should we say to teachers, warmed by the moral superiority that infuses self-styled martyrs, who have made "The Communist Manifesto" must reading while barring Hayek, Friedman, Thomas Sowell from student reading lists?  What should we say to teachers who deplore the pervasiveness of "Western culture" Great Books in college curricula?  In so many institutions of higher learning here and abroad there are covens of professors who teach Marxism, not as they should as part of 19th-century intellectual history, but as the Final Truth.  And as part of the Final Truth they add the macabre conclusion that the United States is, as Susan Sontag once described the white race, "the cancer of human history."  And why is America the enemy to the unforgiving Marxist professoriat and their allies in the media?  -- Because so long as the U.S. prospers, socialism cannot be rationally presented as the alternative to capitalism.  -- Because for decades, Marxism-Leninism has been and still is in practice a stipendiary of free market economics.  -- Because Marxism-Leninism simply cannot shake itself loose from its dependence of free market economies.  So long as entrepreneurship, invention and innovation, are rewarded in the free market democracies; so long as consumer societies only exist in non-Marxist countries, anti-Americanism will be the staple of the now irrelevant intellectual classes, including those semi-skilled intellectuals who govern television news and the Hollywood scene.  To remain a Marxist today or a Marxist fellow-traveler when the whole world has voted against the malice of Marxism raises the most profound questions as to the rationality of the true believer.  ---  Mr. Beichman is a research fellow at the Hoover Institution.  A Minnesota state appeals court ruled that a news reporter's promise of confidentiality to a news source can constitute an enforceable contract.  The court upheld a $200,000 verdict against that state's two biggest newspapers, whose reporters promised a news source that he wouldn't be identified and then were overruled by their editors.  However, in a 2-1 decision, the court tossed out $500,000 in punitive damages that had also been awarded to the news source, public relations man Dan Cohen.  The court said the two papers weren't guilty of misrepresentation, which might have warranted such additional damages.  The issue in the case -- whether a source can collect for breach of contract if a newspaper breaks a promise not to name the source -- is important to news organizations' ability to gather information, but it isn't often put to the test.  Mark Nadler, managing editor of the St. Paul Pioneer Press Dispatch, said he did not know of any other instance in which the newspaper overruled a reporter and ordered a source identified.  The 1988 verdict in state court did, however, temporarily make certain news sources reluctant to provide information to some of the paper's reporters, Mr. Nadler said.  "Some of their sources were feeling shaky."  The case arose from stories in 1982 about the gubernatorial race in Minnesota.  Mr. Cohen, then working for one campaign, told reporters on the condition he not be named that a candidate in another party had previously been arrested for shoplifting.  Editors at the two papers overruled the reporters on the belief that readers had to be told the damaging information came from the rival camp.  Mr. Cohen sued the Pioneer Press Dispatch and Minneapolis Star Tribune, saying he'd lost his job because he was revealed as the source of the stories.  Mr. Cohen's lawyer, Elliot Rothenberg, said he may appeal the decision tossing out the punitive damages.  Neither paper has decided whether to appeal the state Court of Appeals ruling to the state's Supreme Court.  Both papers said their reporters are allowed to enter into confidentiality agreements with sources under certain circumstances, although at times they are encouraged or required to seek an editor's approval.  ---  BIG CHICAGO LAW FIRM of Winston & Strawn bails out of Arizona market.  The 400-lawyer firm is abandoning its Phoenix outpost, with 18 lawyers, despite the protests of partners there.  Gary L. Fairchild, managing partner of Winston & Strawn, said the firm wants to focus its energies in its offices in Chicago, Washington, D.C., and New York -- and possibly to open a branch in Los Angeles.  The Phoenix office generated $6 million in billings last year, or about 6% of the firm's gross revenues, Mr. Fairchild said.  "The office was profitable, but Phoenix wasn't generating the type of client referrals we got with the other locations."  The Phoenix office has remained intact and formed a new law firm, Johnston Maynard Grant & Parker, after efforts to get Winston & Strawn to reconsider its decision failed.  "We don't understand why the decision was made and we don't agree with it," said Logan T. Johnston III, managing partner of the spinoff.  He had been with Winston & Strawn for 16 years.  ---  FREEMAN ENTERS GUILTY PLEA: In keeping with his prior agreement, Robert M. Freeman, formerly head of arbitrage at Goldman, Sachs & Co., pleaded guilty to mail fraud in an insider-trading scheme.  Last month, Mr. Freeman, 47 years old, agreed to plead guilty to the felony count in federal court in Manhattan and resigned from Goldman Sachs.  He admitted that on January 8, 1986, he traded on inside information from Martin Siegel regarding the leveraged buy-out of Beatrice Cos.  Mr. Siegel, formerly a takeover strategist with Kidder Peabody & Co., pleaded guilty to insider trading in 1987.  U.S. Judge Pierre Leval set Mr. Freeman's sentencing for Nov. 16.  Mr. Freeman, who is free on his own recognizance, faces a maximum penalty of five years in prison and a fine of $1.86 million.  ---  SPY MAGAZINE'S PARODY of Cliffs Notes Inc.'s study guides won a reprieve from a federal appeals court in Manhattan, which threw out a preliminary injunction that had banned Bantam Doubleday Dell Publishing Group Inc. from distributing the parody, known as Spy Notes.  The book, which was written by Spy, a humor magazine based in New York, will be shipped to bookstores this week, said Graydon Carter, co-editor of Spy.  In issuing the injunction last month, U.S. District Judge Shirley Wohl Kram had said that because of the books' similar covers, consumers shopping for Cliffs Notes study guides, which include synopses of famous works of literature, might be misled into buying the parody.  The appeals court panel hasn't yet released an opinion explaining why it vacated the injunction.  Kathy Trager, an attorney for the Doubleday publishing division, said Doubleday had urged the court to lift the injunction on the ground that "parody has a wide scope of protection under the First Amendment," and that there was no likelihood that the products would be confused.  William M. Hart, an attorney for Lincoln, Neb.-based Cliffs Notes, said he couldn't yet comment on whether the decision will be appealed.  ---  A 156-year-old Georgia law stirs furor over role of state in intimate relations.  In February 1988, James D. Moseley, a 35-year-old carpenter, was charged by his wife with multiple counts of sexual assault.  Mr. Moseley was acquitted of all the original charges, but he was convicted on one charge of simple sodomy after he testified that he engaged in oral sex with his wife with her consent. (His ex-wife -- the couple are now divorced -- disputes that she gave her consent.)  In Georgia, sodomy -- even between a consenting wife and husband -- is a felony, punishable by a maximum 20-year sentence.  Mr. Moseley was sentenced to serve two years in prison.  His conviction and subsequent jailing sparked a bitter debate over the constitutionality of Georgia's sodomy statute and the apparent severity of Mr. Moseley's sentence.  His attorneys went so far as to suggest that state prosecutors should be required to disqualify themselves from the case if they had engaged in oral sex.  The law "makes outlaws of all of us in our homes," says Hilary Chiz, the executive director of the American Civil Liberties Union of Georgia, which is representing Mr. Moseley.  "A significant percentage of the population of this country participates in consensual oral sex, which is defined as sodomy in Georgia."  Last week, after Mr. Moseley had served 18 months, Judge Robert J. Castellani in DeKalb County court ordered him released, pending a review of the ACLU's petition for habeas corpus.  If the petition is granted, Mr. Moseley's conviction could be voided.  ---  ELLIS RUBIN, the splashy Miami trial attorney, was publicly reprimanded by the Florida Supreme Court for refusing to represent a murder defendant.  Mr. Rubin said he rejected the court-ordered assignment because the defendant told him before the 1987 trial that he planned to lie on the witness stand.  Mr. Rubin was cited for contempt of court and jailed for 30 days when he withdrew from the case over the trial judge's objection.  In a 5-1 decision, the Florida Supreme Court wrote that attorneys cannot be "permitted to ignore and refuse to follow a court order based on personal belief."  Mr. Rubin, famous for the unsuccessful "television intoxication" defense of a 15-year-old Miami youth accused of murdering a neighbor in the mid 1970s, said he would seek review by the U.S. Supreme Court.  "This order," said Mr. Rubin, "makes it permissible for jury trials to be giant lying contests."  Fabricland Inc., citing a successful store-expansion program, said its earnings for its fiscal fourth quarter rose 43% on a 21% increase in sales.  Fabricland, a chain of fabric stores in six Western states, said earnings for the quarter ended June 30 were $680,000, or 25 cents a share, up from $475,000, or 18 cents a share, a year earlier.  Fourth-quarter sales were $18.7 million, up from $15.5 million in the 1988 quarter.  The Portland, Ore., company attributed the rise to booming sales, especially in new California stores, and to an expansion and remodeling program.  The company has 72 retail stores.  Fabricland's earnings for fiscal 1989 were $3.1 million, or $1.16 a share, up 10% from fiscal 1988 earnings of $2.8 million, $1.05 a share.  Sales rose 18% to $74.5 million from $63.1 million.  Fiscal 1988 earnings were adjusted to reflect an accounting change.  A $16 million plan filed in federal bankruptcy court here seeks to end a multibillion dollar battle between former financier Marvin Warner and creditors claiming losses from a bank collapse that threw the Ohio thrift industry into a tailspin, lawyers said.  Under the plan, Mr. Warner would immediately pay $10 million and make three annual $2 million payments beginning with the first anniversary of the plan's approval.  Mr. Warner, 70 years old, the target of a flood of lawsuits following the collapse of his Cincinnati-based Home State Savings Bank in March 1985, filed for Chapter 11 bankruptcy-law protection in October 1987 against creditors seeking more than $4.5 billion.  A motion filed with the proposal said approval "would settle virtually all adversary proceedings and litigation related to this bankruptcy case."  The creditors agreeing to the settlement include: Ohio Deposit Guarantee Fund, which went bankrupt because it insured Home State; American Savings & Loan Association of Florida; Thomas Tew, a trustee at defunct ESM Government Securities; Fidata Corp. and several communities that invested with ESM such as Beaumont, Texas; Clark County, Nev., and Harrisburg and Dauphin County, Pa.  Bond investors returned from the long Labor Day weekend in the same mood as when they departed: unenthusiastic.  As a result, bond prices moved slightly lower in torpid trading.  The benchmark 30-year Treasury bond fell less than 1/8 of a point, or less than $1.25 per $1,000 face amount, while the yield rose to 8.13% from 8.12%.  The Treasury market got off to a weak start overnight in Tokyo where limited selling among Japanese investors pushed prices as much as 1/4 point lower.  When the market opened in the U.S., prices remained lower throughout the day.  Even a stronger dollar and lower commodity prices failed to inspire confidence in the bond market.  "It was definitely Japanese selling that pushed the market around," said Jay Goldinger, head of trading at Capital Insight Inc., Beverly Hills, Calif.  And because the market was so thin, "it didn't take much selling to force prices lower," he said.  In the U.S., concerns about the economy and a spreading belief that the Federal Reserve will keep its policy on hold kept many investors away from the market.  Traders said investors were especially discouraged by a report in yesterday's Wall Street Journal indicating that the Fed won't drive down interest rates any further unless the economy weakens significantly.  The story noted that, for the first time in months, the presidents of a few regional Fed banks were ready to consider higher interest rates because they fear that inflationary pressures could be building.  "There was a little bit of nervousness about the article" because it suggested that the Fed's next move won't necessarily be a policy-easing, said Robert T. McGee, a senior vice president at Tokai Bank Ltd.  Michael Moore, trading manager at Continental Bank, Chicago, said activity in the bond market is likely to remain sluggish until the government releases the producer price index Sept. 15, a broad measure of inflation on the wholesale level.  Recent economic reports, especially Friday's employment report, "were enough of a mixed bag that you couldn't conclusively draw an opinion about what is happening in the economy," he said.  Any changes in "market sentiment will be determined by the PPI."  Meanwhile, the Federal National Mortgage Association's new indexed sinking-fund debentures, scheduled to be priced today, are expected to draw sizable interest from overseas investors because of the attractive yield.  "We've seen pretty good foreign interest," said Fannie Mae Treasurer Gary Perlin.  "Many foreign investors aren't comfortable with mortgage securities, and they're a little spooked by the supply in that market."  Fannie Mae's last two sinking-fund issues in February and May attracted strong foreign demand.  Fannie Mae will price $500 million of 10-year indexed sinking-fund debentures as part of its regular monthly debt sale and an additional $600 million of seven-year debentures.  The yield on the new Fannie Mae sinking-fund debentures is expected to be about 9.15%, nearly one percentage point higher than the yield on five-year Treasury notes, which now yield about 8.18%.  Treasury Securities  Treasurys were slightly lower in light trading.  The benchmark 30-year bond was quoted late yesterday at 99 27/32, compared with 99 30/32 Friday.  The latest 10-year notes were quoted late at a price of 98 22/32 to yield 8.18%, compared with 98 26/ 32 to yield 8.16% Friday.  At the government's weekly auction of Treasury bills, the average discount rate on three-month Treasury bills fell to 7.88% and the rate was 7.87% on six-month Treasury bills.  Those rates were down from last week's auction, when they were 7.94% and 7.88%, respectively.  The average discount rate on three-month bills was the lowest since the average of 7.65% at the auction on July 31.  The rate on the six-month bills was the lowest since the average of 7.85% at the auction on Aug. 21.  Here are auction details:  Rates are determined by the difference between the purchase price and face value.  Thus, higher bidding narrows the investor's return while lower bidding widens it.  The percentage rates are calculated on a 360-day year, while the coupon-equivalent yield is based on a 365-day year.  @ 13-Week 26-Week  @ Applications ......... $25,874,485,000 $23,274,800,000  @ Accepted bids ........ $7,212,505,000 $7,211,600,000  @ Accepted at low price 60% 40%  @ Accepted noncompet'ly $1,200,075,000 $1,162,480,000  @ Average price (Rate) 98.008 (7.88%) 96.021 (7.87%)  @ High price (Rate) .... 98.013 (7.86%) 96.042 (7.83%)  @ Low price (Rate) ..... 98.006 (7.89%) 96.016 (7.88%)  @ Coupon equivalent .... 8.15% 8.31%  Both issues are dated Sept. 7.  The 13-week bills mature Dec. 7, and the 26-week bills mature March 8, 1990.  Municipals  Municipal bonds finished flat to 1/8 point weaker, having barely budged during the sleepy session.  With the market not yet back to full force after the long Labor Day weekend, traders said prices may hold near current levels for the rest of the week.  "You'd need a microscope" to monitor the price fluctuations that will probably take place, quipped a New York trader.  There are hopes, however, that excitement will be generated by the new issues to be priced this week.  Among issues slated for pricing is California's $385 million of general obligation Veterans bonds.  The deal, which includes $339.2 million of Series AX bonds due 19942016 and $45.8 million of Series AY bonds due 1994-2019, is scheduled for competitive bidding tomorrow.  New Jersey Turnpike Authority's 7.20% issue of 2018 finished 1/8 lower at 98, yielding 7.36%.  Foreign Bonds  Prices of most foreign government bonds tumbled as the value of the dollar firmed on foreign-exchange markets.  In Japan, the benchmark No. 111 4.6% bond due 1998 ended on brokers' screens at 96.46, down 0.29 point.  The issue's yield rose sharply to 5.185%.  In the past two weeks, the benchmark's yield has risen more than 1.5 percentage points.  Turnover in the December futures contract, meanwhile, was "the highest in the past two years," according to a yen bond trader.  The tally was 12.3 billion yen ($84.3 million).  Part of that surge was linked to the expiration of the September contract Wednesday.  West German government bonds ended little changed.  Traders said investors disregarded rumors that the Bundesbank may decide to raise interest rates when central bank members meet later this week.  Bonn's 6 3/4% bond issue due June 1999 ended unchanged at 99.30 to yield 6.845%, while the 6 3/4% issue due 1994 closed 0.05 firmer at 99.00 to yield 6.994%.  Meanwhile, the West German government sold 3.2 billion marks ($1.62 billion) of 10-year bonds Tuesday.  The issue had a coupon of 7% and was priced at 101 1/4 to yield 6.82%.  In Britain, government bonds fell about 1/2 point in light trading.  The benchmark 11 3/4% bond due 2003/2007 was quoted late at a price of 114 1/32 to yield 9.83%, while the 11 3/4% notes due 1991 fell 6/32 to close at 99 11/32, to yield 12.22%.  Mortgage, Asset-Backed Securities  Mortgage securities ended unchanged after trading in narrow bands.  Government National Mortgage Association 9% securities for September delivery finished at 97 3/32, unchanged; 9 1/2% securities at 99 5/32, unchanged; and 10% securities at 101 9/32, also flat.  In the asset-backed market, Sears, Roebuck & Co. offered $500 million of securities backed by credit-card receivables.  The offering, through a trust created specifically for the issue, was priced to yield 9.07%, 0.78 percentage point above the Treasury four-year note.  The four-year issue uses a structure in which a subordinated class absorbs losses on the underlying pool of credit-card receivables, supporting the senior securities, which are offered publicly and carry triple-A ratings.  There is no guarantee from Sears on the deal.  Sears is considered the premier issuer in the $15 billion credit-card securities market because of the high quality of the receivables generated by its merchandise division and its long history of lending to Sears customers.  Corporate Issues  Corporate bonds drifted about 1/8 point lower.  Among new issues, El Paso Natural Gas Co. offered $300 million of 10-year notes, up from the originally planned $200 million.  The non-callable notes, underwritten by Morgan Stanley & Co., were priced to yield 9.465%.  General Re Corp. offered $150 million of 20-year non-callable debentures, priced to yield 9%.  Underwriters led by First Boston Corp. will sell the issue.  Researchers working with electro-optical devices say they have made progress that should enable computer memories to store thousands of times more information thousands of times faster than current memories.  The researchers say they have achieved increased memory density by storing data optically in three dimensions, anywhere in a block of material, rather than just on the surface.  The faster speed comes largely because the laser beams that are used to store and read the data can handle lengthy strings of information in an instant, rather than reading or writing one bit of data at a time.  The devices also operate faster, and should be more reliable, because the beams can be directed through the material with lenses.  That means there is no waiting, as happens now when an optical disk spins and the head that reads it moves until the laser in the head is directed at the right spot.  It also means there are no moving parts to break down.  Considerable work remains to be done, and it will be at least several years before products using the technology reach the market.  Even then, early uses will be in esoteric applications, such as in computers used in aircraft, because the devices initially will be expensive and hard to make in quantity.  But "there is a lot of interesting stuff going on," said Bob Katzive, a consultant with Disk/Trend Inc., a market-research firm in Mountain View, Calif.  The work that is closest to reaching the market is being done at Microelectronics & Computer Technology Corp., a consortium of U.S. companies that was formed to advance computer technologies.  Jerry Willenbring, manager of the optics program at the consortium, said the process uses holographic techniques to store a whole "page" of data at one time.  He said a page now consists of 6,500 bits of data and can probably be increased to one million bits.  To store information, a laser beam is split in two and shined through the material in such a way that the beams form a pattern of interference.  That changes the refractive qualities of the crystalline structure, leaving in the crystals a picture of a page of data.  To read the stored information, a single beam is shined through the material at lower power at the correct angle.  The beam is altered in such a way that it picks up all the information on the original page.  The consortium's researchers said problems have dogged this sort of research since it began in the 1960s; the image in some materials faded quickly, after being read as few as half a dozen times.  But they said their material, strontium barium niobate, has handled more than a billion readings.  The initial device will be about the size of a personal-computer disk drive, though the storage material will be just half a centimeter thick and three centimeters in diameter.  It will store a few hundred megabytes of data -- a substantial amount, but far less than the theoretical capacity of a sliver that size.  It will yield up a bit of data in as little as a microsecond, which is about the speed of a current computer memory chip and is 1/10,000th of the time it takes a very fast personal-computer disk drive.  Ron Riedesel, the strategic marketing manager at the group, said the device might initially be used, say, to record all the details of encounters by U.S. fighter planes in sensitive areas.  The device could store film footage from a camera, plus all the radar information and radio traffic.  From there, if all goes as planned, the device could find its way into high-end computers.  Eventually, it could move into consumer-electronics applications, because it can store enough information to play back a full-length movie.  Taking a different approach, two researchers at the University of California Irvine have written in the Aug. 25 issue of Science about a storage technique that also uses two laser beams.  Dimitri A. Parthenopoulos and Peter M. Rentzepis said the lasers are shined through the material at right angles to each other.  Through a property called two-photon excitation, they would store a bit of data at each point where they intersected.  They said the theoretical density of their technique is some 20,000 times as great as for two-dimensional techniques.  This technique seems to have potential, researchers and consultants said.  They cautioned, though, that the materials and lasers required are esoteric enough that the technology is probably more than a decade away from reaching the market even if it turns out to be practical.  Vic Jipson, head of International Business Machines Corp.'s optical-storage laboratory, said he thinks that even the Microelectronics consortium's holographic approach needs a breakthrough in materials science to become really widespread.  "You can look at one material and say, this property is good, but not that one, or that property is good, but not this one," he said.  "You can find all the properties you need, but not in one material."  Three Japanese banks were slapped with heavy tax penalties for improperly reporting large cash transfers made to shore up overseas subsidiaries after the 1987 stock-market crash.  Japan's National Tax Administration Agency told the banks, Dai-Ichi Kangyo Bank Ltd., Fuji Bank Ltd. and Mitsui Bank Ltd., to pay tax penalties on wrongly declared profits they transferred to their offshore subsidiaries, mainly in London.  The fines were imposed in April but weren't disclosed until this week, when the banks confirmed reports on the penalties that appeared in Japanese newspapers.  The disclosure of the penalties shows a clumsy side to some of Japan's giant financial companies.  While the firms are a major and somewhat dreaded presence in many international markets, their trouble with the tax authorities shows some missteps.  The banks said they made the transfers to avoid potentially damaging repercussions from securities-trading losses incurred when world stock markets plummeted on Oct. 19 and 20, 1987.  The banks were concerned that the losses could have cut their capital to an extent that they would have affected their membership in local securities dealers' associations or their ability to buy or sell stocks and bonds internationally.  Spokesmen for the three banks said they hadn't intended to avoid paying Japanese taxes or conceal income.  They claimed they were caught off guard by an April 1986 change in Japan's corporate tax system, requiring that Japanese companies declare all profits before they are transfered to subsidiaries.  "We were somewhat surprised at this," said a spokesman for Dai-Ichi Kangyo, the world's biggest bank.  Dai-Ichi faced the heaviest penalty tax, 550 million yen ($3.8 million), for failing to report 1.3 billion yen in profits that it transferred to its London subsidiary, DKB International Ltd.  The spokesman characterized the transfer as a "necessary act."  Fuji Bank was fined 280 million yen for failing to report a transfer of 200 million yen to a London subsidiary and 600 million yen to another subsidiary in the Cayman Islands.  Mitsui Bank, which last week agreed to a proposed merger with Taiyo Kobe Bank, failed to report properly on an 800 million-yen transfer to Mitsui Finance Asia Ltd., a Hong Kong subsidiary, of which 350 million yen hadn't been declared.  The bank was fined 150 million yen in additional taxes.  A Mitsui spokesman said Mitsui Finance had suffered large foreign-exchange losses in 1987 and needed financial support.  To bring the subsidiary's accounts into the black, the parent bank bought stocks and bonds from its subsidiary at a hefty premium to market value, the spokesman said.  "This kind of thing will not happen again," the spokesman said.  The speedy Gaetano Donizetti composed some 75 works for the stage before syphilis finally killed him at age 51 in 1848.  Success had come early.  Already in 1822, he was excused from further military service by northern Italy's Austrian overlords after the premiere of "Zoraide di Granata" -- though the title has nothing to do with grenades, or even pomegranates, just the Spanish city of Granada.  Any confusion is forgivable, since "Zoraide" dropped from sight shortly after the opening.  But the way Nuova Era is going, we probably will not be deprived for long.  Nuova Era is a three-year-old Italian record company with a wide range of classical offerings.  But most of all, Nuova Era has a special niche reserved for operas you never knew you wanted to hear.  I have just spent the weekend listening to compact disks of mostly obscure works, the majority by Donizetti, sometimes taking a break to enjoy Nuova Era's eccentric packaging techniques.  In the "Maria Stuarda" album, the libretto runs out of room before Scotland's queen runs out of breath, and gamely flips back to the inside cover.  A few sets have no translation at all; others do, along with rambling essays in odd English and photographs of extremely handsome conductors.  Many are unknown, like the photogenic Antonello Allemandi, who leads the equally obscure youth orchestra of the province of Emilia Romagna through a cheerful rendition of Donizetti's "Alina" -- a derivative early work in the Rossinian mode.  But in an arrangement with the Maggio Musicale Fiorentino, Nuova Era also is releasing some historic, star-studded performances from the festival's vast archives.  "Il Pirata" for instance, composed in 1827 by Donizetti's rival Vincenzo Bellini, is heard in a 1967 Maggio performance featuring a 34-year-old soprano with finely spun pianissimos and a distinctive timbre: Montserrat Caballe.  This was her Italian debut and we hear the audience cheering her on as unhappy Imogene, who in her youth loved the pirate who has just washed up on her shores.  He is clumsily sung by Flaviano Labo, a short tenor who had a short range and a short career in the late '60s.  According to Italian operatic customs of the time, Imogene had to wander off stage to die of a broken heart.  Such stage proprieties began to disappear after Donizetti's "Imelda de' Lambertazzi," an otherwise justifiably forgotten 1830 opera about a Bolognese maiden who dies in full view of the audience after licking the poisoned wounds of her beloved.  This dramatic breakthrough apparently was permitted by the ever-attentive censors because Imelda showed deep contrition.  But what excuse can soprano Floriana Sovilla offer for the sickly top range she produces on this first ever recording?  Maybe she licked some moldy Nestle bars at the Swiss studio where the recording was made.  Unlike "Imelda," Donizetti's "Maria Stuarda" of 1834 is a steadily inspired, brilliantly theatrical opera.  Donizetti's imaginary encounter between the two queens, Mary Stuart and Elizabeth Tudor, slowly heats up into an insult match that culminates with Mary's great line: "vil bastarda]" It needs no translation, which is just as well since the album doesn't offer any.  But compensating for no English libretto are some treasurable photos from the 1967 Maggio Musicale production showing Shirley Verrett and the Turkish soprano Leyla Gencer.  Both sound distantly miked, but effective nonetheless, thanks in part to the vital conducting of Francesco Molinari Pradelli.  Ms. Gencer was not in her best voice that night, but there is enough fire to suggest why she provoked such fierce partisanship during her heyday some 25 years ago.  It is fun to hear the psyched-up audience applaud her after she flings the aforementioned malediction at Ms. Verrett.  At least she by all reports didn't take this gibe personally, unlike the soprano in the original Naples production.  During the dress rehearsal she pummeled -- and some claimed bit] -- her colleague, having perhaps taken literally some critic who had praised her for her mordant attack.  For this and other reasons, the premiere had to be cancelled.  "Ronzi so outweighed her adversary that del Sere fainted and had to be carried out," writes William Ashbrook in his illuminating biography of the composer.  Having borrowed from Schiller, Donizetti turned to Corneille in 1838 for "Poliuto," a mournful opera about a Roman who converts to Christianity, distressing his wife, Paolina, who loves the old gods (and a Roman proconsul).  Bassoonists probably know this work better than most mortals since the noble double reed is prominently featured in the overture.  Is there more to "Poliuto" than this?  I think so: for instance, a perfectly splendid duet that takes Poliuto and his wife (who by then has rejected her proconsul for God) into the arena, where they die.  It is jauntily paced by another conductor new to me, young Jan Latham-Koenig, leading the Rome Opera House orchestra.  Like so many of Nuova Era's ventures, this is a live recording, meaning tenor Nicola Martinucci is more nervous than ever.  From the sound of it, he spent most of Poliuto's first aria spitting and shaking, before slowly steadying his brawny voice.  Elizabeth Connell's pinched soprano would probably not guarantee heaven's doors opening up for Paolina.  But the soprano always is an enthusiastic performer, and she throws her small all into Paolina's music.  Renato Bruson sings the spurned proconsul with a resonant baritone.  But the Donizetti opera I would most like to see is "Maria di Rohan," a sophisticated piece he composed in 1843 for the Vienna Karntnerthor theater even as fevers were boiling his brain and speeding the poor man toward the madness that enveloped his final years.  The story, set in 17th-century France, is simple but effective: Maria is loved by both Chevreuse, her husband, and the nobleman Chalais, a triangle not solved to her benefit by the opera's end.  Many musicologists, among them Mr. Ashbrook, think highly of "Maria," particularly the last act, which is filled with moody duets and a forceful trio punctuated by the anguished husband's outbursts.  Nuova Era's live recording of a 1988 performance at Martina Franca will, I hope, bring the work some more admirers.  It is, on the whole, sung with urgency and considerable style by Mariana Nicolesco, Paolo Coni and Giuseppe Morino, a mannered tenor with a seductive vibrato.  American affluence.  Yuppie pleasure-seeking.  Inner-city alienation.  Proximity to South America.  The permissive youth culture of the 1960s and 1970s.  American individualism.  Restraints on police.  These are among explanations offered by government and private drug experts for why the U.S. has a drug epidemic -- more specifically, a crack-cocaine epidemic -- that appears far worse than in any other industrialized country.  "There's no question that the U.S. is out in front of other industrial countries in drug use -- and particularly use of cocaine and crack," says Rand Corp. drug specialist Peter Reuter.  Experts quickly add two notes of caution, however: Most of these are unproven theories, with little hard research to back them up; and, in fact, there are no good data showing just how U.S. addiction rates compare internationally.  The problem isn't uniquely American.  U.S. authorities say Colombians are now seeking new markets in Europe, via Spain.  European law enforcement personnel are seizing increasing amounts of cocaine, and Spain and Portugal are asking for help in spotting shipments from Latin America.  Officials throughout western Europe are increasingly apprehensive.  Says Mr. Reuter: "Europe seems to be moving in the late 1980s along the path we were moving in the mid-1980s," when cocaine use was up and crack was just beginning to appear.  "With prices collapsed here, the wholesalers may be looking around for new markets."  Some specialists also note that other industrial nations have long had to contend with serious addiction problems equal to or worse than the U.S. crack mess: the Soviet Union and Japan with alcohol, Britain and several other countries with heroin, Sweden with amphetamines.  David Musto, professor of psychiatry and the history of medicine at Yale, keeps reminding policy makers that the U.S. has had a major cocaine epidemic before.  From the late 1880s into the early 20th century, varying amounts of cocaine were contained in some prescription drugs, patent medicines and soft drinks, and were widely and legally used as restoratives or mild stimulants.  Whether the problem is unique or just the early stage of a world-wide cycle, why is it so bad here?  "Our form of government has a lot to do with it," says Dr. Musto of the federal system, where legislating and law enforcement are divided among national, state and local governments rather than centralized in one government as in much of Europe.  Mark Moore, a Harvard specialist on crime policy, offers a different thumbnail explanation for the U.S. primacy in cocaine and crack consumption: "We're bigger, richer, more liberal, maybe a little more pleasure-oriented."  And his colleague Mark Kleiman cites another aspect of money: "This is a country where crimes that produce income are unusually rewarding.  The class system here is less confining than in Europe and there's enough geographic and social mobility that a person who makes big money from crime can really move up the scale."  Some see other cultural differences at the root of the problem.  U.S. society, they say, is more individualistic, more willing to experiment, less likely to impose community restraints on individual behavior.  "There's a lack of strong informal controls here, particularly neighborhood controls," says Mr. Kleiman of Harvard.  "In Germany, start to jaywalk and ordinary citizens will tell you not to do that."  Herbert Kleber, a Yale psychiatrist and drug-treatment specialist currently on leave to serve as William Bennett's deputy in the federal drug policy office, traces much of today's problem to "the myth perpetrated in the early 1970s" -- that cocaine is a safe, nonaddictive, relatively clean drug.  That fallacy, he says, was fortified by media reports of cocaine indulgence by jet setters, athletes, movie stars, "what everyone does at parties on Saturday nights."  Most drug experts believe middle-class and other "recreational" use of marijuana, heroin and cocaine is now declining and the overriding drug problem today is the widespread use of cocaine and crack in the inner cities.  Government figures say the total number of drug users is dropping, but the number of chronic cocaine users or addicts is up.  Here's where frustration and alienation emerge as explanations: For people whose lives are empty, crack and cocaine provide temporary highs, making them feel good or powerful.  "What is new," says Stanton Peele, a psychologist with Mathematica Policy Research Inc., "is large numbers of inner-city people -- blacks and Hispanics -- sufficiently disillusioned, a real level of hopelessness.  Most northern European countries have nothing remotely comparable."  A breakdown in law enforcement in the inner cities is another frequently cited factor.  Writing in the New Republic, criminologists John DiIulio of Princeton and James Q. Wilson of UCLA declare that "we have a special responsibility to prevent the streets of inner-city neighborhoods from being controlled by those who seek to profit from the trade."  They would like more cops, tougher sentencing, more certain jail time.  Many experts note that law enforcement officials in Europe and Japan operate with a much freer hand than their U.S. counterparts -- fewer restrictions on search and seizure, for example, and greater leeway to wiretap -- and with much tougher penalties available.  "The legal situation in Britain is entirely different," says Jonathan Cave, a Rand drug researcher.  "If you are convicted of drug trafficking there, everything you own is forfeited unless you can prove it wasn't acquired with drug money."  The U.S. has a similar law, but it generally doesn't apply at the state or local level.  Geography and trade patterns also play a significant role in America's problem.  Compared to Europe, the U.S. is far more accessible to the cocaine-producing and distributing areas of South America, and long-established legitimate business dealings with those countries ease smuggling into the U.S.  The most peculiarly American aspect of the drug epidemic isn't a cause of it but is probably the main reason for the current level of concern.  It is the degree of crime and violence that accompanies drug use here -- a problem severely aggravated by the wide availability of guns.  England, Germany or France could have as great a drug problem, experts believe, and yet it probably wouldn't seem as great.  As one academic specialist puts it, "they're not armed to the teeth, as we are."  ---  @ The War on Drugs  @ Major provisions of Bennett plan  -- Expand federal prison capacity by 85% by increasing annual spending to $1.5 billion from $631 million.  -- Increase federal aid for prevention and education to $1.2 billion from $943 million.  -- Increase federal aid to state and local police to $350 million from $150 million.  -- Triple economic and military aid to Bolivia, Colombia and Peru to about $300 million to reduce coca crop and fight traffickers.  -- Increase federal funds for treatment to $925 million from $604 million, but also step up federal monitoring of how money is spent.  Source: Office of National Drug Control Policy  The Caped Crusader, Indiana Jones, a couple of cops and some shrunken kids boosted Hollywood to a record-breaking blockbuster summer.  The final tally won't be completed until the end of this week, but A.D. Murphy, who compiles data for industry weekly Variety, began predicting two weeks ago that the summer box-office take could reach $2.05 billion or more, a 20% increase over the 1988 summer peak of $1.7 billion.  "It's just a question now of what the second decimal point is -- $2.05 or $2.06 billion," Mr. Murphy says.  What's more, he adds, if box-office performance from Labor Day onward increases by just 12% over last year -- which is the rate of improvement to date in 1989 -- the industry will set a record of $5 billion, compared with $4.46 billion last year.  And since domestic theatrical exhibition accounts for only 35% of Hollywood's revenues from a film, compared with 75% a decade ago, the leading studios stand to reap even biggger rewards from their hits in such post-theatrical markets as videocassettes and cable television.  While ticket prices are up about 10% over last year, Mr. Murphy and other industry observers note that five movies did more than $100 million at the box office, and about a half-dozen more took in $50 million to $85 million, an unusually high number of hits.  At the top of the heap, as expected, is Warner Bros., now a unit of Time-Warner Inc. Thanks largely to "Batman" and "Lethal Weapon 2," which have grossed $238.5 million and $131.3 million, respectively, Warner holds the No. 1 spot in the industry with a box-office market share of more than 23%.  Next in line is Walt Disney Co. with 17% of the market, while Paramount Communications Inc.'s Paramount Pictures Corp. unit and Columbia Pictures Entertainment Inc. are vying for third place, according to Mr. Murphy.  Paramount and Columbia's success wasn't a big surprise; both studios depended almost entirely on sequels to previously successful blockbusters.  "Indiana Jones and The Last Crusade," the third in the "Raiders of the Lost Ark" series, has grossed more than $189 million so far for Paramount, while Columbia Pictures released "Ghostbusters 2," which has taken in more than $110 million at the box office.  Paramount's "Star Trek V" has grossed about $50 million, while Columbia's "Karate Kid III" has sold about $40 million in tickets.  Although neither film performed as well as expected, the revenues are still considered respectable.  The big surprise this summer was the performance of three Disney films: "Honey I Shrunk the Kids," which has grossed over $119 million; "Dead Poet's Society," at over $85 million; and "Turner & Hootch," at over $52 million.  While some industry observers initially feared such movies would get lost in the shuffle, Disney was able to get them noticed.  "This was the summer for the marketers to put it all on the line," said Larry Gerbrandt, a move analyst at investment firm Paul Kagan Associates.  Despite all the competition, Disney was "really able to get the message across," he added.  But big stars and sequels didn't work in every case.  Sylvester Stallone's movie for the Tri-Star unit of Columbia, "Lock-Up," has taken in less than $20 million, and the latest MGM/UA James Bond film, "Licence to Kill," has sold only about $32 million of tickets.  New Line Cinema Inc.'s "Nightmare on Elm Street Part V" has sold only about $18 million of tickets in three weeks and is falling off fast.  By contrast, the fourth "Nightmare" movie took in about $50 million.  Philip Garfinkle, executive vice president of Entertainment Data Inc., notes that pictures such as "Licence to Kill" and "Lock-Up" might perform better overseas.  In the case of the James Bond movie, he says, international audiences might enable the picture to exceed $100 million in revenues.  Although summer business began to drop off in the week prior to Labor Day, a number of more adult-oriented films show promise for continued fall business, such as Columbia's "When Harry Met Sally," which has grossed more than $60 million, and "Parenthood," which has grossed about $55 million for the Universal Studios unit of MCA Inc.  Figgie International Inc. changed the terms of a self-tender offer, increased the number of shares it intends to repurchase, and extended the offer to Sept. 19 from the original Sept. 1 expiration date.  Under the new offer, the fire protection, electronics and industrial products concern will repurchase as many as one million shares of Class A common at a price of $78 a share and as many as 370,000 shares of Class B common at a price of $94 a share.  Previously, the Willoughby, Ohio-based company had proposed a Dutch auction under which shareholders would have tendered Class A shares at prices ranging from $74 to $84 a share and Class B shares at prices of $83 to $94 a share.  The company said it would buy as many as 437,811 shares of Class A common and 162,189 shares of Class B common, paying the lowest price that would bring in the desired number of shares.  Based on shares tendered by the Sept. 1 expiration date, the company said it would have repurchased Class A shares at $78 a share and Class B shares at $94.  Societe National Elf Aquitaine said its consolidated net income after payments to minority interests rose 43% in the first half of this year to 4.3 billion francs ($644.6 million) compared with three billion francs for the year-ago period.  The oil concern said consolidated revenue increased 22% to 72.8 billion francs from 59.6 billion francs.  Elf Aquitaine said first-half profit on a per-share basis rose 37% to 41 francs a share compared with the year-earlier period.  The concern said cash flow increased by 30% to 12.4 billion francs from 9.5 billion francs.  Chemical operations made a significant contribution to the company's profitability in the first half, Elf Aquitaine said.  It said market conditions remained favorable although there was a slight deterioration in the petrochemicals sector.  The French government owns 56% of Elf Aquitaine.  Sedgwick Group PLC, London, an international group involved in insurance brokering, risk management and consulting, reported a 5% gain in half-year pretax profit.  For the six months, profit before taxes rose to #64.8 million ($100.44 million) from #61.9 million in the year-earlier period.  Sales were nearly level at #306.8 million compared with #296 million for the year-earlier period.  Expenses rose to #269.2 million from #256.1 million.  Operating profit increased to #67 million from #63.6 million.  Per-share earnings increased to 10.1 pence from 9.8 pence.  Sedgwick Chairman John Rowland said that the concern was continuing to emphasize cost control and that its trading companies have shown a "healthy appetite" for new business.  However, Mr. Rowland said, insurance market conditions remain difficult as rates in many product areas have continued to fall.  Nonetheless, both interest and exchange rates have worked to the company's advantage, he said.  Sedgwick said its board would keep the interim dividend unchanged from last year's payment of four pence a share.  Amdura Corp. said it is urging shareholders to refrain from voting to oust the company's directors.  A group led by New York investor Frank J.A. Cilluffo, which owns 18.1% of Amdura, has begun a consent solicitation to replace Amdura's board with Cilluffo nominees.  In a letter to shareholders, Amdura, a Denver hardware and automotive distributor, questioned whether Mr. Cilluffo truly is concerned about the company's performance, saying he waited several months before questioning the company's statements that it would have a difficult year because it was integrating acquisitions.  Further, Amdura charged that Mr. Cilluffo is preventing the company from refinancing or extending a $40 million bridge loan.  The company said it had four proposals from financial institutions that were contingent on the company settling the dispute with Mr. Cilluffo.  Mr. Cilluffo last week rejected Amdura's settlement offer.  Amdura said it believes shareholders' "patience will be rewarded" if holders ignore Mr. Cilluffo's consent solicitation.  Computer Sciences Corp., El Segunda Calif., said it signed a $134 million contract with International Business Machines Corp. to provide software and related services for a program to upgrade equipment and software in the nation's air traffic control system.  IBM is the Federal Aviation Administration's prime contractor for the $3.6 billion program, known as the Advanced Automation System.  The pact spans a 13-year base period beginning November 1988.  Additional work proposed during this base period plus anticipated options for support through the year 2010 could raise the total value of the contract to more than $700 million.  The software will be written in Ada, a government-sponsored programming language.  Computer Sciences said it will provide more than 800,000 lines of Ada code to process flight plans, predict and resolve potential conflicts in aircraft flight paths, provide weather data and make simulations to train controllers.  Westinghouse Electric Corp. received a $50 million contract from the U.S. Department of Energy to continue development of a new nuclear power plant that Westinghouse intends to sell in the 1990s.  The company, a utility research group and Westinghouse licensees will match the $50 million with their own funds, Westinghouse said.  Westinghouse, based here, which has been working on the AP600 reactor since 1984, said it expects to obtain Nuclear Regulatory Commission design certification by 1994.  The new 600-megawatt reactor is intended to be built in modules in factories, with the modules later assembled at the site.  That process would shorten the construction period, permit tighter quality control and improve the economics of nuclear power plants, Westinghouse said.  Westinghouse estimates that the AP600 could be operating within five years after receiving an order, in contrast to the 12 years or more required for current nuclear generating plants.  Because the AP600 would be a standard unit, only six months of specialized design work would be required, Westinghouse said.  Construction would take three years, and testing and certification would be completed in about 18 months, the company said.  "Advanced light water reactors promise to be America's major new source of electricity in the 1990s," said Richard J. Slember, a Westinghouse vice president and general manager of the company's energy systems business unit.  The new design will revive the nuclear power option for utilities, he said.  Utilities have stopped ordering nuclear plants because of high cost and difficulty in obtaining the necessary construction and operating permits.  The letters AP stand for advanced-passive, meaning that in the event of a problem the unit would be immediately cooled by water flooding in under the power of gravity, Westinghouse said.  No operator action would be required.  The AP600 would be about half the size of most nuclear reactors that have gone into service recently, and it would be far simpler, the company said.  The simplicity makes quality control easier, makes the unit safer and reduces costs, Westinghouse said.  A spokesman for General Electric Co. in San Jose, Calif., said that "it is our understanding" that GE also has been awarded a $50 million development contract from the Energy Department.  Rep. Norman Mineta of California is expected to make the announcement soon, the GE spokesman, Hugh Hexamer, said.  The big Fairfield, Conn., company, with interests in electrical products, broadcasting and financial services, is developing a simplified boiling water reactor.  Mr. Hexamer added that GE also is leading a team of companies and universities that will contribute at least $50 million to the project.  The group includes Bechtel North America Power Co., a subsidiary of Bechtel Group Inc.; Southern Co. Services, a unit of Southern Co.; Burns & Roe Co.; Foster Wheeler Energy Applications Inc., a subsidiary of Foster Wheeler Corp.; Massachusetts Institute of Technology, University of California at Berkeley, Ansaldo S.p.A., Hitachi Ltd.,Toshiba Corp. and Kema/Nucon Cos.  Profit-taking pushed stocks lower in quiet trading.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average slipped 7.41 to 2744.68.  Philip Morris gained 2 3/8 to 166 7/8 on continued buying after last week's dividend increase and stock-split announcement.  Chevron advanced 7/8 to 57 7/8 on expectations of higher oil prices in the next few months.  International Business Machines, Boeing, Texaco, Sears and United Technologies were among the other gainers in the 30 Dow industrials.  Volume came to 145,180,000 shares on the New York Stock Exchange, compared with 133,300,000 Friday, ahead of the Labor Day holiday.  The Dow Jones Transportation Average reached another record, rising 5.69 to 1532.01.  UAL led the average higher with a gain of 3 3/4 to 290 3/4 on 1.1 million shares as traders positioned themselves for a bidding contest between Marvin Davis and a labor-management group led by UAL's chairman and British Airways.  The labor-management group's $300-a-share bid had not been disclosed when the market closed last Friday.  British Airways rose 3/4 to 33 3/4.  Among other airline shares, AMR, the owner of American Airlines, gained 1/2 to 90 1/4, and Delta Air Lines rose 1 3/8 to 81 3/8.  Most of the large railroad stocks in the average were unchanged to lower.  Santa Fe Southern Pacific fell 5/8 to 24 3/8, while Union Pacific declined 1/8 to 79 5/8.  Buyers retreated instantly from the market when a news report cast doubts on President Bush's determination to not raise taxes.  Stories about a television interview taped Aug. 29 reported that Mr. Bush indicated Congress might undercut his pledge of no new taxes.  "They pulled every bid in the room" when that news was released on wire services, one floor trader said.  A few traders said caution ahead of Mr. Bush's planned speech last night on drug policy caused some selling as well.  A moderate outbreak of computer-guided sell programs also threw some shares into losses.  B.A.T Industries traded actively in New York in American depositary receipt form.  The shares fell 5/16 to 12 13/16, partly because of a sharp rise in the dollar against the British pound and partly on selling by investors in London who are skeptical over a bid for the company by a group led by Sir James Goldsmith.  Traders said, however, that a number of U.S. investors supported the stock as it fell.  Speculative buying in hotel stocks focused on Holiday, which advanced 1 to 81, and Hilton Hotels, which gained 2 5/8 to 108 3/4.  Holiday climbed on rumors that the lodging and casino company had rejected a $105-a-share takeover bid.  Holiday, which announced plans Aug. 24 to sell its Holiday Inn hotel system to British-based Bass for $2.22 billion, declined to comment.  Elsewhere, Niagara Mohawk Power rose 3/8 to 13 1/8 on 1.9 million shares.  Prudential-Bache Securities, citing the utility's agreement with New York state regulators on a plan to maintain investment-grade credit ratings, reversed its recommendation on the stock to "buy" from "sell" and increased its estimates of 1989 and 1990 earnings.  Niagara Mohawk also was one of a number of issues on which Smith Barney, Harris Upham repeated buy recommendations.  Others included Unocal, which went up 1 1/2 to 54 1/2; Federal National Mortgage Association, up 1 3/8 to 101; and Waste Management, up 5/8 to 59 5/8.  Litton Industries climbed 3 3/4 to 94 3/4 despite rumors that Teledyne may sell its 30% stake in the company.  Litton declined to comment.  Careercom gained 3/4 to 10 5/8.  The company accepted a takeover offer of $11.50 a share from a merchant banking unit of Ambase, which topped an $11-a-share bid from Golder, Thoma, Cressey Fund III. Ambase rose 1/8 to 15 7/8.  Harnischfeger rose 3/4 to 21.  Shearson Lehman Hutton raised its investment rating on the stock and its fiscal 1989 and 1990 earnings estimates, citing improvement in the company's margins and growth in its order backlog.  Digital Communications Associates added 3/4 to 24 1/2.  Shortly after the market closed, the company said it is considering a spinoff of its wide-area networking operations to shareholders.  The American Stock Exchange Index gained 0.57 to 384.53, another record close.  Volume was 12,460,000 shares, compared with 12,590,000 Friday.  There were 288 issues advancing, 303 declining and 253 unchanged.  Advanced Medical Technologies rose 3/8 to 7 3/4.  Its Fidata Trust Co. of New York unit agreed to pay about $6 million to settle a suit resulting from the collapse of Bevill, Bresler & Schulman, a government-securities firm.  Investor Harold C. Simmons and a company he controls said they are beginning an effort to unseat Georgia Gulf Corp.'s board in an attempt to prevent the Atlanta company from taking further anti-takeover measures.  Mr. Simmons and NL Industries Inc. own 9.9% of Georgia Gulf and have proposed acquiring the chemicals company or helping it recapitalize in a transaction that would bring shareholders at least $55 a share in cash, or about $1.38 billion.  In a letter to Georgia Gulf, J. Landis Martin, NL's president and chief executive officer, said the group will begin soliciting consents to oust Georgia Gulf's directors unless Georgia Gulf agrees that it won't take actions to prevent any of Mr. Simmons's proposed transactions.  While the maneuver is a threatening one, it might be difficult for Mr. Simmons and NL to pull off.  Under a consent solicitation, the group has up to two months to collect consents from holders of 51% of Georgia Gulf's shareholders.  But about 18% of the stock is owned by Georgia Gulf's management and employees own an estimated 6% or 7%, meaning a great majority of the remaining shareholders will have to support the group's slate.  The market clearly hopes for a more valuable transaction than Mr. Simmons's proposal.  Georgia Gulf stock has been trading above $55 since he proposed the transaction a few weeks ago.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Georgia Gulf closed at $58.50 a share, up 62.5 cents.  In Atlanta, Georgia Gulf couldn't be reached for comment.  Mr. Martin said the action was prompted because Georgia Gulf delayed meeting with Mr. Simmons and NL until next week after the group asked for a meeting in August.  That delay apparently raised concerns that Georgia Gulf was planning to amend its bylaws or take other anti-takeover measures in the interim.  NL and Mr. Simmons currently are scheduled to meet with Georgia Gulf Chairman James R. Kuse next Wednesday.  Georgia Gulf twice has strengthened its poison-pill anti-takeover measure, once after Mr. Simmons' initial stake was disclosed and again after Mr. Simmons made his proposal to recapitalize or take over the company.  In the letter, Mr. Martin said the group would nominate as new directors Mr. Simmons, Mr. Martin and Michael A. Snetzer, president of Valhi Inc., Mr. Simmons' 88%-owned holding company.  Valhi owns 66% of NL, a Houston specialty-chemicals concern.  In addition, the group said it plans to add at least one other independent director, if its nominees are elected.  Eagle Clothes Inc., a menswear retailer that has been seeking a cash infusion, filed for protection from creditors under Chapter 11 of the federal Bankruptcy Code.  In the bankruptcy-law petition, filed in U.S. Bankruptcy Court in Manhattan, Eagle said the filing was "not a sudden event" but resulted from a combination of events, including a "general down term in the sale of men's clothing nationally," that reduced the company's sales and cash flow.  Several weeks ago, Eagle said it was exploring "financial alternatives" to its credit facilities that included revised financing accords or a bankruptcy-law filing.  "The cash flow of the company was insufficient to meet its obligations," said Barton Nachamie, attorney for Eagle.  The company listed total assets of $54.4 million and liabilities of $43.8 million, with secured debt of $11.8 million, as of July 29.  In a statement, Eagle said it obtained a commitment, subject to court approval and other conditions, from Norfolk Capital Group Inc. for as much as $8 million in financing.  Eagle said it continues to hold talks with lenders and with Norfolk.  The filing was triggered by the illness of its chief executive officer, Albert Roth, who fell ill several weeks ago, Eagle said.  Mr. Nachamie said that although Mr. Roth is still on the payroll, "doctors ordered him not to be around the company."  Mr. Nachamie said that Mr. Roth had "an attack" of an unspecified nature and that he wasn't sure when Mr. Roth would return to the business.  In the filing, Eagle said its problems began in 1987 and early 1988 when its then-senior lender, Bankers Trust Co., reduced its credit line.  In September 1988, Eagle acquired Biny Clothing Inc., a closely held New York chain operated under the Bonds name.  Eagle's management retired and Biny's management took control of the company.  At the time, Eagle reached a new credit agreement with Bankers Trust and with Bank Leumi Trust Co. of New York for $8 million, and a new subordinated debt accord with First Century Partners and Biny management for $2 million, while debt due to former shareholders was substantially reduced.  But Eagle said the financing was insufficient, and sales during the past fiscal year sagged.  For the third quarter, ended April 29, Eagle's net loss widened to $2.7 million from $1.3 million the year earlier.  Revenue fell to $21.9 million from $25.6 million.  Penn Traffic Co., Johnstown, Pa., said its board authorized management to exchange its P&C Food Markets Inc. holding for a larger Grand Union Co. stake.  Under the proposed restructuring being discussed with Grand Union, P&C Food Markets, currently 90%-owned by Penn Traffic, would become wholly owned by Grand Union, a major supermarket chain.  Penn Traffic would increase its holding of Grand Union common to 40% from 24%, and would receive $67 million in two classes of Grand Union preferred stock.  Penn Traffic, an affiliate of Miller Tabak Hirsch & Co., said it would receive Grand Union securities with an indicated value of about $89 million for its P&C holdings, for which it paid $28 million in a tender offer in July 1988.  Grand Union would retire the P&C preferred shares outstanding at $32.20 a share, Penn Traffic said.  Penn Traffic, which owns other supermarkets and discount department stores, said a combination of Grand Union and P&C would let Grand Union strengthen its position in New England and permit P&C to focus efforts in New York state.  Copper futures traders returned from the long Labor Day weekend still gripped by the negative mood they'd been in Friday.  The September contract ended yesterday at $1.2830 a pound, down 1.40 cents, while the December contract ended 1.90 cents a pound lower at $1.2450.  The trading range through most of the session was moderate, with December edging slightly above Friday's close early in the day at $1.2750 and at another point easing to a low of $1.2380.  Traders ignored continuing production problems and sold contracts, even though the fundamental supply-and-demand factors weren't much changed from as recently as a week ago Friday, when prices rose to life-of-contract highs.  The big Bougainville mine in Papua New Guinea did the equivalent of a Broadway play opening and closing the same night, making a minimal impression on futures.  "Early in the day it was reported that Bougainville would indeed open despite problems," said William O'Neill, vice president of research at Elders Futures, New York.  "But then came another report that the rebellious landowners had risen again and attacked the mine, causing it to close.  There wasn't much reaction, pricewise, because the feeling generally in the copper industry and among analysts and traders is that little production had been expected from Bougainville for the rest of the year."  In British Columbia, Mr. O'Neill said, union officials continued to indicate they and management of the Highland Valley mine were still far apart in their labor negotiations.  "It appears that the company's practice of contracting out work to be done, which the union objects to, is a greater stumbling block to settlement than the wage issue," Mr. O'Neill said.  Still, Mr. O'Neill noted, "the growing feeling is that the talks have passed their worst point, will become more intense and may lead to a settlement soon.  I'd say there is a cautiously positive attitude among traders and analysts toward the situation."  In Chile, labor negotiations at the El Salvador mine have reached a deadlock, Mr. O'Neill said.  Agreement has already been reached on a 4% wage increase plus an inflation adjustment, he said.  "The big problem is the scheduling of work time, particularly the holidays and rest days, and some other benefits," he said.  "Peruvian miners have returned to work."  All in all, the problems in some production areas are having less impact than before because the growing expectation among traders is that, at least in two cases -- Highland Valley and El Salvador -- the solutions are coming soon.  "The greater concern now is going to be how supply will be able to meet demand," Mr. O'Neill said.  "Japan, in particular, will be the focus of attention as the increase in copper usage becomes stronger in the fall.  Japan has been the buyer of about 70% of Highland Valley's production of concentrates and Bougainville has also been a major supplier," he said.  According to Fred Demler, metals economist for Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. in New York, there's still a significant bullish sentiment in the market.  "Mostly what we've seen" on Friday and yesterday "is profit taking from the recent advances," he said.  "An increase in London Metal Exchange stocks last week of 2,250 tons to 82,875 tons might have also contributed to the selling.  However, prices remain near life-of-contract highs, supplies remain low and the potential for the resumption of the volatility of the past two weeks still remains," he said.  Even if labor problems are solved soon, Mr. Demler said, it won't mean the tightness of refined copper will be quickly alleviated.  "It would take up to six weeks and more to turn concentrates into refined copper and that wouldn't be much help in relieving the shortage of refined copper that exists today," he said.  In other commodity markets yesterday:  LIVESTOCK and MEATS: Cattle futures prices slumped amid signs that a widely projected shortage of fattened cattle this fall isn't materializing.  According to Charles Levitt, a livestock analyst at Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc., Chicago, the shortage is being mitigated by feedlot operators who are keeping livestock on their feedlots for longer-than-usual periods in hopes of reaping higher prices this fall.  Futures prices were also depressed by indications that beef demand by supermarket chains is turning sluggish.  Hog futures prices dipped on a growing sentiment that the Bush administration will reject the wishes of a hog farmer trade group that wants the federal government to ship frozen pork bellies to Poland as food aid.  The farmer group is arguing that such a shipment would reduce the large U.S. stockpile of frozen pork bellies that has depressed the price of pork bellies as well as hogs.  Analysts, however, doubt such a move would be popular with taxpayers.  Not only would such a refrigerated shipment be expensive, but it would probably raise the consumer price of bacon in the U.S.  ENERGY: Trading was lackluster and thin in petroleum futures on the New York Mercantile Exchange yesterday.  Still, the U.S. benchmark crude oil, West Texas Intermediate, drifted higher to close at $19.05 a barrel, up 20 cents.  Products were higher, as well.  "People are comfortable with these levels," said Eric Bolling of Edge Trading Corp.  "They're not willing to take things either way."  Reports of higher crude production haven't torpedoed prices because demand seems to continue to be strong, some traders said.  Most traders and analysts seem ready to take in stride a wide range of possible domestic inventory estimates due from the American Petroleum Institute today.  The weekly report, usually out on Tuesday, is a day late this week because of the Labor Day holiday.  Many market players expect both volume and volatility to grow over the next couple of weeks as vacationing traders in Europe and the U.S. are back in the pits, the market enters the heating oil season and the special late September meeting of the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries nears.  PRECIOUS METALS: Futures prices for gold and silver eased while those for platinum rose.  December delivery gold was off $1.00 an ounce at $365.10.  December silver declined 1.5 cents an ounce to $5.18.  October platinum advanced $1.90 to $477.30.  Trading was mostly quiet, according to Bernard Savaiko, senior metals analyst for PaineWebber Inc., New York.  Gold and silver reflected in part the strength of the dollar.  Overall, Mr. Savaiko said, precious metals haven't been reacting strongly to the dollar for the last few weeks.  "It would seem that traders are awaiting a signal, such as a pickup in inflation, that can be used as a reason to buy precious metals," he said.  Among the indicators they're watching is the Commodity Research Bureau index, which appears to be attracting strong support at the 220 to 222 level, he said.  As for platinum, he said, continued belief that environmental concerns, which will be reflected in greater use of catalytic converters in automobile exhaust systems, remains a strong supporting factor.  Since Sept. 1, precious metals investors in New York have been exempt from a sales tax that is as high as 8.25% in New York City.  According to Jacques Luben, executive director-investments for the Platinum Guild International (USA) Inc., this could be a boon not only for domestic buyers but also those overseas, who obtain the physical metals in the form of bars and coins in New York.  "It could make the metals much more attractive to offshore buyers in particular," he said.  H.J. Heinz Co., benefiting from strong volume growth in ketchup and other key products, said its first-quarter net income increased 15% to $126.5 million, or 95 cents a share.  In the year-earlier period, Pittsburgh-based Heinz earned $110.1 million, or 84 cents a share.  Sales for the quarter, ended Aug. 2, advanced 5.3% to $1.45 billion from $1.38 billion.  Heinz Chairman Anthony J.F. O'Reilly said volume improvement in ketchup, Ore-Ida frozen potatoes and Star-Kist tuna helped boost operating profit nearly 17% to $230.4 million from $197.8 million.  Strong volume growth, together with price increases for food-service ketchup, corn products and Heinz beans in the United Kingdom, more than offset the unfavorable effect of foreign-exchange rates and lower selling prices for tuna, he added.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, Heinz closed at $64, up 75 cents.  Fred R. Meier was named to the new post of vice president of imaging systems, leading an operation that includes copiers and laser printers.  Mr. Meier had been vice president of business development for the Unisys Network Computing group.  L.W. Beers, formerly vice president of solutions development and corporate marketing, was named vice president of document imaging systems and corporate marketing.  Unisys also has interests in commercial information systems and defense systems.  President Bush launched a strategy against drug abuse that puts a new emphasis on punishing users and middlemen rather than attacking global narcotics cartels.  In his first prime-time television address as president, Mr. Bush suggested that society has been far too permissive toward drug use and that the nation must make individual accountability a guiding factor in the drug war.  To that end, the speech signaled a major departure from the policies of the Reagan White House -- away from "interdiction" and border control and toward law enforcement, prosecution, treatment and education at the local level.  "It will take a national strategy, one that reaches into every school, every workplace, involving every family," he said.  Holding what he said was a packet of crack cocaine seized a few days ago in a park across the street from the White House, Mr. Bush declared: "If we face this evil as a nation united, this will be nothing but a handful of useless chemicals."  Mr. Bush's strategy puts the prestige of the presidency at the service of an especially risky goal: changing the habits not only of individuals and neighborhoods but also of some Latin American nations whose economies have become largely dependent on illegal drugs.  "He has set himself a particularly difficult goal, which is engineering changes in the way people behave," said William Schneider, a political scientist at the American Enterprise Institute here.  Although Democratic politicians couldn't attack the president's intentions, they began a campaign to raise questions about his commitment.  "Quite frankly, the president's plan is not tough enough, bold enough or imaginative enough to meet the crisis at hand," Sen. Joseph Biden of Delaware, the Judiciary Committee chairman, said in a prime-time response.  The president's plan, he said, was "a limited war, fought on the cheap."  The $7.9 billion program, which Mr. Bush will promote in a series of addresses beginning in Baltimore tomorrow, includes pressuring states to stiffen punishments for practically every drug offense, large or small.  Offering to buy drugs, for example, could become unlawful.  States that have quit prosecuting small-time users would be urged to revoke drivers' licenses or impose large fines.  At the other end of the scale, Mr. Bush reiterated his call to put so-called drug kingpins to death.  A number of the proposals were recycled from anti-crime legislation the president sent to Congress in May.  Thousands of jail cells would be built and an army of police and judges put to work.  Funding for treatment programs -- the approach generally favored by Democrats -- would be increased by 50%.  The plan also envisions widespread drug testing, particularly for students, federal employees and criminal defendants.  The president urged private employers to test for drugs in the workplace, commanding companies that do business with the government to put anti-drug programs in place.  Mr. Bush hardly abandoned the international dimension of the drug fight, budgeting additional sums to help Colombia, Peru and Bolivia fight drug traffickers.  He threatened to jail money-launderers "just like any street dealer."  A number of academic drug policy experts immediately criticized the Bush plan as well-intentioned but inadequate.  Mark Kleiman, a lecturer at Harvard's Kennedy School of Government, said the plan "continues to ignore distinctions among drugs and users," adding: "An occasional pot smoker does not represent the same threat to society as does a crack addict."  But Mr. Kleiman's Harvard colleague, Frank Hartmann, praised what he called the federal government's first comprehensive drug strategy.  "Appropriately, the Bush plan puts the burden of making it work at the state and local levels," Mr. Hartmann said.  Although conservatives applauded the president's efforts to make drugs a moral crusade, they too cited the political hazards.  "It's clear there's potential risk, because Bush has clearly made a decision to link himself closely with this issue," said Patrick McGuigan, an analyst with the conservative Free Congress Foundation.  Mr. Bush's declaring the drug war on prime-time TV only increased the risk that he will be identified with any failure.  But Jeffrey Eisenach, a visiting scholar with the conservative Heritage Foundation, saw great potential political advantage: "He is the moral leader, the political leader of the country.  It's the No. 1 problem facing the country."  Democrats are bound to use the program to emphasize the failures of drug policy during the Reagan years -- policies in which then-Vice President Bush was closely involved.  In six of the seven fiscal years from 1982 through 1988, the Reagan-Bush administration proposed cuts -- in real, or inflation-adjusted, terms -- in funding for anti-drug programs, Democrats charge.  That means that even the $2.2 billion in new spending envisioned by the president won't restore spending to its level before it was cut by the Reagan White House, they say.  "We should not have to go hat in hand to pick up a lousy $2 billion," said Rep. Charles Rangel (D., N.Y.) after a briefing at the White House.  "Let's get on with the war."  In fact, by the White House's own calculations, last night's program calls for only $716 million in spending authority beyond earlier presidential proposals.  That includes $300 million for drug treatment and prevention programs, $194 million for grants to local law-enforcement agencies, $132 million for the Pentagon's attempts to disrupt the flow of cocaine from South America and $50 million to help rid public housing of drug dealers.  To pay for this without widening the federal deficit, Budget Director Richard Darman suggested that Congress trim pending spending bills -- and offered what he said amounted to $751 million in potential offsetting cuts.  "If this is a war . . . some other programs should be treated as less important," the budget chief said.  But it wasn't clear how the administration calculated the supposed savings.  Mr. Darman's list, for instance, included trimming $132 million from a Pentagon radiocommunications program -- action that the House already has taken.  ---  David Wessel contributed to this article.  @ Financing the War on Drugs  @ BUSH PLAN -- Reallocate money from other areas, including the Pentagon.  @ Democratic Proposals  @ SEN. JOSEPH BIDEN: Forgiving portions of Latin debt in exchange for eradicating coca and substituting other crops.  @ REPS. CHARLES SCHUMER AND MARTY RUSSO: 1% surtax on individual and corporate income to yield $5 billion a year to fight drugs and crime.  As it opens its doors for the new academic year, Johns Hopkins University has no faculty member in its classics department who teaches Greek literature or philosophy; none who can lecture on Plato's "Republic," Sophocles' "Oedipus Rex" or Homer's "Odyssey."  But this is not just another Stanford-like setback for the Great Books.  In its small way, the fate of the classics at one of the nation's most lavishly funded universities casts a revealing light on both the fragility of the liberal arts and the mysteries of academic finance.  Above all, however, it is a commentary on the paradoxical role of the federal government in the modern mega-university.  Johns Hopkins receives more federal research support than any other university in the country.  In 1987, federal research and development grants totaled $476.3 million.  In addition, the school has raised more than $512 million from private donors in the past five years.  Even so, the administration revealed last year that the School of Arts and Sciences -- the liberal-arts core of the university -- had run up a deficit of $4 million and projected a shortfall of $7 million this year.  The financial crunch led to the resignation of Johns Hopkins's president (who earlier had been stripped of his budgetary authority) and the imposition of a draconian five-year financial plan that includes steep increases in tuition, a 10% cutback in liberal-arts faculty costs and the elimination of several academic programs.  As Prof.  Jerrold Cooper, chairman of the Near Eastern studies department, remarked with a trace of academic understatement: "When a university cuts its faculty after raising half a billion dollars, it's a very, very bad situation."  This might be written off as an aberration except for the distinctive role that Johns Hopkins has played as the prototypical American research university.  With its emphasis on research and graduate education, Johns Hopkins did more to shape the new academic culture of the American university in the late 19th and early 20th centuries than did any other institution.  Keeping up with Hopkins has been a national academic obsession since the day it opened in 1876.  In recent years, that hasn't been easy to do.  Johns Hopkins has been one of higher education's most successful growth industries.  Its operating budget increased from $88.5 million in 1972 to $557 million last year -- a healthy 529% increase.  The largest single factor has been the increasing benevolence of Uncle Sam.  In 1967, Hopkins ranked 15th among leading universities in its share of federal research money -- a respectable, if somewhat modest, showing.  By the early 1980s, it had leaped into the top position.  This growth paralleled the increasing role of the federal government in American higher education in the years after World War II.  While the federal government created vast new research centers, laboratories and federally endowed institutes, it also provided a case study in the law of unintended consequences, especially for the liberal arts.  By shifting the focus of higher education from undergraduate to graduate education and from teaching to research, especially scientific research, the new federal money radically reshaped the priorities and prestige hierarchies of academia.  Then-Education Secretary William Bennett described the curious interplay of cash and scholarship: "X dollars buys the student one professor; 2X dollars buys him two.  But 3X and 4X and 5X dollars gradually remove the professor from the student, and 6X dollars may replace all the classroom professors with graduate students."  At Johns Hopkins the operation of Bennett's Law is writ large.  The money was not going primarily for classroom teachers; nor was it going for the liberal arts.  This is not altogether surprising given Johns Hopkins's historic focus on graduate research and the sciences.  Unlike most large universities, Hopkins has a tiny undergraduate population -- only about 2,000 students.  But the federal money grossly magnified those tendencies.  Of the $476.3 million the university received in federal research and development grants in 1987, the amount allocated to the School of Arts and Sciences was a mere 3.7%.  Nor did the liberal arts fare much better in the university's extraordinarily successful capital campaign, where only 8% of the more than $512 million raised over five years will go for Arts and Sciences.  In the absence of an institutional commitment to compensate for the imbalance, the liberal arts inevitably became the raggedy stepchildren of the university.  The situation was exacerbated by Johns Hopkins's policy of financial decentralization, under which each school was expected to go it alone.  The result was that even as Johns Hopkins prospered and swelled, while the medical school built an $85 million research facility and the administration dreamed of a new space telescope, the School of Arts and Sciences withered like an etiolated limb.  But the news is not all bad.  When the inevitable crunch came, Johns Hopkins adopted a plan to bail out Arts and Sciences and share revenue among the various schools.  Hopkins's new administration is far more realistic about the limits of academic growth; it now recognizes that the university can no longer pursue every frontier of knowledge.  But the omens for the liberal arts are still troubling.  On the heels of the cutbacks, two of the four professors in the tiny and beleaguered classics department quit; today the department has only a single tenured faculty member (Georg Luck, a Latin specialist) and must import guest lecturers for Greek literature.  Other departments await the effects of attrition.  Ironically, Johns Hopkins continues to have a relatively well-funded Humanities Center.  But it too reflects the new academic culture.  Prof.  Luck calls it "a fortress of trendiness," with a special emphasis on deconstructionism, post-structuralism and other forms of fashionable jargoned academic nihilism.  The "Iliad" and Aeschylus may be out; but Hopkins has Derrida and de Man well covered.  Prof.  Luck has watched the changing culture of the university.  "This was a fantastic place 20 years ago," he says.  "But it's become more commercialized.  Hopkins has become more like a business."  Not quite.  Entrepreneurs don't have tenure.  Bureaucrats do.  An eloquent tribute to the transfusion of the federal government's mindset into the universities is the fact that university administrative costs nationally have grown at twice the rate of instructional costs over the past decade.  A notable legacy of the federalization of the universities has been the bureaucratization of the soul of higher education.  It's unclear whether the turmoil at Johns Hopkins, so often a trendsetter, is also a harbinger of more crises to come.  Federal support for academic science and engineering nationwide topped $8.5 billion in 1987, up from less than $5 billion in 1980.  Private money also continues to flow into the universities, usually in the form of restricted grants.  As many as 60 universities and colleges are conducting fund drives with goals of more than $100 million each.  Three schools are seeking $1 billion.  And yet, the signs of poverty amid plenty are becoming more widespread.  Princeton and Cornell, no financial pikers themselves, are also wrestling with red ink.  Mighty Stanford projects an $11 million budget deficit this school year, despite a $1.1 billion fund-raising campaign.  As Robert Maynard Hutchins of the University of Chicago remarked in the late 1940s in a different context, lavishing more money on the modern university "is a little like telling a drowning man that he can improve his position by drinking a good deal of water."  The problem is not money, but values.  There is more than enough blame to go around: academic bureaucrats who imagine they are entrepreneurs; absentee trustees; professors in full-cry after consulting contracts; a society that has lost sight of the value of the humanities.  But a special place in this rogues' gallery must be reserved for the jolly gnomes of official Washington, oblivious, as ever, to the consequences of their actions.  ---  Mr. Sykes is the author of "ProfScam: Professors and the Demise of Higher Education" (Regnery Gateway, 1988).  International Business Machines Corp. introduced two models of its AS/400 minicomputer line and a new release of the operating-system software.  The computer concern said the models 35 and 45 cost the same but operate about 20% faster than models 30 and 40, which are being discontinued.  The announcement, which was expected, said the machines will be available in volume next month.  IBM, based in Armonk, N.Y., also said the new version of its operating system will be easier to install and use and, among other things, will make it simpler for the AS/400 to talk to non-IBM equipment in a network.  IBM also announced two magnetic-tape storage systems for the AS/400, addressing a complaint that some customers have had about the product.  BUSH PROPOSED a $7.9 billion program to combat illegal drugs in the U.S.  The president, in a nationally broadcast address, launched a strategy against drug abuse, placing the emphasis on punishing users and middlemen rather than focusing on global narcotics cartels.  Bush's plan includes pressuring states to boost punishments for drug offenses and envisions widespread drug testing.  The proposal signaled a major departure from Reagan's policies.  While the Democrats couldn't attack the president's intentions, they began a campaign raising questions about his commitment.  Gunmen in Bogota killed an army colonel's wife as Washington delivered five helicopters to help Colombia's government battle narcotics traffickers.  ---  Hundreds of thousands of blacks staged strikes across South Africa to protest today's parliamentary elections.  Blacks are excluded from voting, and the strikes were considered the biggest show of defiance in a monthlong drive to discredit the balloting.  Police reportedly arrested about 500 demonstrators.  ---  Salvadoran guerrillas have accepted a proposal for talks with the rightist government of President Cristiani in an effort to end the country's nearly 10-year-old civil war.  The negotiations, the first since Cristiani's inauguration June 1, are to begin next week in Mexico City.  El Salvador's government called for a 48-hour truce.  ---  Authorities in Brazil said a Varig airlines jetliner that vanished Sunday made an emergency landing in the Amazon jungle, and 46 of the 54 people aboard survived.  The Boeing 737, on a flight to the northern city of Belem from Sao Paulo, crash-landed in the remote Alto Xingu region in the eastern Amazon, airline and rescue officials said.  ---  Researchers in Boston found that women over 40 who have used oral contraceptives don't have increased risk of breast cancer.  The Harvard Nurses Health Study, based on data from about 121,700 nurses collected over 10 years, is considered the most definitive ever on the possible link between cancer and the pill.  ---  Walesa arrived in West Germany for the start of a five-day visit and called for Western aid, saying Solidarity's plan for economic changes in Poland would fail without the assistance.  The trade-union founder also urged the East and West to overcome political divisions to create a Europe "where everyone feels that they are free."  Solidarity leaders said the government's foreign and transport ministries, both sought by the Communists, remained under discussion.  Premier Mazowiecki's cabinet list is expected to be completed today.  ---  The Soviet Union plans to sell unprofitable state-run companies to cooperatives and issue bonds to help halve a $200 billion budget deficit by next year.  Separately, strikes sparked by ethnic groups spread in Moldavia and Azerbaijan, and leaders of the Ukraine announced plans to make Ukrainian the republic's official language.  ---  Moscow launched a spacecraft with two cosmonauts aboard for a six-month mission, official Soviet radio reported.  The cosmonauts are headed toward the Mir space station, which currently is vacant, for construction projects and scientific experiments.  The booster rocket was painted with ads for an Italian firm and Soviet companies.  ---  The U.S. and other nations rejected an Israeli request for aid to rehabilitate Palestinian refugee camps, citing a lack of progress on peace efforts, officials in Jerusalem said.  Also, the Israeli media reported that the government has begun using helicopters to track down wanted Arabs in remote areas of the occupied West Bank.  ---  A car bomb exploded in a Christian neighborhood in Beirut, killing at least two people and wounding seven, police said.  Syrian gunners and Christian forces, meanwhile, exchanged gunfire across the Lebanese capital's factional demarcation line.  ---  Five Japanese were arrested in Tokyo for trying to sell about nine pounds of uranium to the U.S. Embassy for $83 million, police said.  The source of the uranium wasn't clear.  Authorities said the substance required further processing for use in nuclear-power generation and nuclear bombs.  ---  India's Prime Minister Gandhi urged the creation of an $18 billion-a-year international environmental fund.  The proposal, made at a meeting in Belgrade, Yugoslavia, of the 102-nation Non-Aligned Movement, reflected the organization's growing concern about the pollution of the atmosphere.  THE DOLLAR CLIMBED to its highest level in 2 1/2 months despite concerted intervention by at least a dozen central banks.  The currency is being propelled by an unexpectedly strong U.S. economy and by growing speculation the Fed won't lower U.S. interest rates anytime soon, traders and analysts said.  Stocks and bonds edged lower as trading activity remained sluggish.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average slipped 7.41 points to 2744.68.  ---  United Airlines' largest union, the machinists, attacked a proposed $6.75 billion buy-out by management and the rival pilots union, but didn't rule out participating.  The machinists union said piling extra debt on the carrier could threaten its survival.  ---  France's biggest takeover fight appears to be over.  Financiere de Suez reached an agreement likely to lead to the acquisition of Industrielle and its main asset, insurer Groupe Victoire, for about $4.08 billion.  ---  Pan Am is expanding its flights out of Miami, a move that will likely hinder Eastern Airlines' return to a lucrative market it once dominated.  Eastern is struggling to rebuild a domestic system that has been crippled since March by a machinists strike.  ---  Financier Victor Posner suffered another setback at DWG, the crown jewel of his embattled empire.  DWG vice chairman Leonard Roberts resigned and criticized Posner, prompting Roberts to be fired as president of DWG's Arby's restaurant chain.  ---  A scandal involving the Atlanta branch of Italy's largest bank, BNL, widened.  Most of some $1 billion to $2 billion in export letters of credit that the bank branch provided to Iraq only had the backing of that country's central bank, a Moody's analyst said.  ---  Occidental Petroleum plans to restructure its flagging domestic oil and gas business, eliminating 900 jobs and saving what it expects will be $100 million a year.  Analysts applauded the move, which they said has been happening throughout the industry.  ---  Hollywood is expected to post a record summer, with box office receipts exceeding $2 billion, well above the 1988 summer peak of $1.7 billion.  The sharp rise was helped by such blockbuster movies as "Batman."  ---  U.S.-Japanese trade negotiators opened talks in Tokyo aimed at further opening Japan to imports.  The discussions were amicable, but aides said making changes will be hard.  ---  Arthur Andersen and Price Waterhouse are extending merger talks, apparently to resolve what accounting specialists said were several potential problems.  The merger would create the world's biggest accounting firm.  ---  The West German economy grew a robust 4.9% in the second quarter, well above expectations and fueling fears of worsening inflation if business activity continues to heat up.  ---  The NASD announced disciplinary actions against firms and individuals for various rule violations.  ---  Markets --  Stocks: Volume 145,180,000 shares.  Dow Jones industrials 2744.68, off 7.41; transportation 1532.01, up 5.69; utilities 217.24, off 1.38.  Bonds: Shearson Lehman Hutton Treasury index 3310.66, up 0.68.  Commodities: Dow Jones futures index 129.83, off 0.75; spot index 129.56, off 0.39.  Dollar: 146.84 yen, up 0.86; 1.9883 marks, up 0.0073.  Toyota Motor Corp.'s U.S. sales arm said it is extending to 60 months or 60,000 miles its power-train warranty coverage on all 1990 model Toyota cars and trucks.  Toyota's move is the most recent among the major Japanese manufacturers in significantly lengthening engine and transmission warranties.  The U.S. Big Three, led by Chrysler Corp., extended their power-train warranties several years ago and have aggressively used the longer guarantees as a marketing tool.  A spokesman for Torrance, Calif.-based Toyota said he didn't know whether Toyota will promote its new, extended coverage.  Toyota's warranty has offered powertrain coverage for 36 months or 36,000 miles.  Toyota Motor Sales U.S.A. Inc. said its basic warranty, which covers repairs for virtually all defective parts, will remain at 36 months or 36,000 miles.  The newly extended warranty covers drivetrain, engine and safety parts.  Chrysler's powertrain warranty covers engine and transmission parts on most domestic products for seven years or 70,000 miles.  Chrysler's basic warranty is for 12 months or 12,000 miles; after this is exhausted the company charges a $100 deductible for powertrain-related visits until the extended warranty expires.  General Motors Corp.'s basic warranty covers "everything" for three years or 50,000 miles, a spokeswoman said.  Ford Motor Co.'s basic warranty is 12 months or 12,000 miles; its powertrain warranty covers engine and transmission parts for 60 months or 60,000 miles.  Both GM and Ford, like Chrysler, charge a $100 deductible for each visit after 12 months.  The Toyota spokesman said neither the company's basic nor its powertrain warranty requires any deductible.  U.S. vehicle warranties for the Japanese auto makers Nissan Motor Corp. and Honda Motor Co. cover most parts for 36 months or 36,000 miles with no deductibles.  Mazda Motor Corp.'s U.S. warranty provides "bumper to bumper" coverage for three years or 50,000 miles with no deductibles, a company spokesman said.  Warranties for the major European auto makers vary; Audi of America, for example, has a three-year or 50,000 mile warranty that covers all scheduled maintenance and virtually all repairs of major parts.  Some dealers and consumer groups have criticized Japanese auto makers for not lengthening the terms of their warranties to match the Big Three's programs.  Since Japanese vehicles are generally recognized to have higher quality, such extended coverage would seem an obvious move.  But a number of Japanese company officials have said they don't need to further extend their programs, claiming the Big Three warranties are more of a promotional effort to convince buyers that the quality of North American-made cars has improved.  Still, the Toyota spokesman acknowledged consumers could rightly ask why Toyota doesn't offer longer coverage if its vehicles are superior to others.  With such a program, "It's easier to have an answer . . . for potential customers doing comparison shopping," he said.  Lafarge Corp., Reston, Va., said it agreed to acquire six building materials companies from Standard Slag Holding Co., Youngstown, Ohio.  Terms weren't disclosed.  In 1988, the companies had combined sales of $90 million.  Lafarge, a maker of cement, asphalt and other construction materials, has most of its current operations in Canada.  The acquisitions would significantly expand its U.S. activities.  Lafarge identified the companies as Standard Slag Co., Duquesne Slag Products Co., St. Louis Slag Products Co., Standard Aggregates Inc., Cleveland Builders Supply and Standard Materials Inc.  In addition, Portsmouth Trucking, a transportation company, is included in the proposed transaction.  The pact is subject to antitrust clearance and other conditions, Lafarge said.  After leading a charge that drove Castle & Cooke shares to record highs in recent months, some bulls have turned skittish.  Castle & Cooke, known for its Dole brand pineapples and bananas, attracted favorable notice early this year as investors debated the value of RJR Nabisco's Del Monte business, now on the block.  Assuming Del Monte fetched a handsome price, some investors reasoned, the glow would rub off on Castle & Cooke, boosting that company's shares to a higher multiple of earnings.  Bulls got another boost in May when David H. Murdock, chairman and the holder of a 23% stake, announced plans to split Castle & Cooke into its food and real-estate businesses.  While he didn't disclose details, shareholders hoped the breakup would spotlight the value of the company's vast landholdings on the Hawaiian islands of Oahu and Lanai.  But it wasn't until Drexel Burnham Lambert issued a buy recommendation in June -- based on the breakup plan and the Del Monte story -- that the shares spurted 20% to a recent high of 45 1/4.  Kurt Feuerman, Drexel's food and tobacco analyst, valued Castle & Cooke at 69 a share -- 38 for Dole; 35 for the real estate; minus 4 for net debt.  Not long afterward, however, the analyst's enthusiasm cooled and he reduced his rating on the stock to "market performer."  The Del Monte story would be a positive "but it's already {reflected} in the stock," he says.  Castle & Cooke closed yesterday at 39 1/2.  Drexel's calls made a big splash because it's so rare to hear any advice at all about Castle & Cooke from a national brokerage firm.  The company is something of a mystery, largely because Mr. Murdock and other executives rarely talk to analysts.  "Our policy is to keep a level playing field by providing the same information to all investors," a company spokeswoman says.  The next positive catalyst isn't expected until early next year, when Castle & Cooke will complete the breakup of its food and real-estate operations, Mr. Feuerman says.  He notes that Mr. Murdock has been mentioned as a possible buyer for part or all of Del Monte, which "isn't necessarily positive in the short term."  Moreover, Castle & Cooke investors could be disappointed if Del Monte brings a lower-than-expected price.  Some analysts, for example, think the company might be worth $2.5 billion, significantly less than the $3 billion RJR Nabisco now is said to be seeking.  In his report, Mr. Feuerman estimates that Del Monte will be sold for about $3 billion.  Ron Baron, a New York money manager and investment adviser, speculates that Mr. Murdock wants to transform the Dole "franchise" into the nation's biggest purveyor of fruits and vegetables by acquiring all of Del Monte.  He figures a combination of Dole and Del Monte, both with annual sales in the neighborhood of $2.6 billion, could generate cost savings equivalent to 8% of sales.  Mr. Baron sees the Castle & Cooke breakup as part of a master plan to buy Del Monte.  Mr. Murdock could quickly raise a $600 million to $800 million "down payment" by issuing to existing Castle & Cooke shareholders rights to buy the real-estate operations, he says.  Holders could opt to exercise the rights by shelling out cash to Castle & Cooke, or holders could sell the rights to someone else.  Although buying Del Monte would hurt Castle & Cooke's stock price in the short term, the move could double Dole's value in three to four years, Mr. Baron believes.  Baron Asset Fund, a small mutual fund he runs, owns about 46,000 Castle & Cooke shares, but the most recent purchases were made at prices below 27.  Mr. Murdock made his latest purchases of the stock in March at 25 1/2 to 26, filings show.  Many longtime Castle & Cooke bulls own their shares because of perceived hidden values in the company's roughly 129,000 acres of Hawaiian land.  Estimates of the value of these holdings, plus some properties in California and Arizona, range widely from $15 a share to more than $100 a share.  Castle & Cooke is building a 102-room lodge and a 248-room luxury hotel and golf course on Lanai, which is 98%-owned by the company.  The two hotels will be the first major tourist facilities on that island.  Paul C.T. Loo, senior vice president in Dean Witter's Honolulu office, began recommending Castle & Cooke after Mr. Murdock got involved several years ago.  "We believe strongly in Hawaiian land," he said.  Besides investors from Hong Kong and Japan, Mr. Loo says he's seeing more interest in Hawaiian property from people in South Korea and Bangkok.  But Larry Selwitz, research director at Cruttenden & Co. in Newport Beach, Calif., warns that a slow-growth movement in the islands is putting a damper on land values: "Elected officials have expressed a lot of concern over future land sales to foreign nationals."  ---  Castle & Cooke (NYSE; Symbol: CKE)  Business: Fresh and processed foods, real estate  Year ended Dec. 31, 1988:  Revenue: $2.47 billion  Net income: $112.3 million; or $1.90 a share (fully diluted)  Second quarter, June 17, 1989:  Per-share earnings: 59 cents vs. 63 cents (fully diluted)  Average daily trading volume: 140,866 shaes  Common shares outstanding: 59.3 million  Mor-Flo Industries Inc., Cleveland, said it will take an after-tax charge of $3.9 million in the third quarter to make an added provision for damages in a patent suit.  The producer of water heaters said a Federal appeals court affirmed a July 1988 court decision against it and a subsidiary in the amount of $8.9 million, plus interest of $780,000 and remanded the case to the trial court to reconsider the issue of increased damages for willful infringement.  Mor-Flo previously made several charges to earnings, providing $3.8 million to cover its estimate of the amount of the damage award and related litigation expenses.  The company has been operating at a loss in recent quarters, with a loss in the first half of $2.2 million on sales of $109.6 million.  The appeals court vacated the trial court's denial of increased damages, Mor-Flo said.  The suit was brought by a competitor, State Industries Inc., alleging Mor-Flo violated patents covering a method of insulating gas water heaters with polyurethane foam.  Mor-Flo said it has since changed its method of insulating the water heaters.  even by any stretch of a negative imagination -- "a badly demoralized orchestra," as described in Barbara Jepson's Aug. 15 Leisure & Arts article.  It is, on the other hand, and in the estimation of many of the world's finest critics and more than 35,000 subscribers in New York, one of the world's most gifted musical ensembles -- one that more often than not outplays all of the world's other great orchestras under the direction of its dedicated music director, Zubin Mehta.  Come listen more often and you'll know what I'm talking about.  Francis Little  Director  Advertising and Public Relations  New York Philharmonic  New York  Fibreboard Corp., Concord, Calif., said it agreed in principle to sell about 27,500 acres of California timberland to Sierra Pacific Industries Corp., Arcata, Calif., for $32.5 million.  Fibreboard, which makes lumber, plywood, industrial insulation and fireproofing material, said the sale will accelerate its plan to close its sawmill near the timberland in Truckee, Calif.  Fibreboard will also transfer additional timberland to Sierra Pacific in exchange for about 10,000 acres of timberland that Sierra Pacific owns near Fibreboard's main wood-products operation in Standard, Calif.  Also, Fibreboard will grant cutting rights to Sierra Pacific in most of the rest of Fibreboard's timberland around Truckee.  A Fibreboard spokesman said the transaction will help the company continue to concentrate its resources around its Standard production facilities.  Last July, the company sold an Oregon sawmill to a private investor group.  Dow Jones & Co. agreed to distribute the National, a daily sports newspaper being launched by former New York Post Publisher Peter Price and Emilio Azcarraga, the principal shareholder in Univisa Inc., a unit of Mexico's Televisa entertainment and publishing concern.  The National is scheduled to appear starting Jan. 1 on newsstands Monday through Friday and Sundays.  The distribution of the National won't be connected with that of The Wall Street Journal, which is published and distributed by Dow Jones.  The four-color, tabloid newspaper, which is expected to compete primarily with Gannett Co.'s USA Today and the sports pages of metropolitan dailies, will cost 50 cents a copy and will be distributed by Dow Jones first in New York, Chicago and Los Angeles.  Total distribution on newsstands will be about 250,000 to start.  Mr. Price, president and publisher of the National, said the agreement with Dow Jones will help "get us going on a national level quickly."  He added, "It's distribution that is practical and credible."  Mr. Price said the newspaper will start primarily as a newsstand buy but will eventually have part of its circulation home-delivered.  It will start out with between 32 and 48 pages.  A typical 40-page edition would have about 12 pages devoted to a particular city's local sports news, with about 28 pages devoted to national sports stories and statistics.  "We expect to open with about ten pages of ads," said Mr. Price.  "We don't have a media kit or a full prototype, but we've had extraordinary interest from advertisers."  Congratulations on the excellent Aug. 16 Politics & Policy article linking politics and the environment.  This problem has emerged in another context: presidential appointments to EPA positions.  I am dismayed with the nomination of a purely political appointee with virtually no relevant experience to the position of assistant administrator for water.  The proposed appointment of Lajuana Wilcher for this post should be opposed because she does not come close to meeting the minimum requirement for the difficult and complex task of managing the nation's drinking water, streams, lakes, estuaries, marine and groundwaters.  The task is complex and requires technical competence.  Even the operator of the smallest sewage-treatment plant in Pennsylvania is expected to pass examinations and be certified by the state before he is allowed to assume his job.  Why then do we overlook the question of qualifications when it comes to the top jobs?  Walter A. Lyon  Camp Hill, Pa.  Laidlaw Transportation Ltd. said it agreed to purchase 67 million additional shares of ADT Ltd. of Bermuda for about $211.9 million, increasing its friendly holding to 28%.  Laidlaw said it may be entitled to purchase additional shares if the issue of another 67 million ADT shares to British shareholders isn't fully subscribed.  The company said it won't increase its stake beyond 30% at this time.  Laidlaw said it will pay 203 pence ($3.16) a share to increase its stake from its current 24% holding.  The purchase is subject to ADT shareholder approval.  Laidlaw Chairman and Chief Executive Michael DeGroote said it is "premature to say" if Laidlaw will increase its ADT holding in the future.  DeGroote said he will join ADT's board in the next month or two.  ADT is a security services and auctions company, listed in London.  Toronto-based Laidlaw, which is 48%-controlled by Canadian Pacific Ltd., provides waste services and runs school buses.  Van Kampen Merritt said it would withdraw its offer for Syncor International Corp. by noon EDT tomorrow if "an encouraging response" isn't received.  Van Kampen Merritt, Lisle, Ill., is an investment banking unit of Xerox Corp.  It said yesterday that its offer for $81.8 million, or $7.57 a share, made on behalf of an unidentified client would only be pursued with "the support of Syncor's board of directors and shareholders."  However, Syncor, a Chatsworth, Calif., maker of advanced medical diagnostic products, said it is intent on remaining "an independent company in order to pursue corporate objectives and thus maximize long-term shareholder value."  The company added, "Syncor has not sought a sale of its business to a third party and has no intention of doing so at this time."  Regarding Martha Bayles's Aug. 21 Leisure & Arts commentary, "Crying Wolf About Racism," on the television documentary "Black in White America."  I am convinced racism still exists in the U.S.  There is abounding evidence that racism is subtly and craftily perpetrated upon our people.  Rather than fear that a documentary appears to be crying wolf, I am concerned that it is stating the obvious: The wolves of racism are all over.  We see only some; we admit only part of those we see.  It shows up in the most unlikely places, at the least expected times.  It lives within and around us all.  It thrives still, 20 years after the War on Poverty.  Rev. W. Thomas Schomaker  Grosse Pointe Park, Mich.  "What Am I Doing Here" (Viking, 367 pages, $19.95) is an ironic and multileveled title for Bruce Chatwin's posthumous collection of essays.  On the surface, it's the simple and perfect name for a book by one of the world's best-known literary wanderers.  But the first two pieces in the book, both very short, are conversations Mr. Chatwin has with Assunta, the cleaning lady and tea maker on his ward in a British National Health Service hospital.  What he is doing there is dying, from what he insisted was a rare, wasting fungal infection, picked up in China.  Mr. Chatwin wasn't a risk junky like Graham Greene, using the political misfortunes of foreign countries as an antidote for boredom.  His wry account of how he stumbled into a political coup in Benin leaves no doubt that his primary impulse throughout the experience was to get out of the ammo shed that was his jail and go home, without seeing again the female sergeant who had just energetically crushed his sandaled foot with her boot.  Present-day politics aren't Mr. Chatwin's forte; they intrude on his private, meditative relationship to the places where he travels.  And he falls all too easily into the classic, left-wing two-step.  In a piece denouncing French racism against Algerians in Marseilles, he quotes an Algerian as telling him, "I am happy to say there are no Jews left in Algeria.  I'd kill a Jew if I saw him in Algeria."  How does Mr. Chatwin explain this?  By blaming the French.  "Algerians are victims of their own country's anti-Zionist propaganda," he writes.  He'd never represent the French as "victims" of, say, Le Pen.  But whether being crushed or wanting to crush, the Algerians must be "correctly" viewed as the oppressed.  This soft-mindedness can extend to other areas of Mr. Chatwin's sensibility.  The treks he took show a man unfazed by difficult and dangerous terrain.  But when he writes about walking he can sound as gooily mystical as Shirley MacLaine.  One of the reasons he likes Werner Herzog is that the film director appreciates "the sacramental aspect of walking.  He and I share a belief that walking is not simply therapeutic for oneself but is a poetic activity that can cure the world of its ills."  What, the reader may wonder, am I doing here?  Certainly not getting a clue as to what motivated Mr. Chatwin to denounce settled civilization -- most of the world -- in favor of the soul-healing powers of nomadism.  On the last pages of his book, "The Songlines," Mr. Chatwin encounters three dying aborigines, "smiling at death in the shade of a gum tree."  At the end of his own journey, he found no sheltering tree, only a bed in an England he had spent his life fleeing.  What did this mean to him?  He doesn't say.  Fortunately, "What Am I Doing Here" also contains examples of the writer at his best.  His curiosity, childlike yet rigorous, can be wonderful, and it's on display here as he travels to Shetland to see a black-browed albatross (related, he believes, to the albatross that hung from the neck of Coleridge's ancient mariner) or to India to observe a grunting orphan rumored to have been raised, like Kipling's Mowgli, by wolves.  Some of the same attitude, occasionally touched with satire, can enter into his accounts of the people he meets, among them Diana Vreeland, Andre Malraux and Maria Reiche, who spent her life studying the mysterious Nazca lines transecting the surface of a Peruvian desert.  In the short profile of the Soviet literary dissident Nadezhda Mandelstam, his Hemingway-like spareness -- which can sometimes seem like a tic -- is perfectly judged.  Mr. Chatwin had an eye for the specific, unexpected detail.  Even before he gets to Ms. Mandelstam herself, he has created her life for us through her room:  "The kitchen smelled of kerosene and stale bread.  On a table there were sticky purple rings, a vase full of begonias, and dried grasses left over from the lightness of a Russian summer."  Then a man comes out of the bedroom: "A fat man in spectacles . . .  He glared at me as he wound a grey scarf around his jowls. . . ."  A doctor doubling as KGB man? he wonders.  Mandelstam sits smoking in bed.  Tucking a straying breast back into her nightgown, she waves to her visitor and asks: "Tell me my dear . . . are there any great poets left in your country?  I mean grand poets . . . of the stature of Joyce or Eliot?"  He is most satisfying on the famous dead, whom he meets halfway -- something he doesn't always do with his living subjects -- revealing more of his self.  Perhaps the best piece in the book is his review of the diaries of Ernst Junger, the German military professional and author of a 1939 anti-Nazi allegory, "On The Marble Cliffs."  An aesthete and antiquarian who believed in "the philosophical need to accept death and total warfare as the everyday experience of the twentieth century," Junger was compellingly strange, and Mr. Chatwin's account of him goes beyond a mere sympathetic response into a mysterious empathy.  Junger, he writes, was "a man who combines . . . acute powers of observation with an anaestheticized sensibility."  This may be as self-revealing as Mr. Chatwin ever got.  It could be his epitaph as a writer.  ---  Ms. Rose is a free-lance writer living in Washington, D.C.  Community Psychiatric Centers, Laguna Hills, Calif., said its shareholders approved a proposal to spin off the kidney dialysis and home health services divisions into a new company called Vivra.  James W. Conte, 61 years old, president and chief executive officer of Community Psychiatric, was elected chairman, as expected, succeeding Robert L. Green, 58, who will serve as chairman and chief executive officer of Vivra.  In addition, Mr. Conte's son, Richard L. Conte, 35, who serves as executive vice president and general counsel of Community Psychiatric, was named chief financial officer, succeeding Mr. Green in that post.  James P. Smith, 39, senior vice president and treasurer of Community Psychiatric, was named corporate secretary.  The spin-off will leave Community Psychiatric with its core business of operating acute psychiatric hospitals.  In "The World-Wide Tax Revolution," an Aug. 29 table on the editorial page, the top British income-tax rate in 1989 was misstated.  It is 40%.  (See: "The World-Wide Tax Revolution" -- WSJ Aug. 29, 1989)  Women over 40 who have used oral contraceptives don't have increased risk of breast cancer, according to the latest study on the subject.  The study, based on data from about 121,700 nurses collected over 10 years, is considered the most definitive ever on the possible link between cancer and the pill.  It confirms earlier studies indicating that women in their 30s and 40s who have used oral contraceptives for extended periods don't have increased risk of breast cancer.  However, the study didn't address what is currently the most urgent question concerning breast cancer and the pill -- whether women who begin taking the pill in their teens and 20s have increased cancer risks.  In May, British scientists reported that women under 36 who had used contraceptives for four to eight years had about a 40% increase in breast-cancer risk.  More than eight years of use increased the risk by about 70%, according to the British study, which was based on data from about 2,100 women.  The latest study is one of a series of findings from the Harvard Nurses Health Study, which was begun in 1976 by researchers at Harvard University and Brigham and Women's Hospital in Boston to track effects of life style on the health of nurses in 11 states.  The study is reported in today's issue of the Journal of the National Cancer Institute.  About half of the approximately 120,000 women participating in the study used oral contraceptives, and 1,799 of the total group were diagnosed with breast cancer over the decade they were tracked, the researchers reported.  Women who formerly took the pill had no statistically significant increased risk of breast cancer, regardless of how long they took it or whether they had passed menopause.  The researchers did find about a 50% increase in risk for women still using the pill after age 40.  But the finding was based on a small number of cases.  Moreover, its significance isn't clear because very few women use the pill after age 40, said Walter Willett, a Harvard epidemiologist and co-author of the nurses study.  The youngest nurses were in their mid-30s when the study began, hence its conclusions don't apply to women younger than that.  Still, "if there is definitely positive increase in risk among younger women, you would expect to see some hint of it" among the younger women in the nurses study, said Dr. Willett.  "We didn't see that."  One theory to explain the apparent discrepancy between young and older women is that hormonal changes -- perhaps associated with childbirth -- lessen the possible risks of breast cancer for older women who have taken the pill.  Alternatively, as pill formulations have changed over the years, they may have become more likely to contribute to breast cancer; hence, most of the pills taken by older women may have had less associated breast-cancer risk.  In any case, the correlation between the pill and increased breast cancer risk in young women hasn't been established in a large, definitive study like the latest one.  The Boston researchers, funded by the National Cancer Institute, now plan to answer questions about young women and the pill with a study based on data from nurses 25 to 42.  Some conclusions from the new study may be available in about five years, Dr. Willett said.  Like the just-completed study, the new one's data on oral contraceptive use will be collected "prospectively" -- before any breast cancer diagnoses are made.  Most past studies showing higher breast-cancer rates among users of oral contraceptives employed data from women collected after they were diagnosed with breast cancer.  That method can color the results.  "It's possible that women diagnosed with breast cancer remember {details of their pill use} a little better than controls because they have searched their memories many times," said Lynn Rosenberg, a Boston University epidemiologist.  The nurses studies are important because they eliminate such potential bias, which "has caused a lot of concern" about the validity of earlier studies, she added.  BP Canada Inc. said it may sell all or part of its 50% stake in the Wolf Lake bitumen production facility in northern Alberta.  The facility was developed at a cost of several hundred million dollars.  BP Canada, a unit of London-based British Petroleum Co., said it is considering selling its Wolf Lake interest in order to achieve a more balanced portfolio of natural gas, conventional oil, frontier exploration and mining activities.  It didn't elaborate.  A spokesman for BP Canada wouldn't estimate the value of the stake in the Wolf Lake facility, a joint venture with PetroCanada Inc. that currently produces about 8,300 barrels of bitumen daily.  But he noted that the second phase of the Wolf Lake project alone cost about 200 million Canadian dollars (US$169.3 million) to develop.  Bitumen is a tar-like substance used to make asphalt and other products.  BP Canada's spokesman said the company hasn't yet had any talks with prospective bidders, nor has it held any discussions about the possible sale with PetroCanada, a state-owned oil and gas production and marketing concern.  The nerve center of the Customs Service's squadron of anti-drug patrol planes is in Oklahoma City -- nearly 500 miles from the nearest border.  Reagan administration officials didn't want the facility at all, much less in Oklahoma.  So why is it there?  Because a key lawmaker -- from Oklahoma, of course -- insisted on it.  President Bush has embarked on a new escalation in the federal war on drugs.  But as the peculiar location of the Customs National Aviation Center illustrates, members of Congress and the executive branch often seem more interested in battling over perks, pork and power than in fighting drug dealers.  The drug war epitomizes the worst of the turf battles and jurisdictional overlaps that afflict the federal government.  In Congress, dozens of committees get bits and pieces of the issue, and the guaranteed publicity makes it irresistible for lawmakers to use to push pet projects and turn hearings into morality plays aimed at TV audiences.  Within the executive branch, meanwhile, the issue cuts across the responsibilities of more than 30 agencies, often resulting in a lack of coordination -- or, worse, in jealous bureaucrats spending their time scheming over how to do in other jealous bureaucrats.  A big problem in Congress is simply the enormous number of lawmakers who think they deserve a role in the issue.  The drug debate comes under the jurisdiction of at least 75 House and Senate committees and subcommittees, according to a Library of Congress report, and almost all of them want a piece of the action.  The House Banking subcommittee on International Finance, Trade and Monetary Policy, for instance, claims jurisdiction because it oversees the Export-Import Bank, which provides financing for foreign countries' anti-drug programs.  But the one panel set up specifically to examine drug issues -- the House Select Committee on Narcotics Abuse and Control -- doesn't have any legislative powers.  Declaring that "there are simply too many cooks in the kitchen," Senate GOP leader Robert Dole of Kansas has proposed remedying the jurisdictional problems by creating a single drug committee in each chamber to handle this year's legislation.  But his plan isn't likely to go anywhere since it would take politically valuable turf away from too many colleagues.  Things aren't much better in the executive branch.  The Drug Enforcement Administration, for instance, has refused to give the Customs Service direct access to its intelligence files and continues to maintain a separate drug-trafficking intelligence center in El Paso, Texas.  And the Coast Guard, which has an interdiction air force of its own, maintains a separate air operations center on Governor's Island in New York Harbor.  During the Reagan administration, Attorneys General William French Smith and Edwin Meese consistently fought the establishment of a single administration "drug czar," viewing it as an invasion of Justice Department turf.  Congress finally created the job anyway, and now Bush Attorney General Dick Thornburgh is known to resent it.  "We never wanted this," admits a senior Thornburgh aide.  The attorney general is cooperating only grudgingly with drug czar William Bennett's attempts to coordinate federal policy and has already scored some points against Mr. Bennett in heated bureaucratic infighting.  For instance, he managed to veto a proposal to establish a central committee overseen by Mr. Bennett's office to coordinate all federal drug intelligence gathering.  Some disagreements within the executive branch appear to have blown some significant opportunities.  Federal prosecutors in Miami complain that the State Department, citing diplomatic concerns, has repeatedly impeded efforts to capture and extradite powerful Colombian cocaine traffickers indicted by U.S. grand juries.  On three occasions, law enforcement officials say, U.S. prosecutors have had opportunities to grab Jorge Ochoa, a leader of the notorious Medellin cartel.  In 1984 and again in 1987, the State Department failed to pressure the Colombian government to turn over Mr. Ochoa after he had been arrested, says Richard Gregorie, former chief assistant U.S. attorney in Miami.  Both times, Mr. Ochoa bribed his way out of jail, Mr. Gregorie adds.  Most recently, State Department officials blocked an elaborate scheme that Mr. Gregorie devised to trap Mr. Ochoa while he was on vacation in Venezuela.  Diplomats and some Justice Department officials feared the trap wouldn't work and would risk the lives of U.S. embassy personnel in Caracas.  "Those are the risks you have got to take in this kind of business," says Mr. Gregorie, now in private practice.  "The State Department doesn't make drugs a priority."  In an angry response, Otto Reich, the departing U.S. ambassador to Venezuela, says, "Mr.  Gregorie was running an uncleared, unauthorized and very dangerous operation . . . .  We all want to get these thugs, but we have systems to make sure these things succeed."  For years, Customs and the DEA have also feuded over who gets to keep money and assets seized during drug investigations.  DEA officials complain that, despite written agreements and Justice Department directives giving the DEA priority in most domestic investigations, Customs agents grab multimillion-dollar booties in many major cases.  All told, 19 agencies are involved in drug enforcement alone.  In addition to the obvious ones -- the DEA, the Federal Bureau of Investigation, Customs and so on --a re some unlikely ones: the Bureau of Indian Affairs, the National Park Service and the Forest Service.  The reason is that, in the current budget crunch, it's the one area where funds still flow freely.  "Where there's money available, you'll find everyone volunteering a program," says a federal law enforcement official.  "No one can really keep track of what everyone else is doing."  As a result, the DEA, FBI, Customs, State Department, Central Intelligence Agency and Defense Department all gather intelligence separately.  That diffusion of responsibility has led to many instances of agencies not sharing information or informants because of fear that other agencies will blow their cover.  One such incident involved Max Mermelstein, a former pilot for Colombian cocaine traffickers who is now cooperating with U.S. authorities.  Mr. Mermelstein told lawmakers at a Senate Judiciary Committee hearing last month that he had been questioned last year by a DEA agent who wanted to double-check information provided by an FBI informant.  The FBI informant turned out to be none other than Max Mermelstein.  "They were using me," he told the senators, "to corroborate my own statements."  @ ---  @ Legislative Labyrinth  @ Committees with jurisdiction over the drug plan, partial list  @ In the House  @ -- Agriculture -- Judiciary  @ -- Appropriations -- Merchant Marine  @ -- Armed Services and Fisheries  @ -- Banking, Finance -- Narcotics Abuse  @ and Urban Affairs and Control  @ -- Education and -- Post Office and  @ Labor Civil Service  @ -- Energy and -- Public Works and  @ Commerce Transportation  @ -- Foreign Affairs -- Science, Space  @ and Technology  @ -- Government  @ Operations -- Veterans' Affairs  @ -- Interior and  @ Insular Affairs -- Ways and Means  @ In the Senate  @ -- Agriculture, -- Energy and  @ Nutrition and Natural Resources  @ Forestry  @ -- Finance  @ -- Appropriations -- Foreign Relations  @ -- Armed Services -- Governmental  @ Affairs  @ -- Banking, Housing  @ and Urban Affairs -- Judiciary  @ -- Labor and Human  @ -- Commerce, Resources  @ Science and  @ Transportation -- Veterans' Affairs  @ Source: Library of Congress  Three French entrepreneurs are preparing to launch Europe's first specialized financial television network next month.  The network will broadcast analysts meetings, company financial presentations and other financial news to subscribers by satellite.  It would permit a broker in Frankfurt to witness live an analysts meeting in London, Paris or Zurich, for example, and to trade on the information before the meeting endswithout leaving his or her office.  The network, called Finance & Satellite S.A., or Finsat, has been welcomed by many European stock market officials, and by French telecommunications executives eager to find profitable uses for their satellites.  In addition to events originating in Europe, the service has arranged to broadcast analysts meetings and other presentations from the U.S., via an exchange agreement with a similar U.S. network called Institutional Research Network.  Until now, financiers and officials of the two networks say, IRN has been the only network of its kind in the world.  IRN is a subsidiary of Infotechnology Inc., which also owns Financial News Network.  In response to terry culler's aug. 11 editorial-page article "federal pay scare's hidden agenda." evidence of the national emergency resulting from the decade of disinvestment in the federal sector is abundant -- mr. Culler need only read a newspaper, including the wall street journal, for proof of the growing crisis.  The feb. 2 journal reported that although one-third of all chickens on the market are now contaminated with salmonella, causing deaths at a rising rate of about 2,000 a year, the agriculture department continues to reduce its force of processing-plant inspectors.  In the march 7 journal, a former chief of the federal home loan bank board blamed the reagan administration for fueling the savings-and-loan debacle by refusing requests for more bank examiners despite ample evidence of wild speculation and outright thievery by many s&ls.  Death and default are the apparent consequences of mr. Culler's notion of "efficiency" in government.  It is time for mr. Culler and his colleagues to stop with the ideological claptrap.  The federal service and its employees perform vital functions with serious consequences for this nation and its people.  The question is not more or less government.  The question is how to maintain and improve the effectiveness of government operations.  The current federal pay system doesn't even address the question, much less provide an answer.  Mr. Culler's defense of the current system, citing economywide job turnover rates in comparison with federal sector rates, misses the mark.  First, federal agencies aren't fast-food restaurants or corner convenience stores.  What may be acceptable turnover rates for some segments of the economy would be disastrous for the effectiveness of federal agencies.  Tax processing, bank examination or nuclear power-plant inspection, for example, cannot be effectively performed with an unstable work force.  Second, government-wide turnover rates only mask the problem.  The federal service is living on the career investment of employees who entered the service prior to this decade.  This stable core of employees is not being replenished.  As the office of personnel management reported, fully 25% of all new federal employees leave before the end of one year, and another 14% leave before completing three years of service.  Finally, mr. Culler plays on the myth of a faceless, formless and monolithic bureaucracy of federal employees.  There are more than 100 different agencies and more than 900 different occupations.  Each has its own unique mission and goals in serving the american public.  We must develop pay and personnel systems that are responsive to fulfilling those missions and goals in the most effective way possible.  Mr. Culler's bureaucrat bashing is boring, and it's useless in the search for methods to deliver high-quality services to the public.  Robert M. Tobias  National President  National Treasury Employees Union  Washington, D.C.  ---  Contrary to Mr. Culler's beliefs, the push for reform of the federal pay system is not coming from within the Washington beltway; alarm bells over unprecedented civil-service vacancy rates rang first in cities such as New York, Los Angeles, San Francisco, Boston and Newark.  In those high-cost cities, jobs at all levels and all grades, from clerical to executive, are often vacant for a year or more because of a lack of candidates willing to work for substantially below market pay in the federal civil service.  And yet these are the cities where most federal grant programs and law enforcement organizations are located.  In fact, the "inside the beltway crowd" has been reluctant to take up a debate on pay reform with Congress while the agencies are trying to stretch out their federal budgets.  Even if we assume the accuracy of the 1982 data cited in Mr. Culler's article, the data is badly out of date, especially for New York City.  Federal salaries here are inadequate to attract and retain professional candidates.  We pay beginning accountants $18,888 a year; they can start at $24,000 in the city's private sector.  Federal salaries in New York do not even compare with city and state salaries for comparable occupations -- for example, the federal government starts engineers in New York at $35,000.  Federal agencies in the above-mentioned cities have all provided the U.S. Office of Personnel Management with newer data, (1988, 1989) showing much larger vacancy rates than have ever been seen before.  It is that data that the Volcker Commission, the U.S. General Accounting Office, the Quadrennial Commission on Pay, the Advisory Committee on Federal Pay, Congress and others are using, rather than Mr. Culler's data from his earlier stay at OPM and the 1982 Dartmouth study.  James J. Farsetta  Chairman  New York Federal Executive Board  New York  ---  Mr. Terry Culler should sit a while where I do.  I coordinate law-student recruiting for a major federal agency.  This fall, we will be able to offer third-year law students slightly less than $29,000 a year to start.  According to a recent article in this newspaper, top New York law firms will offer $83,000.  Top Washington firms reportedly will offer starting salaries in the mid-70s, with less affluent firms in many major cities offering about twice what a federal agency can pay.  We probably will be able to fill the vacancies we have, but the effect of this significant and increasing salary disparity on the size and quality of the applicant pool is very evident.  It appears to be Mr. Culler's view that federal pay policy should deliberately be structured to discourage the most capable persons from entering and remaining in public service, lest talent that is rightfully employed manipulating mergers and acquisitions be diverted to more frivolous pursuits like addressing the drug problem, working to improve the environment, ensuring transportation safety, conducting research to combat deadly diseases, buying weapons systems and assisting housing programs honestly, and other matters that Congress and the president have identified as national priorities.  Robert C. Ashley  Bryantown, Md.  Gerard Scannell has a low-key, calm manner, but he isn't laid back when he talks about what he wants to do with the government's worker safety and health program.  Mr. Scannell, 54 years old, talks freely about trying new initiatives if the Senate confirms his nomination by President Bush to head the Occupational Safety and Health Administration.  He suggests his efforts could include promulgating the agency's first standard to protect on-the-job motor-vehicle drivers, boosting the size of criminal fines for the most egregious employer workplace violations, and substantially expanding efforts to reduce carpal tunnel syndrome, which involves arm, wrist and hand injuries resulting from repetitive motions.  He also promises to speed up OSHA's rule-making process.  "I will be very tough on meeting deadlines," Mr. Scannell said in an interview.  "If we're going to do something, we'll do it."  It's unusual for a nominee to speak so freely about his agenda before the Senate acts on his confirmation.  Mr. Scannell emphasizes that carrying out his ideas obviously hinges on his being cleared by the Senate; lawmakers haven't yet scheduled action on the nomination.  But the prospective new OSHA chief leaves no doubt that he'd be an activist.  He exudes quiet confidence with a deceptively friendly -- but nonetheless tough-minded -- style.  Though OSHA has become more vigorous in recent years than it was during the early, deregulation-minded years of the Reagan administration, Mr. Scannell says, "I believe there's a lot to do to improve administration of the {Occupational Safety and Health} act."  Mr. Scannell knows something of what he speaks.  As safety and environmental affairs director for 10 years at Johnson & Johnson, the big New Brunswick, N.J., health-care products company, he helped the firm acquire a top reputation in worker health and safety matters.  He also held workplace-safety jobs for Aetna Casualty & Surety Co., Thiokol Chemical Corp. and Rohm & Haas Co. between 1958 and 1971.  And through most of the 1970s, he was an OSHA official; as standards director of the young agency, which was formed in 1971, he wrote the regulations that comprise the core of its standards today.  Mr. Scannell says that in studying OSHA today, he found the agency is "still working on things they were working on when I was here before."  In a typically no-nonsense set of written responses to questions posed to him recently by the National Safe Workplace Institute, a private Chicago group, Mr. Scannell said of his stint as OSHA's rules writer: "I believe my track record as director of standards is second to none."  He said he couldn't identify "notable failures," though he considered lack of much progress on a migrant labor-camp regulation as a "disappointment."  Mr. Scannell evidently has convinced Joseph Kinney, the institute's director, of his dedication to worker health and safety.  Mr. Kinney founded the group after his younger brother was killed in a construction accident.  He worried initially that the nominee would be "just a smoother version" of his predecessor, John Pendergrass, whom Mr. Kinney regarded as not tough enough.  But since Mr. Scannell has been willing to confer with Mr. Kinney, and because of the nominee's comments about what OSHA needs to do, Mr. Kinney now talks hopefully that Mr. Scannell will make OSHA a hard-hitting agency.  Not everyone applauds Mr. Scannell, though.  Conservative, deregulation-oriented economists are likely to take a dim view of his activist ideas, and some are already frowning on the selection of a career industrial hygienist for the OSHA job.  Margaret Seminario, an AFL-CIO health and safety official, offers only guarded praise, reflecting unions' wariness about any nominee from management ranks.  "He seems to be a serious individual who wants to run a serious safety and health program," she says.  Although Mr. Scannell isn't yet in a position to make OSHA decisions, OSHA and Labor Department people benefit from his expertise and counsel as they brief him on issues and forge ahead on their own in regulatory actions.  Any direct Scannell role in OSHA policy-making would be "inappropriate," says OSHA spokesman Roy Clason.  But Alan McMillan, a veteran department regulator who was named OSHA's deputy chief and its acting head at Mr. Scannell's urging, already has pursued stronger rule-making and enforcement.  Backing Mr. McMillan is Labor Secretary Elizabeth Dole, who helped pry loose some regulations that had languished a dozen years or more at OSHA, including one to protect persons who work in confined spaces such as storage vessels and railroad tank cars.  OSHA is also seeking funds from Congress for another 179 inspectors.  That would be the first increase in the inspector force in a decade.  It was cut 25%, to 1,200, under President Reagan.  Under Mr. Scannell, OSHA seems certain to show still more vigor.  He wants to include unions in the rule-making and enforcement process and complete work on standards faster.  "Let's get out things that have been hanging around, festering -- and are needed," Mr. Scannell says.  He also says, flatly, "A motor vehicle safety standard is needed."  Building on his heavy emphasis at Johnson & Johnson on safe cars and driver safety, he says he'd like to issue general requirements that employers would have to follow.  It could spur increased driver-safety training and employer policies mandating safety belt use, for example.  Mr. Pendergrass rebuffed suggestions for such rules, insisting OSHA lacks authority to issue them.  To Westerners, the idea of updating a performing art like Kabuki must seem fairly pointless.  For us, the value of Kabuki, in existence for nearly 400 years, is that it preserves a resolutely nonrealistic, traditional approach to theater.  On their visits to this country since the end of World War II, the leading Kabuki troupes have satisfied a need -- largely unmet in our own theater except by classical ballet -- for ritual.  American viewers do not have much difficulty in coming to terms with the basic features of this exotic genre: the exaggerated makeup; the highly energized acting style; the resolution of narrative conflicts in long-held frozen tableaux; the assumption of female roles by male players; the chanting speech; the use of wooden clappers to point up a climax.  For its American fans, this quintessentially Japanese form satisfies all the requirements of classic theater.  The trouble with the preceding view, according to Ennosuke III, whose company opens at the Metropolitan Opera House tonight for a run of eight performances before moving on to the Kennedy Center in Washington, D.C., is that it misrepresents Kabuki, and does so, moreover, in a fundamental and damaging way.  Though Kabuki is indeed a serious art form, it is not, he asserts, one of the classic, unchanging genres of Japanese theater.  Unlike No, which began as a performance art for Buddhist priests, Kabuki has popular, even disreputable, origins.  During its early years, in fact, Kabuki was rent by scandals involving prostitution, both male and female -- which is why adult males have performed all the female roles since the mid-17th century.  Kabuki became the leading form of theater in Japan after Commodore Perry brought U.S. influence into the country in the mid-19th century.  And it maintained its pre-eminence until the end of World War II, always adapting itself to the taste of its diverse public.  According to Ennosuke, "Kabuki and sumo wrestling were the most widely popular kinds of entertainment in Japan.  Kabuki appealed to people from all classes, rich and poor alike.  Outside Japan, people confuse No and Kabuki.  They think Kabuki is solemn, our classic theater.  They're convinced it operates according to rules fixed in perpetuity.  That's not the case at all.  Kabuki was always open to outside influences, adapting itself to every shift in the public's taste.  It never hesitated to take over whatever audiences found interesting or amusing in other kinds of theater."  Speaking through an interpreter in his New York hotel a few days before opening night, Ennosuke was intent upon clearing away the distortions which, he says, surround Kabuki.  He makes an authoritative spokesman.  A member of one of the handful of distinguished families that dominate the art, he belongs to the Kabuki acting line of Omodaka, which has flourished for six generations.  Though all the leading performers are related by blood, not all are awarded the coveted title of Ennosuke.  The present bearer, now 49 years old, inherited the designation at the unprecedentedly early age of 23, not from his father, who was known as Danshiro III, but from his grandfather, Ennosuke II, who at that point took the name of En'o I. Famed for his versatility, which enables him to play as many as 18 different character-types in a single play, Ennosuke has enjoyed great acclaim.  He also has been subject to unceasing criticism for his determination to bring in new ideas.  Innovation, Ennosuke points out, is fundamental to Kabuki as originally conceived.  While the existence of acting families keeps the traditions of Kabuki alive, it does not inhibit innovation.  The history of Kabuki is replete with the names of great performers who went beyond the bounds established by their predecessors.  "Unfortunately, many Japanese are reluctant to understand the true nature of Kabuki.  It's not only Westerners who believe it's frozen in the past.  There's a reason for this.  After the war, Kabuki became fossilized.  The companies treated Kabuki as if it could never change, as if they didn't know its true history.  Kabuki stopped being popular theater.  It became ceremonial, remote, a part of the traditional Japan that was being rapidly transfigured under the impact of the West.  "As a result, the audience shrank, became older.  Kabuki used to give two performances a day: one in the evening from 4:30 till 9:30, mostly for mixed audiences; and another from 11 a.m. till 4 p.m., mostly for women -- housewives who kept themselves occupied while their husbands were at the office.  It was expensive to go, stately, boring.  It attracted the kind of audience that looks back on what once was.  Young people in Japan weren't interested in it.  They were attracted to Western kinds of entertainment, like musicals and rock 'n' roll.  That's why I came to the conclusion that Kabuki had to be revitalized, that it had to become once again lively, modern.  Not something other than Kabuki, mind you.  My aim has been not to destroy Kabuki, not to abandon it or change its nature, but to preserve it by returning it to its original outlook."  Ennosuke sees himself as a kind of orchestral conductor, as someone who adjusts and refines.  Above all, he sees himself as a reanimator.  He has modernized the productions with the use of up-to-date technology, streamlining the texts of the familiar classics and extending the repertoire to encompass both forgotten plays and brand new ones.  Asked how he thinks his illustrious acting forebears would view his many changes, he answers: "They would approve.  My grandfather used to put Western plays on the same program with Kabuki -- 'The Merchant of Venice,' 'A Doll's House,' 'The Lower Depths.' They would say about my efforts to keep Kabuki abreast of the modern world, 'But that's just what we did.'"  U S West Inc. said its Applied Communications Inc. subsidiary acquired 10 software products to become the dominant provider of on-line transaction processing software for retail banking and corporate financial services.  Terms weren't disclosed.  The products, acquired Friday from Dallas-based Electronic Data Systems Corp., increase Applied Communications' customer base of financial institutions and service bureaus to 410 from 250, said company spokeswoman Judy Prusa.  The acquired software products include programs to run automated teller machines, debit and credit card authorization systems, wire transfers and automated clearinghouse systems.  Denver-based U S West, a regional Bell operating company, acquired Applied Communications in 1986.  Vitro S.A. said it received clearance to proceed with its $20-a-share tender offer for Anchor Glass Container Corp.  Vitro, a Monterrey, Mexico-based conglomerate, said it was notified by the Treasury Department, on behalf of the Committee on Foreign Investment in the U.S., that it has received clearance under the Exon-Florio Amendment of the Defense Production Act to proceed with its proposed acquisition.  Vitro's offer appears to be the first unsolicited bid by a Mexican company for a U.S. concern.  On Aug. 22, the board of Anchor Glass, a Tampa, Fla.-based maker of bottles and other glass containers, unanimously rejected Vitro's offer as "inadequate."  Anchor Glass said it had opened preliminary talks with other parties about a possible transaction.  Executives at Anchor Glass couldn't be reached for comment.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, Anchor closed yesterday at $20.125 a share, up 12.5 cents.  West Germany's gross national product continued to reflect robust economic growth in the second quarter, underscoring inflationary fears if business activity continues to heat up.  The Bonn Economics Ministry yesterday said GNP rose an inflation-adjusted 0.5% from the first quarter after adjustments for seasonal factors.  But when accounting for extra working days during the period, GNP eased by a calendar-adjusted 0.5% from the first quarter.  In a year-on-year comparison, the ministry said second-quarter GNP was up a sharp 4.9% from the previous year, well above most expectations of a rise of closer to 4%.  For the first half of 1989, the economy thus expanded an inflation-adjusted 4.6% from a year ago, the sharpest rise for any comparable period since 1976.  The economy appeared to be sustaining sharp growth rates recorded in the first quarter, when mild weather fueled a seasonally adjusted 3% in real GNP from the previous period, and by a revised 4.4% from the first quarter of 1988.  The ministry statistics office also revised West Germany's GNP growth for 1988 to 3.6% from 3.4%.  Separately, the Federal Labor Office said West Germany's August unemployment rate fell to 7.5% from 7.7% in July, contining the steady decline in joblessness during the past year.  Total unemployment was down to 1.9 million last month from 2.2 million in August 1988, when 8.5% of the work force was reported to be with jobs.  Signs of possible overheating include an average industrial capacity utilization running at an 89% rate.  In addition, many companies, particularly in the capital-goods sector and auto makers, are complaining of production bottlenecks.  The nation's central bank has sought to cool the economy and support the weak mark with four boosts in leading interest rates between December and June.  Bundesbank President Karl Otto Poehl said in an interview yesterday that inflationary pressure was still relatively weak despite strong economic growth.  Despite 1989 projections of an inflation rate approaching 3.5%, West German inflation was running at a 2.9% rate in August.  Bundesbank staffers say privately that demand trends and homemade inflation -- not currency levels -- have become the Bundesbank's chief source of inflationary concern.  In particular, policy makers are watching for the inflationary impact of the government's plan to cut income taxes by a net 20 billion marks next January, as well as an important round of wage negotiations scheduled for April.  Richard D. Silverman resigned as executive vice president, chief financial officer and treasurer of this thrift to pursue other interests, the company said.  Kevin Timmons, vice president of finance, and Steve Brown, vice president of accounting, are to take over Mr. Silverman's responsibilities until a buyer for the thrift can be found.  Poughkeepsie Savings and a dissident group of shareholders earlier reached an accord under which company officials will do their best to sell the thrift.  Monogram Bank USA, a subsidiary of General Electric Co.'s GE Capital, Stamford, Conn., said it acquired a Visa gold and MasterCard gold credit-card portfolio from Dollar Dry Dock Bank, White Plains, N.Y. Terms weren't disclosed.  The acquisition marks Monogram Bank's entry into the gold-card market and increases the Cincinnati bank's credit-card portfolio to more than 1,100,000 accounts.  GE, Fairfield, Conn., is a major electrical-products, financial-services and broadcasting company.  America was deluged by foreign ice cream last year: 576 gallons came in from New Zealand and 12 gallons from Denmark.  In other words, foreigners "foisted" almost as much ice cream on "hapless" Americans as a large Safeway sells on a summer Saturday.  Obviously, a crisis was imminent.  While many people relish American-made ice cream with deliberately foreign-sounding names, few people realize that the U.S. government restricts ice-cream imports to less than one-tenth of one percent of U.S. consumption.  Jamaica, the Netherlands and Belgium are the only other countries allowed to sell ice cream to Americans, and with quotas so low and transportation costs high, they don't bother to ship us any ice cream at all.  The U.S. exports hundreds of thousands of gallons of ice cream to Canada, yet Canadian ice cream is banned from the U.S. Canada expressed its appreciation for this treatment last year by slapping a quota on U.S. ice-cream exports to Canada. (Dairy trade was exempted from last year's Free Trade Agreement.)  Across North America, armies of bureaucrats have mobilized to slug this one out.  Officials from the Canadian Embassy met with U.S. State Department officials to raise the ice-cream issue last October.  Canada filed a formal complaint with the U.S. government in November.  The U.S. Agriculture Department convened a task force that spent months studying ice-cream quotas.  On May 5 of this year, President Bush sent a letter to the U.S. International Trade Commission demanding an ice-cream investigation.  The ITC has had as many as 30 people dealing with this project.  The ITC made a report on Aug. 28 to the U.S. Trade Representative's Office, which is responsible for forwarding it to the president.  According to Claire Buchan, spokeswoman for the trade rep, "The president has not made a decision on this, and there is not a deadline."  Doesn't he realize the ice cream is melting?  The U.S. ice-cream quotas date back to Dec. 31, 1970, when President Nixon decreed that future ice-cream imports could not exceed 431,330 gallons a year.  Why?  That year, according to Deputy Secretary of Agriculture Ann Veneman, testifying this July before the ITC, the U.S. was hit with a "flood of imports."  This so-called "flood" amounted to barely 1% of U.S. ice cream consumption.  How did Mr. Nixon decide to limit imports to exactly 431,330 gallons a year?  Section 22 of the Agriculture Adjustment Act allows the U.S. government to protect domestic price-support programs by restricting imports to 50% of the annual average imports of a representative period.  Ice-cream imports did not begin until 1969 -- so the U.S. government chose the years 1967, 1968, and 1969.  This allowed the government to slash imports by 95% of their 1970 level and then tell foreigners that the 5% remaining was their "fair" market share.  Under the "free trade" Bush administration, the Agriculture Department still has a phobia about foreign ice cream.  Deputy Undersecretary Veneman told the ITC, "We believe that imports above (the current) level would render or tend to render ineffective or materially interfere with the domestic dairy price support program."  The ice-cream controversy illustrates the meaninglessness of some of the central terms in our trade law.  In 1983, the Agriculture Department concluded that imports of roughly 160 million pounds of casein, a dairy derivative, did not "materially interfere with domestic dairy (price) supports," even though the casein imports had far greater impact on the dairy price support program than did ice-cream imports.  This July, when ITC Chairman Anne Brunsdale pushed Agriculture Department official John Mengel to explain what had changed between 1983 and 1989, Mr. Mengel sputtered, "I think, Madam Chairman, that perhaps budget is a stronger consideration now."  Yet the Agriculture Department a few weeks later endorsed a $900 million drought bailout to farmers who had failed to protect themselves by buying crop insurance.  Given all this controversy, what was the ITC looking at?  Apparently, it looked only at changing the distribution of the quota -- allowing more countries to compete to sell the same tiny amount of ice cream to the U.S. Abolishing or increasing the quota apparently was not even seriously considered.  In this mega-investigation, the U.S. government has probably already spent more than a thousand dollars in administrative expenses for each gallon of ice cream imported into the U.S. last year.  International trade disputes are rapidly degenerating into a full employment program for government bureaucrats.  Since 1987, the U.S. has been hollering for the abolition of all trade-distorting agricultural subsidies.  But how can we tell the Japanese to abolish their rice subsidies or the Europeans to stop dumping wheat when the U.S. is terrified over a few scoops of ice cream?  ---  Mr. Bovard is an associate analyst for the CATO Institute.  Companies listed below reported quarterly profit substantially different from the average of analysts' estimates.  The companies are followed by at least three analysts, and had a minimum five-cent change in actual earnings per share.  Estimated and actual results involving losses are omitted.  The percent difference compares actual profit with the 30-day estimate where at least three analysts have issues forecasts in the past 30 days.  Otherwise, actual profit is compared with the 300-day estimate.  @ ESTIMATE  @ (# of analysts)  @ ACTUAL ---------------------- %  @COMPANY NAME EPS 30-DAY 300-DAY DIFF.  @ NEGATIVE  @Microbilt Corp. $ .17 ... $ .21 (3) 19.05  Source: Zacks Investment Research  Finmeccanica S.p.A. said it will purchase the Bailey Controls division of Babcock & Wilcox Co., a unit of McDermott International Inc. for $295 million.  The Italian state-owned holding company, which has interests in the mechanical engineering industry, said the transaction is expected to be completed before the end of the year.  Bailey Controls, based in Wilkliffe, Ohio, is a producer of computerized industrial control systems.  It has annual revenue of $370 milion, employs 2,700 people and has operating facilities in the U.S., Australia, Brazil and Canada.  The purchase has already been authorized by Istituto per la Ricostruzione Industriale (IRI), the giant state holding company that owns Finmeccanica, and the minister of state industry.  Vickers PLC said an investment unit controlled by New Zealand financier Sir Ron Brierley raised its stake in the London-based defense and engineering group to 11.5% from 9.05%.  I.E.P. Securities Ltd., a unit of Hong Kong-based Industrial Equity (Pacific) Ltd., boosted its holding of Vickers shares by 5.5 million, the British company said.  The increase is the second since May, when the I.E.P. Securities Ltd. stake in Vickers was 8.67%, and it brings the total number of ordinary shares held to nearly 29.8 million.  I.E.P. Securities' stake in Vickers has ranged between 5.2%, when its holding was first disclosed in March 1988, and the current level.  Vickers declined to comment on prospects for further share purchases by I.E.P. Securities.  Mediobanca S.p.A., Milan, posted a 35% profit increase, to 162.4 billion lire ($115 million) in the fiscal year ended June 30, up from 120.5 billion lire a year earlier.  Italy's leading merchant bank also announced plans to increase its capital to 340 billion lire from 204 billion lire.  As part of the increase, a rights issue will raise 680 billion lire in fresh funds.  A senior official said the reason for the increase will be disclosed at the time of the shareholders meeting Oct. 28.  Mediobanca also said that it will distribute a dividend of 20%, or 200 lire a share.  The total dividend payout will amount to 54.4 billion lire, up 33% from a year earlier.  Argyll Group PLC said it will swap new stock with two other European grocers, cementing the companies' pan-European business links.  Argyll, which owns the Safeway grocery-store chain in Britain, signed initial cooperation accords last May with Koninklijke Ahold N.V. of the Netherlands and Etablissements Economiques du Casino Guichard, Perrachon & Cie. of France.  Under yesterday's agreement, each of the three food retailers will issue new shares worth 50 million European currency units to each of the two other companies, Argyll said.  The transaction, which Argyll expects to be completed in late October, would give the U.K. company a 3.8% stake in Ahold and 3.4% stake in Casino.  Those two companies in turn would each acquire 1.5% of Argyll.  The stock swap represents a further step in the food retailers' effort to forge links ahead of the European Community's planned single market in 1992.  Avions Marcel Dassault Breguet Aviation SA, Paris, announced that its consolidated revenue fell 12% in the first half to 8.73 billion French francs ($1.32 billion) from 9.93 billion francs a year earlier.  The aircraft group made the disclosure in a regulatory filing without providing details on its first-half profit.  Revenue at the company has been hurt by the tightening financial positions of some of its major developing-country clients.  Analysts noted, however, that the erratic billing cycle for companies in such big-ticket sectors as aviation sometimes makes half-year sales data misleading.  For all of 1988, Dassault had consolidated profit of 428 million francs on revenue of 18.82 billion francs.  Moody's Investors Service Inc. said that it lowered its rating on $475 million of this utility's preferred stock to Ba-2 from Ba-1, and that the securities may be subject to further possible downgrading.  The ratings concern cited Illinois Power's reduced earnings, as a result of a huge write-off, and the likelihood of additional write-offs because of the denial of all but $61 million of a $256 million rate increase the company had sought to pay for its investment in the Clinton nuclear power plant.  A spokesman for Illinois Power said the Moody's action wasn't unexpected.  "We have said that our financial condition was fragile and would remain so until the Clinton rate issued was resolved," the spokesman said.  ---  LONG ISLAND LIGHTING Co. (Hicksville, N.Y.) -- Moody's Investors Service Inc. and Standard & Poor's Corp. both upgraded their ratings on this utility's preferred stock, reflecting resumption of dividend payments on the preferred issues.  Lilco is paying about $390 million to cover previously omitted preferred dividends.  Long-term debt ratings aren't affected by the changes.  Moody's said it boosted its rating on Lilco preferred to Ba-3 from single-B-3; S&P said it upgraded its rating to double-B-minus from single-C.  About $600 to $700 million of securities are affected by the rating concerns' changes.  Moody's said that it believes sufficient cash flow is available for Lilco to meet regular dividend payments on a sustained basis, but that cash flow and debt coverage remain relatively weak in the near term, offering "minimal" protection for holders of preferred stock.  The following U.S. Treasury, corporate and municipal offerings are tentatively scheduled for sale this week, according to Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ U.S. TREASURY  @ Today  @ $14.4 billion of 13-week and 26-week bills.  @ CORPORATE  @ One Day This Week  Alco Health Distribution Corp. -- $175 million of senior notes, via Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.  Brite Voice Systems Inc. -- initial offering of 1.5 million common shares, via Piper, Jaffray & Hopwood Inc.  Royal Bank of Scotland Group PLC -- eight million of American depositary shares, via Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  @ MUNICIPAL  @ Thursday  California -- $385 million of general obligation Veterans bonds, including $339.2 million Series AX, non-alternative minimum tax (non-AMT) bonds and $45.8 million of Series AY (AMT) bonds, via competitive bid.  @ One Day This Week  Alaska Energy Authority -- $100 million of power revenue bonds, First Series, Bradley Lake Hydro-Electric Project, via a John Nuveen & Co. group.  Indiana Health Facility Financing Authority -- $75 million of hospital revenue bonds, The Lutheran Hospital of Indiana Inc., via a First Boston Corp. group.  Board of Trustees of the University of Alabama -- $65.5 million of University of Alabama at Birmingham hospital revenue bonds, 1989 Series, via a Goldman, Sachs & Co. group.  @ Pending  San Antonio, Texas -- $640 million of gas and electric revenue refunding bonds, via a First Boston group.  Triborough Bridge & Tunnel Authority, N.Y. -- $150 million to $250 million of general purpose revenue bonds, via a Goldman Sachs group.  St. Mary's Hospital Authority -- $55 million of hospital revenue refunding bonds, Franciscan Health System Hospitals Issue, via a Merrill Lynch group.  @ Indefinite (Competitive)  Port Authority of New York & New Jersey -- $100 million of consolidated bonds, 65th Series.  And, $100 million consolidated bonds, 66th Series.  Both offerings, via competitive bid on 48 hours' notice.  Canada's wheat crop is expected to total 861.1 million bushels this year, up 47% from last year's drought-stricken crop, Statistics Canada, a federal agency, said.  Last year's wheat crop totaled 587.7 million bushels.  This year's crop would have been bigger but for hot, dry weather in recent weeks.  Harvesting of Canadian grain crops now is well advanced.  The main wheat crop, spring wheat, is expected to total 673.2 million bushels, up 45% from 1988.  Winter wheat is estimated to total 47.6 million bushels, down 4%.  Durum wheat, which is used to make pasta products, is expected to total 140.3 million bushels, up 93%.  Oats production is expected to total 242.7 million bushels, up 25% from 1988.  Barley, Canada's main feed grain, is expected to total 569.5 million bushels, up 21%.  Canola, Canada's main oilseed, is expected to total 150.3 million bushels, off 21%.  Ford Motor Co. said it will idle its Dearborn plant, which builds Ford Mustangs, and its Lorain, Ohio, truck assembly lines, which build Ford Econoline vans, for one week beginning next Monday.  The No. 2 auto maker blamed the Dearborn plant shutdown on a parts shortage and said slow sales of the Econoline van is causing the shutdown at the Lorain plant.  Ford said the moves will temporarily idle 2,900 hourly workers at Lorain and 2,100 workers at Dearborn.  The shutdowns will eliminate production of about 4,000 vans and 4,400 Mustangs.  Last week, Ford suspended its Thunderbird and Mercury Cougar production at Lorain for the week because of weak demand for the coupes built there.  Norfolk Southern Corp. is offering a voluntary severance program for certain train-service employees at its Central of Georgia Railroad Co. subsidiary.  The severance program follows a crew accord reached last month between Central of Georgia and the United Transportation Union.  That agreement allowed Central of Georgia to immediately cut freight-train crews to three workers and through attrition to two, leaving just engineer and conductor.  Currently, freight trains on the line -- and through much of the railroad industry -- still operate with four crew members: engineer, conductor and two trainmen.  The program would pay active train-service employees whose applications for severance are accepted a $100,000 separation allowance and certain medical-care coverage.  About 400 Central of Georgia employees are eligible for separation, and their applications for voluntary severance are due by Sept. 15.  Norfolk Southern isn't yet sure how many will apply for the buy-out and how many it will accept.  The separation allowance includes a one-time $50,000 payment to each Central of Georgia conductor, trainman and switchman in exchange for elimination of annual productivity-fund payments provided by a previous agreement.  The program also allows a $10,000 death benefit for those employees separating who will reach age 55 by Sept. 30.  Analysts said Norfolk Southern's crew-reduction efforts are part of the industry's growing commitment to shed costly work practices and become more competitive with trucks.  In the past year, major railroads CSX Corp. of Richmond, Va., Union Pacific Corp. of Bethlehem, Pa., and Santa Fe Pacific Corp., Chicago, have announced agreements to pare some freight-train crews.  "Competitive reality is sinking in," says Andras Petery, analyst at Morgan Stanley & Co. Crew-reduction programs "will eventually lead to more jobs in the railroad industry because more railroads will be price competitive in merchandise freight with trucks than they are today."  Some railroads that have reduced train crews in recent years have seen savings eroded by payments to so-called productivity funds distributed to remaining crew members.  Norfolk Southern's agreement with Central of Georgia train-service workers "gives each employee $50,000 up front, which is expensive," in exchange for elimination of annual productivity payments, said Graeme Lidgerwood, analyst at First Boston Corp.  "But then every year Norfolk Southern will have the full benefit of reduced crews."  South Korea ran a trade deficit of $431 million in August, its biggest monthly gap since January 1985, the Trade and Industry Ministry said.  The country had a trade surplus of $476 million in the same month of 1988.  For the first eight months of the year, South Korea had a trade deficit of $282 million, in sharp contrast to a year-earlier trade surplus of $4.27 billion.  A group of Connecticut Bancorp Inc. shareholders formed an opposition slate of directors, including three current board members who weren't renominated by the bank holding company, for the vote at the annual meeting Sept. 21.  Management of the holding company, which owns Norwalk Bank, has been divided over Connecticut Bancorp's direction.  The three board members nominated by the dissidents are Chris P. Handrinos, William J. Fox and Francis E. Jones, a statement from the group said.  It wasn't clear how much of Connecticut Bancorp the group holds, and neither the group nor the company was available for comment.  Peter V. Lathouris, who calls himself "a major Bancorp stockholder," organized the group.  Nine directors, including Mr. Lathouris, were nominated by the group.  In the release, Mr. Lathouris said he would mail a letter to other shareholders "urging them to restructure the board because of the unsatisfactory performance of Board Chairman Frank J. Cooke and Emmett G. Murphy," chief executive officer of the bank.  In April, George W. Green resigned as chairman of the company and vowed not to lead or participate in a proxy fight for Connecticut Bancorp after reports said he considered leading a proxy contest.  Grand Metropolitan PLC said it is negotiating the sale of its big bookmaking business to help pay for its $5.8 billion purchase of Pillsbury Co.  The William Hill/Mecca Bookmakers division, Britain's second-biggest chain of legal betting shops, could fetch #700 million ($1.1 billion), London analysts said.  Though Grand Met didn't name the likely buyer, sources said the leading candidate is British leisure and beverage concern Brent Walker PLC.  A sales pact is expected this week.  The sale is part of a corporate restructuring designed to reduce debt and focus on Grand Met's extensive food, beverage and eye-care businesses, a company spokesman said.  The British conglomerate's consumer brands in those three fields includes Green Giant foods, Haagen Dazs ice cream, Smirnoff vodka, Alpo pet food and Pearle Vision Centers.  The British-centered bookmaking business, a spokesman said, doesn't fit Grand Met's preferred focus on global consumer brands.  But the sale also appears aimed at boosting the company's share price, generally depressed since the Pillsbury purchase by market worries about heavy debt.  On Friday in London, Grand Met shares edged up four pence apiece to 633 pence.  In the 12 months ended March 31, the Pillsbury acquisition and other purchases nearly quadrupled Grand Met's net borrowings to #4.1 billion.  Since buying Pillsbury in January, Grand Met has reduced debt with asset sales totaling about $1 billion.  Even so, stock traders have been expecting further asset sales, said London-based securities analyst Ron Littleboy of Japan's Nomura Research Institute.  Besides the bookmaking business, other rumored sales candidates have included Grand Met's British brewing business valued at #450 million, and many of its pubs.  Given stock-market worries about Grand Met's debt, "they can't keep all the businesses they've got," Mr. Littleboy said.  Among other things, traders worry that a heavy debt load might hamper Grand Met's ability to finance its rapidly growing retail food and beverage businesses.  Already Grand Met claims to have the second-largest number of retail outlets in the world, at 15,000 shops under various brand names.  It says PepsiCo Inc. is largest, with about 18,000 outlets, and McDonald's Corp. is third with about 12,500.  The Hill/Mecca sale also represents a rapid about-face.  In December, Grand Met more than doubled the size of its 19-year-old bookmaking business by buying a major rival, William Hill, for #331 million.  The merged operation made Grand Met, with 1,550 betting shops in Britain and Ireland and 400 in Belgium, the second-largest force in licensed bookmaking in Britain, after Ladbroke Group PLC.  Even with so quick a sale, however, Grand Met stands to make a tidy profit, analysts said.  The merger of William Hill with Grand Met's Mecca division produced immediate savings.  Aggregate operating profit for the two businesses consequently rose to as much as #50 million in the year ending Sept. 30, from a pre-merger level of about #40 million, analysts estimate.  The merger, a Grand Met statement said Sunday, was "a genuine case of one plus one equals three."  Further profit growth, however, would have required substantial investment and expansion abroad, a price Grand Met apparently decided it wasn't willing to pay.  Brent Walker officials couldn't be reached for comment.  But if they conclude a purchase agreement as expected, it would be their largest of a series of acquisitions.  The company's recent purchases have included the #180 million wine and spirits business of Britain's Lonrho PLC.  It has also shopped before at Grand Met: In recent months, it bought nearly 400 Grand Met pubs for #47.5 million, as well as some regional Grand Met betting shops.  Tylan Corp. said it will hold a special shareholders meeting Oct. 3 to vote on Tylan's acquisition by closely held Vacuum General Inc. of San Diego.  Tylan's board unanimously approved the proposed merger, which follows months of wrangling between Tylan, Vacuum General and Autoclave Engineers Inc., an Erie, Pa. company whose offer for Tylan shares was blocked last month by the Federal Trade Commission.  All three concerns make pressure-measurement systems used primarily by semiconductor makers.  Shareholders would receive $4.25 a share under the merger agreement.  Finally Molly Yard, the president of the National Organization for Women, and Rep. Henry Hyde, the Illinois Republican who crusades against abortion, are in accord.  They both support the idea of a third political party to fight for women's rights and abortion.  Ms. Yard likes the idea, which NOW is examining, because she thinks it would bring women's-rights issues to the forefront.  Rep. Hyde likes it because he thinks it would split the Democrats and abortion-rights activists, weakening both.  "It's a great idea," crows Mr. Hyde, the principal sponsor of the existing restrictions on federal funding for abortion.  "It would divide the liberal Democrats hopelessly for a few years, confining liberalism to a few scattered rallies here and there, and that would be a great thing for the country.  I say: More power to Molly Yard."  Such support makes Ms. Yard and her sometime allies in the women's movement squirm.  Now that the Supreme Court's Webster decision has given states authority to restrict abortion, the Democrats and abortion-rights activists see their first political opening in a decade, but the notion of a third party threatens to damage the effort by driving a wedge between leaders of the women's movement, their congressional supporters and other political allies.  The third-party idea, moreover, has illuminated tensions inside the women's and abortion-rights movements.  "The public lumps us all together," says Kate Michelman, president of the National Abortion Rights Action League, "but NOW doesn't speak for the entire pro-choice movement."  In recent months, Ms. Yard, in her 70s but reluctant to pinpoint her age, has emerged as a lightning rod for criticism, with some liberal Democrats worrying that her high profile on the abortion issue might hurt their cause.  Many political analysts believe the new strife over abortion makes this a peculiarly bad juncture to start a new party.  "The worst way to make your debut into national politics," says Democratic pollster Harrison Hickman, a consultant to the National Abortion Rights Action League, "is to enter at a time when you'd help the opposition."  In fact, there already exists a National Woman's Party, today comprising the political descendants of Alice Paul, the early 20th century suffragist who was a central figure in the drive to win the vote for women and an early equal-rights amendment.  The party, which was founded in 1913, consisted of the radicals of the women's movement in the early part of the century but since has been overtaken by more modern activists and has all but disappeared from the political scene.  The idea for a late-century women's party -- a resolution to study the proposal was approved unanimously at this summer's NOW convention in Cincinnati -- is classic Molly Yard, and even with the criticism, she isn't backing down.  To her allies in the women's movement who have raced to criticize the plan, she says simply but somberly: "They'll live with what they did."  Nor is she patient with the criticism from the political establishment.  "The people who think Molly Yard is a 'Republican mole' are crazy," she says.  "Basically we want to see a much more responsible political leadership in this country.  I think it's very serious when 50% of the registered voters don't bother to vote for president of the U.S."  She attributes to the discussion of a third party the House's refusal last month to maintain restrictions on the District of Columbia's use of funds for abortion.  "The first pro-choice victory we've had in the House in nine years came after the talk of a third party," she says.  "I can't help but wonder whether that had something to do with it."  But some specialists on the women's movement believe that the third-party notion is a symbol of generational strains within the movement.  The women who began the modern movement fought for free abortion on demand, and they worry that the daughters of the movement aren't as fierce, as radical or as committed.  "The Molly Yards want to consolidate the two generations and think a separate party is the way to do it," says Temma Kaplan, director of the Center for Research on Women at Barnard College.  But with her trademark hair bun, Ms. Yard herself often is exploited by her adversaries as a symbol of feminist radicalism.  Roger Stone, a conservative Republican consultant, says he hopes Ms. Yard will visit "as many states as possible" during the coming abortion debate.  "I want to hear that voice on television every night," says Mr. Stone, who believes Ms. Yard "has one of the most grating personas I've ever seen" and describes her as "the worst stereotype of a radical feminist wacko."  Ms. Yard has been present at many of the symbolic knot-points of modern politics, working in the 1950 campaign of Helen Gahaghan Douglas against Richard Nixon, serving in the administration of Philadelphia reform mayor Joseph Clark, acting as a regional organizer for the 1963 civil rights March on Washington and then leading a march in Pittsburgh urging passage of the Civil Rights Act.  Now, with fund-raising and membership approaching historic heights, Ms. Yard is deep into planning NOW's "Freedom Caravan," which will visit states where abortion fights are being conducted, and a mass mobilization of abortion-rights activists for the Lincoln Memorial on Nov. 12 to pressure the Supreme Court, which is to take up three additional abortion cases this autumn.  While some chapters of NOW are providing information on self-performed abortions -- the national organization hasn't taken a position on such procedures -- Ms. Yard is working to win import approval for RU 486, the French-produced antiprogestin that proponents argue can produce safe abortions and may be a treatment for such diseases as breast cancer, endometriosis, glaucoma and prostate cancer.  "I don't understand why the medical community isn't outraged by the failure to bring this drug to this country," she says.  The contretemps over a third party wasn't spawned solely over concern about the abortion debate, but instead gets to the heart of the controversy surrounding Ms. Yard.  Some experts on the women's movement believe that Ms. Yard and other advocates of the idea are moving women out of the political mainstream.  "To encourage women to work outside conventional channels is only to delay getting women within established power structures," argues Deborah Rhode, director of Stanford's Institute for Research on Women and Gender.  But the iconoclastic NOW president has always been more comfortable as an outsider.  "If she's successful and forms a third party," says former Vice President Walter Mondale, "she'll be the first one to leave it and start a fourth party."  TRANSCO ENERGY Co.'s Transco Exploration Partners Ltd. unit declared an initial liquidating distribution of $9.50 per unit, in line with the closing of the $902 million sale of substantially all of its oil and gas producing and development properties to Amerada Hess Corp., a New York-based oil company.  The distribution is payable Sept. 18 to unit holders of record Sept. 12.  The unit said it also expects to close in the near future the approximately $23 million sale of interests in certain offshore exploratory leases and other assets to Transco Exploration & Production Co., another unit of Houston-based Transco Energy.  THE HUMAN RIGHTS CAMPAIGN FUND contributes to candidates who pledge to support gay, lesbian and AIDS-related issues.  An article in Friday's edition failed to describe fully the fund's purpose.  (See: "Politics & Policy: Homosexual Lawmakers Face Unclear Standards Over Questions of Ethical and Personal Behavior" -- WSJ Sept. 1, 1989)  CHEMICAL BANKING Corp.'s Chemical Bank hasn't eliminated a 16.8% interest rate for finance charges offered to some preferred customers.  New York City's Department of Consumer Affairs incorrectly said in Friday's edition that the bank had eliminated the rate.  (See: "New York Credit-Card Law, Aimed to Lift Competition, Found to Have Little Effect" -- WSJ Sept. 1, 1989)  The Securities and Exchange Commission is pushing for a uniform time limit on filing private securities-fraud lawsuits in federal court.  Typically the statute of limitations in such cases is dictated by the state law that applies to the case.  The time restrictions range from one to 10 years among the states, and lawyers often bicker over which one applies.  SEC General Counsel Daniel Goelzer, in a friend-of-the-court brief, has urged the federal appeals court in New York to rely on federal law in the case of Ceres Partners, a New Jersey securities broker, vs.  Gelco Corp., a Bahamian limited partnership.  The SEC wants the five-year statute of limitations that is used in federal insider-trading laws to apply in all private securities-fraud suits.  "Insider trading is a kind of fraud claim and so it's the closest analogy for federal securities law," Mr. Goelzer says.  Recent rulings by the U.S. Supreme Court that federal rules should determine time limitations in racketeering cases prompted the SEC's move, Mr. Goelzer says.  Eventually the SEC hopes that all courts will adopt a five-year standard in securities-fraud cases or that Congress will enact legislation setting that limit.  The five-year standard would effectively reinstate Ceres's claim against Gelco alleging violations of securities laws.  A district court had thrown the case out on the basis of a two-year limit.  Richard Ziegler, a partner with Cleary, Gottlieb, Steen & Hamilton, who represents Gelco, agrees that courts should adopt a uniform standard in such cases, but said it should be one to three years.  A five-year limit might discourage directors from serving on company boards, he says. ---  TWO LAW FIRMS establish relationships with European counterparts.  Gibson, Dunn & Crutcher, a Los Angeles firm with 650 lawyers, agreed to associate with Van Bael & Bellis, a 25-lawyer firm in Brussels.  The move was made in anticipation of a single European market in 1992.  "As the 1992 process goes forward there will . . . be a need for U.S. law firms to work with indigenous European lawyers," said Timothy L. Dickinson, a partner in Gibson Dunn's Washington office.  Gibson Dunn also plans to open a Brussels branch this year.  Phillips, Nizer, Benjamin, Krim & Ballon, a New York firm with 102 lawyers, has affiliated with the Morresi law offices, located in Bologna, Italy, and in Brussels.  In each arrangement, the firms will advise each other's clients and refer business back and forth.  ---  CHICAGO SECURITIES LAWYER is sentenced for insider trading.  Alfred Elliot, 45, a former partner at Schiff, Hardin & Waite, was sentenced to five years in prison for reaping more than $650,000 from buying and selling the stocks of clients his firm represented in mergers and acquisitions.  In May, Mr. Elliott told a federal jury that he would be "the stupidest securities lawyer" in the world if he had committed the crimes the government alleged.  Mr. Elliot represented himself.  It wasn't such a wacky defense: The jury deadlocked.  But in a second trial in June, Mr. Elliott was convicted.  The U.S. attorney's office in Chicago believes Mr. Elliott's sentence is the stiffest ever imposed for insider trading.  Judge Marvin Aspen last week also ordered Mr. Elliott to pay the government $333,000 in fines and $353,000 in profits.  "I realize what I did was wrong," Mr. Elliott said at his sentencing.  "It was crazy, nuts.  I am a person of integrity and I really am sorry this happened."  ---  MASSACHUSETTS CAN'T END forced arbitration in disputes with brokers.  A federal appeals court in Boston upheld a lower-court ruling blocking a Massachusetts law that had been closely watched by the securities industry.  The law would have prevented brokers from refusing to do business with investors who declined to sign statements agreeing to settle disputes only through arbitration, and not in court.  The appeals court said the law would result in "exactly the kind of inefficiency which arbitration and standard-form contracts . . . are designed" to reduce.  ---  A TOP FEDERAL PROSECUTOR is joining Howard, Darby & Levin.  Aaron Marcu, the third-highest-ranking official in the U.S. attorney's office in Manhattan, will join the New York firm as a partner Oct. 10.  Mr. Marcu, 33 years old, helped prosecute the successful racketeering and conspiracy case against Carmine Persico and eight of his associates in 1986.  That victory is said to have incapacitated New York's Colombo organized-crime family.  Last March, he took the lead in negotiating a settlement with the Teamsters union, which agreed to broad reforms to avoid a trial on racketeering charges.  Mr. Marcu had planned to join Howard Darby earlier this year, but after former U.S. Attorney Rudolph Giuliani resigned in January, acting U.S. Attorney Benito Romano asked Mr. Marcu to postpone his departure.  Despite protests by Alaskan officials, Exxon Corp. has already begun laying off workers and demobilizing equipment in preparation for halting oil spill cleanup operations in Alaska by mid-month.  The big New York-based oil company has said for some time that it would end work in Alaska's Prince William Sound Sept. 15 because of risky weather conditions after that.  To hit that date, it has to begin scaling back well in advance, Exxon said.  One Exxon official said actual beach scrubbing could stop as early as the end of this week.  Exxon currently is letting as many as 400 people go each day as it rapidly winds down operations.  Crews, which generally work for two weeks and then take one week off, are being given pink slips as they rotate off and are offered prompt, free transportation out of the Valdez area by Exxon.  Many are taking it because if they linger, they'll have to pay their own way home.  Six task forces of workers that had been scrubbing oil off the rocks in Prince William Sound will be reduced to four by late this week, Exxon officials said.  The sound was badly fouled when an Exxon tanker ran aground in March, spilling almost 11 million gallons of crude oil into the water.  Exxon's pullout is irritating Alaskan officials, who continue to appeal to both the oil company and the Coast Guard for an extension of cleanup efforts beyond the mid-September deadline.  Robert Flint, an official of the Alaska Department of Environmental Conservation, maintained there could be an additional six to eight weeks of clear weather during which small crews could continue to work on priority beaches.  Alaskan officials also said they will continue to lobby for small strike forces to remain behind in the sound to protect the fish hatcheries.  "We're not looking to put people at risk, and, yes, as winter progresses there will be a time to stop," Mr. Flint said.  But "total demobilization is improper," he asserted.  Exxon, however, said bad weather has already started to hamper cleanup efforts.  High winds and eight to 10-foot waves in the sound kept the company from putting cleanup crews ashore last week, it said.  Remaining beyond Sept. 15 is like playing Russian roulette, countered one Exxon official, Henry Beathard.  He accused Alaskan authorities of "double talk" -- constant criticism of Exxon to support the lawsuit the state has filed accusing the company of bungling the cleanup effort.  "A lot of their statements should be discredited," he said.  Exxon has consistently claimed that all of the beaches fouled by oil will be "treated," if not totally cleansed, by the self-imposed deadline of Sept. 15.  According to Mr. Beathard, more than 1,060 miles of shoreline have been scrubbed, with less than 25 miles left to treat.  Alaska's Mr. Flint countered that not all of those beaches are clean.  Smith Island, which has been treated four times, is still fouled by oil, he said.  As Alaskan and Exxon officials continue to squabble, however, the practical chance of any extension of cleanup work has all but vanished.  Already, Exxon has moved more than 100 truckloads of equipment to Anchorage for storage in warehouses.  And for the last two weeks, ships and barges that had been participating in the cleanup effort have been leaving Prince William Sound and heading down the West Coast on their way back to permanent berths in the Gulf of Mexico.  As of late last week, Exxon had reduced its work force to 9,800 people from a peak of 12,000.  The fact that many have departed the Valdez area makes the prospect of any remobilization of work crews remote at this late date.  By Sept. 15, the oil company expects to have only 3,000 people working in the area, most of them dismantling equipment.  For a short time after Sept. 15, Exxon intends to keep small "touch-up" crews on the job, revisiting cleanup sites primarily to check for any litter left behind.  During the winter, the company plans to have only about 300 people doing spill-related work in Alaska.  Most will be in Anchorage, where they'll study environmental data gathered during the cleanup and evaluate oil-removal equipment.  About 30 people will stay in Valdez, site of Exxon's cleanup command post, to handle claims and stay in touch with small communities along the sound.  Mr. Beathard said Exxon is still determining how to monitor any continued shoreline soiling or threats to fish hatcheries.  He said boats will be available around the clock, but emergency crews may be maintained on a standby basis.  "The men may be employed elsewhere but be available to be called out," he said.  For the seeded men players in the U.S. Open Tennis Tournament, last week's early rounds were like a stroll through the park.  Central Park.  After dark.  Mats Wilander, the defending champion and No. 5 seed, was ambushed by 91st-ranked Pete Sampras in round two.  Then fourth-seeded John McEnroe, tennis's perennial bad boy (that's English for enfant terrible), was mugged by 115th-ranked Paul Haarhuis, a player so obscure he rates nary a line in the game's media guide.  Boris Becker, the No. 2 seed and favorite in many quarters (and semis), came within a net-cord point of suffering the same fate before escaping Derrick Rostagno, ranked 65th, in five sets.  For tranquillity, one must observe the women's draw; there, the seeds toured the park regally with armed escort, and the top eight all advanced to the round of 16.  Queen Steffi Graf, in the second year of what promises to be a lengthy reign, as usual did not loiter among hai pollai (that's Greek for the low-seeded gals).  She held court for just 55, 45, 37 and 67 minutes, respectively, in her first four matches, and lost but 12 games in the eight sets.  Truth to tell, few expect the remainder of her appearances here to be much longer, or have much-different outcomes.  That women's tennis has always tended toward monarchy is a fact not lost on Teddy Tinling, the long-headed, clean-domed, diamond-eared gentleman pictured here.  As an Englishman, he is familiar with the institution, and as a traditionalist he approves of it, although not entirely for traditional reasons.  "The monarchy always has been wonderful show-business] No movie star has more glamor than a queen, even a very businesslike queen," he asserts.  "Sport is show business, too, especially women's sport, and royal glamour is an asset.  I think we have been the better for having it."  The 79-year-old Mr. Tinling speaks with authority on tennis history, because few have seen more of it.  He has been a peripheral luminary of the game since Suzanne Lenglen, the great French champion of the 1920s, picked him out of a gallery as a gangly youth to umpire one of her matches.  He became Ms. Lenglen's friend, factotum and frequent umpire; in those days, apparently, the choosing of officials was a prerogative of tennis royalty.  He umpired the first match at Roland Garros Stadium in Paris, in 1928.  He played doubles in four Wimbledon draws.  He traded strokes with Bill Tilden and, 30-or-so years later, Lew Hoad, winning a gentlemanly three games from each in two-set matches.  He has been on the staffs of each of the four "major" tournaments.  He has designed tennis outfits for players of seven decades, including the lace, peek-a-boo panties in 1949 that made Gorgeous Gussie Moran, a so-so player, both gorgeous and famous, even unto this day, and brought the game to the attention of people who didn't know a backhand from the backs of their hands.  The panties got him bounced from Wimbledon's stuffy precincts for a goodly stretch, although he now is persona grata (that's Latin for welcome) there again.  His present post is as director of international liaison for the Virginia Slims Series, the corporate tag for the women's tennis tour.  He's not the linguist the title suggests; in addition to his native tongue, he speaks only French and dabs of Spanish and Italian.  "It's not so much what I say but how I say it," he smiles.  "I apply the salve of cool words to troublesome areas.  It works, mostly."  To those who are troubled that the projected, protracted Graf spree might cause some to switch off his beloved game, he has a few of those cool words: "We are lucky to have her.  She already is one of the greats.  Maybe, one day, she will be the greatest."  Better than Martina or Chris?  "Oh, yes.  Maybe even better than Lenglen."  Mr. Tinling hastens to acknowledge that modern perceptions, shaped by jerky old films, usually are not flattering to athletes of bygone eras, and that Ms. Lenglen, who played some 65 years ago and won six Wimbledon and six French Open singles crowns, may be in this category.  Yet he notes there are parallels in the rises of both her and Graf.  "Both were champions at a young age, although Graf came along younger, and both had strong fathers guiding them," he says.  "Lenglen's father, Charles -- everyone called him 'Papa' -- might have been the first 'tennis father.' He was some sort of transit mogul who took up bicycle racing to become famous.  When he failed in that, he turned to making his daughter famous.  And there he suceeded.  "Tennis was quite different then," he goes on.  "Ballet was the model for the woman athlete, and Suzanne epitomized balletic grace in sport.  Now, the model is the running track and weight room.  I must say I preferred the old one.  Suzanne might not have hit the ball as hard as some players do today, but her patience and court sense were unmatched.  I'm sure she'd find a way to prevail against almost anyone.  "Suzanne had great style and glamour, which are things Steffi lacks, but let's not be harsh; Steffi is young, barely 20.  Chris Evert was boring at 20, and at that age Martina Navratilova was a lumpy Czech girl.  Both grew up very nicely, I think."  Women's tennis has been fortunate in its rulers, Mr. Tinling opines.  Helen Wills Moody was "beautiful," Alice Marble was "carefree, our first real jock."  Maureen Connolly was "both athletic and delightful."  Margaret Smith Court had "strength and dignity."  Billie Jean King was "our superstar."  Evert, who says she'll retire after the Open but seems in no hurry to leave, is "what every mother would like her daughter to be."  Navratilova is "very gracious and a wonderful athlete -- before Steffi, our finest since Suzanne."  He continues: "Having Chris and Martina at their primes together was extraordinary.  For once, we had competition as well as majesty."  And if Queen Steffi's rule is pitiless, well, there will be compensations in that, too.  "Competition is grand, but people also like watching a victim twitch," notes Mr. T.  "In fact, some prefer it."  The Federal Reserve won't push down interest rates further unless substantial signs of economic weakness appear, interviews with several Fed policy makers suggest.  And for the first time in months, the presidents of a few regional Fed banks appear poised to consider higher interest rates, because they fear the vigor of the economy threatens their anti-inflation efforts.  "I don't see that the evidence has accumulated to convince me that we've got a 'soft landing,'" said Roger Guffey, president of the Kansas City, Mo., Fed, which sponsored a conference here last week on monetary policy.  A "soft landing" -- jargon for what appears to have been the Fed's goal -- is a slowing of the economy short of recession but sufficient to keep inflation from accelerating.  Based on revisions of recent economic data and other indicators, Mr. Guffey said he now thinks growth in 1989 will exceed previous expectations of Fed governors and regional presidents, whose forecasts generally were for growth of around 2% to 2.5%.  "The risk of recession in the second half has diminished substantially," he said.  "The risk is an accelerating growth."  The Fed fears that if the economy grows too robustly, inflationary pressures will build.  Several weeks ago, the risk of recession outweighed the risk of accelerating inflation in the minds of most Fed policy makers, so the prescription was for lower interest rates.  For some, that isn't any longer true.  "The risk is clearly shifting to inflation," said Robert Forrestal, president of the Atlanta Fed.  However, many other Fed policy makers, though they believe that no recession is imminent, aren't convinced that the economy is actually gaining momentum.  In fact, they say, economic conditions are about as good as the Fed could have hoped for.  "Things are going well.  We should sit back and enjoy them," said Robert Parry, president of the San Francisco Fed.  "I'm frankly not all that worried about the possibility that the economy is going to take off.  There's not enough information to support" that view, he said.  And Robert Boykin, president of the Dallas Fed, said, "It's pretty hard to see that you need to take decisive action {to alter monetary policy} one way or the other."  To their relief, the Fed district bank presidents said they haven't yet seen any sign of accelerating prices or wages.  "I'm a little more optimistic than I used to be that inflation has peaked," said Robert Black, president of the Richmond, Va., Fed.  Although Mr. Guffey expects economic growth to quicken, he said, "I think we'll see some capping of inflation at the current level."  Inflation is currently running at an annual rate of about 4.5%.  After a year of tightening credit, the Fed began to ease gently at the beginning of June.  That move was led by Fed governors in Washington and was resisted at the time by some Fed presidents.  As signs of a slowing economy mounted and the money supply -- which is followed closely by some policy makers -- grew very sluggishly, the presidents went along with subsequent easing moves.  The federal funds rate, the short-term interest rate that is most directly controlled by the Fed, has fallen by three-quarters of a percentage point to 9% in the past three months.  Banks charge this rate to one another for overnight loans.  At its late August meeting, the Fed's policy-setting Open Market Committee apparently decided to leave policy unchanged for the moment.  The voting membership of the committee consists of the six current Fed governors and five of the 12 regional Fed bank presidents, although the other seven presidents also participate in discussions.  Courts of Flaw  The wheels of justice  Plod slowly along,  Often taking years  To right a wrong.  But it doesn't end  Like chapter and verse:  The wheels, on appeal,  Go into reverse.  -- Arnold J. Zarett.  ---  Strategic Retreat  I know that I'm winning the argument  And putting my opponent to rout  When he says with a superior smile,  "Well, it's nothing to fight about."  -- George O. Ludcke.  Europe's airlines are looking for ways to go trans-Atlantic as never before.  Spurred by visions of deregulation and the ever-widening horizons of the industry, European airlines have started buying into U.S. air carriers.  Industry analysts predict that if the U.S. government doesn't intervene, more will follow suit.  As Daniel M. Kasper, director of the transportation practice of Harbridge House, a Boston consulting firm, says, the U.S. market is "a market one can't afford not to be in."  About 40% of all airline passengers in the non-Communist world are either domestic U.S. travelers or international travelers originating or arriving in the U.S.  "There will be deals in the next month and certainly in the next quarter," says Ernest S. Arvai, director of the airline practice of the Boston consulting firm Arthur D. Little Inc.  "There are a number of airlines in talks now."  As the European-U.S. relationships develop, the next phase is likely to involve links with Asian carriers.  For travelers, such world-wide networks could mean greater convenience and better service -- although prices also may be higher and choices fewer.  Consider these recent and prospective accords involving European carriers:  -- Scandinavian Airlines System, which owns 9.9% of Texas Air Corp. and has a marketing alliance with its Continental Airlines unit, is reportedly trying, together with partners, to buy Continental.  -- British Airways, which signed a marketing pact with UAL Corp.'s United Airlines unit in 1987, is in the running to buy a 15% stake in United as part of a group led by United pilots and UAL management.  -- Swissair, which signed a marketing agreement with Delta Air Lines early this year, took the next step this summer by buying 5% of Delta.  Delta plans to take a 5% stake in Swissair before year's end. -- KLM Royal Dutch Airlines is buying 10% of NWA Inc., owner of Northwest Airlines.  -- Lufthansa, the West German carrier, is discussing a marketing alliance with AMR Corp.'s American Airlines.  And the Amadeus airline reservation system, of which Lufthansa owns 25%, is discussing taking a stake in American's Sabre reservations unit, according to Max Wernet, Lufthansa's vice president for corporate strategy.  Takeover fever hit AMR's stock last week on the New York Stock Exchange.  It soared a total of $15 a share Tuesday and Wednesday before falling back Thursday along with other airline issues.  Friday, AMR closed at $89.875, up $1.875, in composite trading of 1.6 million shares.  Thursday's slide -- and Friday's partial rebound -- came after a senior U.S. Department of Transportation official warned that the government might rein in leveraged buy-outs and foreign investments in the industry.  The law now allows foreign carriers to hold 25% of a U.S. airline, but the official said the department might try to block foreign investments that involve smaller stakes than that.  For now, European airlines that are partly or wholly private are taking the initiative in buying into U.S. airlines.  But industry watchers say buyers could soon include such state-controlled carriers as Lufthansa and Italy's Alitalia.  In addition to American Airlines, U.S. companies that could represent investment opportunities include USAir Group and smaller carriers such as Braniff, Midway Airlines and Alaska Air Group.  The European airlines' moves are closely linked to the 12-nation European Community's planned dismantling of internal trade barriers after 1992.  For the past couple of years, European airlines have been preparing for this deregulated post-1992 competition by consolidating within Europe.  Now they are turning their attention abroad.  By having partners in other parts of the world, European carriers can indirectly "serve" routes they aren't licensed to operate, such as those within the U.S. and across or within the Pacific.  But all this frenzied trans-Atlantic dealmaking wouldn't be possible without the takeover fever surrounding U.S. airlines.  In recent months, an oligopoly of U.S. carriers that survived the airline deregulation process has started to prosper.  With less competition and less of a chance for newcomers to get into the game, these U.S. carriers will have a more stable and profitable financial environment than they've had in the past, says George James, president of Airline Economics Inc., a Washington consulting firm.  Moreover, he says, major U.S. air carriers also have such assets as undervalued real estate, valuable landing slots, airport gates, salable aircraft and even positions in line to take delivery of new planes.  Thus, U.S. corporate raiders such as Los Angeles investor Marvin Davis are making huge takeover bids, and rival investors are flocking in and sending the bids still higher.  Stock prices have been soaring, and defenses are being readied.  Delta's sale of a 5% stake to Swissair was seen as a defensive step.  It was Mr. Davis's raid on NWA that led to its sale to a rival group that includes KLM. Mr. Davis currently is bidding $6.2 billion for United, which spurred British Airways' interest in a stake.  Some European carriers are already looking beyond the U.S. market.  KLM says it is seeking an Asian partner to complement its NWA stake, and SAS has marketing arrangements with All Nippon Airways and Thai Airways International that could be a step toward equity positions.  In such alliances, the partners typically adjust their schedules to make it easier for travelers to transfer between them.  This also can mean that a traveler will have to check in only once, receiving boarding passes for all legs of a trip.  But the trend toward global partnerships also may mean fewer choices and higher prices.  Some analysts predict it will result in 12 to 20 big airline consortia controlling most international travel by the year 2000, making it more difficult for upstarts with lower prices or new ideas to break in.  As investors, European airlines may get a mixed reception in the U.S.  On the one hand, the 25% ownership limit will bring them added scrutiny.  And there could be pressure from Washington to allow U.S. carriers to invest in European airlines, many of which are state-owned.  On the other hand, compared with corporate raiders, European airline investors might look attractive.  They are serious about the industry; they have expertise; and they have money to help finance huge buy-outs.  And because of the wave of mergers and consolidations that has shrunk the number of major airline companies, few U.S. airlines could pass an antitrust review to buy a U.S. carrier.  Coastal Corp. disclosed plans to raise about $544 million through stock and debt offerings but said the proceeds will be used to retire existing debt, not to finance takeovers.  The company, a natural gas pipeline and oil concern feared by many in the industry for its aggressiveness, most recently made an unsuccessful, hostile offer for Texas Eastern Corp.  In an interview, Oscar S. Wyatt Jr., chairman and chief executive officer, insisted that Coastal isn't on the prowl again.  "If you're asking if it's a warchest, the answer is no," he said of the proposed new financing.  Mr. Wyatt said Coastal intends to invest in internal projects because he believes stocks of most other energy companies are overpriced.  "In this market, I don't think there are many companies you should acquire," he said.  In fact, last January, Coastal wouldn't raise its bid for Texas Eastern when another pipeline company, Panhandle Eastern Corp., agreed to pay some 25% more than Coastal offered.  Coastal plans to spend about $300 million on more than a half-dozen pipeline projects this year.  It also has been drilling exploratory gas wells, a spokesman said.  The company's strategy has been to find gas but not to produce it until prices recover, and that may be some time away.  "I don't see a lot of gas demand until 1991 or 1992," Mr. Wyatt said.  Mr. Wyatt, 65 years old, also said he plans to step down as chief executive and will recommend to the board that James R. Paul, currently president and chief operating officer, fill the post.  Mr. Wyatt said he will remain as chairman and will stay actively involved in daily operations.  He said he hasn't any plans to leave the company, which he founded in 1955.  "I don't have the least intention of retiring," Mr. Wyatt said.  "The only thing that would retire me is a lightning bolt."  Coastal officials described Mr. Paul's ascension as a continued expansion of his role at the company.  "Jimmy has functioned to a degree as CEO for the past two years," Mr. Wyatt said.  Mr. Paul, 54 years old, has spent most of his time with Coastal's pipeline operations and was a key player behind Coastal's acquisition of pipeline company American Natural Resources Co. in 1985 as well as the bid for Texas Eastern.  In its offering, Coastal said it seeks to sell eight million common shares, initially priced at $43 each.  The company's stock fell Friday to $43 a share, down $1.125 in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  The underwriters have an overallotment option of 1.2 million shares.  The debt offering will consist of $200 million of 15-year senior debentures, which haven't been priced.  With the refinancing, Coastal is spreading out its debt over a longer period.  The company said it plans to use the proceeds to retire about $160 million of borrowings with an average maturity of less than one year.  The balance is to be used to retire debt with an average maturity of 3.3 years.  Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc., Coastal's usual investment banker, is the lead underwriter for both the stock and debt offer.  After the offers are completed, Coastal said, the board plans to declare a 3-for-2 stock split payable in shares of common stock.  The company intends to maintain the 40-cent-a-share annual dividend.  Coastal plans a special stockholders meeting to approve an increase in authorized common shares to 250 million from 100 million.  The Environmental Protection Agency said Ford Motor Co. agreed to strengthen its warranty policy, the first result of a move by the agency to check whether auto makers have been improperly denying free repairs on vehicles' emissions-control equipment.  Under a settlement between Ford and the EPA, the No. 2 U.S. auto maker agreed to expand its warranty coverage for emissions-control equipment to cover additional parts, beginning with 1991 models.  The EPA claimed Ford's warranty policy improperly failed to cover certain repairs required by the Clean Air Act.  The law requires that auto makers provide free repairs of vehicles' air-pollution equipment for five years or 50,000 miles, provided the equipment has been properly maintained and there has been no tampering with it.  Ford also agreed to pay a $92,000 penalty and to reimburse car owners for repair work that should have been performed under its emissions-control warranty.  The auto maker noted that EPA will impose the new standards on all auto makers, which will minimize the competitive impact of the settlement on Ford.  Martha Casey, an EPA spokeswoman, said the agency is reviewing other auto makers' warranty policies and will be sending domestic and foreign car makers a list of all parts that should be covered.  The EPA acted after it received complaints from 23 Ford customers who were denied free repairs.  The agency said Ford improperly refused to cover replacement of catalytic converters and exhaust-gas recirculation valves when the parts failed because of some "non-covered part," such as problems with a spark plug or carburetor.  Ford also failed to cover repairs or replacements of fuel-injector pumps, air-cleaner-duct valves and motors, ignition modules and turbo chargers, the EPA said.  The agency said the warranty should cover emissions-control parts regardless of the cause of failure and other parts that "significantly affect performance of emissions components."  Ford officials denied violating federal emissions-warranty laws.  "Although the general emissions warranty requirement has been on the books for some time, there has never been any rule-making proceeding to define what specific components are covered," said Richard M. Gulau, executive engineer of Ford's certification engineering and compliance programs.  Jean-Marc Vernes's decision to fight Cie.  Financiere de Suez's bid for Cie.  Industrielle and Groupe Victoire without making a counterbid throws France's biggest-ever takeover battle into deeper confusion.  Mr. Vernes, Industrielle's chairman, said he would neither launch a bid to top Suez's double-barreled 23.7 billion French franc ($3.57 billion) takeover offer nor throw in the towel.  Instead, Mr. Vernes indicated he will try to destabilize Suez's bid for control of Industrielle, a holding company whose main asset is a 40% stake in the Victoire insurance group.  "I will simply pursue the mandate that was given to me by my board to do everything within the law to make Suez's bid fail," Mr. Vernes said in a radio interview.  Mr. Vernes's unconventional defensive tactics turn what could have been a straightforward bidding war into a more complex battle that may involve psychological warfare and legal challenges, analysts and people involved in the battle say.  Mr. Vernes's move could result in turning the takeover battle into a U.S.-style proxy fight, and it is possible that neither side will end up holding an absolute majority, many analysts say.  Mr. Vernes didn't describe in detail how he intends to fight Suez, but said his main gambit will be to try to convince shareholders that it isn't in their interest to tender their shares to Suez because he intends to build up Victoire through a series of European alliances.  "The shareholders are free to decide whether they want to tender their shares and who they want to give their {voting} power to," he said.  Analysts expect that allies of Mr. Vernes will seek to buy Industrielle shares in the open market to push the stock's price above the 13,000 French francs a share Suez is offering, thus rendering Suez's bid unattractive.  But this would test the limits of French law on takeovers and concerted action, as well as the power of France's market authorities.  Mr. Vernes has been told repeatedly during the past few days that the only legitimate response to a takeover bid is a counterbid.  Stock market authorities last week told Mr. Vernes that if he failed to make a counterbid he couldn't make open-market purchases until Suez's offer expired Sept. 18.  And the concerted-action laws effectively extend the ban to allies acting in his place.  But financial sources say that it is extremely hard to prove concerted action, and that one way of getting around it would be for allies of Mr. Vernes to buy shares in the market and then not vote at the next shareholder meeting.  Thus they could pick up enough shares to deprive Suez of a majority but couldn't be proved to have acted on Mr. Vernes's behalf.  "Vernes's intentions are very clear," says Philippe Braye, an analyst at Paris brokers Ferri Germe SA.  "He wants to make Suez fail through the market, and he can do it even without intervening himself.  If he finds 20 allies willing to buy 0.49% each, he will pick up the approximately 10% he needs to deprive Suez of a majority."  To avert such a tactic, Suez had hoped to push for a prolonged suspension of trading in Industrielle shares, people involved in the battle say.  But Industrielle resumed trading on the Paris Bourse yesterday, ending a month-long suspension, market officials announced.  Attention now focuses on Industrielle shareholders.  Mr. Vernes can count on a 25.5% stake held by Societe Centrale d'Investissement, in which he himself is a large shareholder.  He also can reckon on the 3% to 5% held by Cie. de Navigation Mixte and another 3% or so of shares that are believed to have been bought by allies before the battle.  Suez, for its part, holds 18.5% of Industrielle, and analysts believe it can count on a 16% stake held by Centenaire Blanzy.  A further 15% of Industrielle is held by the company's own units, and this stake is currently frozen under court order.  Thus the fight centers on the approximately 20% held by the public.  If neither side manages to garner all these shares, the fight could hinge on who holds a relative majority or on how the commercial court decides to allocate the units' 15% stake.  International Business Machines Corp. will announce today some models of its AS/400 minicomputer line and a new release of its operating-system software, industry executives said.  The announcement is designed to provide a kicker for the AS/400, which has been phenomenally successful in the year it has been available but which has lately seen its momentum slow in an important area.  In Armonk, N.Y., an IBM spokesman said the company has scheduled a press briefing for today related to its midrange product lines but declined to elaborate.  The industry executives said IBM will announce models in the middle of the AS/400 line to get customers to upgrade from the IBM System 36, the less powerful of the two lines that IBM combined into the AS/400.  Sales to System 36 users have fallen short of expectations, consultants said, because many don't need more power and because moving their software to the AS/400 can be complicated.  "Customers say, 'If I'm going to go through all this pain to do this, maybe I should look at some other type of equipment,'" said Steve Cohen, an analyst at SoundView Financial Group Inc.  He said IBM has already begun offering sales incentives to address the problem but has made clear that it intends to do more.  Mr. Cohen said that because of the weakness he has cut his forecast of AS/400 shipments this year to between 55,000 and 60,000 machines, down from his projections late last year of 70,000 to 75,000.  He added, though, that he doesn't think that poses a problem for IBM this year, because it is exceeding its expectations at the high end of the AS/400 line.  Users of IBM's System 38 -- the more powerful line that was merged into the AS/400 -- have bought lots of the high-end machines because many were desperate for more computing capacity and moving their software was easy.  David Andrews, president of ADM Inc., a consulting group that recently produced a report on the AS/400, said he thinks the unexpected mix of sales will still let IBM meet its revenue forecasts.  He added that IBM should actually generate more profit than expected, because profit margins are higher on the bigger machines.  "If you're going to have a problem, this is the right problem to have," he said.  Mr. Andrews said he thinks the new release of the operating system will do such things as make it easier to move software from the System 36 to the AS/400 and make it easier for a non-technical person to run the equipment.  He said the operating system will also allow the use of a protocol called TCP/IP, which means it will be easier for the AS/400 to talk to non-IBM equipment in a network.  Consultants said IBM clearly needs to succeed more with System 36 users if it is to maintain the momentum of the AS/400, because IBM has already grabbed most of the easy opportunities among System 38 users.  George Colony, a consultant at Forrester Research, said he also worries that IBM has relied too heavily on European business for the AS/400, which sells for an average price of $150,000 to $175,000.  He said he thinks IBM has been below expectations in the U.S. and predicts business in Europe will slow in the next year and a half as networks of personal computers gain popularity there.  "IBM is going to sell a ton of these machines.  Let there be no mistake about that," Mr. Colony said.  "But we're entering a period of slower growth for the AS/ 400."  Adolph Coors Co. said it will begin advertising its Keystone popular-priced beer with National Football League games on CBS and NBC the weekend of Sept. 16.  The nation's fourth-largest brewer also told its distributors it plans to spend as much to advertise the new beer as does Stroh Brewery Co.'s Old Milwaukee, the category leader.  National distribution of Keystone will begin Sept. 11.  Coors said the Keystone ad campaign will include television and radio commercials and billboards.  The "Wouldn't It Be Great?" campaign is clearly aimed at the 25-to-54-year-old men who drink nearly all the popular-priced beer sold.  Twelve-packs of popular-priced beers generally sell for about $1.50 to $2 less than premium beer 12-packs.  The commercials tag Keystone and Keystone Light as having "bottled beer taste in a can," pointing to the special lining Coors created for the Keystone can to eliminate a metallic taste.  The campaign features three male fantasies -- being chosen to pinch hit in the final game of the World Series, being put in charge of the Sports Illustrated swimsuit edition and receiving "eight gajillion dollars" from lawyers who show up at the door.  The strong male orientation of the advertising is somewhat surprising, as Coors was one of the leaders in targeting women with its beer ads, especially with its Coors Light campaigns.  And the company takes a chance of alienating women with its swimsuit ads.  Women may not consume much popular-priced beer, but they do make more trips to the grocery store.  Coors said no women were included in focus groups that tested the ads, because the beer is aimed at men.  The target audience for the beer is the same audience that has made Sports Illustrated's swimsuit edition the magazine's largest-selling edition, a Coors spokeswoman said.  Coors did informally monitor reaction to the ads from women in the brewery and its advertising agency, which resulted in some changes in the swimsuit version, she added.  "The stereotype of the heavy beer drinker isn't far from the truth," adds Emanuel Goldman, analyst for PaineWebber Inc. in San Francisco.  "The NFL is perfect" as a place to launch the beer's advertising, he says.  The company wouldn't specify how much it will spend on advertising, but said it would be equal to or greater than the amount Stroh allocates for Old Milwaukee and Old Milwaukee Light.  In 1988, Stroh spent about $11.8 million to advertise those brands.  In comparison, Coors spent $23.4 million to advertise its Coors premium brand and $52.1 million on its Coors Light brand in 1988, according to John Maxwell of Wheat First Securities Inc.  Keystone will be Coors' first entry in the popular-priced category.  The brewer's long-held strategy of brewing only one label began breaking down in 1978, with the introduction of Coors Light, which is now its biggest seller.  In recent years, the company has added a super-premium, Herman Joseph's, and Coors Extra Gold, aimed to compete in the draft-beer category opened by Miller's Genuine Draft.  Coors shipped about 16.5 million barrels of all its beers in 1988, or about 9% of the beer market, according to Impact, a trade publication of M. Shanken Communications Inc.  Rupert Murdoch's News Corp., in a continuing battle to boost ad pages and circulation at TV Guide magazine, is embarking on an ambitious advertising and editorial campaign for the fall television season.  Last night, TV Guide launched a $10 million ad campaign -- a hefty sum by magazine standards.  The 30-second commercials, featuring stars from various TV shows, will air over the next five weeks on the major networks, cable TV and local stations -- and on News Corp.'s own Fox Broadcasting network.  And instead of publishing one fall preview issue as in past years, TV Guide will have five preview issues covering various aspects of the launch of new shows.  The efforts are "an attempt to get excitement back into TV Guide," says Joseph Cece, president of the Radnor, Pa.-based magazine, which News Corp. acquired last year as part of its $3 billion purchase of Triangle Publications Co.  "We need a big message now."  TV Guide's moves come amidst criticism of News Corp. for sensationalizing the magazine and blatantly using it to promote shows produced by its own Fox network.  TV Guide last week published a cover illustration of Oprah Winfrey's head on Ann-Margret's body, which TV Guide editors later apologized for.  A recent cover story, "In Defense of Tabloid TV," carried a photo of Maury Povich, anchor of Fox's own tabloid TV entry, "A Current Affair."  TV Guide also put Fox's "Married . . .  With Children" show on its cover.  "The quality of the magazine and its covers has deteriorated noticeably," said Cable Neuhaus, editor of TV Entertainment, a monthly TV-cable magazine.  "It's clear Murdoch will use the magazine as he likes.  They are feeling pretty severe pressure to get their circulation back up so they are reaching for the lowest common denominator."  Mr. Cece says that the magazine "has been under a microscope" since News Corp. acquired it, but he denies the weekly is being used to push Fox, and bristles at the criticism that TV Guide covers have become sensationalistic under the Murdoch regime just to push newsstand sales.  He points out that the tabloid TV cover was written by Van Gordon Sauter, former president of CBS News.  "You put your strongest story on the cover and we put things there to sell the magazine," Mr. Cece says.  Although TV Guide remains the country's most widely read weekly magazine, for the first six months of 1989, its circulation totaled 16.3 million, a 3.5% decrease from the prior year.  News Corp. attributes that partly to an increase in the cover price last year to 75 cents from 60 cents.  Advertising pages are in a slump too.  For the first half of the year, ad pages totaled 1,607, a 7.6% drop from last year, partly, the company says, because it abandoned the practice of trading ad space to local stations in exchange for commercial airtime.  Fall is usually a lucrative season for the magazine because of a blitz of network advertising in TV Guide directed at attracting new viewers.  Last year, however, TV Guide was hurt by the TV writers' strike, which delayed the network's fall promotions.  The networks traditionally promote the shows heavily in TV Guide and daily newspapers.  "Last year our pages suffered because the networks didn't have any new shows to push," says Mr. Cece.  "The fall season usually puts us on a circulation high for the year, but we didn't see that last fall."  He expects the fall preview issues to contribute to an improved performance this year.  Despite its efforts to increase circulation and advertising, industry experts note TV Guide continues to face a changed market for its magazine.  Charles Elbaum, a New York-based magazine consultant, points out that there are more TV and cable guides being distributed by the owners of cable systems, as well as more sophisticated TV logs in daily newspapers.  "TV Guide also faces a shrinking consumer circulation market," says Mr. Elbaum.  "Households appear to have reached the saturation point in the number of magazines they are going to subscribe to, especially when they could get the cable magazine free or find what they need in the newspaper listings."  Like kindergarteners all over Tacoma, Wash., the people assigned to Wendell Brown will observe some quiet time today.  For two hours, there will be no visitors, and all are asked to please refrain from disturbing their neighbors.  "It used to be kind of a Wild West atmosphere in here," says Mr. Brown.  "I think this is going to work out fine."  But Mr. Brown's charges aren't five-year-olds.  They're the 80 or so adult civil servants who work for the Pierce County Assessor-Treasurer's office, and they're not so sure about Mr. Brown's plan.  Mr. Brown, an insurance agent who was elected assessor-treasurer last fall, thinks he can boost productivity by invoking a two-hour quiet time every morning.  He hopes to give workers a chance to catch up on homework and map out a schedule for the day, eliminating distractions that used to result in a "two-hour coffee break."  To that end, all but a few workers will be forbidden from talking, and movement around the office will be discouraged.  A "Do Not Disturb" sign will be posted on the door and, except in emergencies, the phone essentially will be disconnected.  An operator will take messages.  The quiet-time proposal, which was to go into effect this morning, has already drawn a noisy reaction.  One employee grumbles that it seems "more like kindergarten."  Some wonder how the office -- which appraises real estate and collects property taxes -- will be able to avoid miffing citizens.  Sheldon Cook, the man Mr. Brown defeated in the race for the assessor-treasurer post last year, says he hears that the idea is wrecking morale.  "They are just totally discouraged," he says.  "I feel awfully, awfully sorry for the taxpayers."  Mr. Brown, however, says phone operators and a handful of others will be able to handle most of the queries, and that the advantage to the public of his office catching up on a big backlog of paper work will more than outweigh any inconvenience taxpayers may feel.  Moreover, he says the idea, which he experienced while working as a claims adjuster for Fireman's Fund Insurance Co., has a proven track record.  A Fireman's Fund spokesman said, however, that his company is now "going in the other direction.  We have developed more of a service-oriented system."  Arco Products Co. received a $325.7 million Defense Logistics Agency contract for jet fuel.  TRW Inc. received a $33.4 million Air Force contract for laser research.  General Electric Co. received $28.4 million in Air Force contracts for F-16 engines and C-5 engines.  Textron Inc. received a $15.8 million Air Force contract for ballistic missile research.  Sun Refining & Marketing Co., a unit of Sun Co., received a $14.6 million Defense Logistics Agency contract for jet fuel.  Navcom Defense Electronics Co. received a $13.7 million Navy contract for aircraft navigation equipment.  Bellville Shoe Co. received a $12.9 million Defense Logistics Agency contract for combat boots.  Westinghouse Electric Corp. received an $11.4 million Air Force contract for F-16 fire control radars.  McRae Industries Inc. received an $11.1 million Defense Logistics Agency contract for combat boots.  A federal grand jury is investigating allegations against Boeing Co.'s military airplanes division and at least one midlevel company official in connection with allegations of overcharging the Air Force millions of dollars on its KC-135 aerial tanker.  Details of the criminal probe into the activities of division were reported by the Wichita Eagle Beacon; the existence of the investigation was confirmed independently by this newspaper.  The government, according to the Eagle Beacon, contends Boeing overcharged the Air Force $11 million in the past decade on contracts to replace the aluminum skins on the KC-135.  The newspaper quoted Defense Department sources as alleging the Boeing division improperly charged the government as much as 13% more for aluminum than the division was paying its suppliers.  Because the five-year statute of limitations has expired on some of the contracts, however, the criminal inquiry is apparently limited to alleged overcharges of $3 million to $5 million, the newspaper said.  Officials at Boeing's Seattle headquarters couldn't immediately be reached to comment.  The 746th and final KC-135 was delivered to the Air Force in 1988.  The 13 year program was the division's longest running.  Boeing, which generally has fostered a clean reputation relative to other defense contractors, has lately faced a swirl of allegations of impropriety.  The company, for instance, has become the focus of a criminal investigation following the indictment three weeks ago of one of its former managers on charges of illegally obtaining some of the Pentagon's most sensitive planning documents.  In addition, the General Accounting Office, Congress's investigative arm, accused Boeing last month of overcharging the Air Force nearly $5.9 million on various computer projects.  Company officials have chalked up the rush of bad news to unfortunate timing.  The investment community doesn't seem too worried, either.  "The Street has the perception that in this industry there are so many regulations, over a period of time, practically everybody has a problem like this," said Phillip Brannon, a Merrill Lynch Capital Markets analyst.  Noting that Boeing's shares have been rising recently, closing at $56.375 Friday in New York Stock Exchange composite trading, up $1.625, Mr. Brannon added: "For a multibillion dollar company, a fine of a few million dollars is really not that significant" financially.  The Wichita paper reported that Boeing could be fined $1 million in addition to repayment of the alleged overcharges on the KC-135.  Two extraordinary mavericks changed jazz in the 1940s.  Charlie Parker was one; he changed the way it was played.  Norman Granz was the other; he changed the way it was sold.  His idea was simple: Harness the crackle and spontaneity of the small jam session to the prestige and seating capacity of the concert hall.  He presented his first concert 45 years ago at Los Angeles Philharmonic Auditorium.  Jazz at the Philharmonic, it was.  And it was a sensation.  Two days later, he heard a transcription of the concert.  It was a revelation.  He became convinced that live recording could capture a level of performance and spontaneity impossible in a studio.  He took a demo to Mannie Sachs, the reigning guru at RCA.  All Mr. Sachs could hear were "clinkers and crowd noises."  Columbia and Decca were equally deaf.  So Mr. Granz did what all stubborn visionaries ultimately must do when defeated by conventional business wisdom.  He formed his own business.  His goal was modest enough: issue records of his concerts, plus a few others by his favorite artists.  Early in 1945 "Jazz at the Philharmonic, Volume 1," came out and "How High the Moon" became the first commercially issued live record.  "This is it," Mr. Granz proclaimed in his program note.  "In this album we've got it."  He believed he had done something important, and he had.  What he didn't realize was that he had also stumbled upon the keys to a jazz empire.  Jazz at the Philharmonic (JATP) jump-started a selling reciprocity between box-office and record sales no one had imagined possible.  The album leveraged the concerts.  The concerts generated more live records.  And within a couple of years, JATP was a national phenomenon.  By the early '50s, Mr. Granz had virtually cornered the market (and most of the talent) in mainstream American jazz.  Some called him a monopolist.  He probably was.  He managed talent, produced records and packaged concerts.  By controlling his product from raw material to distribution, he built the closest thing America has ever seen to a vertically integrated jazz conglomerate.  Among other things, he used the clout of success to enforce a social agenda.  Virtually no Granz concert ever played to a segregated audience.  Money was expendable on principle.  When an Ohio department store invited Mr. Granz and his musicians to autograph albums but refused to allow the group's black members on the premises, he quickly ended the affair by yanking his entire inventory from the store.  What was the power of these concerts?  A JATP performance was a kind of secular gospel meeting, as explosive as it was manipulative.  There was no big star holding it together.  It was an ensemble.  Each musician was a star for five choruses.  But young people loved it.  Horns would shout.  The kids would shout back.  And the whole house would shiver in a frenzied collective catharsis.  Illinois Jacquet and Flip Phillips developed saxophone sequences on "Perdido" that could bring even the most knowing audience to a boil.  You can hear it today on several JATP volumes issued by Verve/PolyGram and other albums on Pablo.  But in the cultish world of jazz, success is always suspect.  Mr. Granz's methods also brought critics to a boil.  Some felt he'd allowed the money changers into the temple of the bandstand.  They attacked him as a purveyor of pandemonium.  They attacked his audiences as "lower-class swing enthusiasts."  Mr. Granz attacked back, admitting excesses but standing by his convictions.  "I've never tried to prove anything," he told Down Beat in 1952, "except that good jazz, properly presented, could be commercially profitable."  Profitable indeed.  While Mr. Granz built one of the world's premier private Picasso collections, many of the musicians working with him, including Charlie Parker, made the biggest money of their careers.  It was an era of milk and honey for jazz.  By the time he sold the assets of his Clef and Verve labels to MGM in 1962, his catalog numbered nearly 1,000 albums and fetched $2.8 million.  In 1973 he returned to the record business and brought many of his old JATP stock company members back with him.  His Pablo label never recaptured the commercial critical mass of the Verve period.  But it made no difference.  Mr. Granz, as always, pandered only to himself.  By the time he sold it to Fantasy in 1986 and retired to Switzerland, its catalog stood at more than 350 albums, including about 35 each by Oscar Peterson and Count Basie and more than 25 by Ella Fitzgerald.  This spring Mr. Granz and Ms. Fitzgerald were back in the studio for the first time in three years.  Yet, there was ennui in the air as he sat in his small Beverly Hills office planning the session.  "I recorded artists from a different era," he mused, "and most are dead now.  I really have no need to go into the studio anymore.  I think I've recorded all the people I wanted, and in just about every conceivable way."  Not quite everyone, maybe; he never got Frank Sinatra and Ms. Fitzgerald together long enough for an album.  But he recorded enough, and with an integrity, imagination and depth that ultimately has confounded his critics.  His 13 albums of solo piano by Art Tatum are in the Grammy Hall of Fame (Pablo 2625-703).  The finest records Fred Astaire ever made were unquestionably those Mr. Granz persuaded him to do in 1952 with Oscar Peterson and Charlie Shavers (reissued on Verve 835 649-2 2G).  And when Decca laughed at his proposal to record Ms. Fitzgerald in a Cole Porter songbook album, he bought her contract and made an American classic.  Some albums sold, some didn't.  Every artist didn't necessarily have to carry his own weight.  Mr. Granz routinely robbed Peter to pay Paul.  "For the first 10 years the concerts subsidized the whole record company," he says.  "When I stopped touring after 1957, Ella took up some of that slack.  So did my talkers like Mort Sahl, Shelley Berman and Jonathan Winters.  They subsidized Ben Webster, not to mention Dorothy Parker and Linus Pauling.  As for Pablo, it was never really a profitable company.  Considering all the time and effort I spent on it over 13 years, I could have made more working at Columbia Records."  But that would have been absurd.  Mr. Granz is not a company man -- unless it happens to be his own company.  He's too independent, too indifferent to the marketplace, too impatient with intrusion, and too insufferably stubborn to be satisfied with any way but his own.  He suffers fools poorly; and fools, in his view, make up most of the record business today.  Accommodation would not be possible, any more than it was in 1944 when Mannie Sachs turned him down on live recording.  That's when he became the recording industry's first neo-realist.  Others have been following ever since.  "And they still haven't got it," Mr. Granz insists.  "The major labels have never shaken that studio mindset of control.  They do a 'ive' album at Carnegie Hall, yet they put a forest of mikes on stage.  They balance, edit, filter, and doctor the tapes.  It ends up a studio date with the audience as a prop.  It's all fake."  Mr. Granz only sounds like a free spirit.  His feet never left the ground.  The business of music remained business for him, always.  Negotiation is simple, I once heard him say.  "If you don't get substantially what you want, be ready to walk.  And don't look back."  For 40-odd years Norman Granz recorded the artists he wanted the way he wanted.  When there weren't any more to record, he didn't negotiate.  He walked, and didn't look back.  But we can listen.  ---  Mr. McDonough is a free-lance jazz writer based in Chicago.  Whatever benefits elite colleges may gain from their information exchanges, some of their employees appear to be doing well in the process.  They work for Student Aid Services Inc., a closely held company that sells admissions-related data to some 80 to 100 colleges.  Three Harvard University employees -- Admissions Dean William Fitzsimmons, Assistant Admissions Dean Warren Reed and Financial-Aid Director James Miller -- are listed in its marketing materials; so is Walter Moulton, the director of student aid at Bowdoin College.  Their roles in the company raise ethical questions, according to some critics, who say administrators shouldn't be involved in profit-making activity that relies on their college jobs.  Mr. Miller has said the company makes a small profit, but how much hasn't been disclosed.  He, Mr. Fitzsimmons and Mr. Reed declined to be interviewed for this article.  Mr. Moulton didn't return phone calls.  Harvard declined to comment about its officials' activities.  A Bowdoin spokesman said that Mr. Moulton long ago disclosed his connection with Student Aid Services, in line with Bowdoin's policy of requiring employees to disclose potential conflicts, and that Bowdoin "is satisfied that it doesn't constitute a conflict of interest."  Student Aid Services gathers and collates information for financial-aid "overlap," a system in which the eight Ivy League schools and 15 other private Eastern colleges compare notes and fix financial-aid awards to students admitted at more than one of the schools.  The process, which affects more than 10,000 students, is aimed at avoiding a bidding war that the colleges say would be unethical.  One school says it pays $700 for the service.  For $350, the company also sells colleges the names of students who applied to their school but enrolled elsewhere and of those who made deposits to attend more than one school.  A company marketing letter last February included the names of customers, including Harvard, Bowdoin and other private schools and public institutions such as the University of Rhode Island and University of California at Berkeley.  More than 154,000 names were entered in the company's data bank in 1987-88.  The admissions-overlap data is valuable.  Knowing where common applicants decide to go helps colleges tailor their marketing.  Identifying multiple depositors helps them enforce application rules and ensure that all their slots are filled.  As a result of the service, which identified 1,225 multiple depositors in the 1987-88 school year, acceptances are sometimes pulled.  Chester E. Finn, a former research director at the Education Department and now at Vanderbilt University, calls it "gross" that a company selling such services employs admissions officers who can influence their school's decision to buy.  "It sounds to me like a form of self-dealing that in Washington would be worthy of reference to an ethics committee," he adds.  Edward Custard, the acting director of admissions at New College, in Sarasota, Fla., says the people connected with Student Aid Services "are clearly capitalizing" on their college positions.  He says the Harvard officials are well known in collegiate circles.  Few colleges, Mr. Custard says, would buy the services "if the officials were employed by Southwest Texas State."  (See related story: "Educated Mores: Elite Private Colleges Routinely Share Plans for Raising Tuition --- Saying It's Done Openly, They Decry Price-Fixing Probe; Critics Charge 'Arrogance' --- Wesleyan's Accurate Forecast" -- WSJ Sept. 5, 1989)  As the federal government accelerates its efforts to unload the pile of real estate it inherited from Texas's dying thrifts, it has found one gem among the junk: apartments.  "It's far and away the hottest topic in Texas real estate today," says Ron Witten of Dallas's M/PF Research Inc., which tracks apartment occupancy for interested buyers.  "It's really the only area where you can say there are more people interested in buying than there are properties available."  The strengthening of the apartment market is welcome news for lenders and the government agencies selling foreclosed real estate in Texas.  George W. Deuillet, who heads the apartment investment division of Henry S. Miller/Grubb Ellis & Co. in Dallas, estimates that at least 50% of the apartment complexes for sale in Texas are owned by the government or lenders who foreclosed on soured loans.  The Federal Asset Disposition Association, formed to market properties foreclosed by the FSLIC, has sold most of the "high-profile, Class A" apartment complexes in its portfolio, says Craig Koenig, acting sales director for FADA's Dallas region.  Of the agency's $112 million in sales in the region so far this year, 60% to 70% came from sales of apartment complexes, mostly in Texas, he says.  High occupancy, and the accompanying higher rents, are boosting the attractiveness of investing in apartment complexes.  In the Dallas-Fort Worth area, where occupancy slid to a low of 82% in 1987, apartments are now 88% occupied, Mr. Witten says.  And rents have risen 3% in the past six months, Mr. Deuillet adds.  Despite rising occupancy rates and rents, brokers don't expect to see competition from new construction.  Mr. Deuillet says the market won't support new apartments for at least three to five years.  David Gleeson, president of Lincoln Asset Management Co., predicts there won't be new construction until at least 1991.  Although most of the apartment complexes on the auction block were built by Texans, most of the buyers are from out of state.  Mr. Koenig and others say the majority of buyers are coming from Canada and the northeastern U.S., with a strong showing from traditionally conservative pension funds that are willing to ante up cash for what appears, at the moment, to be a safe bet.  Last week, the Michigan Public Employees Retirement System spent $45 million to buy most of the apartment complexes -- originally built as condominiums -- along Interstate 30, east of Dallas.  The condominium developments, among the most blatant byproducts of fraud at a Texas thrift, were foreclosed by the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corp. in 1984 and 1985 after the failure of Empire Savings & Loan Association of Mesquite.  The 1,765 units, all built since early 1982, are in great shape, thanks to $26 million spent by the FSLIC on rehabilitation, maintenance and the demolition of unfinished buildings in the area.  Mr. Gleeson, whose Lincoln Asset Management Co. put the sale together, says he offered the FSLIC more than $50 million for just the units in January 1987, when the occupancy rate was well below the current 85% to 87%.  The pension fund is getting the units, plus 57 acres of nearby land, for $45 million.  FSLIC officials familiar with the property couldn't be reached for comment.  The enthusiasm for Texas apartment complexes, particularly in Dallas and Houston, hasn't spread to other properties in the state, nor has it spread to other markets in the Southwest, brokers and sellers say.  Markets in the states hit hard by the crash of oil prices -- Louisiana, Oklahoma, Colorado and, to some extent, Arizona -- remain soft and unattractive to buyers who are uncertain that the local economies will support their investments.  In Texas, raw land remains virtually unsalable, as do retail and office properties.  But in the financially decimated Southwest, any good news is very good news.  Sales of apartment complexes led the recovery in the last two cycles of depressed real estate prices in Texas, according to Mr. Deuillet, whose apartment division is outperforming all others at Henry S. Miller with $55 million in sales over the last year.  If interest in apartments remains high, it could be a bellwether of another real estate recovery, he says.  To do that, apartment complexes currently on the market will have to hold their own against the impending offering of properties now under the control of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp. and the newly formed Resolution Trust Corp.  The Southwest Division of the RTC alone controls $25 billion in assets from 81 defunct thrifts in Texas and Oklahoma.  But both government and private brokers say they are confident that the properties won't be dumped at fire-sale prices that will push the Texas market even lower.  An FDIC spokesman noted that several millions of dollars in FDIC-controlled properties were slipped onto the market in recent months with no fanfare and no furor.  Mr. Deuillet says he noticed the FDIC's move to list its properties but was unperturbed.  "There is enough money out there chasing apartments that I don't think you'll see a lessening of value," he says.   By Raymond Sokolov  Kai Erikson had a clever idea.  He would ask a series of important people, mostly authors and intellectuals, to write memoirs of other important people they once met.  Then he published them in the Yale Review, which he edits.  And now he has collected these vignettes in a book that, since other, less discriminating folks already thought of People, Mr. Erikson entitles, perhaps with a nod to the disenchanted mood of some of the sketches, "Encounters" (Yale, 184 pages, $19.95).  Leading with his strongest card, he puts the novelist Paul Horgan's miraculous runin with the diva Mary Garden first.  It happened in 1935 at the Plaza.  Harper & Bros. was feting Mr. Horgan's second novel; but Garden, by then a legend at 58, was to lecture two hours before in the same hotel, on Debussy.  No one knew it, but this would be her last public appearance as a singer.  Mr. Horgan was thrilled anyway that the hotel got him into the room.  "She wore a close-fitting hat of black silk with a mesh of veil that came down just past her eyes -- her eyes gleamed with a tigerish light in a little blue cave of shadow that put the years at a distance, and yet conveyed the vivid present. . . .  By her valiant posture she seemed to tell us not to be nervous -- all would be well, indeed brilliant."  It was.  Her reminiscences of Debussyan encounter within an encounter -- were brilliantly evocative of another era in music, as was her wraith of a voice putting over the Debussy songs, regally.  But the most brilliant part of the Garden performance came after her own appearance, at Mr. Horgan's party.  He invited her, in a sort of self-dare that paid off tenfold.  The Divine Mary appeared at the tatty book party, with her entourage, and refused to speak to anyone but Mr. Horgan, improvising a preposterous scene for the gawking cocktail crowd to watch.  Almost with a wink, she begged him to write her a play, "a delicious three-act comedy of manners, very high style, "gaie comme les hirondelles," witty, blazing with epigrams, don't you know, yet with an undertone of sadness -- not sad, don't you know, but "triste," like a lovely day in autumn and full of love -- amusing love, don't you know, nobody throwing themselves about, but so touching.  And please: Mr. Horgan: Give me just one little song to sing?  The second act?  Perhaps, yes, I think, just before the curtain . . ."  It was a hard act to write -- Mr. Horgan never did -- but what he did write for Mr. Erikson is an even harder one to follow.  There are, nevertheless, several juicy matchups in the rest of the book.  Isaiah Berlin and Monroe Engel's admiring glimpses of the blustering, erratic Edmund Wilson make one feel sympathy for all who knew him.  Julian Barnes plays chess with Arthur Koestler, awed at the thought of it, later grim over his double suicide with his wife.  Quentin Bell goes driving with Henri Matisse.  John Hersey spends a summer with Sinclair Lewis.  Jerome Bruner, the Harvard psychologist, goes hiking with Jean Piaget.  Stanley Cavell, Harvard philosopher, takes the austerely colloquial British philosopher of ordinary language, J.L. Austin, to a softball game, where the author of "Sense and Sensibilia" hits a standup double.  Perhaps there is a bit too much here of now-famous highbrows and Ivy League profs remembering when they were young and eager and first saw the clay feet of their mentors and elders.  Frankly, I couldn't get enough of this gentle debunking, and would have liked it even better if it turned justifiably acid, as it does in Mary Lee Settle's portrait of awful Somerset Maugham.  Vitriol certainly makes better reading than the pious resurrection of her famous mother, Alva Myrdal, contributed by Harvard's first lady Sissela Bok.  To praise plausibly and forcefully, especially in these close encounters of the word, kind is a harder mode than unkind.  John Hollander, poet and A. Bartlett Giamatti Professor of English at Yale, ("Rhyme's Reason: A Guide to English Verse," Yale, 96 pages, $20) hits a home run here with his memoir of encounters with W.H. Auden over many years.  It is modest and respectful, but manages to shine a strong light on the older poet, on Mr. Hollander's own life from student to grudgingly self-acknowledged poet, and on a whole living bunch of fellow poets who met at Columbia or in New York a generation ago.  Mr. Hollander does this sort of thing with elan, as readers of his self-mocking poem of tribute for another poet, "To Elizabeth Bishop" ("Harp Lake," Knopf, 1988), well know.  ---  When Congressman Mickey Leland's plane crashed recently, it took down with it an American resident in Ethiopia called Roberta Maria Thomas Worrick.  Fluent in Amharic, Mrs. Worrick presumably was in that plane as an interpreter for Mr. Leland's mission to an Ethiopian refugee camp.  To American readers lucky enough to have read her fiction set in the various African locations where she had lived in various capacities, Mrs. Worrick was known by her pen name, Maria Thomas.  She was 48 years old and her wonderful collection of stories, "Come to Africa and Save Your Marriage," and her novel "Antonia Saw the Oryx First" (both published by Soho in 1987) were a splendid overture to a career, as well as its finale.  Maria Thomas, possibly better than anyone else, brought to life the predicament of outsiders encountering the Third World, and vice versa.  Her theme was her life, to the end.  Chemical Banking Corp. named J. Patterson Cooper president and chief executive officer of the Chemical Bank & Trust Co. of Florida unit of the bank holding company's Chemical Bank.  He succeeds John Holzberg, who resigned from the posts he had held since April 1988.  Mr. Holzberg couldn't be reached to comment.  The Palm Beach, Fla., unit is a limited-service bank that specializes in private banking for wealthier individuals.  Mr. Holzberg's predecessor was at the Palm Beach operation about 1 1/2 years before resigning, while that manager's predecessor, who founded the bank, held the job from 1979 thru 1986.  The bank declined to comment.  Mr. Cooper had been head of corporate finance origination, sales and marketing in London for the bank's global securities and foreign exchange group.  He also held responsibility for the public finance department as country manager for South Korea.  Generale de Banque and Amsterdam-Rotterdam Bank N.V. of the Netherlands are continuing to negotiate "actively" on a merger, a spokesman for Generale de Banque said.  The spokesman for Belgium's largest commercial bank wouldn't comment on a report in a Belgian financial daily citing Brussels stock market rumors that the talks weren't progressing and were about to be broken off.  The spokesman said that if there were any new elements in the talks, "a joint announcement will be made."  However, a banking source said the two banks would disclose information about the talks before the end of next month and that the news isn't expected to be bad.  So far, the two banks have acquired a stake of 9.9% in each other and linked a small part of their activities.  Bowater Industries PLC announced a #382 million ($599 million) bid for Norton Opax PLC, a security and specialty printing group that recently made a #484 million bid for De La Rue Co.  London-based Bowater, which already had a 26% stake in Norton Opax, opposed the company's bid for De La Rue and thus decided to mount its own bid for Norton.  Bowater declared its offer "final" but said it might be raised if a "competitive situation arose."  The bid is conditional on Norton Opax shareholders rejecting the bid for De La Rue.  For every four Norton Opax ordinary shares, holders will receive three new Bowater convertible cumulative preference shares and 600 pence in cash.  Bowater said that full acceptance of its offer would result in the issuance of 96 million new convertible preference shares.  Bowater has interests in printing, packaging and engineering.  Valeo S.A. said it has agreed to acquire full control of Mark IV Industries Inc.'s Blackstone Corp. unit for 1.5 billion French francs ($226 million).  The French group said the move fits into its recent expansion drive, which has been aimed at expanding in the auto parts industry through outright acquisitions and joint ventures.  Valeo said Blackstone specializes in temperature controls for engines and climate-control equipment for auto interiors.  Valeo said its agreement with Amherst, N.Y.-based Mark IV is still subject to U.S. approval and won't be final until Oct. 5.  Standard & Poor's Corp. said if the Financial Accounting Standards Board adopts a proposal to force companies to deduct billions of dollars from profits for retirees' medical benefits, the credit-rating agency will ignore it.  Scott Sprinzen, an assistant vice president for corporate finance for S&P, said that while medical costs have become an important issue in accounting, adoption by the FASB of its proposal "wouldn't cause any downgradings of corporate debt" by S&P because of resulting increased liabilities or lower profits.  In a statement that S&P will issue next Monday in its Credit Week publication, Mr. Sprinzen says that "the FASB approach could result in huge distortions to finance statements in the most extreme cases, severely reducing operating earnings, giving rise to liabilities that could dwarf other financial liabilities on the balance sheet, and substantially eroding equity."  Mr. Sprinzen said that the FASB's approach is "flawed, due to the highly speculative assumptions that would be necessary" to accrue insurance expense, setting up a reserve for the retirees' medical expenses.  S&P said if the proposal is adopted, S&P would "reverse the resulting accounting changes."  Currently U.S. companies deduct such medical expenses each year as they are paid.  But last February the FASB, the chief rule-making body for accountants, proposed that such benefits be accrued for promised future benefits as a form of deferred compensation.  This change would sharply slash corporate profits by as much as $2 trillion by some estimates.  That's because medical benefits aren't deductible from taxable income as pension benefits, which are tax-deductible.  If adopted, the rule would be effective starting in 1992 on the income statement and force companies starting in 1997 to book a liability on their balance sheets if the benefits aren't fully funded in advance.  Hearings will be held on the proposal Oct. 10, 11 and 12 in New York and Nov. 2 and 3 in Washington, D.C.  The action by S&P, a subsidiary of McGraw-Hill Inc., is considered highly unusual and some corporate executives believe it could help erode the power of the FASB.  "For a credit-rating agency to take such a stand attacks the credibility of the FASB and could be an attempt to force it to change its mind," said Thomas E. Jones, a senior vice president of Citicorp.  Mr. Jones, who also is chairman of the 35-member committee on corporate reporting of the Financial Executives Institute, said that the FASB's medical-benefits proposal "goes from one extreme of not accruing for such benefits to another extreme of using the most harsh interpretation to measure such benefits."  Harold Dankner, director of technical benefits consulting for Coopers & Lybrand, said while the concept of accruing for medical expenses is correct, "the FASB doesn't permit companies to anticipate benefit changes that would reduce future costs, and that's unrealistic."  S&P said that it will focus on current cash outlays rather than benefit accruals as proposed by the FASB to make its credit ratings.  In Norwalk, Conn., where the FASB is based, Diana Scott, a project manager, said the FASB has so far received 400 comments from industry, accounting firms and others concerning its proposal.  "While these may disagree on some facets of our proposal, more than 95% of the letters support accruing for retirees' medical benefits," Ms. Scott said.  Ms. Scott labeled S&P's action as "very irresponsible because this huge liability {medical costs} deserves to be given recognition just as pension costs and accounts payable are recognized on financial reports."  While agreeing there should be some accrual, some companies would like the FASB to ease the trend rate it uses to measure future medical benefits while other critics would like the FASB to give companies more time to spread the effect of past retiree medical benefit promises.  Under the FASB's current proposal, companies could spread the cost of such previously promised benefits in a catch-up by up to 15 years.  Some companies suggest extending that period to 20 years, 30 years or even up to 40 years.  Also, the FASB proposal suggests beginning the accruals when employees become eligible for such benefits, and some companies would prefer them to begin when the employee is actually expected to retire.  The latter would reduce profits by a lesser amount since it would spread the cost of benefits over a longer period, accountants note.  Ms. Scott said that the FASB is giving more thought to the length of the transition period for catching up on accruing or reserving for retiree medical benefits previously promised by a company.  "It's not inconceivable that we could extend the time to 20 years," she added.  Lengthening the time period would reduce the impact of the FASB's proposal on annual earnings, accountants say.  While practically all accounting firms agree with the FASB that some accrual should be made from now on for promised retirees' medical benefits, some believe the impact on profit of catching up on past benefit promises should be softened.  Don Nicolaisen, national director of accounting services for Price Waterhouse, suggests keeping the catch-up amounts, which add up to billions of dollars for all U.S. companies, on the balance sheet rather than deducting it from profit.  "Reducing reported profits by such a big amount seems to be too abrupt a step," he said.  Ironically, although many companies oppose some facets of the FASB proposal, a handful have already adopted the proposal early, as permitted under accounting rules, for a variety of reasons.  LTV Corp. adopted it last year and recorded a $2.26 billion charge to reflect the potential cost of medical benefits for its 118,000 current and retired employees.  LTV had already entered Chapter 11 proceedings and was taking a big write-down of its steel-bar business.  Since then, a handful of companies such as Merck & Co., Wheeling-Pittsburgh Steel Corp., Vulcan Materials Co. and Corning Glass Works have adopted the proposal early.  Financial analysts say that at troubled companies already reporting huge losses or at companies with strong equity positions, biting the bullet early on this proposal doesn't hurt as much.  Times Mirror Co. is betting that its president, David Laventhol, whose love for horse racing earned him the nickname "Clocker Dave," can help its Los Angeles Times keep its lead in the Southern California news derbies and maybe get it to compete on broader turf.  Mr. Laventhol, 56 years old, was named to the additional posts of publisher and chief executive officer of the Los Angeles Times last week, succeeding W. Thomas Johnson Jr., 47, who after nine years as publisher was named chairman of Times Mirror's newspaper management committee -- a post formerly held by Mr. Laventhol -- and chairman of the Times.  The appointment of the pensive, almost painfully shy Mr. Laventhol to succeed the charismatic Mr. Johnson caught most of the Times newsroom by surprise.  Many observers wondered whether the move for Mr. Johnson was a big promotion or a boot upstairs, and Mr. Laventhol did little to ease the speculation when asked Friday how it happened that he was named publisher.  "These things are worked out in the appropriate way. . . .  We work out what people should do," he said enigmatically.  Most observers agreed that in selecting Mr. Laventhol as publisher, Times Mirror is looking to draw from his extensive experience in the editorial side of the newspaper business.  "Clearly his editorial background is there, and Tom's really isn't," says John Morton, a media analyst in Washington, D.C.  For his part, Mr. Johnson said in a speech last week to Times Mirror's senior executive management that "I have enormous respect for Dave's reputation, his experience, his vision, his commitment to quality journalism."  The shift comes at a time when the paper, once complacent about its dominance over the Los Angeles Herald Examiner, its only competitor in the Los Angeles metropolitan market, is undergoing considerable self-analysis about its place in Southern California.  Although the Times is one of the nation's biggest and most successful newspapers, with a daily circulation of more than 1.1 million, it has been unable to quash growing competition from papers in suburban areas that it once presumed were part of its empire, such as the San Fernando Valley and Orange County.  And it has to battle national newspapers.  "This is a time of challenge for the Times," says Mr. Laventhol.  "This is a very competitive newspaper area."  But, then, Mr. Laventhol, a die-hard baseball fan, knows all about competition.  As publisher and chief executive of Times Mirror's Newsday newspaper in the 1970s and 1980s, Mr. Laventhol helped the Long Island newspaper grow in its market, then elbow its way into New York City.  The experience at Newsday may have provided some critical lessons that Mr. Laventhol can apply to the Southern California market.  Just as Newsday has had to acknowledge and cater to the differences between Long Island and New York, so too must the Times appeal to the varying tastes of readers in far-flung communities.  The Times has tried to do this with regional sections and "zone" editions that feature local news and local advertising, though Times executives were slow to get the zoned editions started and to give them the independence to launch a full-scale attack on the competition.  Mr. Laventhol, for one, is sold on the zoning concept.  "The Times commits much more resources to covering the region and on zoning" than do other big metropolitan dailies, he says.  "I think that's very important and a wise investment."  He says the paper will continue to focus on the growth of its regional editions: in the San Fernando Valley, where the Daily News presents a formidable challenge; in Orange County, where the Register has captured the market; and in San Diego, where the San Diego Union and the evening Tribune dominate.  That's not all.  The Times has been considering a Western regional edition that could bring the paper north to the Canadian border and as far east as Denver -- and maybe a national edition.  Mr. Laventhol says such expansion is "one of the more important issues" facing him.  Although the Times brings in more than $1 billion of revenue a year, it will take more than just throwing money into the fray to be successful with any expansion.  "We have to make sure that we're doing it the best way and the most efficiently," says Mr. Laventhol.  The moneymaking side of journalism isn't lost on Mr. Laventhol, who has "an enormous knowledge of the whole business of newspapers," says Shelby Coffey, editor of the Los Angeles Times, who earlier in his career succeeded Mr. Laventhol as editor of the Washington Post's Style section when Mr. Laventhol left for Newsday.  Former colleagues say Mr. Laventhol has a keen ability to take limited resources and make something of them.  At the Washington Post, where Mr. Laventhol helped create the renowned Style section in 1968, "we had a kind of mediocre women's section, with a tiny handful of critics, and he repackaged this and made it the template for feature sections of the next 20 years," says Paul Richard, the Post's art critic who worked with Mr. Laventhol during the Style section's inception.  Mr. Richard says that in addition to Mr. Laventhol's "lumbering, witty, New Yorky style," he was particularly taken by the editor's strong visual sense.  Visuals have become very important to the Times in recent years, as suburban competitors, particularly the Register and the Daily News, have mastered the art of color.  The Times is spending more than $400 million over the next several years for the latest in technology and a new printing plant to increase its capacity for high-quality color printing.  Still, Mr. Laventhol says, "it's not just color and graphics that increase readability.  I think the Times will continue to be a place where in-depth reporting will be important."  The appreciation for good journalism, coming from one who worked his way up into management from the editorial side, has won Mr. Laventhol many fans among his fellow journalists.  "This guy is one of us.  He comes out of our ranks," says Noel Greenwood, deputy managing editor of the Times.  "He doesn't look like a corporate type or act like a corporate type."  Amax Inc. allowed its 2.85 billion Canadian dollar ($2.42 billion) offer for Falconbridge Ltd. to expire, leaving the way clear for a competing bid by Noranda Inc. and Sweden's Trelleborg AB.  "We didn't consider it would be in our shareholders' best interest to raise the bid," said a spokesman for Amax, which had faced a choice between dropping out or sweetening its C$36.125-a-share offer to match the C$37 offered by Noranda and Trelleborg.  "We offered what we felt was full and fair value for Falconbridge."  On composite trading on the New York Stock exchange, Amax closed Friday at $28.375, down 25 cents.  With no other bidder in sight, Amax's withdrawal left some speculators facing a possible loss.  Falconbridge closed Friday at C$38, down 25 Canadian cents, in trading on the Toronto Stock Exchange.  Analysts had estimated bidding could go as high as C$40 for the Toronto-based nickel, copper and zinc producer.  Bruce Bone, Noranda's vice president and treasurer, said the Amax decision "was a bit of a surprise.  It would seem to be the end as far as Amax is concerned."  William James, chairman, president and chief executive of Falconbridge, wasn't available for comment.  Mr. Bone said he would be surprised if another bidder emerged, but said, "I don't think we'll be doing any celebrating until after the 15th (of September)," when Noranda's bid expires.  Noranda is a Toronto-based resources company controlled by that city's Bronfman family and Trelleborg is an industrial group.  Amax, based in New York, produces aluminum, coal and gold.  Noranda and Trelleborg together hold about 27.2% of Falconbridge on a fully diluted basis, giving their offer a value of C$2.13 billion.  Mr. Bone said the current holdings reduce Noranda's cost for acquiring Falconbridge to about C$30 a share.  But he said Noranda's offer was still on the high end.  "Certainly we had to stretch a long way to where we are," he said.  "The value you put on Falconbridge depends on what you think the price of nickel is going to be in a few years.  We think it could be considerably lower, but we hope we're wrong."  London spot nickel prices have fallen to a current level of about $5.80 (U.S.) a pound from $6.55 a year ago.  Amax made its offer as part of an acquisition agreement with Falconbridge, which had feared that Noranda's piecemeal acquisition of its shares on the stock market was leading to a cut-rate takeover.  Under the agreement, Amax is entitled to receive $20 million (U.S.) as reimbursement for costs and expenses connected with its offer.  Noranda and Trelleborg plan to operate Falconbridge's nickel, copper and zinc operations in an equal partnership.  The companies' proposed bid is conditional on the tender of at least 25 million additional shares.  Separately, Amax closed the sale of its Amax Magnesium Corp. unit to closely held Renco Group Inc.  In July 1988, Amax said it intended to sell the unit as part of a strategy to focus on its main businesses: aluminum coal and gold.  Amax bought the business from NL Industries Inc., Houston, in 1980 for about $58 million in cash and notes.  The business has a production capacity of 38,000 tons of magnesium a year.  ART  University Museum of Archaeology and Anthropology, University of Pennsylvania, Philadelphia: "The Sigmund Freud Antiquities: Fragments From a Buried Past" -- Sixty-five objects from Freud's collection of ancient Egyptian, Greek, Roman, Near Eastern and Asian artifacts, supplemented by prints, photographs and archaeological books.  The exhibit, which emphasizes the parallels between the procedures of archaeology and Freud's revolutionary theories of psychoanalysis, commemorates the 50th anniversary of his death.  Sept. 8-Oct. 15.  The show then travels nationwide through the spring of 1992, to locales including: the David and Alfred Smart Gallery, University of Chicago, April 19-June 17, 1990; C.U. Art Galleries, University of Colorado, Boulder, July 6-Aug. 18, 1990; the New Orleans Museum of Art, April 21-June 3, 1991; and the Jewish Museum, New York, Nov. 7, 1991-Feb. 19, 1992.  International Center of Photography, New York: "I Dream a World: Portraits of Black Women Who Changed America" -- Seventy-five large-scale black-and-white portraits by Pulitzer Prize-winning photographer Brian Lanker.  The women depicted, some famous, some not, come from all professions and all parts of the country.  Among the recognizable faces: Alice Walker, Sarah Vaughan, Althea Gibson, Cicely Tyson, Shirley Chisholm, Barbara Jordan and Coretta Scott King. 1130 Fifth Ave. at 94th Street, Sept. 8-Oct. 29.  IBM Gallery of Science and Art, New York: "50 Years of Collecting: Art at IBM."  Highlights include selections from the company's core collection of about 30 works from the 19th and 20th centuries by artists such as Thomas Hart Benton, Childe Hassam, Winslow Homer and Edward Hopper; selections from IBM's collection of contemporary art; models, photographs and drawings of commissioned works for IBM buildings; models and photographic documentation of notable IBM buildings (including an office building in Purchase, N.Y., designed by I.M. Pei); documentary footage of Joan Miro at work on the IBM mural in Barcelona, Spain, and of "IBM Day" at the 1939 World's Fair. 590 Madison Ave. at 56th Street, Sept. 12-Nov. 25.  THEATER  "Ennosuke's Kabuki": Kabuki star Ennosuke Ichikawa III and his company demonstrate their energetic blend of tradition and modern theatrical technique -- dubbed "Super-Kabuki" by Japanese audiences during a rare U.S. tour.  The 36 actors and 24 musicians will perform a doubleheader: "Yoshitsune Senbonzakura," the story of a 12th-century warrior-hero; and "Kurozuka," the legend of a man-eating demon adapted to Kabuki in 1939 from a Noh drama of the same name.  Metropolitan Opera House, New York, Sept. 6-9, 11-12 (212-362-6000); Kennedy Center Opera House, Washington, D.C., Sept. 20-24 (800-424-8504).  DANCE  United States Ballroom Championships: More than 2,000 of the world's Freds and Gingers, in their rhinestone and feathered finery, kick off six days of dance fever tonight in Miami Beach as they vie for $50,000 in prizes and several national titles.  Events range from such sizzling Latin-American dances as the cha-cha and "pasodoble" to smoothies including the Viennese waltz.  And between competitions the music plays on for spectators to shake a leg.  Grand Ballroom, Fontainebleau Hilton Resort. (305) 596-9507.  MUSIC  Los Angeles Music Center Opera: Maria Ewing dons Tosca's cape in a new production of Puccini's opera that launches the company's fourth season.  Neil Shicoff and Justino Diaz also star and Placido Domingo conducts.  Sept. 6, 9, 12, 15 and 18.  Also on tap, Jonathan Miller's staging of Brecht/Weill's "The Rise and Fall of the City of Mahagonny," conducted by Kent Nagano.  Sept. 10, 13, 14, 16 and 17.  Dorothy Chandler Pavilion. (213) 972-7211.  Honolulu Symphony kicks off the new season with a program of Bizet's Symphony No. 1 in C Major, Ravel's Concerto in G Major, and Saint-Saens's Symphony No. 3 ("Organ") featuring Philippe Entremont on piano.  Donald Johanos conducts (Sept. 10 and 12).  Then, on Sept. 17 and 19, there's an all-Mozart program, also conducted by Mr. Johanos, and featuring the Honolulu Symphony Chorus and Soloists.  Neal Blaisdell Concert Hall. (808) 537-6191.  Remember the "New Puritanism?"  Michigan housewife Terry Rakolta became a talk-show celebrity earlier this year with her campaign to pressure marketers to pull their ads from Fox TV's "Married . . .  With Children."  In Tupelo, Miss., the Rev. Donald Wildmon garnered equally hefty press for his own assault against sex and violence on television.  Two months ago, Mr. Wildmon called on consumers to boycott Clorox Co. and Mennen Co. for ignoring his demands to stop advertising on such shows as "Miami Vice" and "Tour of Duty."  Well, Mrs. Rakolta is juggling a less-hectic media schedule these days.  "Married . . .  With Children" still airs weekly with a complement of commercials from major advertisers.  And Mr. Wildmon's ballyhooed boycott hasn't exactly raced across the nation.  Even in the heart of the Bible Belt, retailers report Clorox bleach is still very much in demand.  In fact, a lot of people aren't even aware of the boycott.  "We haven't heard anything about a boycott," says Jeff Brown, assistant manager at a K mart store in Shreveport, La.  Mr. Brown says sales of Clorox products and Mennen deodorants haven't changed a smidgen all summer.  Other retailers around the country, from Biloxi, Miss., to Toms River, N.J., report the same: There has been no drop in sales for the blacklisted products.  No irate customers have registered complaints.  The failure of Mrs. Rakolta and Mr. Wildmon to generate anything more than headlines raises the question of why advertisers took both of them so seriously.  Earlier this year, some companies did pull their ads from "Married . . .  With Children" and similarly controversial shows.  Others promised to closely watch what shows they advertised on.  Some, like Coca-Cola Co., wrote apologetic letters to Mrs. Rakolta.  Fearful of controversy -- even if it had life only in the media circus surrounding Mrs. Rakolta and Mr. Wildmon -- advertisers are still reluctant to criticize their critics.  In fact, Mr. Wildmon's only real impact seems to be that he has successfully tied the tongues of Clorox and Mennen, both of which declined to comment for this article.  Mr. Wildmon, who is executive director of the American Family Association, a Christian advocacy group, concedes that the boycott is off to a slow start.  One reason, he says, is that Clorox appears to have raised its ad spending and promotional activities.  But executives close to both Clorox and Mennen say neither company has increased advertising expenditures or altered any marketing plans because of the boycott.  Mr. Wildmon also blames the long lead times required to prepare direct-mail solicitations and to get notices into the monthly Christian publications that he plans to use to rally support.  He insists that the initial publicity, which he says attracted "a small group" of people, isn't critical to the boycott's success.  He predicts that it will take six months for the full effect to be felt.  Mr. Wildmon says his staff has already shipped 100 boycott cards each to 175,000 churches.  The group has mailed 1.5 million direct-mail pieces.  In addition, it has sent a 30-minute TV program and matching radio program explaining the boycott to 80 Christian television stations and about 800 Christian radio stations.  But many churches that have received the material say they have no plans to use it.  "My name's on his mailing list," says Richard Jackson of North Phoenix Baptist Church, Phoenix, Ariz.  "But we're not participating.  We by and large don't involve ourselves in crusades, product boycotts, civil disobedience, things like that."  Mr. Jackson's church, which also runs a TV ministry, claims 20,000 members.  Chapel Hill Harvester Church, Atlanta, which has 10,000 members, 22 full-time pastors and a TV and radio ministry, also isn't participating.  "We are not involved at all," says Tricia Weeks, a spokeswoman.  "Once you start censoring anyone, eventually you become the one being censored."  Thomas Road Baptist Church, the 22,000-member church where Jerry Falwell preaches in Lynchburg, Va., is also abstaining.  Mr. Falwell didn't have much luck with his own campaign against Sassy, a magazine for teen-age girls that features frank advice on sex and romance.  "These groups will never have much of any effect on consumer behavior," says Jeri Moore, a senior vice president at DDB Needham Chicago, one of the few advertising executives willing to talk on the record about the subject.  "The networks will continue to air programs that they think advertisers will sponsor and consumers will watch.  Consumers will continue to watch what they want to watch and buy what they want to buy."  DDB Needham, one of Clorox's agencies, recently completed a study entitled, "The New Puritanism: How Widespread is it Really?"  After interviewing 2,000 adults, the agency found that only about 2.5% of the respondents said they refuse to buy products that advertise on shows they find offensive.  A majority of people, the ad agency concluded, think they should be allowed to make their own decisions about viewing.  "There is no new puritanism," Ms. Moore says.  Indeed, Mrs. Rakolta's original target, "Married . . .  With Children," is more of a hit than ever.  An all-new episode that aired last week led its time period, beating the programs on each of the three major networks.  And the sponsors, including Nike, Adolph Coors, Revlon and Amoco, were lined up out the door.  But Mrs. Rakolta is as undeterred as Mr. Wildmon.  In an interview from her home in Bloomfield Hills, Mrs. Rakolta says loads of supporters have eagerly volunteered their help for her group, Americans for Responsible Television.  "I don't think it's unrealistic to think that we could have a million members in a year," she says.  Just recently, Mrs. Rakolta continues, the Michigan district of Kiwanis International passed a resolution throwing its support behind her group.  Not far off, she says, is the support of the national organization.  That may not come as easily as she thinks.  "It would be quite a difficult process for Kiwanis International as an organization to officially endorse or affiliate itself with another organization like this," says David Williams, a spokesman for Kiwanis's national affairs.  "We probably would leave it up to the individual clubs to decide what service needs exist in their communities."  ---  Ad Notes. . . .   TWO-MINUTE WARNING: A campaign for Porsche Cars North America Inc. will test the limits of television viewers' attention spans when it introduces its new 90-second and two-minute spots next Monday night.  Minneapolis-based Fallon McElligott created the lengthy ads, which highlight the philosophy of the West German parent company's 80-year-old founder, Ferdinand Porsche.  FLORIDA ACQUISITION: Benito Advertising Inc., Tampa, Fla., announced it agreed in principle to be acquired by Fahlgren & Swink, a Tampa-based unit of Lintas, in turn a subsidiary of Interpublic Group of Cos.  Terms weren't disclosed.  WHO'S NEWS: Marcus Kemp, 38, will leave Ammirati & Puris, New York, to join keye/donna/pearlstein in Los Angeles as vice president and creative director on Oct. 1.  While the dust settles on the S&L bailout, Agriculture Secretary Clayton Yeutter is trying to get control of delinquent loans held by the Farmers Home Administration.  Past-due borrowers are into the agency for $8.7 billion.  Secretary Yeutter said he is determined to get control of this problem but he also noticed that past efforts have run into a familiar roadblock to financial responsibility -- opposition by Congress.  Capital Cities/ABC Inc. is thinking what has been the unthinkable: It plans to sell some shows from its newly formed in-house production unit to competing networks.  In a move that underscores the extent to which the networks are turning over rocks for new business, ABC Productions said it intends to sell made-for-television films and series to NBC and CBS, as well as to such cable services as HBO.  Each project must be offered to and declined by ABC-TV before ABC Productions can propose it to another network.  An ABC official said that ABC Productions, headed by former ABC Entertainment President Brandon Stoddard, has held discussions with NBC over two programs and with HBO over three films.  The official, Jim Brochu, manager of business information operations at ABC, declined to be specific.  "A buyer is a buyer," said one senior Capital Cities/ABC executive who did not want to be identified.  If NBC signs the deal with ABC Productions, it would be the first time that one network bought a show from a competitor, an NBC spokesman said.  Each network has formed in-house production units in an attempt to control the skyrocketing costs of prime-time programming.  The networks are in constant squabbles with the Hollywood studios, which supply a vast majority of the prime-time shows, usually over production budgets.  "We'll always need the Hollywood studios, but in-house productions is a way we can have some control over our own destiny," CBS Broadcast Group President Howard Stringer said.  CBS, for example, will have about one quarter of its 22 prime-time hours supplied by in-house productions.  CBS Entertainment Productions, a unit of CBS Inc., will produce two hours of shows, "Rescue 911" and "Wolf."  Additionally, CBS News produces three hours in prime time, "60 Minutes," "48 Hours," and "Saturday Night with Connie Chung."  NBC Productions, a unit of General Electric Co., will produce two new series, "Hardball" and "Mancuso FBI," as well as one segment in "The Magical World of Disney," titled "Brand New Life."  Last year, NBC Productions sold the series, "Good Morning Miss Bliss," starring Hayley Mills, to the cable service, Disney Channel, but Disney did not renew it.  NBC Productions redid the format of the show, and it is part of NBC's Saturday morning lineup under the name, "Saved By the Bell."  ABC doesn't have any shows yet from ABC Productions, which was established in March and replaced ABC Circle Films, which produced miniseries, films and the series "Moonlighting."  Another reason in-house production is more attractive to the networks is that it enables them to reap the financial rewards once a show enters the potentially lucrative syndication market.  "The Cosby Show," for instance, sold for about $500 million in syndication, making fortunes for its production company, Carsey-Werner Co. and its syndicator, Viacom Inc. NBC, however, saw nothing from syndication sales.  Currently, each network is limited by a consent decree with the U.S. Justice Department to owning five hours of prime-time programs.  The decree is due to expire next year.  But it is unlikely, broadcast officials said, that the networks will ever cease needing the Hollywood studios.  "We need Hollywood," said CBS's Mr. Stringer, "but we also need to control costs."  The beleaguered Vancouver Stock Exchange is showing new signs of life -- for better or worse.  Racked by stock scandals and scathing press coverage that helped shrink trading activity, the exchange's seven-year-old index sank to a record low in May.  But word of a gold discovery in a remote area of British Columbia, involving companies linked to 68-year-old Vancouver promoter Murray Pezim, seems to have brought speculative small investors back to the exchange.  The Vancouver exchange specializes in the risky, low-priced "penny stocks" of gold exploration concerns and other startup ventures.  Like many penny-stock brokerage firms, it has been finding investors harder to entice because of the increased attention on penny-stock scams.  Still, daily trading volume has swelled in recent weeks, reaching a record high of 53.5 million shares last Monday, surpassing the high set just the previous Friday.  The dollar value of trading, though only a fraction of the level on the Toronto Stock Exchange, Canada's largest, is also up substantially, peaking last Monday at 59.4 million Canadian dollars (US$50.4 million).  That's about five times the average daily value for the year ended March 31, when the exchange reported a loss of C$3.7 million.  The reported gold discovery in British Columbia "has just revitalized our whole business," says Chan Buckland, vice president of Canarim Investment Corp., Vancouver's largest brokerage house.  "It's fair to say most of the brokers' incomes are quadrupling over what they were a couple of months ago."  Brokers getting rich is no guarantee that investors will, of course.  Several well-publicized scams involving certain Vancouver-listed stocks and their promoters have made most investors wary of sampling the exchange's more than 2,500 listed stocks.  "There's a healthy dose of skepticism about the authenticity of that market as a whole.  It's going to take quite a lot to coax the mainstream investor to get back into the Vancouver market," says Robert McEwen, president of Toronto's Goldcorp Investments Ltd., which invests in gold stocks.  Adds Robert Flaherty, editor of New York's OTC Review, a monthly magazine that tracks over-the-counter stocks, "Generally, the stuff sells on hype up there.  I can't see going into that market unless you want to get killed."  Mr. Flaherty concedes that exchange officials "have been trying to clean up the place" by introducing tighter listing requirements, but he still advises investors to steer clear of Vancouver.  The Vancouver exchange is used to criticism and early obituaries.  Donald Hudson, Vancouver exchange president, only three months ago was fielding questions about whether the exchange could survive; Forbes magazine had just run a stinging article that dubbed the exchange "the scam capital of the world."  But Mr. Hudson says that provincial securities regulators have stepped up enforcement efforts in an attempt to weed out unethical operators.  He adds that the gold discovery in British Columbia, by Vancouver's Calpine Resources Inc. and its partner, Consolidated Stikine Silver Ltd., cements a turnaround that was already under way.  "There was some evidence that our market had bottomed out," Mr. Hudson says, including an upswing in the daily ratio of advancing to declining stocks and a gradual gain in the exchange's index from its record low of 686.65 on May 30.  It closed Friday at 844.0.  "Our market is the retail investor," Mr. Hudson avows.  "This may be an indication that the retail investor is back."  Some brokers and investors say Vancouver-listed stocks are also benefiting from expectations that gold prices will rebound from their currently depressed levels.  "In view of the strength in leading gold stocks on other exchanges in the past few months, some of this is now percolating into second and third-tier gold stocks, including some of those in Vancouver," says Jeffrey Nichols, president of Toronto's APMA (Canada) Ltd., an investment concern that specializes in precious metals.  But brokers and investors agree that the main reason for the Vancouver exchange's improved fortunes stems from the gold discovery in northwestern British Columbia by Consolidated Stikine and Calpine Resources.  The latter, whose stock price has soared with each new round of drill results, is one of a stable of companies controlled by Vancouver's Prime Resources Corp., which is run by Mr. Pezim and is effectively controlled by Toronto's Corona Corp., a big gold producer.  "It's certainly a world-class ore body, maybe bigger than Hemlo," declares the colorful Mr. Pezim, who is known in Canadian investment circles as simply "the Pez."  He is Vancouver's best-known promoter.  Mr. Pezim's many flops include an ill-fated venture that made greeting cards with audio-cassette messages from Hollywood personalities.  But he has also had a major success.  In the early 1980s, he helped found Corona's predecessor, and under his leadership, the company found Canada's richest known gold deposit, at Hemlo, Ontario.  Hemlo is now home to three of Canada's biggest gold mines, two of which are jointly owned by Corona.  Vancouver analyst Robert Sibthorpe, of Yorkton Securities Inc., calls the Calpine-Stikine discovery "the best looking thing I've seen in my career as a geologist and analyst," which he says spans about 20 years.  On the basis of results from about 100 drill holes, he estimates the deposit contains probable reserves "on the order of four million contained ounces" of gold, which would rank it among Canada's largest known gold deposits.  Several Toronto analysts who track major gold stocks agree that the find is significant, but note that the deposit's remote location near Alaska's panhandle would make mining difficult and expensive.  While small investors have caught Vancouver's newfound gold bug, few institutional players buy Vancouver-listed stocks.  "We stay with the big blue-chip names, like Placer Dome and American Barrick," says Carol Schultz, associate manager of New York's $120 million Oppenheimer Gold and Special Minerals Fund, one of the year's best-performing gold funds.  "We've never tried the Vancouver exchange," she says, mainly because its small-capitalization stocks aren't traded actively enough to accommodate orders from big funds.  No matter, the exchange is finding business from others.  It even managed to win back business from the advisers to a Texas gold fund, whose former portfolio manager was found by a Canadian court to have accepted bribes f rom promoters to buy worthless stock on the Vancouver exchange.  The scam cost the Prospector Fund, which is run by United Services Advisors Inc., of San Antonio, Texas, about $16 million.  "One bad apple doesn't ruin the whole batch," says Gil Atzmon, portfolio manager of the affiliated New Prospector Fund.  The fund, which has trailed many other gold funds this year, currently holds several Vancouver-listed stocks, including Calpine Resources, among its $92 million of equities.  "The nature of the (Vancouver) market is that it's a venture capital market," he says, "and it has its place."  ---  Monday's Market Activity  Tokyo stocks rebounded for the first time in four trading days.  Traders and fund managers remained cool toward the market, however, pointing to poor turnover, which implies that gains weren't strongly supported.  In London, takeover speculation, mainly about a handful of U.K. food and pharmaceutical concerns, helped boost the Financial Times-Stock Exchange 100-share index in thin trading.  Japan's Nikkei index of 225 issues rose 135.56 points to 34483.78.  The index lost 82.98 points Friday.  In trading in Tokyo Tuesday, the Nikkei index was up 144.93 points at 34628.71 just after the opening.  Volume on the First Section Monday was estimated at 400 million shares, down from 645 million shares Friday.  Advancing issues outnumbered declining issues 583-363, with 164 issues remaining unchanged.  While the FT-SE 100 got a boost in early trading, continued speculation about potential takeovers was cited as the primary factor in the market's continued rise above the 2400 level.  "The market is still afraid of selling," a dealer with a large European institution said, "as long as this takeover talk remains active."  The FT-SE 100 closed at 2419.2, up 11.7 points, but off its intraday high of 2424.5.  Volume on the London market also wassubstantially below Friday's level.  Only 369.9 million shares were traded yesterday, compared with 533 million Friday.  In other European markets, stock prices were higher in London, Paris, Frankfurt, Zurich and Brussels and lower in Amsterdam, Stockholm and Milan.  South African gold stocks closed lower.  Stock prices closed higher in Wellington, Singapore, Hong Kong and Sydney and were lower in Seoul, Manila and Taipei.  Here are price trends on the world's major stock markets, as calculated by Morgan Stanley Capital International Perspective, Geneva.  To make them directly comparable, each index is based on the close of 1969 equaling 100.  The percentage change is since year-end.  @ % This  @ Sep 1 Aug 31 Year  @ U.S. ................... 325.3 322.9 + 27.0  @ Britain ................ 721.5 716.1 + 32.1  @ Canada ................. 438.0 437.1 + 19.3  @ Japan .................. 1530.0 1530.9 + 7.7  @ France ................. 543.5 542.1 + 22.8  @ Germany ................ 254.6 251.9 + 22.4  @ Hong Kong .............. 1864.8 1863.6 - 8.1  @ Switzerland ............ 235.2 235.1 + 36.0  @ Australia .............. 349.0 352.1 + 20.2  @ World index ............ 534.9 535.2 + 8.2  The elderly's revolt over the catastrophic health surtax has drawn the public's long-overdue attention to health policy in this country.  Prior to the surtax flap, the air had been filled with calls for a Canadian-style public health-care system or for long-term care insurance.  Before the American people bite off these huge commitments, they ought to learn more about how the politicians are running the public system we already have.  The Massachusetts Hospital Association, for example, is suing the governor and other state health officials for not forking over payments for Medicaid bills.  The Michigan Hospital Association is suing that state for the same reason.  Three Colorado Hospitals recently won a suit against Colorado for unpaid Medicaid bills.  Hospital associations in other states have similar suits in mind.  Irene Frazier of the American Hospital Association explains:  "In most states the amount of reimbursement is below costs.  The typical scenario is that there are funds for Medicaid set aside at the beginning of the year, then the states run out of money near the end of the year."  She adds that "there has not been a sudden increase in health care costs," but because of the pressures to deal with crime, education and other areas, states have to find a way to balance their budgets.  "One place they're inclined to look is Medicaid reimbursement."  As Ms. Frazier notes, the shortfalls force health care providers to shift costs.  That is one reason private insurance rates have been soaring, causing some business leaders to join in the cry for national health.  In short, states have found another way to take money out of the private economy without explicitly raising taxes.  Such tactics by a private entity would qualify as fraud.  Colorado's Department of Social Services used a complex formula for shorting hospitals.  Ailments or hospitalizations were classified into different groups and weighted.  These weights were then multiplied by a base rate.  The base rate was computed by multiplying the average Medicare (the program for the aged) cost for a service by 0.88.  Then this rate (the Medicare cost times 0.88) was multipled by a "budget adjustment factor," which was 0.54.  So hospitals were recovering only about half of a Medicare reimbursement, itself carefully controlled.  The hospitals won their suit on appeal.  The Massachusetts lawsuit alleges that slow payments have snowballed into a $350 million backlog of payments owed to hospitals.  This has caused a number of hospitals to have "difficulty staffing their critical care units and providing adequate emergency care," according to William T. McGrail, vice president and general counsel of the MHA.  There's more.  Prior to November, all Medicaid claims in excess of $40,000 for inpatient care and $10,000 for outpatient care went through a review process.  Now, all Medicaid claims in excess of $10,000 for inpatient care and $3,000 for outpatient care are reviewed.  The MHA alleges that the change overloaded the review system and caused a backlog of payments.  The MHA also says this was intentional.  The holdup in payments is being used to balance the state budget, says Mr. McGrail.  "They're holding up on hospital payments because they don't have the cash."  Massachusetts officials admit they don't have money in the budget to pay for Medicaid.  "The legislature has traditionally underfunded Medicaid," says the spokesperson for the Department of Public Welfare.  The spokesperson disputes the $350 million claim, though.  "I don't know if that figure is accurate.  The hospitals' numbers bear no resemblance to reality."  Last year Medicaid cost $54.7 billion nationally.  It's often said that at such levels, the average person loses any real comprehension of how much money government is spending.  That's too bad, because public officials exploit that public unconcern.  After decades of making commitments to all manner of "public" services, they also know which big-budget programs can be pilfered to "balance" the books.  For a long time, voters allowed these commitments to grow believing that even large programs funded out of public revenues somehow kept everyone's share of the costs to an endurable minimum.  Ronald Reagan, however, won two national elections by refusing to continue jacking up taxes to cover ever-expanding social commitments.  Now, it seems, public attention will have to turn to the states.  An excellent place to start will be an examination of the effects on all citizens of efforts to transfer Medicaid's burdens to someone else.  The Environmental Protection Agency is taking steps to rid grocery store shelves within two years of apples and other foods treated with the possibly cancer-causing pesticide Alar.  The EPA proposed food-safety standards that would make it illegal to sell any food with detectable residues of Alar after May 31, 1991.  Until then, it would still be legal to sell food with Alar residues, but only at lower levels than now permitted.  The change would primarily affect imported foods and any of this year's U.S. apple crop that was sprayed with Alar this summer.  The U.S. apple industry says the vast majority of growers stopped using Alar, a growth regulator that makes apples redder and crunchier, after research linking it to increased cancer risks for children touched off an apple scare earlier this year.  Uniroyal Chemical Co., the Avery Inc. subsidiary that makes the pesticide known generically as daminozide, voluntarily halted Alar sales in the U.S. in June.  However, it contends the pesticide is safe and still sells it in more than 70 other countries.  Thus, environmentalists had feared Americans would still be exposed to cancer risks because of imported apples and other foods.  The EPA's proposal in effect would stop use of the chemical without formally banning it.  It would gradually lower the allowable residue level on apples and such processed products as apple juice from the current 20 parts per million to five parts per million Nov. 30, one part per million in November 1990 and nothing by May 31, 1991.  It would similarly phase out the levels permitted on other foods, including peanuts, cherries, nectarines, peaches, pears and grapes, although Alar isn't used much on those crops.  The Food and Drug Administration would be in charge of inspecting imported apples and banning shipments containing Alar.  The FDA, though, has enough inspectors to check only a tiny percentage of imported food.  Almost all of the U.S. apple crop, which is just now being harvested, will probably meet the new EPA standards.  Even if apple trees were sprayed with Alar this spring, before Uniroyal pulled its product, the residues at harvest would probably be less than the standard that would go into effect this November, the EPA said.  However, apples that were sprayed in the summer could have residues at harvest of 10 parts per million, which are too high.  "Any such summer use could result in treated apples being . . . subject to seizure," the EPA warned.  As a result of the EPA rules, expected to go into effect by November after 45 days for public comment, there will probably be a surge in food testing by states and grocery stores themselves, an EPA official predicted.  More than a dozen states now test foods for safety, and grocery stores have increased tests for pesticides on food as a marketing device.  Al Meyerhoff, a senior attorney with the Natural Resources Defense Council, which alerted the public with its report on Alar and children, complained that the EPA's action is still too slow and "permits an unnecessary and serious cancer risk for up to another two years."  The NRDC advocates an immediate ban on any detectable levels of Alar.  The EPA has been trying to ban the pesticide since 1985.  Studies found that a breakdown product called UDMH, formed when Alar is digested or heated, causes liver tumors in rats and mice.  It estimates that the chemical was sprayed on 5% to 15% of last year's apple crop, down from 40% in 1985.  The EPA has no estimate of its use on this year's crop, although an EPA official said there is evidence that some U.S. apples were sprayed.  Sweden's Saab Scania AB and Ford Motor Co. of the U.S. confirmed they are discussing "closer cooperation in various areas of the automotive business."  At a hastily called news conference in Stockholm yesterday, Saab-Scania Chief Executive Officer Georg Karnsund said "serious" talks with Ford have been under way for several months.  Nevertheless, a joint statement by the companies said the "discussions are still at an early stage," making it improper "to speculate on their possible outcome."  No further comment or announcement will be made "until conclusions have been reached," the companies said.  Mr. Karnsund and Ford officials, citing a confidentiality agreement between the two auto concerns, declined to respond to most questions about the talks or speculate on when an agreement might be reached.  The Saab-Scania chief did insist that the sale of the entire Saab car division to Ford wasn't under discussion, "at least for the time being."  But he didn't rule out the possible sale of a majority stake in the struggling car division.  Analysts said the companies' joint statement implied Saab-Scania and Ford might go beyond previously rumored collaboration in cars and forge a heavy truck partnership as well.  If Saab Scania is ultimately acquired by Ford, it could mark the beginning of a consolidation in the world-wide automotive business.  The industry has substantial and growing excess manufacturing capacity, largely because of the aggressive expansion of Japanese auto makers into the U.S. and Europe and into all segments of the car market.  European auto makers, including Saab, have been hurt badly in recent years by declining sales in the U.S., which for some is their biggest market.  Ford has been seeking to acquire a European luxury car maker in recent years to strengthen its image and its position in the European automotive market.  In May, Ford Chairman Donald E. Petersen said Ford "must have an interest and a presence in Europe beyond what we have today.  We're giving serious consideration to a series of actions in Europe.  It is critically important."  When Mr. Petersen made his remarks, speculation grew that Ford was thinking about buying British luxury auto maker Jaguar PLC. Ford has also been linked to takeover rumors involving West Germany's Porsche AG and Bayerische Motoren Werke AG.  But none of the earlier speculation was confirmed as specifically as the Ford and Saab talks.  Outside of its own European operations, Ford owns only a stake in Aston Martin Lagonda, a British sports car maker.  Ford has been the subject of varied takeover rumors the past two years because of its sizable cash holdings.  Last year, the No. 2 U.S. auto maker had more than $10 billion on hand -- one of the largest cash positions of any U.S. corporation.  But Ford has been cautious about spending its cash in the face of a declining and increasingly competitive U.S. automotive market.  Already, Ford is behind several foreign auto makers and General Motors Corp. in the development of powertrain technology such as efficient multivalve engines.  Ford has also spent heavily modernizing several factories to boost its vehicle production.  Most of Ford's recent acquisitions have involved financial-services companies.  At the end of last year, Ford bought several ailing thrifts in federally assisted deals that made it one of the U.S.'s largest thrift holding companies.  And in July, Ford made its biggest acquisition to date, the $3.35 billion purchase of Paramount Communications Inc.'s Associates Corp. consumer and commercial finance unit.  The addition of Saab's upscale models would fill a gap in Ford's strong international market position for cars -- and access to Ford's strong dealer network could stop the recent plunge in U.S. sales of new Saabs.  Meanwhile, by swallowing Ford's lackluster heavy truck operations in North America, Saab-Scania's profitable heavy truck division could get the expanded global base it has sought.  "The best pooling of management resources would be Scania driving the trucks and Ford making a major input into cars," said Edmund Chew, senior economist in London for auto consultant DRI Europe.  Separately, Saab-Scania headed off a possible clash with the Stockholm Stock Exchange by disclosing that the car division's first-half loss reached 800 million Swedish kronor ($120.5 million).  Saab-Scania predicted that the "negative trend" will continue at about the same rate in the second half, widening the division's full-year loss before tax to 1.6 billion kronor.  It had pretax profit of 11 million kronor last year.  Despite continued high profitability at the truck division, pretax profit for the full Saab-Scania group fell 30% in the first six months to 902 million kronor from 1.29 billion kronor a year earlier, the company said.  Saab-Scania normally issues financial reports at four-month intervals.  But after the Stockholm Stock Exchange requested clarification of the car division's status to halt market speculation, the company prepared the first-half report over the weekend.  Mr. Karnsund, Saab-Scania's chief executive, traced nearly all the car division's troubles to the U.S., the Swedish concern's biggest market.  He said about one-third of the first-half loss reflected costs of reducing production.  The rest resulted from various marketing moves -- rebates, advertising, dealer-related bonuses -- intended to reduce excess inventories in the U.S.  The first reports for August suggest the economy continues at a healthy pace even though the manufacturing sector is still dragging.  The nation's civilian unemployment rate remained a low 5.2% last month, the Labor Department said.  During the month businesses added 110,000 new workers -- a number the department said would have been nearly double had it not been for 108,000 workers removed from payroll counts because of strikes.  Counting military personnel, the rate dropped to 5.1% from 5.2%.  "I think they {the employment numbers} have to be regarded as another indicator that the economy is still firmly established on a sustainable growth path," said Norman Robertson, chief economist at Mellon Bank in Pittsburgh.  "How strong the track is, is very difficult to say, but it's indicative of an economy still at a level of full employment."  But a closely watched private survey of buyers for the nation's factories shows manufacturing stumbling in August for the fourth consecutive month.  The monthly index of the National Association of Purchasing Management slipped in August to 45.2% from 46% in July.  A reading below 50% indicates that U.S. manufacturing generally is declining.  "I would see that bordering on recessionary," says Daniel Friel, an economist at NCNB Corp., a large bank holding company in Charlotte, N.C.  The survey asks buyers whether such factors as production, new orders, inventories and employment are up or down.  An index of consumer confidence compiled by the Conference Board also dimmed the economic outlook.  The index dropped six points last month, to 114.7.  Nevertheless consumer confidence remains "in the context of the survey's history reassuringly strong," said Fabian Linden, executive director of the Conference Board's consumer research center.  And a newly released July figure, the Commerce Department's index of leading indicators -- designed to foretell economic activity six to nine months hence -- rose 0.2%, the first increase since April.  Moreover, a 0.1% decline originally reported for June was revised upward to the same as May.  But the department also said that declining interest rates failed to boost construction spending significantly after a 0.9% drop the month before.  The economy seems to be at a crossroads, and statistics from a couple of months aren't conclusive evidence of the path it is taking.  Still, Bruce Steinberg, senior economist at Merrill Lynch & Co., believes, "What we see here is an economy which still is growing, but growing sluggishly and also growing sporadically."  Clearly, the one big blotch on the economy is manufacturing.  "Consumer-related industries are making somewhat of a comeback," Mr. Steinberg says, citing recent gains in car sales.  "But the industrial sector {as a whole} is fading and continuing to fade."  The employment report underscored the weakness in manufacturing.  Although the big auto companies rehired a number of workers, the number of manufacturing jobs in the economy showed little change in August, the Labor Department said.  Employment in the electrical equipment industry continued to decline, bringing job losses there to 40,000 since November.  Many economists blame a tapering in growth of exports, which soared in the face of a declining dollar over much of the past two years, giving U.S. manufacturers a boost.  Robert J. Bretz, chairman of the purchasing manager's survey panel disagrees.  "The continued strength in the new export-order index is something of a surprise," he says.  "You would think the strong dollar would begin to catch up with export orders, but so far it hasn't."  Last week the government revised its calculation of the economy's inflation-adjusted growth in the second quarter a full percentage point, to 2.7% from 1.7%.  And for the time being, many recession forecasts appear to have vanished.  But Jeffery Bell, president Bell Mueller Cannon, an economic forecasting firm in Washington, is one who still believes the economy is headed for a mild downturn, beginning in the fourth quarter.  "You feel like it's falling off a cliff.  We think the cliff is going to come in the fourth quarter," he says.  For the past few months, the index of leading indicators had been signaling just such a crash course.  It declined four times between February and June, the government reported, although Friday the June drop was revised away.  But in July five of the index's 11 components showed signs of increased strength, including rising stock prices, growing capital-goods orders and an expanding money supply.  The result was the modest upturn.  Many economists and the Federal Reserve have been hoping for a slowing economy in order to reduce demand pressures that cause inflation.  The Labor Department's employment report said the average hourly earnings of American workers dipped one cent in August, to $9.69.  That suggests businesses face less pressure to raise prices to cover rising costs of compensating workers.  But for working Americans the stagnant wages aren't necessarily good news.  Inflation is still running around 5% for the year.  Figures in all the reports are adjusted for seasonal variations.  Overall construction spending grew to $415.7 billion in July from $415.6 billion in June, a statistically insignificant change.  Measured in 1982 dollars to eliminate the effects of inflation, spending fell 0.3% in July.  ---  James T. Areddy contributed to this article.  ---  @ EMPLOYMENT  Here are excerpts from the Labor Department's employment report.  The figures are seasonally adjusted.  @ August July  @ 1989 1989  @ (millions of persons)  @ Total labor force ............... 125.7 125.6  @ Total employment .............. 119.3 119.1  @ Civilian labor force ............ 124.01 24.0  @ Civilian employment ........... 117.6 117.5  @ Unemployment .................. 6.4 6.5  @ Payroll employment .............. 108.9 108.8  @ Unemployment: (percent of labor force)  @ All workers ...................... 5.1 5.2  @ All civilian workers ............. 5.2 5.2  @ Adult men ...................... 4.4 4.3  @ Adult women .................... 4.7 5.0  @ Teen-agers ..................... 14.5 14.7  @ White .......................... 4.5 4.6  @ Black .......................... 11.1 10.9  @ Black teen-agers ............... 31.6 27.4  @ Hispanic ....................... 9.0 9.0  @ Average weekly hours: (hours of work)  @ Total private nonfarm ............ 34.6 34.8  @ Manufacturing .................... 40.9 41.0  @ Factory overtime ................. 3.8 3.9  ---  @ LEADING INDICATORS  Here are the net contributions of the components of the Commerce Department's index of leading indicators.  After various adjustments, they produced a 0.2% rise in the index for July and no change for June.  @ July June  @ 1989 1989  @ Workweek ............................ .00% .00%  @ Unemployment claims ................. -.08 -.14  @ Orders for consumer goods ........... -.20 -.06  @ Slower deliveries ................... -.03 -.08  @ Plant and equipment orders .......... .05 .09  @ Building permits .................... -.06 -.08  @ Materials prices .................... -.29 -.29  @ Stock prices ........................ .14 .17  @ Money supply ........................ .27 .11  The seasonally adjusted index numbers (1982=100) for July, and the change from June, are:  @ Index of leading indicators ........ 144.0 .2%  @ Index of coincident indicators ..... 133.7 .5  @ Index of lagging indicators ........ 121.4 -.4  The ratio of coincident to lagging indicators was 1.10, up from 1.09 in the previous month.  ---  @ CONSTRUCTION SPENDING  Here are the Commerce Department's figures for construction spending in billions of dollars at seasonally adjusted annual rates.  @ July June July  @ 1989 1989 1988  @ Total new construction ......... 415.7 415.6 410.7  @ Residential .................. 198.2 198.6 196.5  @ Nonresidential ............... 99.7 98.8 98.1  @ Public ....................... 80.9 81.9 82.5  In New York City a young black man went into a largely Italian neighborhood called Bensonhurst recently and was shot dead by a group of young white men.  Beyond the act itself, which was simply murder, the case has set in motion some of the most complex factors that are the reality of race relations in the U.S. now.  The chance is small, however, that any of that complexity will be explored while this drama plays out in the public life of New York.  If the people of New York are having difficulty dealing in good faith with this subject, maybe it's because they believe the political elites in Washington have written new rules for racial discourse.  We have in mind the intellectual quality of the carpet-bombing of Robert Bork's nomination to the Supreme Court and more recently of William Lucas's nomination to run the Justice Department's civil rights division.  We of course defended both men from the tactics of their attackers.  However, some recent criticism of our defense of William Lucas, who is black, has taken a curious turn that is worth discussion because we think its tenor helps explain why race is foundering in the public-policy arena.  After the Senate Judiciary Democrats had mounted their high horses and run them over Mr. Lucas, we editorialized that many white advocates of civil rights no longer seem to know exactly what it is they're trying to achieve.  We cited neoliberal writers in particular, notably in the New Republic magazine, who said our support of Mr. Lucas didn't square with traditional conservative support for a colorblind society.  Our editorial has now drawn a full response from New Republic editor Michael Kinsley.  We would try to summarize Mr. Kinsley's beliefs, but we still don't know what he stands for.  In any event, we and the subject of affirmative action have given him a reason to output some argument: "If race or sex is a 'factor,' it will sometimes be the determining factor"; "if it was permissible for President Bush to take William Lucas's race into account, what is left of the alleged colorblind principle?"  Jumping from the top ropes, Mr. Kinsley writes of Bill Lucas: "A white man with his resume would never have been seriously considered for the job."  Mr. Kinsley, we guess, is saying that reverse discrimination is inherent to the idea of affirmative action.  And because President Bush selected Mr. Lucas and because we supported that choice, we are all engaged in what we claim to oppose, namely "reverse discrimination."  Therefore conservatives who say they support private, voluntary affirmative action, as we do, are hypocrites.  Like others, we are entertained by Mr. Kinsley's syllogistic exercises.  But the basic proposition in his rejoinder -- that if it's OK for the President to weigh Mr. Lucas's race as a qualification for the civil rights post, then it must be OK for the city of Richmond to set aside 30% of contract awards for minorities -- is jejune.  People in Bensonhurst and Brooklyn are picking up guns, rocks and getting set to beat each other bloody, and the New Republic's contribution is this intellectual prancing.  It may well be that for years to come any institution that hires a black man or woman will one way or another be thought to be practicing "affirmative action."  And no doubt it would be possible to analyze into eternity the logical semantics of those acts, whether they are voluntary, which we support, or are coerced by programmatic legislation, which we oppose and which the Supreme Court has lately opposed.  Whatever the outcome of the dispute over means, we remain convinced that after decades of bigotry or nonattention to black aspirations, the best organizations in the United States will voluntarily pursue the same end -- ensuring that blacks participate in the mainstream of their country's life.  If conservative support for this simple proposition still is a mystery to neoliberals such as Michael Kinsley, we suspect it will remain so.  U S West Inc. said it recruited James Ozanne, an executive vice president of General Electric Co., as president of its newly formed Capital Assets Group.  Mr. Ozanne, 46 years old, had been responsible for GE's capital group, including a wide array of financial and investment activities.  At U S West, he will have overall responsibility for the telecommunications company's Beta-West Properties unit and U S West Financial Services, which are being reorganized into the Capital Assets Group.  Beta-West concentrates on developing office and industrial real estate projects in such generally healthy urban markets.  Last year, the properties had an average occupancy rate of 91%.  Almost all of the unit's capitalization is debt.  U S West Financial Services, which has been trying to improve its performance after a marked decline last year, provides loans for hotels, shopping centers, aircraft and corporate debt financing.  Why can't the government follow commercial practice and pay its bills on time?  To Kenton Pattie, vice president of a Washington-based small-business trade group, it seemed like a logical question in 1978.  The answer wasn't so simple.  For a decade, Mr. Pattie has been the field marshal in a complex, frequently lonely legislative campaign to force federal agencies to pay their contractors and vendors in timely fashion.  The struggle, largely ignored by the press, ultimately produced the federal Prompt Payment Act.  The law's amended rules took effect in April.  Late payments are a nuisance for any business but can be devastating for small companies.  Ironically, the government -- which besides being the nation's largest buyer of goods and services is always talking about ways to help small business -- is a notorious deadbeat. (Small businesses get about 20% of the government's $200 billion in annual procurement orders.)  President Reagan signed the first prompt-pay law in 1982, requiring agencies to pay interest on money owed 30 days after goods and services are received.  Four years later, the General Accounting Office conceded the government was still paying about one-fourth of its bills late, often two or three months after they were received.  So Mr. Pattie spent two more years pursuing amendments to plug the law's loopholes.  "People tell me I've made a career out of this," he sighs.  In his long pursuit of speedier bill paying, Mr. Pattie conducted a classic, albeit undermanned, lobbying campaign.  He criss-crossed miles of marble hallways on Capitol Hill, sat through countless House and Senate committee hearings, coordinated testimony from outsiders, briefed congressional staff members and helped draft legislation.  In many ways, Mr. Pattie's campaign is a textbook example of how laws are shaped by special interests.  But while headline-making issues such as tax reform, clean air and the savings-and-loan bailout attract legions of lobbyists, Mr. Pattie discovered hardly anyone in Congress knew tardy payments to businesses were a problem.  Moreover, the executive branch, suspicious of congressional meddling, opposed a legislative fix.  "A ferociously mundane issue presents all the same problems and complexities as high-profile legislation," says Chris Brewster, who worked on the prompt-pay bill as an aide to Sen. John Danforth (R., Mo.) and is now an attorney in private practice in Washington.  "Kenton truly was a voice crying in the wilderness."  At age 49, soft-spoken and with the clean-cut looks of a young Cary Grant, Mr. Pattie doesn't look the part of a professional arm-twister.  "He doesn't appear to be a take-no-prisoners lobbyist, but he's an excellent coalition builder and he's dogged," says William Montalto, a staff counsel for the Senate Small Business Committee.  Adds Mr. Brewster: "{Mr.  Pattie} is so single-minded on this issue that you'd never want to be caught on an elevator with him."  With permission of his employer, the International Communications Industries Association, Mr. Pattie spent long hours visiting congressional offices.  "Ninety-nine percent of the meetings are with staff," he says.  Frequently, "they'll give you five or 10 minutes if you promise not to stay longer."  Letters from constituents, which helped him gain entrance, were supplied by trade groups: the American Fire Sprinkler Association, the American Builders and Contractors, the National Independent Dairy Foods Association, the National Tooling and Machining Association, and 28 other associations with nationwide membership that Mr. Pattie lumped into an umbrella group, the Coalition for Prompt Pay.  Each coalition member paid dues of $350 a year to help underwrite lobbying costs.  Mr. Pattie also labored to line up co-sponsors for prompt-pay bills introduced in the House and Senate.  "Co-sponsoring sounds Mickey Mouse . . . but it's the key to getting things going," Mr. Pattie says.  "One of my techniques was to issue a press release when they agreed to become a co-sponsor -- 'Congressman Fights Late Bill Payers,' or something like that."  Partisan politics complicated the effort.  Republicans took control of the Senate in 1980, then lost their majority six years later.  With each shift, Mr. Pattie had to recruit a new senator from the majority party to lead the Senate fight.  A break came in 1986, during debate over amendments to the Prompt Payment Act, when Rep. Jack Brooks (D., Texas), then chairman of the House Government Operations Committee, produced a General Accounting Office report detailing the government's late-payment record.  At first, the Office of Management and Budget fought change, but its arguments didn't sway Rep. Brooks.  "Y'all paying your bills late?  Y'all suppose I could pay my bills late?" drawls Mr. Pattie, puffing an imaginary cigar and imitating Rep. Brooks's interrogation of officials.  Ultimately, the administration agreed to support the legislation.  "I think they just feared the wrath of Jack Brooks," Mr. Pattie says.  The amendments prevent ploys like pushing back the stated date of arrival of goods and the almost routine invocation of a 15-day "grace period" for special cases, and also extend the application of the law.  Despite that, federal agencies are already figuring out new ways to drag out payments by keeping invoices floating in bureaucratic limbo, forcing Mr. Pattie to keep to his dogged pursuit of the issue.  He is keeping his coalition alive to monitor compliance, and is working for prompt pay bills in Vermont, New Hampshire and Georgia, having masterminded prompt pay legislation in 35 other states.  The rewards of the lengthy campaign?  Mr. Pattie says company presidents have sent him photocopies of interest checks from the government covering late payments.  "I've got quite a few of them," he says.  "It's pretty neat."  The adventures Milo and Otis are leading on American movie screens pale beside the one they had in Hollywood.  "The Adventures of Milo and Otis," a children's movie that is playing afternoons -- only on a paltry 239 screens, started as little more than a pet project at Columbia Pictures Entertainment Inc.  A small but engaging Japanese movie about a cat and a dog, it was a film that studio executives took under their wings in their spare time, investing only a few million dollars.  Careers didn't hang on it.  But from the time Columbia embarked on the project more than three years ago until the movie opened Aug. 25, the odyssey of "Milo and Otis" through the studio system is an exploit in itself, a story of attempting to transform an arty, foreign film into a commercial American success.  The movie germinated when well-known Japanese author Masanori Hata, who owns a huge ranch abounding with animals, made a series of nature films with Japan's biggest commercial TV network, Fujisankei's Fuji TV unit.  The films were so successful that Fuji made "The Adventures of Chatran," a movie about a young cat who finds himself floating down a river in a box and spends nearly a year away from home, all the while pursued protectively by a pug dog.  The Japanese film was graceful and low-key: sparse narration and occasional poetry readings interspersed with meows, grunts and growls.  Kon Ichikawa, a revered Japanese director, acted as a consultant for the often-stunning photography.  The film cost $8 million to make and was a smash with adults as well as kids.  It grossed about $70 million, the No. 2 Japanese-made hit ever.  But when Fujisankei executives decided to find a studio to release it in the U.S., they knew the odds were against them.  Foreign films almost never make it in America outside the art-house circuit.  And not since Godzilla have Japanese movies played widely in the U.S. When Japan's No. 1 domestic hit, Fujisankei's "Antarctica," was released in the U.S. in 1984, it was frozen out.  Still, several studios sniffed at "Chatran" and several nibbled, including Columbia executive Robert Newmyer.  He showed it to David Puttnam, then the newly installed head of Columbia, who gave it an immediate green light.  Though other studios offered better terms, Columbia had the edge because the Japanese trusted Mr. Puttnam, who earlier had paired Fujisankei with "Chariots of Fire" composer Vangelis for "Antarctica."  "There's no way Columbia would have obtained the rights to the picture without Puttnam being there," says Mr. Newmyer, who went on to produce the current film "Sex, Lies and Videotapes."  Promising to release the picture and spend a guaranteed minimum on marketing, Columbia picked up all domestic rights.  Under the pact, the studio would recoup its costs, then split further proceeds 50-50 with Fujisankei.  Executives on both sides of the Pacific agreed the film needed to be overhauled, Americanized.  "It needed to be tailored to American kids who watch 'Teenage Mutant Ninja Turtles,' " says Brandt Reiter, an account executive at Fujisankei.  And there began the real adventures of Milo and Otis.  Jim Clark, the Oscar-winning editor of "The Killing Fields," was assigned to re-edit.  Fuji supplied him with almost 70 hours of extra footage.  "Some might say we vulgarized it," says Mr. Clark, "but we felt it was on the arty side."  The recipe?  Lose the poetry.  Quicken the pace.  Add a long, zany sequence wherein the dog and cat adopt a newborn chick.  Add a sea turtle.  Bring in a star, Dudley Moore, to narrate the film and do animal voices.  The biggest change -- a gradual decision that began with Mr. Puttnam and accelerated after he was gone -- was to narrow the film's scope to aim at children under 10 on the assumption American teen-agers weren't worth trying for.  Targeting young children is difficult for any company whose name isn't Disney.  Parents get nervous if movies don't have that seal of approval.  On the other hand, as Disney well knows, children's films are evergreen: A new generation arrives every few years to watch them again.  With tots in mind, Columbia's editors removed graphic scenes of animals fighting and toned down other scary parts.  The cat, renamed Milo, still takes a long plunge off a cliff into the ocean, but scenes of him trying in vain to climb back up were cut. (Taming such scenes was also done with animal-rights activists in mind.  Studio executives "were terrified of the animal-cruelty people," says Mr. Clark, hastening to add that Columbia hasn't any reason to believe there was any mistreatment involved.)  Columbia brought in Emmy-winning Sesame Street writer Mark Saltzman for a new script.  He invoked an old Sesame Street rule: Remember how many parents are watching; don't worry about going over kids' heads.  "We set off little comedy bombs that go off later," years later, he explains.  So he put in lines like "Make my doggie day," introduced a pretentious Francophile pooch and, when a dog is having puppies, slipped in a joke about Lamaze breathing.  The music was next to go.  This hurt the Japanese: The score was written by Ryuichi Sakamoto, the composer who won an Oscar for "The Last Emperor."  But Columbia stood firm; a sample audience hadn't liked the soundtrack.  In came Joe Repozo, a Sesame Street composer who has since died, to write an ambitious score performed by the Royal Philharmonic.  By this time, Mr. Puttman had lost his job precisely because he alienated a Hollywood establishment that thought he only liked arty, foreign films.  Columbia's new studio chief, Dawn Steel, decided the picture wasn't ready to release, and assigned Gareth Wigan, a Puttnam protege who was asked to stay on, to overhaul it again.  After angry debate, they dumped the Repozo music, which Mr. Wigan now says "overwhelmed" the picture.  They nearly doubled the length of Mr. Moore's narration, cut out one of two night sequences (too many bad associations with bedtime, Mr. Saltzman says) and stitched together a lighter score based on popular classical music themes.  Finally, last spring, the film was finished.  It cost Columbia only about $1 million to remake, with about twice that again in releasing costs.  "The Adventures of Milo and Otis" hit the theaters to excellent reviews.  But it is playing matinees only, at children's prices, on 239 screens, compared with over 1,000 for most movies.  This makes box office hard to tally, but it has grossed well over $1 million in 11 days, its per-screen average the second-best in the nation on week days last week.  Masari Kakutani, the film's Japanese producer, wonders what the movie might do if it were playing for a broad audience around the clock.  He is still convinced that it could have been a picture that would draw entire families.  "I am very thankful to Columbia," he says.  "But 25 million households in America have cats, and even more than that have dogs.  I would like to have seen more screens."  Lomas Financial Corp., raising the ante in its high-stakes dispute with lenders, said it defaulted on $145 million in notes that matured Friday.  The move, which triggered a cross default on about $1.45 billion in senior debt, increased the chances that the troubled financial services and real estate concern will be forced to seek bankruptcy-court protection.  Jess Hay, chairman and chief executive officer, said that the company prefers to avoid a bankruptcy-law filing but that "we are committed to protecting and preserving the assets of Lomas and, to that end, we will take whatever actions may be necessary."  Some analysts expressed surprise that Lomas was unable to reach at least a tentative debt restructuring accord with its lenders -- which include 34 banks and four insurance companies -- before Friday's default.  Because the lenders are unsecured, analysts speculated that they would concede some key negotiating points to avoid a bankruptcy proceeding.  Talks continued throughout the holiday weekend, but the company said it had nothing new to report.  "They're beyond the point of trying to play hardball," said Frank Anderson, an analyst with Stephens Inc., Little Rock, Ark.  "The whole thing doesn't make sense."  "It's obviously a giant chicken game," added Houston bankruptcy attorney Hugh Ray.  "Neither side flinched, and now things have fallen into the abyss, so to speak."  The sticking point in the negotiations is Lomas's insistence that any new credit facility cover principal payments on certain subordinated debt that might mature during the next two years.  The senior lenders, in exchange, would swap their unsecured loans for secured positions.  The company said that lead banks, Chase Manhattan Bank and Bank of New York, have agreed in principle to the terms but that some of the other lenders are balking.  Despite the impasse, Lomas's common rose to close at $3.75 a share, up 25 cents, in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange Friday.  Its bonds, however, have been hammered in recent days.  For example, the company's 10 3/8% subordinated notes due 1993, which two weeks ago were trading at more than $85 each, were being offered at $68 Friday and finding no takers, according to Jay Lustig, an analyst at Drake Capital Securities Inc., Santa Monica, Calif.  "I'll tell you, the bondholders are white-knuckling it," said Mr. Lustig.  He said he thinks the company's condition may be worse than reflected in its financial statements, in part because of the large amount of "good will" on its books.  Mr. Lustig also takes a dim view of the prospects for common shareholders, particularly in the event of a bankruptcy.  "The common stock of Lomas has about as much chance of ever being worth anything as Pete Rose does of being named 'Sportsman of the Year' for 1989," he said.  Because of the default Friday, Moody's Investors Service Inc. said it downgraded the credit ratings of Lomas Financial, a subsidiary, Equitable Lomas Leasing Corp., and Lomas & Nettleton Mortgage Investors, an affiliated real estate investment trust.  The rating service said it downgraded Lomas Financial's senior notes to Caa from single-B-2, and subordinated debt to Ca from Caa.  Moody's said it lowered the rating on the leasing unit's senior notes, including medium-term notes, to Caa from single-B-1, while lowering Lomas and Nettleton Mortgage's subordinated notes to Caa from single-B-1.  Separately, a Lomas Financial shareholder last week filed suit in federal court here charging that the company lied about its financial condition last year and falsely inflated its net worth to avoid violating debt covenants.  David Jaroslawicz, a New York shareholder, filed a class-action complaint alleging that Lomas made "false and misleading statements" last year after taking a $93 million charge in February 1988 against anticipated losses in its mortgage banking operations.  Although Lomas said at the time it expected the charge would be adequate to cover losses, the company a few months later announced that it was taking another $25 million charge to discontinue its single-family mortgage origination business, the suit contends.  Lomas declined to comment on the suit.  The problem of solid-waste disposal in America is not that the industry does not know how to solve it.  We know how to operate a system that would satisfy the most ardent environmentalist, and still allow us to make money.  No, our problem has to do with values, public priorities and tradeoffs.  Private enterprise is trying to mesh with a set of public processes, and there is sand in the gears.  More than a third of the nation's landfills will be full within the next decade.  New York will exhaust its capacity in nine years, Los Angeles in six, and Philadelphia is out of capacity now, and must engage in continuous negotiations to dispose of its 800,000 tons per year.  Why?  Nobody wants garbage put down anywhere near where he lives, the "not-in-my-backyard" syndrome -- the dreaded NIMBY.  It has been argued that we can recycle waste and reduce waste at the source to such an extent that our need for disposal facilities will disappear.  But this is pie in the sky.  The Environmental Protection Agency estimates that by the year 2000, 55% of municipal wastes will still have to be landfilled.  That's down from 77.5% now, but that still means finding a place for an estimated 107 million tons of waste.  Ten years ago landfill disposal commonly cost $5 to $10 a ton.  Today, fees of $50 a ton are common and $140 is not unknown.  One response is to control costs by regulation -- that is, by treating the disposal industry like a utility and subjecting it to rate regulation.  This is an even worse error than supposing we don't need more disposal capacity.  In New Jersey, the state that has pursued the public-utility option most aggressively, the number of waste haulers has declined from about 2,300 in 1970 to less than 650 this year, demonstrating the truth that people will not stay in business if they can't make a living.  Much New Jersey waste is going out of state.  A recent governor's task force there has recommended deregulation of collection.  Free markets are not perfect, but they are efficient allocators of services.  The U.S. waste-disposal system is such a system.  But it is being blocked by the other great hinge of our free society, the right of our citizens to determine their own fate.  Why do Americans so resist disposal facilities?  And why haven't officials responded more energetically to the NIMBY problem?  The questions are more complicated than they seem.  Granted, a landfill is not a rose garden, but neither is a tire factory or a steel mill, and towns fight to get those.  Perhaps it is the implied degradation associated with the word "garbage."  You often see letters in rural newspapers asking why those city folks can't take care of their own garbage.  Less subtle is the fear that a nearby site will lower property values.  These problems are not helped by the typical absence of any substantive benefit offered to a community in return for accepting a waste-disposal facility, particularly from the standpoint of the community's elected leaders.  Politically, there is no upside to supporting an incinerator or landfill in your district or town.  From the standpoint of the state there is a definite benefit -- indeed a necessity.  Yet state governments have been extremely reluctant to use the brute-force approach, one without which we would have no interstate highway system.  State officials don't want to seem like a Goliath beating down some rural David over garbage disposal.  But this does not explain why the states have not set up a workable process for selecting sites, explaining risks, and distributing benefits.  This inaction means the states have delegated responsibility to localities without providing the incentives to make waste management possible.  There are a number of reasons for the absence of a political solution.  Most important, it is hard for people to believe in the reality of the problem as long as the garbage is picked up every day and fees are a relatively small fraction of the average person's income.  A related reason is that much of American politics has become a kind of demonology.  We are ever ready to tar the villain.  It is much harder to find solutions when everyone shares a little of the blame, as is the case with waste generation.  For example, while it was relatively easy to place air-pollution controls on factories, it has always been hard to influence individuals' driving habits -- now a more significant source of air pollution in many areas.  To get anything done in a free society three things are needed.  First there has to be agreement on a set of values, some public consensus that there is a goal worth pursuing.  Next must come a set of incentives, by which society can be seen to reward those who pursue the values and sanction those who do not.  In market economies incentives usually involve money.  Finally, institutions must be able to adopt the values and administer the incentives.  In the waste business, the values are in conflict, the incentives push mainly in the wrong direction, and the institutions are weak or nonexistent.  We value, for example, the convenience of products such as disposable diapers and we value attractive packaging.  We show this at the checkout counter, which is a powerful incentive for the people who supply such products.  We also value the right of local people to make local land-use decisions, and we show this in public meetings and in the voting booth, which is a powerful incentive for people in political office.  The value of an efficient and fair waste-disposal system has not been as well articulated, and there are few incentives that support such a value.  Disposal costs are rarely included product costs.  People who produce lots of trash rarely are charged more than those who produce little -- and if they are, it's usually not enough to make them change their behavior.  Nor has the consumer faced much social pressure to generate less waste.  Producers, on the other hand, give high priority to reducing the generation of waste -- especially hazardous waste.  This again shows the power of appropriate incentives: in this case the money lost in the form of liability when the hazardous waste is improperly discarded.  The federal government's response to municipal waste has been focused almost exclusively on design standards for disposal facilities.  Aside from these regulations and some research and technical assistance, the federal government believes that its major contribution will be in encouraging source reduction and recycling.  This makes some sense, since it is the nation's single largest customer, and changes in its procurement standards could stimulate markets for recycled materials.  But after source reduction and recycling are implemented to their fullest, new capacity for the residue will still be needed.  In a remarkable display of both humility and generosity, the federal government has decided to let the states and localities deal with the siting issue by themselves.  They -- or, in the breach, industry -- can improve the way this is done.  Mechanisms must be established for local choice.  The public, politicians and the media must be told of the risks of waste disposal or incineration and how they would be controlled, and the host community must share in the benefits from the facility.  It should not be surprising that people are perfectly willing to endure something unpleasant if you pay them for it.  These principles were applied by ECOS Inc., a company (with which I was affiliated) based in Washington state.  The state needs a hazardous-waste-handling facility -- as do many states.  The company conducted a statewide screening that eliminated almost 80% of Washington's area, based on such criteria as sensitive lands and land uses, natural hazards, transportation accessibility, and historical or archaeological importance.  Communities in the remainder of the state were then publicly asked if they might be interested in hosting the facility.  A good number responded.  After some initial discussion, informational meetings were held in nine of them.  The company helped interested communities form citizen advisory committees to represent the community at large and serve as liaisons to the firm.  These committees negotiated proposals that included stringent environmental safeguards and substantial economic benefits for the community.  This March, two towns put the proposals to a vote.  In both places more than 60% of the voters favored accepting the proposal and allowing the facility to be opened in their community.  The company is now doing the detailed geological workups, on the basis of which a single site will be selected.  Only then will it begin work on a permit application.  While this was done for a hazardous waste facility, a similar process would work for a municipal waste facility.  Here we have an example of a private firm making imaginative use of what is essentially a political process.  Political leaders at the state level might well do the same.  You may be able to take the garbage out of politics, but you can't take the politics out of garbage.  ---  Mr. Ruckelshaus, twice administrator of the EPA, is currently chairman and CEO of Browning-Ferris Industries, a world-wide waste-disposal company.  United Illuminating Co. is considering proposing a merger with Public Service Co. of New Hampshire as part of a bankruptcy-law reorganization plan for the New Hampshire utility, a source close to PS of New Hampshire said.  The merger would combine the two largest owners of the long-delayed Seabrook, N.H., nuclear plant -- PS of New Hampshire with its 35.6% stake and United Illuminating with its 17.5% stake.  United Illuminating, based in New Haven, Conn., is the third utility to express an interest in acquiring or merging with PS of New Hampshire, and others may yet emerge.  Northeast Utilities, Hartford, Conn., and New England Electric System, Westborough, Mass., both have proposed acquiring all or part of the New Hampshire utility.  In addition, PS of New Hampshire is expected to file an amended plan for internal reorganization in which it would emerge from bankruptcy-law proceedings as an independent company.  The bankruptcy court has set a deadline of Sept. 15 for filing reorganization plans.  Creditors and shareholders of PS of New Hampshire will then consider the competing plans and decide which one to support.  Any plan must be approved by the court.  Under Chapter 11 bankruptcy-law proceedings, a company is protected from creditors while it seeks to reorganize its finances.  PS of New Hampshire filed for Chapter 11 status in January 1988 because it wasn't able to pay interest on the huge debt it took on to finance its share of Seabrook.  Ernest A. Bates, chairman and chief executive officer of this diagnostic imaging services concern, temporarily assumed the additional posts of president and chief operating officer, following the resignation of J. Rock Tonkel Thursday.  The company declined to elaborate on the departure of Mr. Tonkel, who assumed the posts in February, but said it intends to seek a replacement.  Paul R. Schlaack, president and chief executive officer of Equitable Investment Services Inc., was named a director of this thrift holding company, filling a vacancy.  Sept. 2 was the 150th anniversary of the birth of Henry George.  George is best remembered today for his advocacy of the "single tax" on land -- a social reform that attracted a cult following a century ago.  But he was also a brilliant propagandist for free trade, most notably in his 1886 work, "Protection or Free Trade."  C. Lowell Harriss, emeritus professor of economics at Columbia, collected some of George's pithiest remarks in the July issue of the American Journal of Economics and Sociology:  It might be to the interests of (lighting) companies to restrict the number and size of windows, but hardly to the interests of a community.  Broken limbs bring fees to surgeons, but would it profit a municipality to prohibit the removal of ice from sidewalks in order to encourage surgery?  Economically, what difference is there between restricting the importation of iron to benefit iron-producers and restricting sanitary improvements to benefit undertakers?  ---  To introduce a tariff bill into congress or parliament is like throwing a banana into a cage of monkeys.  No sooner is it proposed to protect one industry than all the industries that are capable of protection begin to screech and scramble for it.  ---  If to prevent trade were to stimulate industry and promote prosperity, then the localities where he was most isolated would show the first advances of man.  The natural protection to home industry afforded by rugged mountains-chains, by burning deserts, or by seas too wide and tempestuous for the frail bark of the early mariner would have given us the first glimmerings of civilization and shown its most rapid growth.  But, in fact, it is where trade could best be carried on that we find wealth first accumulating and civilization beginning.  It is on accessible harbors, by navigable rivers and much traveled highways that we find cities arising and the arts and sciences developing.  ---  The result (of trying to enact laws that would protect only those industries that it is theoretically justifiable to protect) is the enactment of a tariff which resembles the theoretical protectionist's ideas of what a tariff should be about as closely as a bucketful of paint thrown at a wall resembles the fresco of a Raphael.  --- All experience shows that the policy of encouragement, once begun, leads to a scramble in which it is the strong, not the weak; the unscrupulous, not the deserving, that succeed.  What are really infant industries have no more chance in the struggle for governmental encouragement than infant pigs have with full grown swine about a meal tub.  ---  However protection may affect special forms of industry it must necessarily diminish the total return to industry -- first by the waste inseparable from encouragement by tariff, and, second by the loss due to transfer of capital and labor from occupations which they would choose for themselves to less profitable occupations which they must be bribed to engage in.  If we do not see this without reflection, it is because our attention is engaged with but a part of the effects of protection.  We see the large smelting-works and the massive mill without realizing that the same taxes which we are told have built them up have made more costly every nail driven and every needleful of thread used throughout the whole country.  ---  To have all the ships that left each country sunk before they could reach any other country would, upon protectionist principles, be the quickest means of enriching the whole world, since all countries could then enjoy the maximum of exports with the minimum of imports.  ---  What protection teaches us, is to do to ourselves in time of peace what enemies seek to do to us in time of war.  Robert G. Schwartz, chairman of this insurer, formally assumed the additional posts of president and chief executive officer.  John J. Creedon, in accordance with his plans announced in May, retired.  He remains a director.  The company has declined to speculate on a likely successor to Mr. Schwartz, who is expected to retire in April 1993, when he turns 65 years old.  Japan's new prime minister said current bilateral talks with the U.S. on removing obstacles to a satisfactory economic and trading relationship "will produce significant results."  But Prime Minister Toshiki Kaifu also emphasized, when he met with President Bush here Friday, the ingrained nature of the Japanese trade practices at issue, and said changes will take time and effort, according to National Security Adviser Brent Scowcroft, who briefed reporters after the two-and-a-half-hour meeting.  In addition to the meeting here, a round of talks on structural impediments to the U.S.-Japanese economic relationship is taking place in Tokyo.  Japanese officials today are expected to give a critique of U.S. economic policies, which they maintain hinder relations.  These include the nation's low savings rate and its high budget deficit.  In the Tokyo talks, the U.S. delegation in a nine-hour meeting criticized Japan's allegedly closed market business practices -- its exclusive retail and wholesale distribution systems, clannish business practices and restrictive zoning systems -- which it said exacerbate bilateral imbalances and cause abnormally high prices for Japanese consumers.  U.S. negotiators said the tone of discussions was "constructive," according to news agency reports from Tokyo.  The current Tokyo talks, which are being conducted for the U.S. by undersecretary of state Richard McCormack, U.S. Deputy Trade Representative Linn Williams and the Treasury Department's assistant secretary for international affairs, Charles Dallara, are part of a series of bilateral meetings under the structural impediments initiative agreed on earlier this year.  This initiative is expected to produce an interim statement by next spring and a final report by the summer, which should represent a consensus on eliminating obstacles in both economies.  The Japanese delegation is led by Deputy Foreign Minister Michihiko Kunihiro, the Finance Ministry's vice minister for international affairs, Makoto Utsumi, and the Ministry of Trade and Industry's vice minister, Naomichi Suzuki.  The U.S. has a $50 billion annual trade deficit with Japan, which has led to increased congressional pressure for a tougher approach toward that nation.  The trade imbalance and the need to correct it were at the heart of the meeting here between President Bush and Japan's new prime minister.  "The president made it quite clear how important some adjustments were to the success of the bilateral relationship and to our being able to cooperate in the global partnership with the Japanese," Mr. Scowcroft said in his briefing.  "The mood of the Congress and the American people are such that we'd have serious problems if the Japanese didn't take steps on the structural impediments initiative," he added.  However, Mr. Kaifu seemed to be careful to hedge his pledge of progress in the bilateral talks and, according to some reports, told U.S. Treasury Secretary Nicholas Brady that there was "no guarantee" that the talks would achieve important results by next spring.  The prime minister, in an address to the National Press Club, also spoke critically of U.S. economic policy: "The U.S. needs to step up its efforts to improve its industrial competitiveness, shrink its budget deficit and further stabilize exchange rates."  In answer to a question at the National Press Club, Mr. Kaifu said the U.S. is using "unreasonable pressure" to open Japanese markets for such products as satellites, supercomputers and rice.  Mr. Kaifu also commented on the yen-dollar exchange rate, saying, "excessive or violent ups and downs must be avoided by all means."  He said that the exchange rate stability achieved through international coordination -- and particularly through the meetings of the seven major industrial nations -- "will have to be maintained."  After meeting with President Bush, Mr. Kaifu also stressed that Japan would continue to pursue policies that would expand imports of U.S. goods.  And in an effort to emphasize the benefits to the U.S. of the bilateral relationship, Mr. Kaifu said Japanese direct investment had helped create over 200,000 jobs in the U.S. "Japanese investment contributes to the smooth functioning of the U.S. economy by supplementing U.S. savings," he said.  Mr. Kaifu, who is Japan's third prime minister since June, had power thrust upon him by his country's recent sex and corruption scandals, which have discredited several of the leaders of the ruling Liberal Democratic Party.  The 58-year-old politician, who is relatively young for a Japanese political leader, was paying his first visit to the U.S. as prime minister.  It is customary for new Japanese prime ministers to meet with the president of the U.S., Tokyo's most important ally.  Mr. Kaifu was accompanied by his foreign minister and several senior aides on his visit to the U.S., which ended yesterday when they flew to Mexico.  He and President Bush are set to meet again in the U.S. later this month at a gathering of the leaders of the world's seven major industrial nations.  Both the president and Secretary of State James Baker left their Japanese counterparts in no doubt that the U.S. sees a need for the structural impediments talks to make rapid headway.  Mr. Baker told Japan's new foreign minister, Taro Nakayama, it is "important we have progress by next spring" in these talks, according to a Japanese official who briefed reporters after that meeting.  Mr. Baker also warned Mr. Nakayama that there is "rising protectionist pressure" in the U.S., particularly because of frustration with the nation's big bilateral trade deficit with Japan, the Japanese official said.  In his briefing, Mr. Scowcroft said Mr. Kaifu understood that if Congress had its way, the general Japanese impediments to U.S. exports identified for the structural impediments talks would have been included in the administration's so-called Super 301 list.  Super 301 is a tough provision of the 1988 trade act that requires the administration to name egregious barriers to U.S. exports and try to negotiate an end to them.  If negotiations don't produce satisfactory results within 18 months, the Super 301 provision holds out the prospect of unilateral U.S. retaliation against the offending trade partner.  In its first use of Super 301, the U.S. in May identified six unfair trade practices.  Three of these involved alleged Japanese barriers to imports of lumber, satellites and supercomputers.  In his discussions with Mr. Nakayama, Mr. Baker made "specific reference" to these three trade disputes and said "he expects movement," according to the Japanese official who briefed reporters after the meeting.  Japan, along with almost all other U.S. trading partners, has protested the U.S.'s use of Super 301.  These nations say trade disputes shouldn't be addressed by such unilateral measures, but should be handled through the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade, the multilateral treaty for resolving trade disputes.  In his remarks to the National Press Club, Mr. Kaifu said, "We should be aware that not only will approaches such as Super 301 not resolve these problems, but when viewed from the larger perspective of the total relationship, they could have a negative impact on its healthy development."  ---  David Shribman contributed to this article.  Christopher R. McCulloch, an associate director of Total Assets' largest shareholder, Girvan Corp. of Australia, was elected to the board of this consulting concern.  Mr. McCulloch succeeds Robert Barakett, corporate council for Girvan, who resigned to pursue other business interests.  INFORMATION INTERNATIONAL Inc. (Culver City, Calif.) said Ronald V. Paolucci was elected chairman, succeeding Joseph M. Walsh, 68, who retired.  Mr. Paolucci, 62, a board member since 1978, was executive vice president and chief operating officer of Lear Siegler Inc. until 1987.  Information International makes visual information processing equipment.  Opposites May Attract,  But They Also Split Up  IN MARRIAGE, "birds of a feather" may still be a safer formula than "opposites attract."  Wife-husband differences in age, education or religion produce substantially increased risk of separation and divorce, three Yale sociologists report.  Their study, unveiled at the annual American Sociological Association meeting, analyzed dissolution patterns in several thousand marriages, comparing "homogamous" unions where the wife and husband had similar personal backgrounds and "heterogamous" marriages where backgrounds differed.  The researchers found that women wed to less-educated or younger men had marital dissolution rates at least 50% greater than those marrying similarly educated or older men.  Better-educated husbands brought no increased risk to the marriage, but the study hinted at slightly higher rates of separation and divorce if the husband was much older.  Marital instability was also marked when Protestant and Jewish women married outside their faiths; surprisingly, though, no greater risk appeared when Catholic women did.  Sociologist Neil Bennett speculates that differences in spouses' personal backgrounds produce conflicting values and expectations that tend to undermine the marriage.  People entering heterogamous marriages, he also suggests, are generally less traditional in their attitudes and less likely to endure marital discord.  Using somewhat different methodology, University of Wisconsin sociologist Larry Bumpass and two colleagues reached many parallel conclusions, but also some different ones.  They found, for example, high breakup rates when Catholic women married non-Catholics.  On another subject, they noted more frequent dissolution if the husband was out of work or away on military service early in the marriage.  Jobless People Recover  Fast Psychologically JOB LOSS CAUSES severe psychological stress, but re-employment brings emotional recovery surprisingly fast, University of Michigan researchers told the American Sociological Association meeting.  Ronald Kessler, J. Blake Turner and James House studied the health effects of the widespread auto industry layoffs and firings during the recession of the early 1980s.  Surveying some 400 mostly blue-collar workers in southeastern Michigan, they matched the mental health of those working steadily from 1980 to 1984, those losing their jobs during that period but then finding work again, and those laid off and remaining unemployed.  They asked about use of tranquilizers or alcohol, frequent crying or feeling sad, and other symptoms of anxiety or depression.  They discovered that job loss brought "distress levels severe enough to warrant professional intervention," levels comparable to those after the loss of a spouse or child.  But whereas distress from such personal tragedy usually lasts for years, the distress from job loss dissipated relatively quickly for those workers landing a new job; within a year, their emotional state was the same as or even slightly better than that of those working straight through.  Moreover, this recovery seemed to occur even if the new job didn't pay as well or have working conditions as good as the previous job; emotional distress remained high only if the re-employed worker felt the new job might not last.  "The ability to rebound is striking," says Mr. Kessler.  Among those unable to find new work, psychological worries rose to particularly dangerous levels if the financial strains from lost income were combined with other major trouble such as divorce or death of a loved one.  Organ Donations Cause  Stress for Families  MOST PEOPLE who donated a close relative's body for organ retrieval say they'd do it again, but many would like the process to be less stressful.  As part of a broad study seeking ways to spur donation of kidneys and other vital organs, Helen Levine Batten and Jeffrey Prottas of Brandeis University canvassed 250 organ-donor families.  Nine out of 10 said they would make the same decision if another similar situation came along.  Four out of five gave altruistic motives: a chance to help another person, reinforced by belief the dead person would have wanted to help this way.  Similarly high percentages also saw the donation as a way to make something positive come from the death and thus make it easier for loved ones to cope with feelings of loss.  Many respondents, however, were unhappy with the way the hospital raised the question and later handled the donation process.  Over 25% felt they had been asked to decide on organ donation too soon, before they had come to grips with the approaching death; many were offended by what they considered an unfeeling approach by medical personnel.  More than a quarter would have liked more feedback later on just how the donated organs had been used.  Odds and Ends  WIVES who worked when their children were young are likely to retire at earlier ages than those who didn't work until after the kids were grown, according to a study by Angela O'Rand of Duke University and John Henretta of the University of Florida. . . .  Contrary to popular belief, women on welfare have a fertility rate considerably lower than the national average, a survey by Washington University sociologist Mark Rank shows.  And their rate declines the longer they're on welfare.  FARM WAGES soar as immigration controls tighten the labor market.  Some growers can't find enough workers to pick strawberries in California and cucumbers in North Carolina, but the 1986 immigration law didn't create the predicted huge 1989 labor shortage.  It has forced farmers to boost pay to lure and hold legal immigrants and other hired hands.  Farm workers averaged $5.23 an hour in July, up 33 cents from a year ago.  Wages of piece-rate fruit and vegetable pickers, in greatest demand, jumped almost 25% to $6.08 an hour.  "There's a great deal of competition out there for labor," says Al French, an Agriculture Department labor analyst.  Growers are developing worker-referral systems, busing in workers and offering better benefits.  The pinch may mean fuller employment for farmhands and more migrant workers following harvests northward.  Growers may press the Bush administration to admit more immigrants to replenish the labor pool.  MINIMUM-WAGE WRANGLING soon will resume on Capitol Hill.  For the American Farm Bureau Federation, repeal of the wage floor would be ideal.  Short of that, the nation's largest farm group will settle for scuttling the revived version of the Democrats' bill that President Bush vetoed.  "Our members are already paying more than the proposed $4.55 minimum," says lobbyist Libby Whitley.  The group will make its stand against the bill in the House, where it has more friends.  At the least, the Farm Bureau wants growers to be able to pay new hires a six-month training wage.  The original bill left them off the list of employers using seasonal workers, who would be eligible to pay the subminimum.  "We just want to be on a level playing field with fast-food outlets and construction firms," says Ms. Whitley.  A SAFETY MOVEMENT to protect children from farm accidents gathers steam.  Increasingly mechanized agriculture helps spur a Labor Department advisory board to review the child-labor laws.  More than 20,000 children are injured and 300 are killed each year in farm mishaps.  New York Gov. Cuomo wants to ban 14- and 15-year-olds from operating corn pickers and other hazardous equipment, except on family farms.  Consumer advocate Linda Golodner says current laws are intolerable "if they don't protect our children."  Amid a farm-injury epidemic, farm-implement makers boost their commitment to safety.  A grain-wagon manufacturer tests a grate to keep children from falling into corn loads and suffocating.  Eight other wagon makers use warning decals, says Marilyn Adams of Farm Safety for Just Kids.  The House approves $750,000 for a farm-safety school curriculum, and the Senate may up the ante.  THE WORK FORCE on U.S. farms and ranches totaled 3.8 million in July, up 8% from a year ago.  Farm owners cut their own workweek by 2.7 hours on average but required their hired hands to work an additional 2.2 hours a week.  HOG LUNG: University of Kentucky researchers report that workers in hog houses are more likely to suffer respiratory ailments than the general populace.  The reason: Dust and dander (pig dandruff), if inhaled, become lodged in the lungs.  A NEW VIBROMETER looks like a promising tool to detect symptoms of carpal tunnel syndrome, a hand and wrist disease common among meat-plant employees and others whose jobs require repetitive motions, says the American Meat Institute.  A 15-minute test measures early stages of median-nerve pressure that causes loss of sensation in a worker's fingers.  OUTSIDE JOBS: Half of U.S. farm households relied mainly on factory wages and other off-the-farm income for living expenses in 1986, government economists report.  They project 1989 non-farm income at $48 billion to $51 billion -- perhaps enough to surpass net cash income from farming.  NEITHER GROWERS nor the UFW cottons to changes in pesticide rules.  After years of toil and talk, the Environmental Protection Agency soon will issue a major rewrite of regulations to protect farm workers from toxic chemicals.  Agrichemical firms and big farmers say that complying with complex mandates for protective clothing and other safeguards is impossible.  "It's going to take a toxicologist to figure them out," a farm lobbyist moans.  Just as unhappy are United Farm Workers leaders, who accuse EPA of caving in to the other side.  The union complains that strong language was weakened by a slew of exceptions and compromises.  For example, growers won't be required to post skull-and-crossbones signs to warn workers against entering freshly sprayed fields.  UFW consultant Marion Moses calls them "grower-protection standards."  THE CHECKOFF: New health and safety limits on grain dust in rural elevators kicked in Friday. . . .  President Bush proclaims Sept. 17-23 as Farm Safety Week. . . .  Forced labor pays off, says the Illinois Department of Corrections, reporting a 48% jump last year in revenue from convict-produced meat, catfish and vegetables.  The Supreme Court ruled unanimously in June that "indecent" but not obscene telephone conversations are protected by the First Amendment.  But all the uproar over the dial-a-porn issues in Sable Communications of California v.  FCC obscured one aspect of the ruling that could have far-reaching implications for the future of free expression.  As Justice Antonin Scalia wrote in his concurring opinion, "while we hold the Constitution prevents Congress from banning indecent speech in this fashion, we do not hold that the Constitution requires public utilities to carry it."  In other words, the telephone company may ban dial-a-porn message service even if the government may not.  This conclusion follows from the basic principle that the First Amendment prohibits only state action, not decisions made by private entities.  But unlike other private businesses, telephone companies are given a monopoly franchise in their local exchange areas and guaranteed a profit.  They also are required by law to provide service to all who reasonably request it, without discrimination among customers.  This obligation to serve all potential clients does not require phone companies to aid and abet violations of the law.  Courts have long held, for example, that phone service can be denied to bookies or others engaged in illegal gambling.  Justice Scalia is now saying that telephone companies are free to treat dial-a-porn providers as if they were law breakers.  The two federal appellate courts that have decided the issue so far have held that phone companies may deny service to certain customers in order to protect their corporate reputations.  And last week, a federal district court in San Francisco upheld Pacific Bell's right to disconnect dial-a-porn services.  As one of the appellate courts put it, "a private business is free to choose the content of messages with which its name and reputation will be associated."  But the telephone company, after all, is the only game in town.  And its decisions often appear to be motivated by more than just private business judgment.  For example, Southern Bell dropped dial-a-porn service in 1986 after the Florida Public Service Commission hinted broadly that it would be more likely to approve a proposed tariff if adult-oriented services were excluded.  And in Arizona, a single letter from a local prosecutor prompted Mountain States Telephone in 1985 to terminate service to one dial-a-porn provider and then to ban all "adult" services from its network.  Measures short of an outright prohibition are sometimes adopted.  Some carriers, such as Bell Atlantic, have opted for pre-subscription blocking, which requires dial-a-porn aficionados to sign up in advance before access is provided.  Others simply decline to provide billing services for disfavored operators.  Protecting the "corporate reputation" can mean more than just disassociating the carrier from heavy breathers.  As if to test the limits of this justification, Michigan Bell refuses to provide billing services for customers whose messages are "inflammatory and likely to offend ethnic, gender, racial or religious groups; lewd, lascivious, indecent, or obscene . . . or are likely to have a detrimental effect on Michigan Bell's image or reputation."  Pacific Bell adopted similar guidelines that allow it to terminate billing for any "harmful" service.  It is difficult to imagine recorded messages that would not be offensive to some interest group or would not reflect in some way on the carrier's image.  As a special FCC report published in November 1988 asked rhetorically, "does this mean that Michigan Bell could refuse to bill for a 976 audiotex consumer hotline that consistently complained about the telephone company's rates and service?"  This problem expands as telephone companies branch out into new information services.  Carriers are beginning to develop videotex "gateways" through which information services are transmitted to personal computers.  But they are also developing new ways to screen out "offensive" communications.  Speaking at the July 1989 conference of the Videotex Industry Association, the director of gateway services for Southwestern Bell said his company was using on-line monitors to "check for four-letter words" during online conferences at its Houston test system.  A representative of U.S. West similarly acknowledged that there will be "some monitoring" of videotex services on that carrier's Omaha system.  Both carriers are prohibiting adult videotex as well.  The main challenge to freedom of expression will arise as telephone companies begin to provide cable television service.  Right now, the terms of the AT&T breakup bar the former Bell operating companies from doing so and most other telephone companies are prevented from offering such service by the 1984 Cable Act.  But AT&T consent decree restrictions are currently being challenged at the U.S. Court of Appeals in D.C.  In addition, legislation is now pending in both houses of Congress to permit telephone companies to offer cable service.  The FCC also has suggested that Congress should lift Cable Act restrictions, although it has not yet made a formal recommendation.  But Alfred Sikes, the new chairman of the FCC, has said he plans to make telephone entry into cable a top priority.  When that happens, particularly as the telephone companies install fiber optic lines, alternative means of delivering video signals to the home may well atrophy.  Economics could force existing cable operators to purchase excess transmission capacity from the telephone companies rather than maintain a separate coaxial cable system.  Even traditional broadcasters will be affected.  Motorola Chairman Robert Galvin has argued that broadcasters should turn in their licenses and become program suppliers over fiber optic systems.  Similarly, the FCC's Office of Plans and Policy has stated that as new broadband networks develop, broadcasters may be in trouble if "they see their business as emitting nonionizing radiation from the tops of red and white towers."  Rather, it suggests that broadcasters should concentrate on "producing, selecting, and packaging television programming" for fiber optic networks.  Telephone companies are likely to be just as squeamish about video programming as they have been about dial-a-porn and videotex.  And as Justice Scalia reminded us in Sable Communications nothing requires the phone companies to carry programming they don't like.  More than the Playboy Channel is at risk.  Unless conditions for the entry of telephone companies into new markets are carefully crafted, the new information age could make the First Amendment obsolete.  ---  Mr. Corn-Revere is a lawyer in Washington.  Lo Yuk-sui, a Hong Kong property magnate, proposed to take control of Hooker Corp., the financially troubled Australian property and retail company with extensive U.S. interests.  Mr. Lo's plan, which includes lending the company A$100 million (US$76.4 million) in working capital, has been outlined to Hooker's bank creditors.  Their response was "very encouraging," said William Beerworth, managing director in Australia of Wardley James Capel Corporate Finance Ltd., Mr. Lo's adviser.  Mr. Beerworth said he hopes to receive a firm response by early next week.  A spokesman for Mr. Lo in Hong Kong declined to comment.  Under the proposal, Mr. Lo would lend money to Hooker through his publicly listed Hong Kong property company, Richfield International Investments Ltd. Richfield then would formulate a plan to restructure Hooker, submitting it to bank creditors by the end of November.  Hooker shareholders, other creditors and courts also would have to approve the plan.  Under Mr. Lo's proposal, sent to banks late last week, Richfield would acquire shares in Hooker and get options that eventually would give it at least 65% of the Australian company.  The restructuring plan would provide for the "orderly" sale of some Hooker assets and for rescheduling of principal and interest that Hooker owes, according to the Richfield proposal.  The Lo company said it wants to acquire Hooker "as a going concern in order to preserve asset values in Australia and in the U.S. . . .  Otherwise many Hooker assets will be sold prematurely and at unfavorable prices."  Richfield expects Hooker to provide security for the A$100 million loan.  Some banks in July refused to lend Hooker more money because they weren't satisfied there was security to back additional loans.  But Mr. Beerworth said Richfield believes there are sufficient assets that aren't already pledged to other creditors.  Hooker ran into financial problems this year partly because of rising Australian interest rates and a falling Australian dollar.  In late July, a group of its creditor banks abandoned a plan to keep the company afloat by maintaining existing credit lines and injecting more funds.  They forced Hooker, which owes Australian and international banks about A$1.6 billion, to turn itself over to a court-appointed provisional liquidator.  The company's U.S. subsidiary, L.J. Hooker Corp., subsequently filed for protection under Chapter 11 of the U.S. Bankruptcy Code.  Included in the filings were Bonwit Teller and B. Altman & Co., Hooker's largest retail chains, various shopping malls and commercial development properties.  When told yesterday of Mr. Lo's proposal, Sanford Sigoloff, chief executive officer of the U.S. subsidiary, said, "This is the first I've heard of it, so I don't have any comment."  According to sources familiar with Hooker, a U.S. bankruptcy court must approve any major transaction involving assets of L.J. Hooker.  In any event, any of L.J. Hooker's creditors could raise objections if they believed Mr. Lo's interests were being put before theirs.  Besides Richfield, Mr. Lo heads several Hong Kong companies, including Century City Holdings Ltd., Regal Hotels (Holdings) Ltd. and Paliburg Investments Ltd.  Early this year, Mr. Lo's companies acquired control of Aircoa Cos., a U.S. hotel concern in financial difficulty.  He injected funds into the company and is selling some of its assets to try to revive Aircoa, which changed its name to Regal-Aircoa Cos.  ---  Jeffrey A. Trachtenberg contributed to this article.  As Samuel Johnson once remarked, "The Irish are a very fair race -- they never speak well of one another."  In his Aug. 17 Viewpoint column "The Killeagh Fields: An Irish War Against Chemical Pollution," Alexander Cockburn engaged in a flight of fancy, never once allowing facts to get in the way of good copy.  And in the process he maligned his native land and many of his countrymen.  There is not one recorded case of pollution by the chemical industry in Ireland.  Twenty-two of the 30 largest chemical and pharmaceutical manufacturing companies in the world have established production facilities in Ireland in the past three decades.  Ireland's strict environmental protection laws ensure that these industries operate safely and cleanly.  There have been no fish kills, no polluted rivers and no contaminated lakes that can be attributed to the chemical industry in Ireland.  The highly regarded Institute for Industrial Research & Standards in Dublin published the last detailed evaluation of pollution in Ireland in 1977.  The bottom line of that intensive study was that the chemical industry in Ireland got an environmental clean bill of health.  More than that, the study fingered Irish farmers who dumped untreated, highly toxic pig manure and farm chemicals as the major culprit in those fortunately rare pollution incidents that have occurred in Ireland's inland lakes and rivers.  David O'Sullivan  Executive Director  Ireland United States Council for Commerce and Industry  New York  ---  Mr. Cockburn's column was written with a strong anti-industry bias and with inaccurate and misleading statements.  Merrell Dow selected the site near Killeagh, County Cork, for a plant after evaluation of more than 25 other sites in Ireland.  The decision was based on economic considerations and the impression obtained through governmental and other contacts that the location was consistent with zoning practices and precedents in locating industries of this nature.  The provisions of the Cork County Development Plan do not provide explicit guidelines on the restriction of industry to particular areas nor have any land-use principles evolved.  The National Planning Appeals Board noted that "the proposed development would not be injurious to the residential or visual amenities of the area or give rise to a public health hazard.  The Board considers that the proposal would not militate against the development of agriculture or damage aquatic life or be otherwise contrary to the proper planning and development of the area."  This recommendation was issued after an eight-day public hearing, eight months after the planning application was filed in July 1988.  The decision was appealed to the Irish High Court, which found last month there was no justification for the premise relied on by the objectors.  No project proposal in Ireland has been subject to such extensive and intensive public review.  Merrell Dow has committed itself to design features and operating procedures that go far beyond current Irish standards and are equal to or more restrictive than those found in any country.  For example, the use of low-sulfur fuel oil will reduce sulfur dioxide emissions to less than 15% of normal industrial levels -- less than from a creamery boiler.  The planning application included an environmental impact study by the Irish Science and Technology Agency.  And we have commissioned a far more comprehensive environmental study to provide a scientific basis for future measurement of any possible adverse environmental effects.  A community environmental consultative committee with representatives from all potentially affected publics has been formed and will have access to all operating data on performance of the plant environmental control systems.  The plant will provide as many as 300 jobs during the peak of construction.  When the plant starts up, about 90 people will be directly employed with plans to increase employees to more than 200 within a few years.  We expect that 65%-70% of these jobs will go to people in the Youghal/Killeagh area. (Not ". . . just six jobs for common laborers from Youghal," as Mr. Cockburn stated.)  A small process incinerator was included in the plant design to destroy used solvents and sludges from the water-treatment plant at an efficiency in excess of 99.99%.  No chemical wastes will be shipped off-site or used for landfill.  There are no known precursors of dioxins in the waste materials to be incinerated.  The overall plant design is unique in Ireland in venting virtually all process emissions to the incinerator for destruction of the organics.  The result is that the plant would produce less pollution than the exhaust from a diesel engine or a coal fireplace.  The irony of Mr. Cockburn's column is that the proposed plant is exactly the type of investment Ireland should attract.  H.F. Plagens  Vice President  Director of Operations  Merrell Dow  Cincinnati  The following issues were recently filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission:  Coastal Corp., offering of eight million common shares, of which, five million shares will be offered in U.S. and Canada, via Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. and Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.; two million shares will be offered in Asia, via Nomura Securities Co.; one million shares will be sold in Europe, via: Swiss Bank Corp.; Drexel Burnham Lambert International Ltd.; Paribas Ltd.; and Shearson Lehman Hutton International.  Also, $200 million of 15-year senior debentures, via Drexel and Shearson.  Federal Realty Investment Trust, proposed offering of two million common shares, via: Alex.  Brown & Sons Inc.; Salomon Brothers Inc.; and Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  Midland Bank, offering of up to $500 million of American depository preferred shares.  Mobile Telecommunications Technologies Corp., proposed offering of 3,450,000 common shares, via Donaldson Lufkin & Jenrette Securities Corp. and Prudential-Bache Capital Funding.  Stoneridge Resources Inc., offering of 2.6 million common shares.  Supercomputing Solutions Inc., proposed offering of two million common shares, via Gruntal & Co. and SoundView Financial Group Inc.  Swift Energy Co., proposed offering of 750,000 common shares, via Ladenburg, Thalmann & Co. and Underwood Neuhaus & Co.  The New York Stock Exchange said it listed shares of one company.  Chart House Enterprises Inc., a Solano Beach, Calif., restaurant operator, will begin trading under the symbol CHT after its initial public offering.  The American Stock Exchange said it will list one issue this week.  Ackerley Communications Inc. will trade under the symbol AK.  The Seattle communications company, which previously traded over the counter, has interests in billboards as well as television and radio broadcasting.  These days General Motors is having more luck persuading investors to buy its common stock than its cars.  GM is marketing itself to Wall Street as the auto company that can withstand business cycles.  Its share of the U.S. car market is off 1.2 percentage points for the year through July.  But the price of GM common stock has climbed 20% since year end to Friday's close of 50, up 1 point for the day and 2 1/2 for the week.  For the year to date, Ford Motor's stock is up a smaller 7% and Chrysler's 5%.  Cyclical stocks in general have been doing well lately amid signs that the economy may avoid a recession.  Not everyone is convinced that the time to buy GM has come, however.  The gain in GM stock still trails the Dow Jones Industrial Average, up 27% so far this year.  The Street is sharply divided over whether GM is a bargain in light of its 6% dividend yield, or an unnecessary risk at a time when the outlook for cars and the economy is uncertain.  And so GM invited about 120 analysts and money managers for a day-long outing last week at the company's Milford, Mich., proving grounds.  The Wall Streeters tooled around in some of the auto maker's newest products, including the hyper-powered Corvette ZR-1.  The price: They had to listen to a lecture from GM's executive vice president for finance, Robert T. O'Connell, about why the bears are wrong.  Mr. O'Connell's message, according to attendees and company officials, was that GM can earn as much as $6 a share, or about $3.6 billion, before counting a penny of profit or loss from North American auto operations.  Overseas operations contribute about half that figure while the rest comes from GM's finance arm, General Motors Acceptance Corp.; the aerospace and auto-electronics operations of GM Hughes Electronics; and the data-processing businesses of Electronic Data Systems Corp.  With this diverse base, Mr. O'Connell argued, the U.S. industry's car and light-truck sales could drop to a disastrous 12.5 million vehicles and GM earnings would still comfortably equal the $3-a-share annual dividend rate.  In other words, pro-GM analysts say, GM isn't likely to repeat its 1980 recession-year performance, when it had losses of $762 million.  "Too few people remember Finance 101," says Prudential-Bache analyst Philip Fricke, a GM proponent.  "You pay dividends out of cash flow.  GM could report zero earnings per share, and still have a cash flow of $6 or $7" a share.  "That was news to a lot of the portfolio managers there," said Wendy Beale, auto analyst for Smith Barney.  On Wednesday, the day after the meeting, GM common jumped 1 5/8 to 48 3/4.  Mr. O'Connell's message had another apparent aim: Rattling the naysayers who have argued that GM could earn less than $2 a share in 1990, assuming U.S. car and light-truck sales tumble to a recessionary 13 million vehicles for the industry.  One prominent GM skeptic, Drexel Burnham Lambert's David Healy, declined to comment on Mr. O'Connell's speech, saying, "I want to do some work on that for our clients."  Prior to last Tuesday, Mr. Healy estimated GM's 1990 earnings would plummet to $1.75 a share and labeled the stock an "underperformer."  Whether or not Mr. Healy softens his hard line, it's apparent that Mr. O'Connell didn't change the minds of a number of middle-of-the-roaders -- analysts who don't quarrel that GM has changed, but aren't willing to risk a buy recommendation yet.  These analysts worry that GM's North American auto operations still have far more passenger-car production capacity than they need.  GM President Robert C. Stempel assured analysts that the company is "not backing away from the tough decisions that have to be made" to get factory capacity in line with market share by 1992.  But he wasn't specific.  Meanwhile, Japanese auto makers are gearing up to build more than one million vehicles in North America next year.  The Japanese are launching a full-tilt assault on the market segments where GM reaps much of its U.S. automotive profit: luxury cars and midpriced family sedans.  To top things off, consumers might vanish from dealer showrooms when higher-priced 1990 models show up without any rebates.  The industry will have "a helluva time in the fourth quarter selling a substantially higher-priced product in a sluggish market," says Shearson Lehman Hutton's Joseph Phillippi.  PaineWebber analyst Ann Knight remains neutral on GM stock.  GM's long-term prospects are good, she says, but in the short run, when many investors want to see results, it will face "tough sledding."  ---  @ General Motors  @ (NYSE; Symbol; GM)  @ Business: Auto, financial and computer services, aerospace  @ Year ended Dec. 31, 1988:  @ Revenue: $123.64 billion  @ Net income: $4.86 billion; or $7.17 a share*  @ Second quarter, June 30, 1989:  @ Per-share earnings: $2.23 vs. $2.26*  @ Average daily trading volume:  @ 1,211,363 shares  @ Common shares outstanding: 607.7 million  @ *Adjusted for two-for-one stock split paid in March 1989.  In a July 28 page-one article about community trials of Trichosanthin (Compound Q), I am correctly but incompletely quoted.  Following my infusions with Trichosanthin, I did indeed refer to feeling "very tired, my muscles sore and achy, and I don't stand up as easily."  But these effects were short-lived and no worse than the symptoms of a bad cold.  Within three or four days of infusion, these effects had dissipated, leaving me with more energy, improved appetite and cognitive function.  I continue to feel well and look forward to a long and productive life.  That is not to say I am prepared to declare Compound Q a "cure."  I have lived with HIV infection too long for that.  More research is obviously needed.  Robert W. Pitman  San Francisco  Friday, August 25, 1989  Following is a weekly listing of unadited net asset values of publicly traded investment fund shares, reported by the companies as of Friday's close.  Also shown is the closing listed market price or a dealer-to-dealer asked price of each fund's shares, with the percentage of difference.  @ Stock N.A. Stock %  @ Fund Name Exch.  Value Price Diff.  @ Diversified Common Stock Funds  @ Adams Express NYSE 19.71 16 3/4 - 15.02  @ Baker Fentress NYSE 29.09 23 7/8 - 17.93  @ Blue Chip Value NYSE 8.61 7 3/8 - 14.34  @ Clemente Global Gro NYSE b10.88 8 5/8 - 20.73  @ Gemini II Capital NYSE 21.45 16 7/8 - 21.33  @ Gemini II Income NYSE 9.75 12 5/8 + 29.49  @ General Amerinvest NYSE 22.67 18 3/4 - 17.29  @ Growth Stock Outlook NYSE 10.45 9 5/8 - 7.89  @ Lehman Corp. NYSE 17.10 14 1/8 - 17.40  @ Liberty All-Star Eqty NYSE 10.08 8 1/4 - 18.15  @ Niagara Share Corp. NYSE 17.98 14 1/2 - 19.35  @ Nicholas-Applegate NYSE 11.64 9 1/2 - 18.38  @ Quest for Value Cap NYSE 17.96 12 5/8 - 29.70  @ Quest for Value Inco NYSE 11.73 12 5/8 + 7.63  @ Royal Value Trust NYSE 11.32 9 3/4 - 13.87  @ Schafer Value Trust NYSE 12.18 10 1/2 - 13.79  @ Source Capital NYSE 43.31 41 3/4 - 3.60  @ Tri-Continental Corp. NYSE 30.17 24 3/4 - 17.96  @ Worldwide Value NYSE 21.98 18 - 18.11  @ Zweig Fund NYSE 11.76 11 1/2 - 2.21  @ Closed End Bond Funds  @ CIM High Yield Secs AMEX 8.74 8 3/8 - 4.18  @ Franklin Prin Mat Tr NYSE b9.03 10 + 10.74  @ Franklin Universal Tr NYSE b9.44 9 3/4 + 3.28  @ Municipal High Inco NYSE 9.55 10 1/8 + 6.02  @ Zenith Income Fund NYSE 8.28 9 1/4 + 11.71  @ Flexible Portfolio Funds  @ America's All Season OTC 5.84 5 1/4 - 10.10  @ America's All S Inco OTC 9.18 9 1/4 + 0.76  @ Zweig Total Return Fd NYSE 9.73 9 5/8 - 1.08  @ Specialized Equity and Convertible Funds  @ American Capital Conv NYSE 24.52 21 7/8 - 10.79  @ ASA Ltd. NYSE bc55.93 42 5/8 - 23.79  @ Asia Pacific NYSE 13.74 13 - 5.39  @ Bancroft Convertible AMEX 21.76 18 7/8 - 13.26  @ Bergstrom Capital AMEX 63.42 59 1/4 - 6.58  @ BGR Precious Metals TOR be11.60 10 - 13.79  @ Brazil NYSE 18.37 10 3/4 - 41.48  @ CNV Holdings Capital NYSE 10.73 5 3/8 - 49.91  @ CNV Holdings Income NYSE 9.55 11 3/4 + 23.04  @ Castle Convertible AMEX 22.65 19 1/2 - 13.91  @ Central Fund Canada AMEX b4.93 4 15/16 + 0.15  @ Central Securities AMEX 13.09 10 1/4 - 21.70  @ Couns Tandem Secs NYSE 12.87 10 3/4 - 16.47  @ Cypress Fund AMEX 11.05 10 3/8 - 6.11  @ Duff & Phelps Sel Utils NYSE 8.52 8 1/4 - 3.17  @ Ellsw Conv Gr & Inc. AMEX 9.03 7 7/8 - 12.79  @ Engex AMEX 14.28 9 15/16 - 30.41  @ Financ'l News Compos NYSE 21.40 20 7/8 - 2.45  @ 1st Australia AMEX 10.83 10 1/8 - 6.51  @ First Financial Fund NYSE 11.88 10 7/8 - 8.46  @ First Iberian AMEX 10.19 10 - 1.86  @ France Fund NYSE b12.59 11 7/8 - 5.68  @ Gabelli Equit Trust NYSE 14.70 14 - 4.76  @ Germany Fund NYSE 9.70 8 7/8 - 8.51  @ H&Q Healthcare Inv NYSE b10.22 8 1/4 - 19.28  @ Hampton Utils Tr Cap AMEX b11.59 9 15/16 - 14.26  @ Hampton Utils Tr Pref AMEX b49.17 47 15/16 - 2.51  @ Helvetia Fund NYSE 12.59 11 1/4 - 10.64  @ India Growth Fund NYSE f14.08 16 3/8 + 16.30  @ Italy Fund NYSE b11.91 9 3/4 - 18.14  @ Korea Fund NYSE 19.28 39 1/2 +104.88  @ Malaysia Fund NYSE 11.43 11 5/8 + 1.71  @ Meeschaert G&C MWSE 8.10 7 7/8 - 2.78  @ Mexico Fund NYSE b12.18 11 5/8 - 4.56  @ Morgan Grenf Sm Cap NYSE z z z  @ Patriot Prem Div Fd NYSE 9.90 10 1/2 + 6.06  @ Petrol & Resources NYSE 30.45 26 1/8 - 14.20  @ Pilgrim Regional NYSE 11.47 10 1/8 - 11.73  @ Rl Estate Sec Inco Fd AMEX 8.70 8 3/4 + 0.57  @ Regional Fin Shrs Inv NYSE 9.93 8 7/8 - 10.62  @ ROC Taiwan Fund NYSE 15.36 15 - 2.34  @ Scudder New Asia NYSE 15.31 11 3/4 - 23.25  @ Spain Fund NYSE 14.01 17 1/4 + 23.13  @ Taiwan Fund NYSE b40.73 38 1/2 - 5.48  @ TCW Convertible Secs NYSE bz z z  @ Templeton Em Mkts AMEX b12.44 12 1/8 - 2.53  @ Templeton Value Fund NYSE b10.98 9 5/8 - 12.34  @ Thai Fund NYSE 16.59 19 + 14.53  @ United Kingdom Fund NYSE 12.14 10 1/4 - 15.57  @ Z-Seven OTC 14.59 14 3/4 + 1.10  a-Ex-dividend.  B-As of Thursday's close. c-Translated at Commercial Rand exchange rate. d-NAV reflects $1.54 per share for taxes. f-As of Wednesday's close. z-Not available.  Jefferson Bankshares Inc. said it completed its acquisition of Chesapeake Bank Corp. in a stock transaction valued at $20.2 million.  Chesapeake holders will receive 1.1333 Jefferson common shares for each of Chesapeake's 751,739 shares outstanding as of June 30.  The following were among Friday's and yesterday's offerings and pricings in the U.S. and non-U.S. capital markets, with terms and syndicate manager, as compiled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ EUROBONDS  Noritake Co. (Japan) -- $100 million of bonds due Sept. 21, 1993, with equity-purchase warrants, indicating a 4 1/8% coupon at par, via Yamaichi International Europe Ltd. Guaranteed by Mitsubishi Bank.  Each $5,000 bond carries one warrant, exercisable from Oct. 5, 1989, through Sept. 7 1993, to buy shares at an expected premium of 2 1/2% to the closing price when terms are fixed tomorrow.  Deutsche Ausgleichsbank (West Germany) -- 100 million marks of 10-year floating-rate notes due Sept. 1, 1999, priced at par and paying three-month Frankfurt interbank offered rate minus 10 basis points, via Deutsche Ausgleichsbank.  Callable after five years.  Oesterreichische Laenderbank (Austria) -- 100 million Swiss francs of bonds due Oct. 25, 1999, with equity-purchase warrants, carrying a fixed 4 1/2% coupon at par via Handelsbank NatWest.  Each 5,000 franc bond carries one warrant to purchase 72 participation certificates at an exercise price of 510 Austrian schillings, a 6 1/4% premium over Thursday's closing price.  Exercise period from Nov. 15, 1989, to Oct. 25, 1994.  Sharp Corp. (Japan) -- $500 million of bonds due Sept. 20, 1993 with equity-purchase warrants, indicating a 4% coupon at par, via Nomura International Ltd.  Each $5,000 bond carries one warrant, exercisable from Oct. 4, 1989 through Sept. 3, 1993, to buy company shares at an expected premium of 2 1/2% to the closing share price when terms are fixed Sept. 12.  Music Corp of America (U.S.) -- $200 million of convertible 5 1/2% bonds due Oct 12, 1999, at par, via Salomon Brothers International.  Convertible from 90 days after the payment date until maturity at $76, a premium of 17% over the Sept. 1 closing price.  Non-callable before 1994; thereafter callable at par.  OKOBANK Osuuspankkien Keskuspankki Oy (Finland) -- 8.5 billion yen of bonds due Sept. 18, 1990 priced at 100 7/8, with redemption at par and the second and final coupon based on the Nikkei Index, via Mitsubishi Finance International Ltd. First coupon, 5.5%, will be paid Dec. 20.  National Bank of Hungary (Hungary) -- 1.5 billion Austrian schillings of 8 1/4% bonds due Sept. 15, 1996, priced at par, via Oesterreichische Laenderbank.  Public subscription period is Sept. 5-9.  Interest accrues from Sept. 15.  U.S. investors seem to believe the world-wide takeover frenzy is about to boil over into Canada.  But that conviction could cost them a lot of money unless they do their homework.  The problem is this: Even with takeover activity apparently on the rise in Canada, it is still tougher than in the U.S. to find a company that really is a suitable takeover target.  Most big Canadian companies are protected against unwanted suitors.  More than half are controlled by a single shareholder, often through stock with special voting powers.  Government restrictions bar foreigners -- and sometimes even Canadians -- from acquiring certain widely held companies.  It all adds up to a mine field for investors who expect the U.S. takeover blueprint to prevail in Canadian takeover situations.  Just last month, for example, Socanav Inc. won the fight for Steinberg Inc., a Montreal food retailer, even though its offer of 1.33 billion Canadian dollars (US$1.12 billion) was about C$185 million below a competing proposal.  The rival suitor backed off because Socanav held an option on a Steinberg block representing just 14% of the fully diluted equity but a full 52% of the voting power.  Against this background, some recent speculation in Canadian stocks has been downright strange.  Shares of Canada's two major airlines, Air Canada and PWA Corp., jumped more than 5% on the Toronto Exchange Aug. 8 after Marvin Davis bid for UAL Corp. and set off a surge in U.S. airline stocks.  But legislation forbids any private party from holding more than 4% of PWA's voting shares or 10% of Air Canada's.  Canadian rules prevent foreigners from buying control of publishing, broadcasting, telecommunications, fishery or airline companies.  Even a Canadian can't own more than 10% of a major bank.  Foreigners can't buy an oil and gas producer unless it is financially sick and needs to be rescued.  Companies that don't fit those descriptions can still become political untouchables if nationalistic feelings are aroused.  Opposition politicians set up a howl recently when takeover speculation spread to Canadian Pacific Ltd., which is viewed as a national heirloom because its railroad opened the Canadian West.  When an agency of the Quebec government began accumulating the company's stock eight years ago, the federal government introduced a bill to forbid a province from owning more than 10% of a national transport concern.  But Canadian companies still can fetch a takeover premium, even if they are controlled by one holder.  "It doesn't mean that someone can't buy them out if he wants to pay the right price," says Stephen Jarislowsky of Jarislowsky Fraser & Co., a leading Canadian fund manager.  Consider:  -- Falconbridge Ltd. is about to be acquired at a premium of C$7.375 (US$6.25) above its July close, as the result of competing tender offers that were welcomed by management.  Consolidated-Bathurst Inc. was acquired at a slightly larger premium earlier this year, when its 40%-owner decided to sell.  -- Cineplex Odeon Corp. is up for sale because of differences between management and its biggest shareholder.  -- Imasco Ltd. could also find itself on the block if Sir James Goldsmith succeeds in acquiring Britain's B.A.T Industries PLC, which owns 40% of Imasco.  -- Some analysts expect the three main holders of Cominco Ltd. eventually to go for the rest of its stock.  -- In the past six weeks, Dominion Textile Inc., Numac Oil & Gas Ltd., Turbo Resources Ltd. and Falconbridge nervously adopted shareholder-rights plans that could trigger an auction if any holder gets too big a stake.  Such poison pills were almost unheard of in Canada until Inco Ltd. swallowed one in October.  Stephen Schwarzman, president of New York's Blackstone Group, sees a "newfound friskiness" in the Canadian market and expects a spillover from the international takeover game.  He says his firm is advising several Canadian concerns, would-be sellers as well as would-be buyers.  Canadian companies seem relatively cheap.  The Toronto Stock Exchange's index of 300 large companies now stands at around 12.5 times the companies' earnings in the latest 12 months, which compares favorably with a multiple of roughly 14 for the Standard & Poor's 500.  Bill Ram, a special consultant with Montreal securities dealer Levesque Beaubien Geoffrion Inc., published a list early this year of Canadian companies that are widely enough held to qualify as takeover targets.  Among others, it included Alcan Aluminium Ltd., Dofasco Inc., Echo Bay Mines Ltd., Moore Corp., Nova Corp., Placer Dome Inc., Stelco Inc. and Varity Corp.  Nova would need a Canadian buyer because it is in the regulated oil and gas industry, but there isn't any obvious legal impediment to foreign acquisition of the other concerns.  Mr. Ram thinks even Canadian Pacific could be taken over, if the buyer arranged for Canadians to buy its politically sensitive railroad, telecommunications and oil and gas holdings.  Some analysts assert that widely held LAC Minerals Ltd. became takeover bait last month when it lost a fight for Canada's biggest gold mine.  LAC will get, instead of the mine, more than C$210 million from the winner of the legal battle.  The cash could help pay an acquirer's bills.  But the number of real or attempted takeovers hasn't been especially high in Canada lately.  Most takeover talk is in the future tense, while takeover obstacles remain and even grow.  The Canadian dollar recently hit its highest level in nine years, which raises costs for foreigners.  The Canadian prime, or base, lending rate is three percentage points above the U.S. rate, which raises costs.  And last month the Canadian government decided that trust companies, which are similar to U.S. thrifts, can't change ownership without its permission.  Takeover-prospect Imasco just happens to own a big one.  "I don't think in general that Canada is in play any more than it was before," says Bill Biggar, director of Canadian mergers and acquisitions at Prudential-Bache Securities Canada.  If Paul Reichmann had a flair for self-promotion, he could push Donald Trump right off the magazine covers.  The Canadian and his two brothers, worth an estimated $8 billion, may be the world's richest "unknowns."  But Mr. Reichmann's days of subway-riding anonymity could soon be over.  For one thing, the brothers' Toronto-based company, Olympia & York Developments Ltd., is building the world's largest commercial complex at a site in east London.  Later this year the family will decide whether the bulk of their giant real-estate empire will go public.  And now they are on the verge of buying the world's tallest building, Chicago's Sears Tower.  It isn't likely to become the Reichmann Tower.  With his just-above-a-whisper voice, black yarmulke, full beard and dark suit hanging on his lanky frame, Mr. Reichmann is a modest fellow who doesn't throw his name around.  But that name is already plenty well known in the world of commercial real estate.  Olympia & York kicked off the 1980s by building New York's World Financial Center, a complex the size of Rockefeller Center.  With that added to vast holdings in Canada, O&Y now is the largest development company in North America.  Europe is its next target, as it begins work on London's Canary Wharf project, estimated to cost $5 billion.  The company hopes to make it a kind of capital of continental business for post-1992 Europe.  Mr. Reichmann is also noted inside real-estate circles for breaking ground in finance.  O&Y was the first development company to raise capital by selling bonds secured by office buildings.  It applied novel financing techniques to the leasing of some of its World Financial Center buildings, and is doing the same in the Sears Tower deal.  Late last year, Mr. Reichmann jumped into foreign-exchange speculation as well, structuring a real-estate loan as an $800 million bet on the direction of the yen against the dollar.  "There really is no one like him in the world of finance," says Steven Karpf, an investment banker with Eastdil Realty of New York, who notes that Mr. Reichmann has the confidence in his own judgment needed to take major risks, and enough capital to frequently make them pay off hugely.  Moreover, Mr. Reichmann "is the best negotiator I know," says Lewis Ranieri, a former Salomon Brothers vice chairman who has a merchant bank in which the Canadian recently invested.  Mr. Reichmann, Mr. Ranieri says, has an uncanny ability to anticipate the needs of his adversary.  "Paul Reichmann plays the game in three dimensions, while everybody else plays it in one," Mr. Ranieri claims.  Mr. Ranieri also speaks in reverential tones about Mr. Reichmann's modesty.  "I remember Paul taking the subway back and forth downtown to midtown in New York while the lawyers were all taking cabs," he says.  Not everybody is so admiring.  Some say O&Y is unusually difficult to work with, leaving little profit for others involved in its transactions.  "They are impossible to make money with," complains one real-estate finance specialist. (Olympia & York is such a heavyweight in commercial real estate that its critics almost universally ask not to be identified.)  Others say one price of doing business with O&Y is occasionally having it appropriate ideas that have been pitched to it "They are famous for picking Wall Street's brain excessively," says a prominent investment banker, who also asks not to be identified.  Asked about this complaint, Mr. Reichmann says that he hadn't been aware of it, but that in negotiations "each side benefits from talking to the other."  As for the notion that he negotiates opponents into unprofitability, he says: "We decide in the early stages under what conditions it makes sense for us to do something.  If you go to a meeting knowing exactly what you want, you may give the impression that you're tough."  Some associates attribute Mr. Reichmann's decision-making prowess in part to 50 years of close study of Jewish law.  "Torah study, especially Talmud study, is overwhelmingly analytical," one acquaintance says.  "It takes nothing for granted."  Despite his rigorous approach in business, Mr. Reichmann seems drawn to a certain unorthodoxy in hiring aides.  An example is Michael Astrachan, who worked for Merrill Lynch in the 1970s -- until the day he told a Canadian conference the Fed was mismanaging the money supply so badly that interest rates soon would hit 20%.  The way they tell the story at O&Y, Mr. Astrachan was fired the next morning for saying that.  But within three months his prediction came true -- and O&Y hired him as its chief economist. (A spokesman for Merrill says it can't confirm or deny the story because employment records don't go back far enough.)  There was little to indicate that the Reichmanns would scale the heights of real estate 30 years ago, when Paul and his brothers, Albert and Ralph, were operating a building-supply business in Toronto.  World War II refugees from Austria who arrived in Canada via France, Spain and Tangier, the Reichmanns moved into real-estate development almost by accident.  When their supply business needed a new warehouse, they decided to build it themselves.  The Reichmanns entered the American market with a bang in 1977, in a deal that quickly made their reputation.  New York City's real-estate market was a mess, and its economy wasn't much better.  But O&Y bought eight Manhattan office buildings from Kinney Corp. for $320 million, and today those properties are valued at over $3 billion.  Admirers say that initial move shows Mr. Reichmann's ability to detect fundamental value and not be scared off by short-term concerns.  The brothers gradually built up their company over three decades, until it now includes, in addition to real estate, controlling interests in Gulf Canada Resources Ltd., Canada's largest oil and gas company; Abitibi-Price Inc., the world's largest newsprint producer; and Consumers' Gas Co., Canada's largest natural-gas distribution utility.  O&Y also holds hefty stakes in some major companies, including Campeau Corp., the mall developer that owns the Federated and Allied department-store chains, and Allied-Lyons PLC, the British food and beverage concern.  Technically, the three Reichmann brothers are equals.  Albert manages the company's operations and focuses on project design, while Ralph operates the building-supply company.  But it is in real-estate development and finance, the two areas run by Paul, that Olympia & York has made the biggest waves.  Mr. Reichmann's analysis led him to believe at the start of the 1980s that several Wall Street firms were about to outgrow their quarters in lower Manhattan, and would be eager to move a few blocks west to the Battery Park City project.  At the time the state-run project, built on Hudson River landfill that was a byproduct of the construction of the World Trade Center, was in financial trouble.  Other developers were wary, and were willing only to build one office building at a time in the project.  But O&Y committed itself to building four mammoth office towers almost simultaneously.  And it lured some prominent Wall Street firms to the site.  The complex now houses the headquarters of American Express Co., Merrill Lynch & Co., Oppenheimer & Co. and Dow Jones & Co., publisher of this newspaper.  In the cases of Merrill Lynch and American Express, which had relatively new headquarters buildings nearby, Mr. Reichmann offered to buy the old buildings in exchange for taking big commitments in the new complex.  O&Y's decision to move ahead on construction all at once paid off when the 1987 stock-market crash took Wall Street real-estate prices down with it.  For O&Y had the development almost fully leased by that time, at pre-crash prices. (Even so, the development's smaller retail space has been less successful.)  In 1987, in the company's most ambitious project yet, Olympia & York laid down a big bet on the future vitality of Europe in general and of London in particular.  In a transaction that rescued the British government's plans to redevelop the London Docklands, the company bought out a development team that was struggling to build Canary Wharf.  If successful, the 12-million-square-foot development -- about the size of five Empire State Buildings -- will transform the skyline of east London.  It also will be one of the first glimpses Europeans get of the state-of-the-art office complex long familiar to North Americans.  The development is propelled by Mr. Reichmann's belief that London will become the business capital of Europe after EC trade barriers come down in 1992.  "In the long run the confidence in the political stability and democratic tradition of England will cause international companies to choose the U.K. as the base and location of their expansion," he reasons.  Late last year, Olympia & York took another leap, gambling on the future value of the dollar vs. the yen.  Aware that the Japanese currency had reached a historic high against the dollar, and anxious to take advantage of relatively low Japanese interest rates, the company sold $800 million of debt to foreign investors and secured it with a downtown Manhattan office building.  The interest was to be paid in dollars but, in a novel move, the principal will be repaid in yen.  That made the deal potentially costly if the yen continued to rise against the dollar.  Instead, the dollar rose, and the company locked in a $100 million trading profit.  "Most people would consider it a matter of luck," says Mr. Reichmann.  "But luck is actually in the timing.  If the fundamentals are sound, we do not worry about timing."  Olympia & York's expected purchase of the Sears Tower is unusual only in its scale.  The financial structure of the deal is characteristic of the firm: It will accept a load of short-term risk in exchange for the possibility of big profits in the long run.  People close to the negotiations say that in return for a sales price of over $1 billion -- which Sears will be able to cite to analysts -- Sears has agreed to continue paying rent for the next six years on the space it is vacating.  That way, O&Y assures itself of a hefty stream of cash on the space while it renovates the entire building.  Sears also is said to be throwing in a vacant site it owns on which O&Y plans eventually to build an office tower of up to 65 stories, or 1.6 million square feet.  With the redeveloped 3.6 million square-foot Sears tower and a new building, the company could through sheer domination of the area attract big corporate tenants, even though the Chicago office rental market already is glutted.  "What sets O&Y apart from every other developer is that they think that by their actions they can actually change real-estate markets," says James W. Allwin, who heads Morgan Stanley's real-estate department.  "Often, they're right."  In the months to come, Mr. Reichmann says, a study analyzing the company's investments will be completed, and the family will decide what to do with the riches it accumulated over the past quarter-century.  He says he expects that the company's Canadian real estate will stay in family hands, while the rest of the empire could be sold as a public holding company.  Whatever the case, Mr. Reichmann, who is 58, says he has no plans to slow down.  In what would be his biggest project ever, he is bidding with a consortium of Japanese companies to build a development in Tokyo that would dwarf even the giant Canary Wharf project.  If the deal goes through, Olympia & York would have achieved a real-estate first, becoming the sole developer playing a major role in the three financial capitals of the world.  R.P. Scherer Corp. said it agreed in principle to sell its Southern Optical unit to a management team led by Southern Optical's president, Thomas R. Sloan.  The gelatin-capsule maker didn't disclose terms of the accord for its subsidiary, which generates more than $40 million in annual revenue.  But an R.P. Scherer spokesman said the company expects to close the transaction by early October.  The accord is part of R.P. Scherer's goal to shed its diversified health-care products and services operations in the wake of its $352 million leveraged buy-out in May led by Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. R.P. Scherer has owned Southern Optical since 1986.  Kasler Corp., a general contractor specializing in heavy construction work, said it was the low bidder and apparent winner of a $124.4 million contract from the California Department of Transportation, the largest single public-works contract in state history.  Kasler will construct a five-level interchange at the juncture of two major freeways near Los Angeles International Airport, the 405, or San Diego freeway, and the new 105, or Century freeway.  The project is expected to take four years to complete, the company said.  After East German leader Erich Honecker underwent gallstone surgery in an East Berlin hospital last month, the government announced he was "on the road to recovery."  Mr. Honecker's detractors, of which there are many in East Germany, joke instead that he is "on the road to Hungary," which has become an escape route to the West for thousands of his countrymen.  That's not likely, given Mr. Honecker's faith in communism.  But the condition and whereabouts of the East German leader are the subject of intense speculation.  According to unconfirmed reports, the surgery was unsuccessful.  It has been suggested that the 77-year-old leader, who hasn't been seen publicly since Aug. 14, may have cancer.  Whether he lives or dies, though, Western diplomats and analysts increasingly believe the government's resistance to reform won't waver.  They say Mr. Honecker's likely successor, internal-security chief Egon Krenz, 52 years old, might be even more inflexible than he is.  Popular discontent probably is more widespread in East Germany than at any time since its founding 40 years ago.  More than 6,000 East Germans have claimed West German citizenship this year by crossing illegally into Austria via Hungary, which began dismantling its Iron Curtain border fence in May.  An additional 5,000 are waiting in emergency camps in Hungary for permission for safe passage to the West.  A Red Cross spokesman said the exodus would begin this week, although there were indications the Hungarians might delay the operation.  One Hungarian official told the Associated Press his government was reluctant to authorize the transfer until it can placate its angry allies in East Berlin.  Yet, despite the mass departures touched off largely by the unpopularity of Mr. Honecker's policies, many Western analysts consider him a moderate among the 26 aged members of East Germany's ruling Politburo.  That council is still dominated by conservative and paternalistic old men who, like Mr. Honecker, fought Nazism and worshiped Stalinism.  One of them, Security Minister Erich Meilke, 82, held the same post in 1953 when an uprising was crushed by Soviet tanks.  It isn't just their conservatism that prevents East German leaders from embracing the economic and political reforms like those introduced in the Soviet Union and two of its East bloc allies, Poland and Hungary.  It is also their recognition that Marxist ideology is all that really justifies the existence of their state.  "What reason would a capitalist East Germany have for existing next to a capitalist West Germany?  None," the party's chief ideologist, Otto Reinhold, said in a recent radio interview.  About the only moderate rival to Mr. Krenz in the Politburo is said to be Guenter Schabowski.  A high-ranking party functionary, he speaks fluent Russian, is married to one and is said to have many associates in Moscow, including Soviet leader Mikhail Gorbachev.  On a recent trip to Moscow, Mr. Schabowski reportedly encountered a young East German folk singer, who was wearing a "Gorby" button.  "We need more people who feel that way," he is said to have told her.  But it's a sign of the times in reform-resistant East Berlin that Mr. Schabowski's connections to Moscow are a political liability.  Although Moscow could always try to install Mr. Schabowski in the event of Mr. Honecker's death, few diplomats believe it would interfere in domestic affairs, given its recent acceptance of a non-Communist government in Poland.  Besides, most observers think the nod has been given to Mr. Krenz.  Mr. Honecker is said to have favored him as successor for a long time, earning Mr. Krenz the nickname "crown prince."  He has also been Mr. Honecker's replacement during official functions in East Berlin recently.  "Clearly, he's the designated representative," says Barbara Donovan, a research analyst who follows developments in East Germany for Radio Free Europe in Munich.  Given the crisis now confronting the East German government, she says, "the leadership is aware that a power struggle now could be suicidal."  Like his boss Mr. Honecker, he, too, is unpopular and, if anything, even less tolerant of dissent.  For example, he is believed to have sided with Security Minister Meilke against Mr. Honecker in supporting a police crackdown on Protestant church peace activists in January 1988.  Despite his reputation, West German officials hope for the best.  "Krenz has taken some very tough lines," says one, "but his past record doesn't necessarily predict how he might behave if he took over."  The United Food and Commercial Workers Union and ConAgra Inc.'s Monfort unit are resuming negotiations on a labor contract.  As a result, Monfort recalled a termination notice it sent to 800 employees of the pork-packing plant here and rescinded its agreement to lease the plant to a third party.  In July, the company told its employees it made a preliminary agreement to lease the plant to MSP Resources Inc., a move that would have ousted the union.  Employees were told they would lose their jobs at the beginning of October but could apply for work with the new company.  MSP was to operate the plant for Monfort, and the Lincoln, Neb., company had signed an agreement with the Teamsters.  The leasing arrangement angered the union, which termed the agreement "illegal and immoral."  In addition, the city of Marshalltown and the community college here reacted to the leasing notice by rescinding $2 million in job-training and sewer subsidies they had granted Monfort this year when the company announced it would expand the plant and double its employment.  The union and the company said they also agreed to a "news blackout" during the negotiations.  Talks are scheduled to resume Monday.  In the bond market, it's back to "coupon clipping."  The credit markets' sluggish tone is prompting many fixed-income portfolio managers to stop hunting for the next big price gain.  Instead, their investment strategy is to focus on fat interest payments.  Now that the bond rally has stalled, "it's time to start clipping coupons," says Paul Suckow, director of fixed-income securities at Oppenheimer Management Corp. "That's one way to keep your total return high when the market is going nowhere."  It's a big switch.  Just six weeks ago, long-term Treasury bonds were the hottest fixed-income investments around.  As interest rates tumbled, bond prices soared and helped fixed-income money managers post impressive double-digit returns for the three months through July.  The term coupon clipping doesn't mean what it used to.  It derives from the detachable stub on a bond certificate that, in the past, was presented in return for semiannual interest payments.  But coupons are few in the computer age: Interest payments are speeded along through electronic transfers.  It's a strategy that some money managers use when the bond market starts to bounce around aimlessly, as prices stop rising and interest rates stabilize.  That condition has persisted for several weeks, a result of contradictory economic data that simultaneously point to an economy that is growing and to one that is slowing.  On Friday, for example, the anxiously awaited employment report for August was stronger than anticipated and portrayed an economy that is expanding at a healthy pace.  But later in the day, the August Purchasing Managers' Index painted a picture of an economy that is losing steam.  The 30-year Treasury bond rose smartly in price, with its yield dropping to 8.12% from 8.19% Thursday.  Such ambiguities make it difficult for money managers to make investment decisions when they can't even form strong convictions about where the economy is heading.  So, in the short term, some are stretching for higher yield as a way to offset the lack of price appreciation.  At Oppenheimer, Mr. Suckow has decreased the percentage of long-term Treasury bonds in some of the company's mutual funds and increased the percentage of intermediate-term government securities that offer slightly higher yields.  For example, yields on four-year Treasury notes are about 8.24%, compared with 8.12% for the 30-year bonds.  In addition, Mr. Suckow says Oppenheimer is "taking a selective look" at high-yield corporate junk bonds as a way to boost interest income.  In recent months, junk bonds have been among the worst performing bonds, primarily because of recession fears.  Although prices of some lower quality issues remain depressed, some analysts say that higher quality junk bonds of better known companies should soon recuperate now that the economy appears to be stronger.  The Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette Securities "Go-Go Index" of yields on 24 actively traded junk bonds closed the week at 13.59%, or about 5.39 percentage points higher than on seven-year Treasurys.  Bob Vitale, manager of the fixed-income group at 1838 Investment Advisors L.P., which has about $2.2 billion in assets, says his mutual fund company changed the composition of its managed accounts to hold fewer Treasurys and a greater proportion of mortgage-backed securities, which pay annual rates of about 10%.  The percentage of mortgage securities in 1838 Investment's managed accounts has risen to 25% from 5% in the late spring and could rise as high as 50%.  Meanwhile, the percentage of Treasury securities in the portfolio fell to 60% from 85%.  The percentage of corporate bonds rose to about 15% from 10%.  "In a stable market, this type of strategy will help your total return," says Mr. Vitale.  But some money managers say such strategies could be a waste of time.  Ian McKinnon, head of fixed-income investments at Vanguard Group, says the potential gains from such strategies are small.  Vanguard did recently begin fiddling with one of its corporate bond funds by decreasing the average quality of the bonds in the portfolio from double-A (the highest quality) to single-A, which pay higher rates.  The mutual fund company doesn't plan any changes on a wider scale.  "If you're reaching for yield because you think that rates will be stable, there's not much there to be garnered," Mr. McKinnon says.  "The transaction costs of changing strategies are so high that you chew up the incremental gains." ---  Friday's Market Activity  Treasury prices rose Friday in a holiday-shortened session after investors responded bullishly to the August Purchasing Managers' Index.  The benchmark 30-year bond was quoted Friday at a price of 99 30/32, up nearly 7/8 point, or a gain of about $8.75 for each $1,000 face amount.  The issue's yield, which declines as the price rises, fell to 8.12% from 8.19%.  Analysts said the gain, exaggerated by extremely thin trading, was puzzling given that the August employment report showed an expanding economy, which portends rising interest rates.  "There is little doubt that the market looked at the purchasing management report and decided to take prices higher," says William Sullivan, director of money market research at Dean Witter Reynolds Inc.  The jobs report, he added, "shows a stronger tempo in the economy as a whole and also in the manufacturing sector, which seems to contradict the implications of the purchasing managers report."  The employment report showed that non-farm payrolls rose 110,000 in the month of August, more than the average forecast of a 70,000 increase.  The civilian unemployment rate remained unchanged at 5.2%.  But the Purchasing Managers' Index declined to 45.2% in August, the lowest since December 1982 and the fourth consecutive monthly decline.  A reading below 50% indicates that the manufacturing sector is generally declining; above 50%, that it is generally expanding.  The government securities market closed at 1 p.m. EDT ahead of the Labor Day holiday.  In other major markets:  -- Corporate bonds ended about 1/4 point higher.  But Lomas Financial Corp.'s subordinated junk bonds closed the week languishing in the low 60s after trading in the high 80s and 90s just a week ago.  The bonds were hit badly by news earlier in the week that the financially troubled company didn't expect to complete its debt restructuring in time to repay $145 million of senior paper that matured Friday.  -- Municipal bonds were flat to nearly 1/2 point higher.  Among active issues, the New Jersey Turnpike Authority 7.20% issue due 2018 closed at 98 1/8, up 1/4 from Thursday.  The yield fell to 7.36%.  -- Mortgage securities ended 7/32 to 8/ 32 higher.  Although mortgage securities trailed the gains in the Treasury market on Friday, they outperformed governments for the entire week.  Government National Mortgage Association 9% securities rose 10/32 during the week while the Treasury 10-year note rose 1/4 point.  Monday, September 4, 1989  The key U.S. and foreign annual interest rates below are a guide to general levels but don't always represent actual transactions.  LONDON LATE EURODOLLARS: 9 1/16% to 8 15/16% one month; 9% to 8 7/8% two months; 9% to 8 7/8% three months; 9% to 8 7/8% four months; 8 15/16% to 8 13/16% five months; 8 15/16% to 8 13/16% six months.  LONDON INTERBANK OFFERED RATES (LIBOR): 9% one month; 9% three months; 8 15/16% six months; 8 7/8% one year.  The average of interbank offered rates for dollar deposits in the London market based on quotations at five major banks.  Friday, September 1, 1989  The key U.S. and foreign annual interest rates below are a guide to general levels but don't always represent actual transactions.  PRIME RATE: 10 1/2%.  The base rate on corporate loans at large U.S. money center commercial banks.  FEDERAL FUNDS: 9% high, 8 3/4% low, 8 7/8% near closing bid, 8 15/16% offered.  Reserves traded among commercial banks for overnight use in amounts of $1 million or more.  Source: Fulton Prebon (U.S.A.) Inc.  DISCOUNT RATE: 7%.  The charge on loans to depository institutions by the New York Federal Reserve Bank.  CALL MONEY: 9 3/4% to 10%.  The charge on loans to brokers on stock exchange collateral.  COMMERCIAL PAPER placed directly by General Motors Acceptance Corp.: 8.50% 27 to 31 days; 8.80% 32 to 44 days; 8.75% 45 to 59 days; 8.625% 60 to 89 days; 8.25% 90 to 119 days; 8.125% 120 to 149 days; 8% 150 to 179 days; 7.625% 180 to 270 days.  COMMERCIAL PAPER: High-grade unsecured notes sold through dealers by major corporations in multiples of $1,000: 8.90% 30 days; 8.825% 60 days; 8.75% 90 days.  CERTIFICATES OF DEPOSIT: 8.33% one month; 8.32% two months; 8.30% three months; 8.27% six months; 8.26% one year.  Average of top rates paid by major New York banks on primary new issues of negotiable C.D.s, usually on amounts of $1 million and more.  The minimum unit is $100,000.  Typical rates in the secondary market: 8.90% one month; 8.80% three months; 8.80% six months.  BANKERS ACCEPTANCES: 8.75% 30 days; 8.65% 60 days; 8.55% 90 days; 8.53% 120 days; 8.45% 150 days; 8.38% 180 days.  Negotiable, bank-backed business credit instruments typically financing an import order.  LONDON LATE EURODOLLARS: 9 1/16% to 8 15/16% one month; 9% to 8 7/8% two months; 9% to 8 7/8% three months; 9% to 8 7/8% four months; 9% to 8 7/8% five months; 9% to 8 7/8% six months.  LONDON INTERBANK OFFERED RATES (LIBOR): 9% one month; 9% three months; 9% six months; 8 15/16% one year.  The average of interbank offered rates for dollar deposits in the London market based on quotations at five major banks.  FOREIGN PRIME RATES: Canada 13.50%; Germany 8.50%; Japan 4.875%; Switzerland 8.50%; Britain 14%.  These rate indications aren't directly comparable; lending practices vary widely by location.  TREASURY BILLS: Results of the Monday, August 28, 1989, auction of short-term U.S. government bills, sold at a discount from face value in units of $10,000 to $1 million: 7.94% 13 weeks; 7.88% 26 weeks.  FEDERAL HOME LOAN MORTGAGE CORP. (Freddie Mac): Posted yields on 30-year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days. 10.18%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.25%, 2% rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  FEDERAL NATIONAL MORTGAGE ASSOCIATION (Fannie Mae): Posted yields on 30 year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days (priced at par) 10.10%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 9.10%, 6/2 rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  MERRILL LYNCH READY ASSETS TRUST: 7.97%.  Annualized average rate of return after expenses for the past 30 days; not a forecast of future returns.  The federal government's hard line in defending its air traffic controllers and the National Weather Service paid off last week when a federal judge ruled that the pilots alone were responsible for the crash of Delta Flight 191.  Since shortly after the crash Aug. 2, 1985, Delta Air Lines Inc. has maintained that the crew of Flight 191 was insufficiently warned of the intensity of a thunderstorm that slammed the Lockheed L1011 into the ground.  The crash, which occurred as the plane prepared to land at Dallas-Fort Worth International Airport, killed 136 people aboard the plane and one person on the ground.  The government, on behalf of the Federal Aviation Administration and the National Weather Service, disputed Delta's charges from the beginning.  The government's stance in this case differed sharply from its agreement to share equally in the liability arising from the July 9, 1982, crash of a Pan American World Airways Inc. Boeing 727 as it took off from New Orleans International Airport.  The Pan Am crash killed 153 people.  In both the Delta and Pan Am crashes, the planes flew directly into thunderstorms in which a weather phenomenon known as wind shear caused abrupt changes in wind speed and direction.  The difference in the two cases, say lawyers for the victims' families, is the control the planes' crews had over their flight paths.  In the Pan Am case, the pilots were taking off and were dependent on the air traffic controllers and meteorologists to warn them of the thunderstorm at the end of the runway.  In the Delta case, the pilots had more of the responsibility for their approach for landing.  The government's refusal to share the blame for the Delta crash was ratified Friday.  Judge David O. Belew ruled that while there was some breach of duty on the part of air traffic controllers and weather service personnel in failing to make certain that the Delta crew knew of the thunderstorm, the crew was in the best position to see the storm and avoid its dangers.  "Controllers are not required to foresee or anticipate the unlawful, negligent or grossly negligent acts of pilots," Judge Belew wrote in his 72-page opinion, most of which summarized the 14 months of testimony he heard in the case.  The decision leaves the carrier and its insurer to shoulder the $150 million to $200 million in damages sought by the victims and their families in 182 claims.  Delta, which had settled many of the claims, said it will appeal Judge Belew's decision.  A GROUP OF UAL EMPLOYEES is favored to win the battle for United Air's parent after unveiling a buy-out bid Friday of $300 a share, or $6.75 billion.  But the labor-management group, which is led by UAL's chairman and backed by British Airways, didn't get a quick agreement.  UAL's board said it would study the bid, and rival suitor Marvin Davis indicated he may top $300 a share.  ---  The economy remains healthy although manufacturing is still sluggish, latest reports indicate.  The jobless rate stayed at a low 5.2% in August, but consumer confidence and a purchasing managers' index fell.  The Fed isn't likely to push interest rates down further unless there are major signs of economic weakness, policy makers suggested.  ---  Ford Motor and Saab-Scania confirmed they are discussing closer ties in "various areas."  Analysts said the two may go beyond previously rumored collaboration in cars and forge a heavy-truck partnership as well.  ---  Hong Kong property magnate Lo Yuk-sui proposed to take control of Hooker Corp., the financially troubled Australian property and retail concern with extensive U.S. interests.  ---  A civil suit against Northrop over alleged MX mischarges is likely to be joined by the Justice Department, sources said.  The move would be another blow to Northrop's image.  ---  Standard & Poor's said it would ignore a proposed accounting rule that would force firms to deduct billions of dollars for retirees' medical benefits.  The credit-rating agency's decision is viewed as an attack on the FASB.  ---  Japan's prime minister expects "significant results" from new Japanese-U.S. trade and economic talks but said changes will take time.  Kaifu met with Bush in Washington Friday.  ---  Coastal disclosed plans to raise $544 million through stock and debt offerings.  But the energy firm said proceeds will be used to retire existing debt, not finance takeovers.  ---  Capital Cities/ABC plans to sell some shows made by its new production unit to rival networks, making it the first in the industry to do so.  ---  Grand Metropolitan is negotiating the sale of its British bookmaking business to help pay for its $5.8 billion purchase of Pillsbury last January.  ---  France's biggest takeover battle became more tangled as Industrielle's chairman said he will fight Suez's offer without making a counterbid.  ---  IBM plans to announce today some models of its AS/400 minicomputer line and a new release of its operating-system software, sources said.  ---  Lyphomed agreed to be bought by Fujisawa Pharmaceutical for $31.87 a share.  The pact may spur takeovers by other Japanese drug companies.  ---  Lomas Financial defaulted on $145 million in notes that matured Friday, raising the ante in the company's high-stakes dispute with lenders.  ---  Financial markets were closed yesterday because of the Labor Day holiday.  ---  Friday's Markets --  Stocks: Volume 133,300,000 shares.  Dow Jones industrials 2752.09, up 14.82; transportation 1526.32, up 16.90; utilities 218.62, up 1.32.  Bonds: Shearson Lehman Hutton Treasury index 3309.98, up 26.90.  Commodities: Dow Jones futures index 130.58, off 0.76; spot index 129.95, up 0.15.  Dollar: 145.98 yen, up 0.98; 1.9810 marks, up 0.0142.  Moody's Investors Service Inc. downgraded the senior debt of Time-Warner Inc., formerly Time Inc., the subordinated debt ratings of Warner Communications Inc., and both companies' ratings for commercial paper.  The rating actions reflect the weaker credit quality that will result when Time-Warner completes the acquisition, financed with debt and preferred stock, of Warner, the rating concern said.  The ratings also reflect the positive outlook for revenue and operating cash-flow growth in the business segments of the companies and the high quality and diversified nature of their asset base, Moody's added.  Moody's cut the senior debt of Time-Warner, a publishing and entertainment company, to Ba-2 from single-A-2, while Warner Communications' subordinated debt fell to Ba-3 from single-A-3.  The commercial paper for both companies sank to Not Prime from Prime-2.  Moody's also cut the senior-debt ratings of Time-Warner's American Television & Communications Corp. to Baa-3 from Baa-1 and assigned a Prime-3 rating to the company's commercial paper.  In addition, Moody's affirmed the subordinated debt ratings of Lorimar Telepictures Corp. at single-B-1.  The rating moves affect $1.5 billion in long-term debt.  As the sun sets on another long day of campaigning in white South Africa, Louis de Waal takes a sip of water from a glass shaped like a cowboy boot and aims his oratory at another quarry of voters: a dozen members of the local gun club, where a sign by the bar says, "We shoot hostages."  It turns out they don't treat such liberals as Mr. de Waal much better.  "For 41 years the government has followed a policy that if you deny reality long enough it disappears," ventures Mr. de Waal, a candidate for the Democratic Party in Wednesday's parliamentary elections.  "We'll recognize that reality, which is that there are more black faces than white faces in our country.  We must accommodate the political aspirations of the blacks."  One of the sharpshooters slaps the pistol on his hip and fires back, "We recognize the reality, too.  That's why we're out here practicing."  Not far from the gun club, at a house meeting of middle-class Afrikaners, Fritz Meyer, a candidate for the far right Conservative Party, also acknowledges South Africa's reality.  His answer, and the siren call of his party, is to tighten the country's racial segregation laws known as apartheid.  "This election is our last chance to save all that is dear to us," he tells his rapt audience.  "It's either partnership {with blacks} or partition.  We say that good fences make good neighbors."  In still another part of the vast North Rand constituency, Attie Grobler, the present member of Parliament for the ruling National Party, carefully straddles both sides of reality.  He assures a gathering of senior citizens that they have nothing to fear from the government's promises of a "new South Africa," a hazy constitutional nether world designed to accommodate the political needs of the disenfranchised black majority without surrendering white minority privilege and control.  If the seniors don't want to integrate their retirement home, they don't have to, Mr. Grobler explains.  But if they want to, they can.  "We can all work together," he says, smiling broadly.  Three men, three parties, three visions of the future.  The deep polarization of white society is on full display in North Rand, a mixture of rich and poor, urban and rural, redneck and "yuppie" between Johannesburg and Pretoria.  Here, Mr. Grobler, who won the seat with a narrow majority in 1987, is up against intense assaults from the left and right.  So divided is white opinion that all three men are equally confident of victory.  Similarly, the National Party countrywide is facing its toughest election since it came to power in 1948 and began laying the foundation of apartheid.  Currently, the Nats, as they are known, have 123 seats in the 166-seat white Parliament.  But some party leaders are worried that the number could fall below 100, with overall support shrinking to less than 50%.  Conceding that the Conservatives will make gains on the right, the Nats have concentrated on holding the center and the moderate left.  The government's main argument of this election is that it can best represent white interests in negotiations with black leaders, which both the National and Democratic parties see as inevitable.  For the first time, the government is looking left, abandoning anti-reformist elements for a white majority coalescing around the need for some kind of negotiation.  How far those negotiations go will determine whether this is South Africa's last apartheid election.  Democratic Party  First up for Mr. de Waal on a Saturday of campaigning is a yard full of English-speaking yuppies.  Although he is a 38-year-old Afrikaner, Mr. de Waal, as an executive of a car rental company, shares their concerns.  "In 1970, I remember standing next to my father as he bought his first Mercedes for 5,300 rand," he says.  "Today, that same car retails for 155,000 rand {about $60,000}."  The yuppies groan.  But their spirits improve when Mr. de Waal tells them the Democratic Party can end South Africa's international isolation, and thus relieve the economic sanctions pushing up the Mercedes price, by scrapping apartheid legislation and sharing power with blacks.  He hits another sensitive yuppie nerve: emigration.  Mr. de Waal says that in 1984 he received an offer to move to the U.S. and, eventually, to become a U.S. citizen.  It was tempting, he says, but he turned it down.  "This is where my heart lies.  I'm not going anywhere," he says in Afrikaans.  One of the yuppies says he sounds just like a Nat, which, in fact, he was before signing up with the Democrats.  Mr. de Waal laughs.  "The time has come," he says, "for all of us with different views to stand up and say we belong here, too."  At the gun club, the candidate runs into trouble with his party's vision of federalism, which divides the country into nine federations where everybody, regardless of color, has a vote in a system of proportional representation.  "Surely," says a man dressed in camouflage, "there will be an education qualifier to the vote."  Mr. de Waal shakes his head.  "There's no soft option," he says.  "We must start bringing people together, and we must start now."  Conservative Party  Mr. Meyer's house meeting begins with a prayer for wisdom and strength and for the Lord's blessing on the task at hand.  Then Mr. Meyer, a 25-year-old computer programmer, launches into his campaign sermon, delivered with evangelic fervor.  "Our policy isn't racism," he says.  "Our policy is love.  Love for our land, our volk {people}, our children, our language."  The Conservatives' policy of partition, he explains, is born of love.  Every population group, defined by race, should have the right to occupy its own territory under its own government.  He scoffs at his opponents' calls for negotiation.  Remember Rhodesia (now Zimbabwe) and Namibia, he warns.  Politically negotiated solutions in those neighboring countries, he says, have opened the door for "black, Marxist, terrorist" governments.  "We have the same choice here," he says.  "The Conservative Party won't negotiate over our fatherland."  The audience, 11 men and three women, nod in approval.  One of them complains that the whites are going broke subsidizing improvements in black residential areas.  "I don't hate their culture," says the man.  "I just don't like paying for it."  Mr. Meyer shares his dismay.  "White taxes for white people," he says.  More nods.  More fears: someone worries that government plans for "free settlement areas," where people of all races can live together, will ruin property values.  "This is a white area, it always has been a white area," Mr. Meyer assures the group.  "If they make it a free settlement area against our wishes, we'll take the law into our own hands."  National Party  Mr. Grobler praises the senior citizens, loyal Nats for 40 years, as the backbone of the National Party and asks for their support one more time.  Retirement homes are prime hunting territory for the Conservative Party, and Mr. Grobler has come to stop the poaching.  One elderly man, his voice breaking with emotion, reports that a Conservative convasser came to the home and asked him how he would like it if a black or colored person suddenly moved in.  Mr. Grobler smiles and shakes his head.  "This is one of their scare tactics," he says.  "Free settlement areas won't happen overnight.  It won't happen at all unless the residents allow it."  There is uneasiness among the seniors; one says the National Party isn't the same party they grew up with.  Before, no Nat worth his salt would have ever spoken of free settlement areas or negotiations with blacks.  Mr. Grobler, a 42-year-old career civil servant, explains that the party must be more flexible.  Thus, he says, the Nats will allow multiracial private schools, but state schools will remain whites-only.  The government will negotiate with black leaders, but not with those who won't renounce violence.  And it will negotiate a new constitution, but it won't ever agree to the Democratic Party's position of one man, one vote.  Change is difficult to accept, he admits, but the Nats, and South Africa, are running out of time.  "We mustn't forget there is still a lot of good will among the blacks," he says.  "But the longer we wait, the more radical the moderates will become."  Lyphomed Inc.'s board accepted a $31.87-a-share buy-out proposal from Japan's Fujisawa Pharmaceutical Co., writing what appears to be a lucrative final chapter to the recent turnaround at the once problem-plagued maker of generic drugs.  Approval of the bid, which values Lyphomed at $956.7 million, was expected.  Fujisawa did, however, slightly sweeten its initial offer, made two weeks ago, of $31 a share.  The takeover is considered a harbinger of a move by Japan's largely domestic pharmaceutical makers to expand internationally through acquisitions in the U.S. and Europe.  Analysts expect Japanese companies to focus on small and medium-size companies that can open new distribution systems for their products.  Fujisawa, which already owns a 30% stake in the Rosemont, Ill., concern, had been restricted by a 1986 standstill agreement from adding to its stake without board permission.  Fujisawa will shortly begin a formal tender offer for the shares it doesn't own; the offer is subject to receiving tenders of enough shares to boost the company's stake to 66.7% on a fully diluted basis.  Reaching that level isn't expected to be a problem.  Since Fujisawa floated its unsolicited proposal last month, no other suitor has stepped forward.  In addition, Lyphomed's chairman, John N. Kapoor, has agreed to sell his roughly 14% stake to the Japanese concern.  Fujisawa's pricey bid -- representing a 42% premium to the closing price of Lyphomed shares the day before its offer was disclosed -- is designed to help the Osaka company diversify away from the antibiotics field, where the company's profit margins have been trimmed by heavy competition in Japan.  One of Japan's leading makers of anti-ulcer, diabetic and hypertension drugs, Fujisawa had revenue of $1.46 billion in the year ended March 31.  Lyphomed's sales skidded 26% to $127.9 million in 1988, as the company's problems with the Food and Drug Administration took their toll.  Beginning in late 1987, Lyphomed ran afoul of regulators over quality-control and other matters, and it had to shut major plants temporarily.  The stock, which had been a Wall Street favorite for several years on the strength of Lyphomed's rapid growth, tumbled as low as $8.625 in 1988, and as recently as January of this year it traded at $11.75.  Mr. Kapoor, who until recently held the additional titles of chief executive officer and president, led a small group that in 1981 purchased Lyphomed from Stone Container Corp. for about $2.8 million.  He stands to receive about $134 million for his holdings under the offer.  It is his successor, Gary Nei, and the new management team he installed since coming aboard late last year, however, who are credited with engineering the company's rebound.  As the long-running feud with regulators was resolved and operating results began to improve, the company's stock nearly doubled in the past seven months, even before Fujisawa announced its bid.  Nonetheless, a shareholder suit in Cook County Circuit Court seeks to block any sale of the company, calling the bid inadequate and contending that the price would have been substantially higher had the board not erected "nearly insurmountable barriers" to other potential bidders.  The company won't comment on the allegations.  In over-the-counter trading Friday, Lyphomed climbed $1.375 to $31.375, on volume of more than 2.2 million shares.  Don't expect biotechnology stocks to roll merrily along with the rest of the bull market.  Although shares of companies that aim to make drugs through genetic engineering are up about 30% on average so far this year, the group is a mixed bag.  Many of the stocks remain volatile and unpredictable, repeatedly confounding analysts and investors.  Many of the most visible biotechnology stocks, including Amgen, Cetus, Biogen, Chiron, Genetics Institute, Centocor and Xoma, are trading on the Nasdaq over-the-counter market.  Another well-known biotechnology issue, Genentech, trades on the New York Stock Exchange.  One biotechnology portfolio manager advises investors buying the issues to prepare for some nasty short-term gyrations.  "I don't even like to talk about (the prospects for biotech stocks) over the next year or two," says Ken Oberman, portfolio manager of Oppenheimer Management's $3 million Global Bio-Tech Fund.  "The stocks will go up and down and some companies will do well while others won't.  But the industry's future success is assured."  Though the group overall has outperformed the market, Mr. Oberman says his fund has done "terribly" so far this year.  Some of the issues are mired in patent disputes and some are trying to live down past debacles, while others are working to overcome regulatory-approval setbacks.  Such problems turn off many investors.  Analysts give high marks to some stocks in the group.  They like Cetus and the outlook for regulatory approvals in the U.S. and abroad of its first proprietary pharmaceutical product, the Proleukin interleukin-2 anti-cancer drug.  Chiron, which has developed a test to screen blood for hepatitis-C, is also popular.  Another favorite, Xoma, is awaiting federal approval along with marketing partner Pfizer, to sell an antibody to treat septic shock.  Much of the stocks' gains occurred in the first quarter, analysts say.  Since then, most of these issues haven't kept pace with the broader market.  Andrew Offit, manager of Fidelity Select Biotechnology Portfolio, says one reason for the slower pace recently may be that the annual campaign to stir up interest in the group is still a few weeks away.  Biotechnology companies usually meet with institutional investors and analysts at meetings sponsored by securities firms several times during the fall and winter, which usually results in a strong first-quarter performance, he says.  "I don't want to imply that these are hype stocks," but they do seem to trade better around the time of industry conferences, Mr. Offit says.  Investor skepticism has been a factor, too.  Amgen, for instance, is up 17% this year.  But it has been jostled by investors trying to predict when the Thousand Oaks, Calif.-based concern would obtain regulatory approval of its highly touted anti-anemia compound, EPO. Analysts' first-year sales targets for the drug are in the $100 million range, but some think they could eventually top $1 billion annually.  The stock began the year at 33 3/4 and advanced to 44 1/4 by March.  It fell back to around 40 during the next two months as the company encountered delays.  When the company finally received the exclusive right to sell EPO in the U.S. for the next seven years, the stock caught fire and traded as high as 48.  But Amgen didn't sizzle for long.  The stock soon retreated, as investors' attention turned to the company's long-awaited court battle with Genetics Institute over patent rights to EPO.  Both companies are claiming that the other's patent for the compound is invalid.  Friday, Amgen closed at 39 5/8, up 5/8.  Genetics Institute, which is up a breathtaking 63% for the year, also added 5/8 to 27 1/4.  Jim McCamant, editor of the Medical Technology Stock Letter, believes that uncertainty about the outcome of the patent trial and its effects on both companies' fortunes is hurting the whole biotechnology group.  Currently, Amgen, Genetics Institute and Genentech are embroiled in patent litigation.  Declares Mr. Offit of Fidelity: "These patent issues are one of the frustrations of following the industry.  No one knows what will happen."  Some of the skittishness stems from the headaches that one-time highflyer Genentech has had with its own blockbuster drug, TPA. Genentech, which sold as high as 47 in January 1988, is still depressed because the heart attack drug hasn't lived up to Wall Street's lofty expectations.  The product is expected to have sales of $150 million to $200 million annually, about half the level analysts once expected.  Genentech finished at 19 1/4, up 1/4 on Friday.  It has improved 20% this year.  ---  Friday's Market Activity  The Nasdaq Composite Index climbed 2.01, or 0.4%, to 471.34.  For the year, the composite is up roughly 24%.  It rose 10% last week.  By comparison, the Dow Jones Industrial Average was up 1.3% for the week and has added about 28% since Dec. 30, 1988.  Volume on the first trading day in September totaled only 113.5 million shares.  But that's an improvement over last September's pace of 111.8 million shares a day.  The daily average share turnover last month was 131 million.  Cellular communications stocks, which have been weak lately, rebounded.  The surge by LIN, McCaw Cellular Communications and other cellular issues pushed the Nasdaq Utility Index up 9.63 to 745.92, a new high for the index.  LIN jumped 2 1/2 to 108 1/2.  McCaw surged 2 1/4 to 40.  Cellular Communications rose 1 to 39 7/8, Contel Cellular rose 1 to 25 1/4, and U S West NewVector gained 1 to 44.  First Executive, the most active stock, jumped 1 to 13 1/2 on 2.8 million shares.  Lyphomed advanced 1 3/8 to 31 3/8.  The company agreed to be bought by Fujisawa Pharmaceutical of Japan for $31.87 a share.  Masstor Systems added 9/16 to 3 9/16 on 1.3 million shares.  The company completed the private placement of 1.8 million preferred shares, raising a total of $4.2 million.  Beeba's Creations jumped 1 1/4 to 15 1/2 following speculation in a Business Week article that the distributor of women's sportswear may soon become a takeover target.  Nasdaq's biggest stocks have posted handsome gains this year.  The Nasdaq 100 Index of non-financial stocks, which rose 3.02 to 447.03 on Friday and 1.2% last week, has advanced 26% this year.  The Nasdaq Financial Index improved 1.36 to 468.28 on Friday and 1.1% for the week.  It has risen 28% this year.  Sizeler Property Investors Inc. launched a $25.1 million cash tender offer for 2,280,000 shares of Property Trust of America.  A successful tender would boost Sizeler's stake to more than 50% of Property Trust's common, according to the offering statement, and would lay the groundwork for a proposed merger between the two real estate investment trusts.  El Paso, Texas-based Property Trust's board has already rejected an unsolicited offer by Sizeler, Kenner, La., to acquire all the Property Trust shares outstanding it doesn't already own for $11 a share, consisting of $4.19 a share in cash and the rest in various securities.  A Property Trust spokeswoman said the company doesn't yet have any response to the new, all-cash tender offer, which expires Sept. 29.  Wang Laboratories Inc. will introduce four personal computers today based on industry-standard designs in a first step toward a "major repositioning" of its product line, a Wang executive said.  The new line includes three models that are compatible with International Business Machines Corp.'s PC-AT design and one that is compatible with IBM's Micro Channel Architecture data-bus design.  Kenneth A. Olisa, vice president of marketing, said Wang would offer the new machines at competitive prices below those of IBM and Compaq Corp.  He also said Wang will unveil a broad product strategy next month focusing on industry-standard computers and networks.  Wang, which had sales of $3.03 billion in the year ended June 30, has been struggling to stem huge losses.  It recently named a new president, former General Electric Co. executive Richard W. Miller.  The Lowell, Mass.-based computer maker also announced a program to improve its dealer marketing efforts.  A labor-management group with the backing of British Airways PLC has emerged as the favorite in a bidding war with Los Angeles investor Marvin Davis for UAL Corp., parent of United Airlines.  The political appeal of the bid's 75% employee ownership -- which would make UAL the U.S.'s largest worker-owned company -- could counteract regulatory concerns about the bid's financing and the participation of a foreign entity.  Hoped-for cost savings of as much as $370 million in contract concessions from UAL employees, plus tax advantages available to employee stock ownership plans, also give the labor-management group a financial advantage.  The concessions and tax advantages would provide the company with increased cash flow, enabling it to reduce debt more quickly.  The group, led by UAL Chairman Stephen Wolf, proposed to acquire UAL for $300 a share, or $6.75 billion, in a leveraged buy-out.  Mr. Davis has bid $275 a share, or $6.19 billion.  UAL's board decided to study the latest offer.  "I'm a little surprised the board didn't accept this, because I thought the board really wanted a management-employee LBO," said Helane Becker, an airline analyst at Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.  "I would say they still probably have the best chance."  On Thursday night, Mr. Davis telecopied a letter to the board saying that he might be able to top the $300-a-share proposal after reviewing confidential company data.  He also said he might make a "substantially higher" bid if he could obtain significant labor concessions.  Even without the Davis letter, it would have been difficult for the board to approve the Wolf group's bid outright.  The group still hasn't lined up financing, although a pilot union leader said several banks have expressed interest in financing the transaction.  Over the weekend, aides to Mr. Davis were negotiating terms with UAL advisers under which he would get access to company data and to members of top management.  In exchange, he was prepared to agree not to make a hostile tender offer or seek to oust UAL directors as long as the company is sold to the highest bidder.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading Friday, UAL rose $7.25 a share to $287 as word of the buy-out proposal spread.  Some traders say the bidding could top $325 a share, or $7.31 billion.  The debt-equity structure of the labor-management proposal mirrors that of the Davis bid.  Both include about $1 billion in equity, with the remainder to be financed with debt.  In addition to the 75% stake for employees, the labor-management proposal includes a 15% stake for British Air and 10% for 35 UAL managers, including Mr. Wolf.  British Air is contributing $750 million in return for common and preferred stock.  The pilots are investing $200 million from a pilot-directed pension plan to purchase a new class of preferred.  The pilots are also offering wage and work-rule concessions valued at $250 million annually, with as much as $120 million in annual concessions anticipated from other employees.  The contribution of UAL managers is more complex.  As envisioned, the executives would acquire at least part of their stake by rolling over proceeds from existing stock options.  The total dollar contribution of the managers couldn't be determined.  The terms under which the managers acquire their stake could prove a public-relations liability, depending on how lucrative the transaction is for them.  But UAL managers also are expected to take pay cuts of as much as 10%.  Despite the employees' much bigger stake, they won't control the board initially.  Management will get three seats, employees three and British Air one.  In addition, there will be eight outside directors, whose selection method hasn't been determined yet.  The pilots are also pressing for a labor-management governance committee.  The labor-management proposal marks a breakthrough in relations between Mr. Wolf and the pilot union, who have been at loggerheads for the last two years.  In a statement announcing the proposal, Mr. Wolf singled out the Air Line Pilots Association for special praise.  He said that because labor and management were able to team up in the bid, "it will be the men and women of United who directly reap the benefits of their hard work and competitive success."  Mr. Wolf also said the employee offer won't include the sale of any assets.  The next round shapes up as a battle of wits between Mr. Davis, a billionaire known for shrewd buying and selling of assets, and the strong-willed and financially savvy Mr. Wolf.  Mr. Davis, who has bowed out of previous bidding wars when outpriced, may be able to recruit a foreign airline partner of his own.  But any bid from him would still face two major obstacles.  The UAL pilots have said they wouldn't give the same concessions to an outside bidder, and Mr. Davis must battle the board's natural sympathies toward management and employees.  Mr. Wolf must now try to rally all UAL employees to the plan.  The initial response has been positive.  The flight attendant union said it will explore participating.  The machinists union, which blocked a takeover attempt by the pilots in 1987, said it remains "skeptical" of the current Wolf proposal but might participate if the transaction can be structured to address its concerns about leverage and job security.  The machinists also questioned the amount of control the pilots would have and said they may seek to renegotiate many of the terms.  The current proposal is "just a Wolf in pilot's clothing," said Brian M. Freeman, the machinists' adviser.  Mr. Freeman said it could take a month or more of negotiations before the machinists make a decision.  The UAL board stopped just short of putting the company up for sale.  It said it would explore both the Wolf and Davis offers "and any other proposals that may be made, as well as other financial and strategic alternatives available to the company," with advice from First Boston Corp. and the law firm of Davis Polk & Wardwell.  If the offer is accepted, Sir Colin Marshall, British Air's chief executive officer, would join UAL's board and Mr. Wolf would join British Air's.  UAL may also acquire as much as 15% of British Airways' shares on the open market.  Neither could acquire more than 15% of the other without regulatory approval.  Both the U.S. and the United Kingdom bar foreigners from buying more than 25% of their airlines.  In a telephone interview from London, Sir Colin said the investment is part of British Air's "global strategy" to become a stronger competitor in the planned unified European Community market after 1992.  For example, he said, British Air wants a link with United's planned flights from Europe to the U.S.  The British Air chief executive had said he didn't want to invest in U.S. airlines because of laws barring foreign investors from exercising control.  But he said he changed his mind after UAL stock started moving on takeover speculation and first approached UAL in July, before the Davis bid.  Last week, the U.S. Department of Transportation threatened to crack down on foreign stakes in U.S. carriers in the wake of KLM Royal Dutch Airways' $400 million investment in Northwest Airlines parent NWA Inc.  But Sir Colin said the large employee ownership stake envisioned for UAL "is likely to be quite appealing" to U.S. regulators.  "The company will be quite clearly under the control" of U.S. citizens, he said.  Kemper National Property & Casualty Cos. and France's largest insurer, UAP Group, agreed to form a joint venture company that will market and service highly protected risk insurance in Europe.  Kemper National, based in Long Grove, Ill., is part of Kemper Group.  Highly protected risk insurance coverage is available only to commercial, institutional and industrial facilities meeting a high standard of property loss protection.  Investment banking firm Van Kampen Merritt said it submitted an offer on behalf of an unidentified investing group client to purchase all the shares of Syncor International Corp. at $7.57 a share.  The offer has an indicated total value of $81.8 million.  Van Kampen Merritt, based in Lisle, Ill., is a subsidiary of Xerox Financial Services, a unit of Xerox Corp.  Syncor, Chatsworth, Calif., makes and distributes advanced medical diagnostic products, and has about 10.8 million shares outstanding.  The company had 1989 sales of $104 million and net income of about $4 million.  It said its board will evaluate the offer.  In national over-the-counter trading Friday, Syncor shares closed up 37.5 cents, at $6.50.  The offer is scheduled to expire Sept. 7 at noon EDT.  Laaco Ltd. said it completed the sale of its 51% stake in the Riviera Country Club to Tokyo-based Marukin Shoji Co. for about $55 million.  Marukin Shoji purchased 49% of the country club last year for $53 million, receiving an option for the remainder.  Laaco is a limited partnership which owns the Los Angeles Athletic Club and the California Yacht Club.  Marukin Shoji is a real estate, construction and civil engineering concern.  Denver investor Thomas W. Gamel, who owns a 5.6% stake in Los Angeles-based Hollywood Park Realty Enterprise Inc. and Hollywood Park Operating Co., said he intends to engage in a proxy solicitation to support his nomination and election as director of the companies.  According to a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, Mr. Gamel also asked that the annual meetings of the stockholders be held by Dec. 10, 1989.  He said he may solicit proxies for the nomination of one or more additional persons for election as directors of the companies, whose shares are paired for trading.  G. Michael Finnigan, chief financial officer of Hollywood Park Operating Company, said the company was familiar with the filing, but he declined comment on it.  The trial of two former Biloxi, Miss., officials charged with illegally allocating Department of Housing and Urban Development funds ended with a hung jury.  Federal prosecutors plan to retry former Mayor Gerald Blessey and Reba Capers, former director of the Greater Biloxi Economic Development Foundation.  They were charged with illegally using $160,000 of a $500,000 HUD grant for costs related to a waterfront-project bond sale, rather than the project's infrastructure development as approved by HUD officials.  "We absolutely intend to retry," said George Phillips, U.S. attorney for the southern district of Mississippi.  Mr. Blessey's lawyer, Boyce Holleman, said the mistrial means "the government lost" and its "case gets weaker" as the prosecution attempts to pursue it further.  Southern California Gas Co. said it will redeem early all $60 million of its 12 3/4% Eurodollar notes due 1991.  The utility said the redemption will take place Oct. 15 at a price of 101, plus interest.  Britain's Plessey Co. pledged a 20% dividend increase this fiscal year as part of its fight against a hostile takeover bid from Siemens AG of West Germany and General Electric Co. of Britain.  The British electronics company, under siege by its two bigger rivals since Nov. 16, said it plans to pay 9.19 pence a share in dividends in the year ending March 31.  The 20% increase, greater than the Plessey average since 1985 of 15%, shows the board's "belief in the future of the company's performance," Plessey Chairman Sir John Clark said in a letter to shareholders.  The unusual pledge appears aimed at keeping shareholders loyal to Plessey's management as an important week begins in the nearly 10-month takeover battle.  Thursday is GEC and Siemens's first date for counting acceptances of the #2 billion offer.  Depending on the count -- and on the results of a GEC holders' meeting Friday to vote on the takeover -- the two partners might resume purchases of Plessey shares on London's stock exchange.  They halted such purchases Aug. 3, when their joint stake reached 29.9%.  Some London analysts expect GEC and Siemens to emerge from the week with a bigger Plessey stake, but still faced with the prospect of another five weeks of skirmishing.  The takeover war is scheduled to end by Oct. 16, the deadline for the GEC and Siemens offer.  A GEC spokesman declined to comment.  POLICE BROKE UP election protests in South Africa, arresting top black leaders.  Archbishop Tutu was held briefly after police in Cape Town surrounded his cathedral and a neighboring church to prevent a protest against national elections tomorrow that will exclude blacks.  Anti-apartheid clerics Allan Boesak and Beyers Naude were also detained, and police arrested journalists covering the event.  At other banned gatherings in Durban and Johannesburg, police used tear gas, bullets and batons to disperse demonstrators.  Earlier, acting President de Klerk said in his final campaign speech that racial discrimination must end.  Police have arrested more than 1,500 demonstrators since anti-apartheid groups began a campaign to defy South Africa's segregation laws Aug. 2.  ---  Two people were killed and 12 wounded when a gunman opened fire at the airport in Colombia's cocaine capital of Medellin.  Hours later, police found a bomb on an airplane there.  Meanwhile, Bush returned to Washington after a three-week vacation and put the finishing touches on his anti-drug speech, scheduled for delivery tonight.  ---  Strikers closed down factories, stores and public transportation in Azerbaijan in a bid to regain control for their republic of a region disputed with neighboring Armenia.  In a separate ethnic dispute, Russian-speaking workers in the republic of Moldavia stayed away from their jobs to protest a law making Moldavian the official language.  ---  Thousands of East Germans waited in Hungarian tent camps in a cold rain for passage to the West.  Hungary's interior minister was quoted as saying Bonn and East Berlin have to reach an agreement before the refugees can leave for West Germany, and that could take more than a month.  ---  Exxon has begun laying off workers and demobilizing equipment in preparation for halting oil spill cleanup operations in Alaska by mid-month.  Despite protests by Alaskan officials, the company is letting as many as 400 people go each day.  An Exxon tanker spilled almost 11 million gallons of crude off the coast in March.  ---  China's legislature dismissed Minister of Culture Wang Meng, a novelist and supporter of freedom of expression in the arts who was considered an ally of fallen Communist Party chief Zhao Ziyang.  He is the highest-ranking official to lose his post since a crackdown on dissent began in June.  ---  The U.S. placed Panamanian officials on a blacklist, forbidding U.S. firms and government agencies from buying from them or their businesses.  The action is intended to "hurt the pocketbooks" of people associated with Gen. Noriega, U.S. officials said.  ---  At least 150 people died when a Cuban jet filled with Italian tourists crashed in a thunderstorm shortly after taking off from Havana.  All but one of the 126 people aboard the Soviet-made jet were killed.  The others were killed in a village near the airport when the plane demolished their homes.  ---  An NAACP official accused authorities of overreacting during two nights of clashes in Virginia Beach, Va., between police and black college students attending a fraternity festival.  Up to 23 people were injured, and more than 100 stores were looted.  The resort town's mayor said that police had acted with "extraordinary restraint."  ---  A Bush spokesman praised Violeta Barrios de Chamorro as "a strong fighter for democracy" after she was picked as the Nicaraguan opposition's presidential candidate in elections scheduled for Feb. 25.  Chamorro's family publishes the opposition newspaper La Prensa, and she was in the first Sandinista government 10 years ago.  ---  An Iranian official said Washington has sent Tehran several messages in the hope of opening up political talks.  The deputy foreign minister said Iran sent an oral response through messengers.  He added that Western hostages in Lebanon may be released if the U.S. unfreezes Iranian assets.  ---  The EPA is taking steps to rid grocery shelves of apples and other foods treated with Alar within two years.  The agency proposed standards that would make it illegal to sell any food with detectable residues of the possibly cancer-causing pesticide after May 31, 1991, and would reduce permissible levels before that.  ---  Non-aligned leaders welcomed the relaxation in global tension at the start of a four-day summit of the 102-member Non-Aligned Movement in Belgrade.  But many voiced concern the Mideast and Africa will slide into political and economic disaster.  The chairman, Yugoslavia's president, made proposals to protect the environment.  ---  Died: A. Bartlett Giamatti, 51, baseball commissioner and former Yale University president, Friday, in Oak Bluffs, Mass., from a heart attack.  Porsche Cars North America Inc., Reno, Nev., which has seen its sales drop 43% this year, said it will close a parts warehouse and a distribution center to cut expenses.  Brian Bowler, president and chief executive officer of the sales and marketing unit of West Germany's Porsche AG, said the unit had already trimmed 15% of its overhead costs in the past six months before this latest reorganization.  Porsche currently operates a parts warehouse and a car-distribution center in both Reno and North Charleston, S.C.  By the end of October, Reno will handle the distribution of parts nationwide while North Charleston will be the only car-distribution center.  Currently, Porsche imports cars at both San Francisco and North Charleston, but only North Charleston will receive shipments after October.  Porsche Cars North America, which employs 348 people, will lay off about 40 because of the reorganization, a company spokesman said.  It pays to read the fine print.  A federal judge ruled that Federal Express Corp. doesn't have to pay any more than $118.50 for a $102,042 shipment of gold dust that the package-delivery company lost.  The court said the form signed by the Federal Express customer was a binding contract limiting the company's liability to $100, plus a refund of the shipping fee.  The liability limit is stated at the bottom of the first page of the form and on the back of the customer's copy.  In federal court in Manhattan, Judge Peter K. Leisure said the customer, U.S. Gold Corp., could have indicated a higher value -- and paid a higher fee -- if it wanted more protection.  The judge said that because U.S. Gold had often used Federal Express in the past, it "had adequate notice of Federal's limitation of its liability."  The lost package was one of several thousand shipped by U.S. Gold via Federal Express in 1988.  The 17-pound package was dropped off at the Federal Express office in St. Petersburg, Fla., but never arrived at its destination in Rapid City, S.D. U.S. Gold had insured the gold, so it won't be out any money.  Andrew R. Colmant, an attorney for U.S. Gold and its insurer, said no decision has been made on appealing.  GTE Corp. said it is investigating circumstances surrounding the departure of the controller of its satellite unit.  GTE said Dan French, who was also a vice president of GTE Spacenet, resigned six weeks ago.  In a memo to employees last week, Spacenet President C.J. Waylan said "the circumstances surrounding his (Mr.  French's) departure are still under investigation and the release of further specific information at this time would be premature."  He urged employees not to talk to outsiders about the matter.  "As this situation unfolds it is very likely that speculation" will appear in the media, the memo said.  A GTE spokesman said he couldn't comment further "on advice of counsel."  Mr. French, reached at his Bethesda, Md., home refused to comment.  An industry newsletter, Satellite News, said in its Sept. 4 issue that GTE auditors found "discrepancies" during an internal audit of the Spacenet unit about six weeks ago.  According to its sources, the newsletter said GTE accountants discovered "what appeared to be invalid vendor accounts" to which as much as $500,000 had been deposited.  GTE wouldn't comment on the newsletter's report.  GTE Spacenet sells telecommunications services that utilize satellites.  The majority of GTE's earnings and revenue comes from local phone operations.  Chase Manhattan Corp. said that it had ended its two-year-old agreement to sell seven New York City branches of Chase Manhattan Bank to an investor group headed by former Democratic Congressman Herman Badillo.  Chase said that it was ending the sale because Mr. Badillo's group hadn't gotten approval from the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp. to form a bank, to be called Bank InterAmerica, and buy the branches.  Mr. Badillo wasn't available for comment.  A Chase spokesman said the bank will keep and operate the branches, located in Manhattan, the Bronx and Queens.  "The sales deadline had been extended four times," said the spokesman.  "Continued uncertainty wasn't in the best interests of our customers or our employees."  The American Society of Travel Agents said it withdrew its plan to offer "press sponsorships" at its scheduled conference in Miami.  "It had the effect of suggesting different levels of treatment to media representatives, against established ASTA policy," a spokesman said Friday.  The sponsorships, which cost between $750 and $3,000 and entitled holders priority access to the press room, were the subject of an article in The Wall Street Journal last week.  The Securities and Exchange Commission asked a federal appeals court to review a recent ruling that led the Philadelphia and American stock exchanges to shut down trading in their new stock "basket" products.  A Seventh Circuit Court of Appeals panel in Chicago ruled two weeks ago that the SEC improperly approved the new products earlier this year.  The court said the products, which enable an investor to trade a broad cross section of stocks, should be regulated by the Commodity Futures Trading Commission because they have some traits of futures contracts.  In response, the Philadelphia Stock Exchange and the American Stock Exchange stopped new trading in the basket products while the matter is argued in court.  Both exchanges joined the SEC in asking that the full appeals court review the decision made by a three-judge panel.  The Chicago Board Options Exchange, which has prepared a basket product but hasn't begun trading in it, also asked for a review.  The SEC and the exchanges contend that the decision, unless overturned, will restrict the development of new products by subjecting securities products to laws governing commodity and futures products.  The case was originally brought by the Chicago Board of Trade and futures-industry officials.  Adelphia Communications Corp. said a unit completed the acquisition of the cable-television systems and assets of Richlands Cablevision L.P. and Better Entertainment Cable L.P. Terms weren't disclosed.  The systems serve approximately 30,000 basic subscribers in and around the Virginia municipalities of Richlands, Pulaski, Galax and Marion.  Live Entertainment Inc.'s choice of a law firm to investigate whether there was any link between Live's operations and the recent murder of its chairman has drawn conflict-of-interest charges from a former client of the firm.  The propriety of Paul, Weiss, Rifkind, Wharton & Garrison doing an "internal review" of Live's operations was challenged by Morris Levy, a record-industry executive who federal officials have said has ties to organized crime.  The New York firm represented Mr. Levy in his unsuccessful defense of extortion charges in a New Jersey federal court last year.  Earlier this year, Live bought Strawberries, a New England record-store chain in which Mr. Levy held a majority interest, for $40.5 million.  Since the Aug. 20 murder of Live's chairman, Jose Menendez, and his wife, Kitty, press attention has focused on the Strawberries purchase as well as a second acquisition by Live from another person with alleged organized-crime ties.  In an interview, Mr. Levy, who has consistently denied any links to organized crime, said his attorney sent a letter to Paul Weiss charging that "a conflict of interest exists if Paul Weiss represents the interests of Live Entertainment in connection with an in-house investigation into Mr. Levy's former company."  Paul Weiss no longer represents Mr. Levy, and the firm has sued him in New York state court over $1.3 million in legal fees the firm claims it is owed from the extortion case.  Mr. Levy, who is free pending appeal of his conviction, contends Paul Weiss overcharged him and gave him inadequate representation.  Peter Hoffman, acting chairman of Live, denied any conflict of interest because Paul Weiss no longer represents Mr. Levy.  Mr. Hoffman also said company officials are "extremely confident" there isn't any connection between the Strawberries purchase and Mr. Menendez's murder.  However, Mr. Hoffman conceded that "if for some God-awful reason" a connection is found, "we will review the situation and likely won't have Paul Weiss involved in anything having to do with Mr. Levy."  Mr. Hoffman is also president and chief executive officer of Carolco Pictures Inc, which finances, produces and leases movies.  Carolco owns 49% of Live, a major distributor and retailer of audio and video entertainment.  Mr. Hoffman said Paul Weiss was chosen partly because the firm "has done a lot of work for us in the past."  However, he said "I can't recall" when asked whether that work included the review Live said it had done of possible organized-crime connections at Strawberries at the time of the purchase.  Live has said that review found the record chain to be "whistle clean."  Richard Borisoff, a Paul Weiss partner, refused to answer any questions about the matter.  Allegations concerning Mr. Levy's past have fueled questions about organized crime in the Menendez case.  A Federal Bureau of Investigation affidavit filed in New York federal court identifies Mr. Levy as a longtime "lucrative source of cash and property for leaders of the Genovese" crime family.  The affidavit also quotes an unidentified informant as saying that Strawberries was partly owned by a faction of the Genovese family.  Mr. Levy said his dealings with Live over Strawberries were amicable.  Despite speculation to the contrary, Mr. Levy says he was "thrilled" with the price he received for the company.  He said he met Mr. Menendez twice during negotiations.  Mr. Levy said his relations with Live officials "have been very friendly.  There is no bad blood."  A second purchase has also raised organized-crime questions.  In a series of transactions beginning in 1986, Carolco purchased International Video Entertainment Inc. from Noel C. Bloom, a Los Angeles businessman.  Mr. Bloom was identified in a 1986 report on organized crime by the California attorney general's office as a "major distributor of X-rated movies" and a "former associate of the late Michael Zaffarano of the Bonnanno" organized-crime family.  The report also said Mr. Bloom is thought to have received his start in the pornography industry with financial help from another figure connected to organized crime.  Mr. Bloom has refused to comment.  However, an attorney for him has described Mr. Bloom as a "reputable" video distributor.  International Video was later merged with another company to form Live Entertainment.  Japan's reserves of gold, convertible foreign currencies and special drawing rights fell by $547 million in August from July, to $88.32 billion, the Finance Ministry said.  The August decline followed a drop of $597 million in July, and is the fourth consecutive monthly decrease.  Oclassen Pharmaceuticals Inc. said it petitioned the U.S. Food and Drug Administration to begin intermediate clinical trials of a new antiviral agent that is partly aimed at relieving a relatively common eye affliction among AIDS patients.  The company said the agent, known as FIAC, is initially being developed for treating AIDS patients with a blinding infection of the retina caused by cytomegalovirus, a type of herpes virus, as well as patients with a related gastrointestinal affliction.  FIAC is the latest of several agents being tested or marketed to combat such problems, including a drug developed by Syntex Corp. of Palo Alto, Calif., that the FDA cleared in June.  FIAC was developed by New York's Memorial Sloan-Kettering cancer center; Oclassen holds an exclusive world-wide license to develop and market it.  Closely held Oclassen said that early clinical studies were conducted on over 100 patients at Memorial Sloan-Kettering, and that more advanced trials could begin as soon as later this month.  Comptronix Corp. said its 1989 sales and earnings will be lower than analysts' expectations, despite the recent addition of "several large" customers.  Analysts had been forecasting the company's 1989 sales as high as $55 million, and per-share earnings of 35 cents to 40 cents.  William J. Ebding, chairman and chief executive officer, said the electronics manufacturer received fewer "than anticipated orders from a major customer for disk-drive products," which will reduce second-half sales and earnings.  For the year, however, he said the company will still report "significantly higher" numbers than the 1988 net income of $1 million, or 17 cents a share, on sales of $29.3 million.  Mr. Ebding said revenue from contracts signed with new customers added over the past three months -- including a contract that could total $50 million over six years -- will start slowly and "have only a minor impact on 1989 results.  The Canadian dollar's climb has stalled, and many currency analysts say a widely expected retreat may have started.  Stemming the bullish sentiment about the currency are new evidence of slowing economic growth and the resulting expectations of an easing in Canada's relatively high interest rates.  Adding to the worries is the nation's deteriorating trade picture.  "The Canadian dollar is vulnerable here.  I'm looking for downward pressure.  We may have seen the Canadian dollar's highs for the year," says Lisa Finstrom, a currency analyst at Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.  But the Canadian dollar probably won't go into a free fall, as Canada's interest rates should remain lofty enough to buttress the currency and the Bank of Canada probably would intervene against any massive selling spree, traders say.  Before running into problems, the Canadian dollar, which had been climbing since the beginning of the year, edged above 85 U.S. cents last month and hit its highest levels in about nine years.  In late New York trading Friday, it was quoted at 84.65 cents, well below its high but still about 1% above its level at the beginning of 1989.  September Canadian dollar futures on the International Monetary Market settled at US$0.8451 Friday, compared with a life-of-contract high of $0.8530 reached last Tuesday.  Ms. Finstrom sees the Canadian dollar dropping to around 84 cents by the end of September.  By year's end, she sees the currency at 82.50 cents; a number of more bearish analysts expect the Canadian dollar to be close to 80 cents by December.  While market participants may disagree about the speed of the anticipated descent, currency analysts say there is little doubt that the outlook for Canada's interest rates is the dollar's biggest problem.  The Bank of Canada is expected to ease credit in coming months because of Canada's moderating economic growth, and a "gradual, fairly steady decline" of the Canadian dollar probably will coincide with that development, says Mark Meagher, senior economist at Merrill Lynch Canada Inc. in Toronto.  Interest rates can have a major influence on a nation's currency because they help determine demand for investments denominated in the unit.  Concerns about lower rates intensified after Thursday's release of Canada's second-quarter gross domestic product data, currency analysts say.  GDP grew at a 0.8% annual rate in the quarter, the slowest inflation-adjusted growth rate since the fourth quarter of 1986, because of slower growth in output, employment, housing starts and housing resales.  With growth likely to remain slow because of weakness in consumer demand and exports, the Bank of Canada may have room to loosen credit after tightening in recent months to battle inflation, says John Grant, chief economist at Wood Gundy Corp. in Toronto.  The closely watched differential between yields on three-month Canadian Treasury bills and three-month U.S. T-bills probably will shrink in the next few months to about 300 basis points, or three percentage points, Mr. Grant says.  The differential is currently 405 basis points, narrowed from 419 in early August but still far wider than the spread of 259 basis points seen in mid-January.  The Bank of Canada is expected to use a rate strategy similar to the U.S. Federal Reserve's, in which any easing will be gradual to avoid rekindling inflation, including price pressures that would be caused by a Canadian dollar plunge.  Canada's consumer price index rose at an annual rate of 5.4% in June and July.  Rate concerns are compounded by Canada's trade problems.  In the second quarter, its trade surplus narrowed to 719 million Canadian dollars (US$608 million), the smallest quarterly surplus in more than 10 years.  Analysts attributed some of the narrowing to the strength of the Canadian currency during the quarter, but a surge in Canadian investment spending also was cited.  Ms. Finstrom of Shearson Lehman Hutton says, "I expect the trade situation to deteriorate as long as the currency is where it is," and many say the weakening that's expected in the Canadian dollar might not be substantial enough to brighten the trade picture.  They point out that the currency's decline is likely to be curbed by Bank of Canada action and say the Canadian dollar might be seen as a good buy again if the U.S. dollar's recent climb runs out of steam.  "The Canadian dollar's weakness is going to be limited," says Anthony Franz, a senior foreign exchange account executive at the Canadian Bank of Commerce Trust Co.  The Bank of Canada, he says, is probably content with the Canadian dollar holding around the current level at this time.  Meanwhile, for the U.S. dollar, traders say further gains are likely after its surge last week.  Late Friday in New York, the dollar was quoted at 1.9810 West German marks and 145.98 yen, up from 1.9668 marks and 145.00 yen late Thursday, despite reports that the Bank of Japan sold an estimated $1 billion in Tokyo trading.  In Tokyo Tuesday, the dollar opened at 145.85 yen, down from Monday's close of 146.13 yen.  The dollar is poised for a test of important resistance at 2.00 marks after news of the unexpectedly strong U.S. employment performance in August, many traders say.  The jobless rate remained unchanged at 5.2%, and non-farm payrolls grew by 110,000 even though strikes idled about 108,000 workers.  Many analysts had expected a 5.3% unemployment rate for August and a non-farm payrolls rise of about 70,000 after the strike impact was accounted for.  "Our economy is showing good growth and moderating inflation.  That's good for the greenback," said Gary Thayer, a currency analyst at A.G. Edwards & Sons Inc. in St. Louis.  It is likely that the dollar will try to top 2.05 marks, its 1989 peak so far, in the next few weeks, he says.  In trading in Hong Kong Tuesday, gold was quoted at $359.35 an ounce.  West Germany's industrial production rose a seasonally adjusted 2.3% in July from June and was up 9.8% from a year earlier, the Economics Ministry said.  July's rise in output was sharply above economists' predictions.  Midlantic Corp. said it completed its previously announced acquisition of five banks in upstate New York from Bank of New York Co. for $305 million.  The five banks, which have $2.1 billion in assets, are Central Trust Co., Rochester; Merchants National Bank & Trust Co. of Syracuse; Endicott Trust Co.; Union National Bank, Albany; and First National Bank of Moravia.  Eastern Airlines agreed to pay $2.9 million to settle two groups of claims alleging violations of security and maintenance regulations, the Federal Aviation Administration said.  The FAA said one of the agreements, for $1.9 million, covers all of Eastern's alleged violations of FAA maintenance and operations regulations before March 9, 1989.  That's the date the airline, a unit of Texas Air Corp., filed for protection from creditors under U.S. bankruptcy law after the start of a strike by pilots and the machinists union.  This settlement includes charges that Eastern failed to comply with requirements for making, retaining, and monitoring records at Eastern's maintenance facility at New York's Kennedy Airport.  The second settlement, for $1 million, involves alleged violations of security regulations, also before March 9, the FAA said.  The FAA said Eastern still must pay an additional $8.5 million, stemming from a penalty Eastern agreed to pay in 1987 for alleged safety violations.  As is customary in FAA settlements, Eastern didn't admit to violating the safety requirements.  Japan's domestic sales of cars, trucks and buses climbed 21% in August from a year earlier to 319,427 units, a record for the month, the Japan Automobile Dealers Association said.  That surpassed the prior August record of 284,914 units, recorded in August 1973.  Association officials commented that a new 3% consumption tax, which replaced a higher commodity tax in April, has reduced sticker prices and bolstered sales.  Krista Hagelberger smiles politely in the middle of a show ring as hundreds of pounds of obstinate hogs and their exasperated owners run circles around her.  It hardly seems a proper place for royalty.  But when you are a teen-age pork-industry queen, your domain necessarily includes the O'Neill Swine Barn at the Ohio State Fair, a kingdom smelling of sawdust and manure, and populated by squealing sausage-in-waiting.  The experience isn't on a par with the Miss America Pageant.  Pork queens generally don't wear spike heels or carry bouquets of fresh flowers.  Krista's white flat shoes are rather more practical, and when she was crowned at the Ohio Pork Congress, she was presented with roses made of . . . pig suede.  She is booked through the fall, giving cooking demonstrations at Big Bear Supermarkets.  And, on Pork in the Press Box day, she will serve pork sandwiches at Ohio State football games.  Every summer, Ohio produces a cornucopia of queens, to promote all manner of foodstuffs -- not just pork but cherries, tomatoes, Swiss cheese, melons, ice cream, honey and bratwurst.  Some Ohio royalty, like Miss Potato, come with a court -- including a Tater Tot Princess and Tater Tot Prince.  Little Miss Apple Blossom is similarly paired with Little Mister Apple Bud.  The two of them, draped in red capes, are barely four feet tall.  The various designees in turn give out other awards, and they participate in one another's parades, waving to their subjects from papier-mache floats that resemble green cigars on wheels.  Maybe 900 festival queens reign over the state, says Ronald Keller, the president of the Ohio Festivals and Events Association.  "I think it has something to do with the mystique of royalty," he says, searching for an explanation.  When his own hometown -- Millersport -- celebrated the 40th anniversary of the sweet-corn festival, about two-thirds of past queens returned for the occasion, making the trip from as far away as Texas, California and New York.  "They said being queen was the highlight of their life," he says.  Typically, a pageant is part of the festival held to honor a town's most abundant produce.  Bellevue, Ohio, picked cherries because it picks so many cherries.  Cropless towns crown commodity queens, Miss Coal for instance.  Williamsport, home of the Deer Creek Dam, elects a Miss Dam Days.  A festival official says one former, flustered sovereign introduced herself as "Your Dam Queen."  Other towns have to scrounge some to find anything local to celebrate.  Consider poor Edison, a town of 504 that doesn't have a dominant fruit or vegetable, a river or natural resource.  About the only thing everyone in town seemed to have was too much zucchini in the garden, so Edison adopted the squash as the royal fruit in 1982.  Besides, it was the one thing that hadn't been claimed by another town.  "We've been accused of going through the whole alphabet to find something," says Eleanor Koon, Edison's mayor, postmistress and chairman of the centennial club.  Edison nevertheless adopted the orphan fruit with gusto, and has found all sorts of exotic things to do with zucchinis.  Making zucchini ice cream, for instance, and decorations -- squat green brides and grooms to top wedding cakes.  Just about any young woman residing in a town with a festival is eligible to compete.  Miss Fish in Vermilion doesn't have to know how to swim.  And just a few pageants, like Edison's, bother with talent competitions.  The reigning Zucchini Queen, Tammy Holland, who has never had a dance lesson, studied the TV show "Solid Gold" to learn what her mother calls "those weird fluid snake movements."  Beauty, while appreciated, isn't essential either.  "You don't want them to look like a dog, but mostly you want someone who can get on stage and make people want to come to your area," says Eileen Hatfield, secretary and treasurer of the state festival association.  The way they act is more important.  Pork queen contestants are coached on such topics as "How to present peppy pork demonstrations," while potential gourd kings and queens are invited to a luncheon so judges, on the sly, can assess their table manners.  Another thing: Once elected, queens shouldn't be seen in bars.  That includes Miss Moonshine from New Straitsville, which, in any case, doesn't have a functioning still that anybody will admit to.  The town nevertheless calls itself the Moonshine Capital of the World, perhaps for historical reasons.  In Bellevue, steady boyfriends of Cherry Queens are told to get lost temporarily to make room for uniformed Marines, imported from Cleveland as escorts.  "They're such fine boys.  Some Marines have come back to us a second and third time," says Dorothy Stedman, who ran the Bellevue queen pageant for 15 years before retiring recently at the age of 81. (Mrs.  Stedman paired her own daughter with the Bellevue parade marshal one year and the two eventually married.)  But the life of a festival queen is no bed of suede roses: Some have to smile and wave their way tirelessly through three parades in a single weekend.  Visiting queens at the Huron Water festival were hosed down by obnoxious punks.  And royal allergies have to be suppressed amid all the hay on some of these floats.  The kids also must be able to endure a certain amount of ridicule.  Parade watchers jeered "Gourdhead" at Abbey Francis, and nearly every queen associated with the pork producers is called "Miss Piggy" and oinked at at some point. (The pork people have tried to cut out some of the snorting by calling her Pork Industry Queen rather than Pork Queen, but it doesn't help all that much.)  If there is a down side, royalty also has its privileges.  "It's a good thing to put on a resume," says Abbey, the Gourd Queen.  Krista Hagelberger got a pig suede coat and a $300 scholarship, thanks to the Ohio Pork Council Women (formerly the Ohio Porkettes).  And if a queen should happen not to go on to college, the money goes to her high-school home-economics department for teaching pork's pluses.  Krista takes her promotional responsibilities seriously.  In fact, she considers herself more the spokesperson for "the other white meat" than she does a queen.  She can rattle off the calories in a three-ounce serving of pork (198) and knows that China domesticated the pig in 4900 B.C.  She has lobbied Ohio legislators to preserve funds for research on a disease that kills hogs.  And she goes around saying that she likes pork better than pizza. (Of course, there's always sausage pizza.)  In years past, Krista would have gone to Des Moines to compete for National Pork Industry Queen.  But the nation's pork industry, which used to elect a national queen from state winners, has decided to forgo pageantry and designate young pork ambassadors instead.  Some fear that local festival queens are dying out.  In Mount Gilead, just two girls tried out for Gourd Queen and only one teen-age boy tried out for Gourd King.  The reigning king, Scott DePhillips, inherited his crown from a fellow who held the title for two years.  He kept it by default because no one else wanted to compete for it.  Scott says some of his friends think Gourd King is stupid, while others don't want any part of it because it means they would have to cut their hair.  But Scott doesn't mind.  "It's been so much fun, I hope no one runs next year so I can be king again."  Zucchini queen Tammy Holland is also being recycled because volunteers were lacking to run the pageant this year.  And the extended tenure doesn't bother the reigning 1988-1989-1990 queen.  She still gets goose flesh remembering the summer night when she was transformed from a kid with glasses and hay fever into . . . a queen.  There she was, standing on stage in a pink strapless gown that she and her mother bought, used, for $20 at a bridal shop, to be crowned with a cut-glass studded tiara, four inches high.  Afterward, her parents whisked her away in their black van, stopping first at the jail where her father works, then at the IGA supermarket that employed her mother, to parade her before admiring friends.  Then it was home for potato chips and pop.  "I thought, 'This must be a dream,'" says Tammy.  "I always wanted to be queen of something some day."  It's a pity she hates zucchini.  The Nuclear Regulatory Commission staff proposed a fine of $25,000 against Northeast Utilities' nuclear power unit for alleged violation of NRC rules relating to the handling of radiation-contaminated parts from its Millstone Nuclear Station.  Northeast, a utility holding company, said it wouldn't contest the fine and that it would be borne by shareholders, not customers.  Separately, the company said that the strong operating performance of its seven nuclear power plants resulted in a $29.5 million credit to customers of its Connecticut Light & Power unit.  But the company noted that it has proposed, as previously reported, that $25 million of this performance refund be retained by the company to pay for its allowed share of costs associated with the Seabrook 1 nuclear plant.  The Justice Department has indicated it will join civil litigation against Northrop Corp. over purported mischarges on MX missile equipment, according to people familiar with the matter.  The case, brought by former Northrop manager David Peterson under the federal False Claims Act, is still under seal here before federal Judge David Kenyon.  But government attorneys have informed Northrop and Mr. Peterson's lawyers that the government intends to intervene in at least some of the complaint against the company, according to people familiar with the matter.  It couldn't immediately be learned which aspects of the case the government wants to help prosecute, but it is understood that Mr. Peterson has alleged damages to be far greater than what the government would attempt to recover.  Despite that disparity, the government's signaling that it plans to take up the Peterson case is significant, helping to revive a thorny issue that Northrop hoped had been laid to rest.  Along with a related, stepped-up criminal inquiry against the Northrop division that makes MX guidance systems, the Peterson case could further taint Northrop's image just as it is trying to persuade Congress not to slash funding for its B-2 Stealth bomber.  The law firm representing Mr. Peterson wouldn't comment or make its client available.  A top Justice Department official also declined to comment, as did a Northrop spokesman and the company's outside counsel.  Nonetheless, Mr. Peterson's allegations are widely known.  In June 1987, he testified before Congress that Northrop set up a series of shell companies to circumvent its normally cumbersome procurement system and speed the MX project along.  There was much incentive to hurry because, at one point, Northrop was so far behind in its guidance-system deliveries, the Air Force withheld millions of dollars in payments to the company.  Rockwell International Corp. was even made a second-source supplier of the guidance systems, formally known as inertial measurement units.  Northrop has acknowledged setting up a separate company to buy parts but has contended the move fell within Pentagon guidelines.  Mr. Peterson, however, testified before Congress that when duplicate parts belatedly reached Northrop through its regular channels, the company threw them away to prepare for an Air Force audit.  Mr. Peterson told Air Force investigators, in fact, that Northrop threw hundreds of boxes of MX parts into commercial trash containers.  In addition, Mr. Peterson alleged that Northrop improperly tested many of the parts that came through the shell company he headed, Liaison Engineering Services Inc.  Some of the parts were even purchased from Radio Shack stores and put right on the guidance system, he told investigators.  Just a few weeks ago, it seemed Northrop's MX-related troubles had all but ended.  In early August, a federal judge dismissed a $3 million civil suit brought by the government against the company for allegedly falsifying test data on the guidance system's heat exchanger.  Furthermore, the Justice Deartment last year declined to join a False Claims Act case claiming fraud in the company's making of MX missile equipment.  But the Peterson case is, in the words of one congressional investigator, "the hottest of all."  Under the False Claims Act, the Justice Department has 60 days to tell the court whether it wants to join in litigation brought by a whistleblower, who shares in any monetary recovery made by the government.  The compan y is not informed it has been sued until the government makes that determination.  The government can ask for further extensions, keeping the suit under seal -- and out of the company's hands -- for an indefinite period.  If there is a companion criminal case that the Justice Department is pursuing, it can request that the False Claims Act suit be kept sealed even after it has decided to join in, thereby blocking the company's access to certain documents.  But if the government wants to do that, it must inform the company, which at this stage may try to strike a deal and settle the civil case.  That is apparently what happened with the Peterson case, though Mr. Peterson's law firm said it "is not aware of any settlement."  Here they come again.  For years a propellant of the U.S. Treasury market, Japanese money is beginning to play its magic on the U.S. stock market.  Increasingly in the past five months, brokers and traders say "the Japanese, the Japanese" when asked to explain market rallies.  The Japanese "carry more mystique and often when they show their face, they move the market dramatically," says Chung Lew, head trader at Kleinwort Benson Inc. in New York.  After selling a net $104 million of foreign stocks in the first quarter, Japanese investors added $6.03 billion to their portfolios in the following three months, according to Japan's Ministry of Finance.  June's net purchases of $3.26 billion set a record; brokers estimate purchases dropped in July but still exceeded sales.  Japanese analysts reckon that 60% to 70% of the buying represents U.S. shares.  Even those analysts who argue that the Japanese now affect the U.S. equity market only at the margin concede the influence could someday be enormous.  Noting that less than 4% of Japanese institutions' total assets are invested in U.S. equities, John A. Conlon Jr., an executive vice president at the U.S. unit of Nikko Securities Co. in New York, says: "They've got the potential to be quite significant."  Indeed.  Analysts at Daiwa Securities Co. say that Nippon Life Insurance Co., Japan's biggest institutional investor, brings in roughly $150 million a day, an amount equal to more than a million shares of IBM.  "We figured it would take them 200 days to buy the whole company," says one Daiwa executive in New York.  For the most part, Japanese investors -- institutions and individuals alike -- are buying such big, blue-chip names as Sears Roebuck, Boeing, Du Pont, Coca-Cola and American Express.  Not surprisingly, brokerage firms are recommending many of these same stocks, with their "buy" lists often overlapping.  For instance, 13 of 27 U.S. stocks on a Daiwa August "buy" list also are among 36 that Nomura Securities Co. recommended in May.  They include Merck, United Technologies, General Electric, American Telephone & Telegraph and Anheuser-Busch.  To some observers, Japanese investors are the rhinoceroses of the U.S. stock market: clumsy behemoths who indiscriminately pour large sums into household-name equities.  Many U.S. competitors also regard them as neophytes when it comes to sophisticated trading techniques.  "I get real concerned when I hear that they are buying for a sustained period," says James Wright, senior managing director at Banc One Asset Management Corp.  "There is a good chance that I will sell stocks to them that they will keep running up.  They are trend followers, price momentum-oriented."  A momentum trader buys stocks when prices are rising and sells them in declining markets.  Mr. Wright invests with the aid of a computer that points out companies with high growth rates but low price-earnings ratios.  In 1987, Mr. Wright says, Japanese buying would often "overvalue" stocks in his portfolio and his computer program would put them on a sell list.  About 10% of the stocks on Nomura and Daiwa's "buy" lists turned up this summer on Mr. Wright's computer as candidates for selling.  In August, his computer flagged Procter & Gamble, Waste Management, Disney, Motorola, AMR and Monsanto, among others, as stocks to sell.  All of them are on Daiwa's "buy" list, and the last five are on Nomura's.  Noting the long, steady rise of the Tokyo stock market, Kenji Kaga, a broker at Daiwa's U.S. unit, says that Japanese investors see no problem with investing in rising markets "because that's the way the Tokyo market is.  They don't think they're late when the market goes up, because of the Tokyo experience."  The Japanese are investing in stock markets other than the U.S., particularly Britain's and West Germany's.  But the U.S. market -- the world's second biggest after Japan -- and big U.S. companies offer Tokyo money managers liquidity, which is the ability to buy and sell large blocks without distorting prices.  "Liquidity is very important to Japanese investors and is getting more and more important," says Seiyu Nakao, chief strategist for Nomura Research Institute's U.S. arm.  That also applies to the over-the-counter market, where big Tokyo brokers are recommending Apple Computer and MCI Communications but few others.  "It's hard to sell small stocks without moving the market," says Mr. Nakao.  Thrusting Japanese investors toward American stocks are an unexpectedly strong dollar and a need to diversify the riches generated by Japan's high savings rate and large trade surplus.  "The most important factor is dollar stabilization," says Mr. Nakao.  "We now think the dollar has hit bottom."  A stable dollar protects Japanese U.S. investments against losses from currency depreciation.  Similarly, a rising dollar increases the value of foreign holdings in yen terms.  And although the U.S. currency has declined from its mid-June highs, "a lot of Japanese institutions insulated themselves from its fall by hedging," says Mark Cliffe, chief economist at Nomura's London unit.  "That means they are more relaxed about investing in the U.S. market."  Moreover, U.S. shares look cheap to Japanese investors.  Tokyo stock prices average about 65 times their per-share earnings, five to six times what U.S. stocks sell for.  In addition, Japanese dividends on average equal 0.5% of share prices, compared with 3.4% for U.S. stocks.  Japanese familiarity with overseas equities is enhanced by the 114 foreign companies listed on the Tokyo Stock Exchange, 66 of which are U.S. Twenty-one of 36 U.S. companies that Nomura recommended to its Japanese clients also carry Tokyo listings.  So far this year, the Dow Jones Industrial Average has climbed 27%, compared with 14% for the Nikkei index of 225 stocks listed on the first section of the Tokyo Stock Exchange.  At the same time, Mr. Nakao predicts that "the U.S. economy will {experience} a soft landing," meaning moderate growth and low inflation, "and U.S. interest rates will decline further."  Both, he adds, are good for equities.  Japan's so-called Big Four securities firms -- Nomura, Daiwa, Nikko and Yamaichi Securities Co. -- have been promoting foreign, particularly U.S., equities.  "For the first time, you have a concerted effort on the part of the Big Four in beating the retail investor over the head to buy U.S. stocks," says a senior executive at one of the firms.  There are signs the Japanese are trying to become more sophisticated investors.  Nikko showed up on the New York Stock Exchange's list of the 15 most active program traders in July, the first appearance by a Japanese institution.  Nikko's trading didn't involve index arbitrage, but a Chicago futures trader says that at least three of the Big Four are getting ready to start index arbitrage trading.  Moreover, Nikko in July agreed to pay $125 million for a 50% interest in Wells Fargo & Co.'s investment advisory group, known for its sophisticated, computerized investment techniques.  Index arbitrage involves rapidly buying and selling stocks and stock-index futures to take advantage of price differences between the two.  For the past few years, Japanese institutions have used futures to hedge currency risk.  Chicago traders say they are now starting to hedge stock positions as well, trading through big Midwestern futures firms such as Refco Group Ltd.  Some Japanese life-insurance companies and trust banks also have given money to U.S. money managers to program trade, but these efforts are still regarded as mostly experiments.  "They are still in the learning stage, and the Japanese market is now trying to catch up with the U.S.," says Mr. Kaga of Daiwa.  That includes chasing potential takeover candidates such as Avon, Eastman Kodak, UAL and Warner-Lambert.  ---  @ Nomura's U.S. Stock Picks  @ The Japanese brokerage firm's recommendations on May 1, 1989  @ % CHANGE  @ 5/1/89  @ NAME TO 9/1/89  @ AMR Corp. 42.7%  @ Walt Disney 38.3  @ Philip Morris 30.2  @ Motorola 27.7  @ Waste Management 27.2  @ Federal Express 26.8  @ Limited Inc. 25.6  @ Monsanto 24.7  @ Coca-Cola 22.8  @ PepsiCo 21.2  @ General Electric 19.5  @ Amer.  Int'l.  Group 17.6  @ Compaq 17.1  @ Commun.  Satellite 16.8  @ Bankers Trust 16.7  @ Abbott Labs 16.4  @ AT&T 16.3  @ Schlumberger 14.1  @ Eli Lilly 13.6  @ Johnson & Johnson 12.0  @ General Mills 11.3  @ Anheuser-Busch 11.1  @ J.P. Morgan 11.1  @ United Technologies 10.2  @ Mobil 10.0  @ Boeing 9.6  @ Merck 9.5  @ Du Pont 9.4  @ Dow Chemical 9.3  @ Citicorp 8.7  @ Caterpillar 8.5  @ McDonald's 5.2  @ Amer.  Family Group 0.0  @ Sears Roebuck -1.1  @ Hewlett-Packard -5.8  @ Ashland Oil -8.0  @ Index of 36 Issues 15.3  @ DJIA 14.0  @ S&P 14.4  @ Source: IDD Informations Services/Tradeline  ---  Friday's Market Activity  Stocks stepped to new highs as the government's labor report confirmed expectations of continued economic growth.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average rose 14.82 to 2752.09, a record.  Broader averages also set records: Standard & Poor's 500-stock index gained 2.28 to 353.73, and the New York Stock Exchange composite index rose 1.10 to 196.37.  The American Stock Exchange index also touched a new high, rising 1.77 to 383.96.  Advancing issues on the Big Board outpaced decliners 897 to 498.  Some 133,300,000 shares traded on the Big Board, the second lightest trading day of the week.  The third-quarter winning streak stayed alive as well.  The Dow industrials rose for the ninth week in a row, the longest such stretch since late 1985.  Last week, the average gained 19.73 points, or 0.7%.  Purchasing managers said the economy declined in August for the fourth consecutive month.  But the August labor report suggested that economic growth remains resilient.  Stock buyers clearly sided with the view that the economy remains strong.  Cyclical stocks -- which rise and fall with the pace of economic activity -- were gainers.  International Paper rose 5/8 to 58 3/4, and Westinghouse added 1 to 69 3/8.  The Dow Jones Transportation Average climbed 16.90 to 1526.32 as airline stocks, which tumbled Thursday amid worries about possible federal intervention in the industry's takeover boom, showed some renewed strength.  UAL, which owns United Airlines, accounted for most of the average's rise by surging 7 1/4 to 287.  The company was expected to receive a leveraged buy-out offer from a group including the pilots union at United, UAL management and British Airways; according to The Wall Street Journal, the bid could exceed $300 a share.  Other airline issues to rebound included AMR, the owner of American Airlines, which went up 1 7/8 to 89 7/8; Southwest Airlines, up 1/2 to 29 1/4, and Alaska Air Group, up 1/4 to 28 7/8.  Johnson & Johnson rose 1 1/8 to 53 1/2 on 1.3 million shares amid rumors that the company might receive an acquisition offer and that the Food and Drug Administration is nearing approval of one of its drugs.  The company told Dow Jones Professional Investor Report it hasn't been approached by any would-be suitors and isn't aware of any imminent FDA approvals.  In addition, Dean Witter Reynolds repeated its buy recommendation on the stock and Shearson Lehman Hutton cited Johnson & Johnson and United Technologies, which advanced 7/8 to 56 5/8, as attractive on a technical basis.  American Brands went up 1 7/8 to 79 1/4.  Business Week magazine reported in its "Inside Wall Street" column on speculation that B.A.T Industries may merge with the company to defend against the $21.1 billion takeover offer from a group led by Sir James Goldsmith.  B.A.T gained 1/8 to 13 1/8 on the American Stock Exchange.  Golden Nugget dropped 1 3/4 to 29 3/8.  Chairman Stephen Wynn told PIR he isn't planning a leveraged buy-out, as has been rumored, and the company has no plans to continue buying back its stock at the current price level.  Niagara Mohawk Power went up 1/8 to 12 3/4 on 1.9 million shares, more than five times its average daily volume.  The utility said it would omit its third-quarter dividend on common stock and implement a plan to cut costs.  Separately, New York regulators allowed Niagara Mohawk to resume charging its customers for power costs related from an outage at the Nine Mile Point One nuclear plant.  Japan's current-account surplus continued to diminish from year-earlier levels, dwindling to $5.31 billion in July from $6.5 billion, the Finance Ministry announced.  July was the fifth consecutive month in which the surplus in the current account, which measures merchandise trade and certain other transactions, slipped below year-earlier levels.  The trade surplus also shrank, to $6.97 billion from $8.68 billion a year earlier.  Both surpluses grew from the previous month, however.  In June, the current-account surplus was $4.12 billion and the trade surplus $6.44 billion.  Cincinnati Milacron Inc. said it completed the purchase of Hayssen Manufacturing Co.'s line of extrusion blow-molding machines and will take over the business of manufacturing, selling and servicing this equipment.  Hayssen, Sheboygan, Wis., is a unit of Bemis Co., Minneapolis.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Cincinnati Milacron said the transaction isn't expected to have a material effect on current-year sales or earnings.  Extrusion blow-molding is a process used to make a wide variety of plastic products, ranging from bottles, jugs, jars and vials to handleware and toys.  Cincinnati Milacron, a maker of machine tools, plastics machinery and robotics, said it will make the machinery at a plant at its headquarters.  The editors of National Review, in its Sept. 15 issue:  The "war on drugs," like the "war on poverty," is amorphous, potentially limitless.  The brightest member of Bush's Cabinet may rue the day he took it on.  ---  John A. Tatom, an official of the Federal Reserve Bank of St. Louis, in its March/April 1989 Review:  (I)Investment in the 1980s was unusually strong and . . . was associated with the unusual decline in the relative price of investment goods.  Indeed, there have been few periods when real investment was as large a share of real GNP as it was in 1984-88.  In these earlier periods, however, the unemployment rate was substantially lower than recently and measures of capacity utilization were much higher.  Adjusted for this cyclical difference, the real investment share in the 1980s was unprecedented in the post-World War II era.  Can the skills of successful commodity trading be learned?  Or are they innate, some sort of sixth sense a lucky few are born with?  Richard Dennis, the legendary Chicago commodity trader, who turned a grubstake of $400 into an estimated $200 million or so in 18 years, has no doubt.  Following an experiment with a group of would-be traders recruited from around the country, he's convinced the secrets of commodity trading can be learned.  Over the past 4 1/2 years, a group of 14 commodity traders he taught earned an average annual compound rate of return of 80%.  In contrast, about 70% of all non-professional commodity traders lose money on a yearly basis.  "Trading was even more teachable than I imagined," he says.  "In a strange sort of way, it was almost humbling."  Mr. Dennis says he had debated the learning vs. innate-ability question with some of his associates for years.  While they argued that his skills are "ineffable, mystical, subjective or intuitive," he says, his own answer was far simpler.  The 40-year-old Mr. Dennis attributes his success to several trading methods he developed and, perhaps more important, the discipline to follow those methods.  To prove his point, Mr. Dennis decided to run a real-life experiment.  In late 1983 and again in 1984, he placed ads in The Wall Street Journal, Barron's and the New York Times seeking people who wanted to be trained as traders.  The job required that they move to Chicago, where they would receive a small salary and a percentage of any profits while Mr. Dennis taught them his methods.  About 1,000 applicants answered each ad.  He selected 80 people to come to Chicago for interviews.  From these, he chose 13 for the program in 1984 and 10 in 1985.  During the four years of the program, three people were dropped.  Of the remaining 20, 16 are known to be trading public funds, three are believed to be trading for themselves, and one has gone into another field.  The students were called the "turtles." (Mr.  Dennis, who says he had just returned from Asia when he started the program, explains that he described it to someone by saying, "We are going to grow traders just like they grow turtles in Singapore.")  Mr. Dennis provided classroom training for two weeks, teaching the fundamentals of commodity trading and the principles behind his methods of trading.  In general, Mr. Dennis is known as a trend-following trader, that is, one who determines that a market is moving up or down and then takes an appropriate position to profit from that movement.  When classroom work ended he gave each student $1 million in capital to trade.  In choosing participants for the program, Mr. Dennis says he was biased toward people with mathematical and game-playing aptitudes.  For example, Elizabeth Cheval, 33, the only woman admitted to the turtle program, had a bachelor's degree in mathematics and was a clerk on the floor of the Chicago Board of Trade when she heard of the search.  Ms. Cheval, who now trades for others, says the most important thing she learned was the discipline required to trade well.  "Rich often said if you have an inferior trading system and stick with it, then you are better off than if you have the best trading system in the world and can't stick with it."  Jerry Parker, 32, who was a certified public accountant before he became a turtle, says the most important thing he learned from Mr. Dennis is "to do the right thing every day -- both in the market and in life."  Mr. Parker says "doing the right thing" in the market means following the rules of the trading system and good money management.  During the selection process Mr. Dennis asked applicants to describe the riskiest thing they had ever done.  He wanted to see if they took calculated risks or risk for its own sake.  The answers he got ranged from one applicant who drove an hour to a basketball game without having a ticket to get in, to another who drove around Saudi Arabia for several months with whiskey in his car trunk -- a very serious offense.  The former was admitted to the program; the latter wasn't.  Russell Sands, 34, another turtle, recently formed a partnership with Mr. Parker to trade commodities for others.  He told Mr. Dennis that the riskiest thing he ever did was quit a job on Wall Street to move to Las Vegas to play backgammon and blackjack professionally.  He won a world championship in backgammon in 1980.  The most successful turtle was apparently Curtis Faith.  Trading records show that Mr. Faith, who was only 19 when he started the program, made about $31.5 million in profits for Mr. Dennis.  Mr. Faith says he was so successful because "I went into it with the least fear, probably because of my age."  Despite his success, Mr. Faith no longer trades commodities.  Although he doesn't rule out a return to trading, he says, "it's not fun anymore."  He has now started several computer-related businesses in Nevada.  Mr. Dennis says that if he had it to do over again, there is only one thing he would do differently: limit the incentive fee to 15% of profits instead of the average 20% the turtles received.  He estimates that he paid the turtles between $30 million and $35 million in incentive fees over the four years.  He says he never believed the turtles could make as much money as they did.  Mr. Dennis's own fortunes suffered a reversal last year.  In March 1988 two public funds for which Mr. Dennis was the commodity trading adviser and the general partner were dissolved after losing about 50% of their equity in a relatively short period.  Soon after that, he quit trading for himself as well as for others.  Mr. Dennis is now president of "New Perspectives Quarterly," a publication that explores policy implications for the Center for the Study of Democratic Institutions in Santa Barbara, Calif.  He is also involved in other activities, including the Washington-based Drug Policy Foundation.  In an interview in July, Mr. Dennis said that he didn't miss trading and that he has wanted to do something else for a long time.  Recently, however, rumors have surfaced, both on and off the trading floor, that he has returned to speculating.  Mr. Dennis won't confirm or deny that he's gotten back into commodities.  His explanation: "Whatever uncertainty that exists about whether I am trading now or in the future, the better it is for me."  Looking ahead to commodity markets this week:  Energy  Oil traders this week will be examining whether the markets will continue to shrug off reports of rising production by the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries.  In August, OPEC's daily production increased to around 22 million barrels a day, the highest of the year, some analysts say.  So far, the markets appear to be absorbing the output, and the industry is mixed as to whether demand through the rest of the year will continue as strong.  Some market participants believe that demand into the colder fourth quarter will rise sufficiently to absorb growing OPEC output, but others predict prices will soften because of an anticipated oversupply.  Activity recently has been sluggish, both because of uncertainty and the absence of many market players on holiday.  Many traders expect the rather narrow trading to continue until the OPEC committee meeting, scheduled to begin Sept. 23.  During the holiday weekend, trading in Europe was extremely slow as U.S. markets were closed yesterday for Labor Day.  In London, Brent crudes rose five cents to 10 cents a barrel in quiet trading.  Grains and Soybeans  Futures prices are likely to follow a choppy sideways path until the U.S. Department of Agriculture releases this month's crop report next Tuesday, analysts said.  In the meantime, they caution, soybean futures prices might be under pressure this week if history is any guide.  In recent years immediately following a drought year such as 1988 -- including 1975, 1981 and 1984 -- soybean futures prices fell on the Tuesday after Labor Day, said Richard Feltes, vice president, research, for Refco Inc. in Chicago.  He said the expectation of lower prices today contributed to price weakness Friday, when soybeans for November delivery fell 8 1/2 cents to close at $5.79 a bushel.  Sugar  The question of when India is going to buy sugar wasn't answered Friday, when that nation rejected all offerings on 200,000 tons of refined sugar it was seeking, causing futures prices to ease.  But traders are confident India will return and take a large amount of sugar off the market.  India apparently rejected the offerings as too high-priced, one analyst said.  It isn't unusual for India to reject first offerings, the analyst said.  But the seemingly severe shortage of sugar in India should force that nation into the market soon, he said.  India caused a bullish stir in the market early last month, when it was expected to buy 300,000 to 500,000 tons, said Arthur Stevenson, writing in Prudential-Bache Securities Inc.'s latest Futures Agricultural Report.  Several days ago, India asked for offers Friday on just 200,000 tons.  Mr. Stevenson said U.S. Department of Agriculture forecasts assume that India will import at least 300,000 tons of sugar in its next season, which begins Oct. 1.  Cotton  Traders will return from the long Labor Day weekend wondering whether the persistent decline in futures prices will continue.  On Aug. 24, cotton for December delivery traded at a life-of-contract high of 77.34 cents a pound.  By Friday, that contract was as low as 72.75 cents, 4.59 cents below its peak.  Buying interest appeared to run out as the contract reached its August high, Ernest Simon, cotton specialist for Prudential-Bache, said.  The subsequent decline was accelerated by computer-guided selling as the price fell below certain support levels, he said.  The market's bullish fundamentals haven't changed, Mr. Simon said.  He cited anticipated lower production in the U.S., higher world consumption and, most importantly, a significant drop in stocks when the current season ends July 31, 1990.  "Actually, what might have encouraged some selling is improved weather in growing areas in Texas and in the Mississippi Delta," he said.  @ ---  @ A Turtle Race Worth Watching  @ Performance of 14 commodity-trading advisers taught by Richard Dennis  @ Average First  @ Annual Half Annual Quarterly  @ Compound 1989 Returns Returns  @ Return* Return (Range: 85-88)* (Range: 85-89)*  @ Stig Ostgaard  @ 124.1% 0.4% 87.8% to 296.7% -49.0% to 317.5%  @ Elizabeth Cheval  @ 114.1% 41.1% 51.6% to 178.0% -27.1% to 203.3%  @ Michael Cavallo  @ 107.7% 16.1% 33.6% to 307.4% -54.7% to 195.5%  @ Chesapeake**  @ 94.4% 6.4% 45.7% to 147.7% -13.1% to 160.1%  @ Paul Rabar  @ 89.1% 20.0% 78.1% to 125.9% -24.8% to 189.6%  @ Philip Lu  @ 88.9% 36.0% 36.3% to 132.3% - 9.2% to 148.2%  @ Craig Soderquist  @ 82.4% 21.3% 58.9% to 135.9% -20.0% to 132.2%  @ James DiMaria  @ 70.9% 0.8% 17.3% to 154.9% -20.2% to 192.3%  @ Brian Proctor  @ 64.5% -13.2% -20.1% to 151.9% -41.6% to 155.8%  @ Howard Seidler  @ 64.2% 23.0% 15.8% to 123.6% -16.6% to 90.3%  @ Tom Shanks  @ 63.7% 18.8% -29.1% to 195.1% -37.8% to 183.1%  @ Jeff Gordon  @ 41.8% 16.4% 3.2% to 111.1% - 5.6% to 83.9%  @ Michael Carr  @ 38.9% 13.7% -18.1% to 88.0% -31.7% to 112.4%  @ By comparison  @ Barclay CTA Index***  @ 25.1% 10.9% 4.3% to 55.4% -12.1% to 32.4%  @ S&P 500 Index#  @ 19.2% 16.5% 5.1% to 31.6% -22.5% to 21.3%  @ *Returns overstate performance because traders paid small or no commissions and no management fees through first quarter of 1988.  However, they received no interest credit on trading capital.  @ **Chesapeake Capital Corp. is jointly owned by R.Jerry Parker and Russell J. Sands.  @ ***The performance of more than 110 commodity-trading advisers who have been trading more than four years.  @ #Total return, including dividends.  @ Source: Barclay Trading Group Ltd.  Wesleyan University was agitated early in 1988 over a recurring issue: money.  Angered by a proposed 7.5% increase in student charges, activists at the Middletown, Conn., school were pushing a letter-writing campaign to mobilize parental pressure against further big increases.  Administrators countered with some data that in virtually any other industry would have set off alarm bells.  A March 4, 1988, document, labeled "confidential" and drafted by the Wesleyan treasurer's office, stated that in September 1988, Harvard University charges would go up 6%, Yale's 6.2%, and Dartmouth's 6.3%.  At the other end of the spectrum, Wellesley College planned a 7.9% increase, Amherst College 8.5%, and Williams 10.6%.  Thus, the Wesleyan administration argued that its increase was only matching the competition.  Exactly right or within a half-percentage point of each school's actual increases, Wesleyan's figures were good -- too good, perhaps.  Most of the group of elite colleges still hadn't announced their 1988-89 charges.  How did Wesleyan know?  It won't say.  Questions over tuition-setting practices have become more than academic.  They are one aspect of a broad Justice Department investigation of possible collusion to rig prices and salaries in higher education.  The department says it has made sweeping civil-investigative demands of about 20 schools for records relating to how they determine student charges, faculty pay and financial aid.  The colleges have begun complying with the demand.  The earlier-reported practice of 23 Ivy League and other Northeastern schools of fixing student financial aid is also under government scrutiny.  At an annual spring meeting, these colleges compare proposed financial-aid packages for more than 10,000 common admittees and in most cases eliminate variances so that a family's expenses will be identical no matter where a student goes.  According to people familiar with the investigation, however, the Justice Department's main concern is tuition and faculty salaries.  The investigation has stunned many educators, especially at the prestigious private schools on which it seems to be focused.  Public-college tuitions and salaries, largely fixed by state legislative and policy decisions, apparently aren't under study.  So far, 13 private schools acknowledge getting the civil-investigative demands; they include the University of Chicago; Wesleyan, Connecticut and Trinity colleges in Connecticut; Amherst, Harvard, Williams and Tufts in Massachusetts; Bates, Bowdoin and Colby colleges in Maine; Hamilton College, New York state; and Middlebury College, Vermont.  Several of these schools have contended that they are doing nothing unlawful.  But the case is more than a legal battle.  To many educators, it's a climactic attack after years of smoldering public resentment of rising tuitions and selective admissions practices in which parents and students have felt impotent.  The Bush administration's interest in the issue was foreshadowed last December, at a meeting between Mr. Bush and 10 college presidents.  To the educators' surprise, the session included a lecture from White House Chief of Staff John Sununu -- two of whose eight children are in college -- about tuition increases that he deemed excessive.  Attorney General Dick Thornburgh has also commented privately about "waste" he has seen on campus; his last job, before joining the administration, was at Harvard's Kennedy School of Government.  Critics say the Ivy League and other top colleges have laid the political groundwork for federal investigators by projecting an image of wealth and indifference to parental fears about affordability as they raised tuitions in the 1980s at a pace well above historical rates.  "This is the arrogance of an elite which is absolutely certain it knows what is best for everybody," says Chester E. Finn Jr., a former Education Department aide who often complains about college charges.  "Colleges feel folks shouldn't be making price decisions when it comes to deciding where to go to college.  And even if they want to, {the colleges} won't let them."  Suspicions of a rigged market "are consistent with what I would characterize as a paternalistic approach to tuition setting," says Arnold Weber, the president of Northwestern University.  Many colleges, he adds, think that "we know what's best for you because we aspire to something called excellence in higher education.  We don't want to cloud the student's mind by putting him in a position where he'd have to make trade-offs between different prices and quality."  Mr. Weber says he has put "our tuition where my mouth is" by keeping Northwestern's increases over the past four years below the average at comparable institutions.  Anyone now shopping among the eight Ivy League schools would find little choice on price.  Except for Cornell, which may enjoy economies of scale as the largest of the eight, charges for tuition, fees, and room and board for the coming school year range from a low of $19,207 at Princeton to a high of $19,510 at Brown.  That's a difference of 1.5%, less than might be expected in shopping for a car or even a television set.  Of course, many colleges do charge less.  In-state students will pay $4,733 at the average four-year public school this year.  Private schools will average $12,635.  Critics complain that the pricier schools exploit their cachet, and the lifetime career advantages, imagined or real, that a diploma from a "better school" confers.  In fact, colleges often raise charges to avoid being the least expensive among their peers, says Jan Krukowski, an education consultant.  They're afraid of raising "suspicion about why they're so low," says Mr. Krukowski, who doesn't view this as evidence of collusion.  Whereas businesses hold down prices to compete, Northwestern's Mr. Weber adds, many schools "raise prices to meet the competition."  Some colleges acknowledge that the similar charges among similar schools is no accident but see nothing illegal about it.  Many college costs, including faculty and other salaries, campus upkeep and the like, are broadly the same.  And, much like retailers, schools scrutinize competitors' pricetags closely.  They often defend greater-than-average tuition increases by citing higher charges or a bigger increase the year before at a similar school.  People familiar with the Justice Department's investigation say the agency suspects that the colleges' exchange of information prior to setting tuition and salaries -- exchanges like that indicated by the Wesleyan document -- are routine, systematic and designed to eliminate any real price choices for higher-education shoppers.  "What many college presidents and their staffs do to share information . . . would pass as price rigging," says Robert Iosue, the president of York College, in York, Pa.  "How on earth can room and board costs at Harvard, located in the Boston area, with one of the highest costs of living in the country, be essentially the same as those at Brown {in Providence, R.I.} or at Dartmouth in Hanover, New Hampshire, where the cost of living is much more moderate?"  The information sharing, both formal and informal, is extensive by private-industry standards.  The schools say they repeatedly call one another during the year about tuitions and salaries, often talking in terms of ranges of prospective increases.  Indeed, the very notion of price competition is foreign to many schools.  Officials of different colleges view one another less as competitors than colleagues.  Typical is the routine at Oberlin College, a small liberal-arts school in northeastern Ohio with selective admissions and an $18,840 pricetag close to Ivy League levels.  Beginning every autumn, over the phone and at multi-college gatherings, Oberlin Provost Sam Carrier swaps data about preliminary plans for increases in student charges the next fall, he says.  By the time final figures are announced in the spring, Oberlin and other schools can set charges at an optimal level -- not too high to be uncompetitive but high enough to meet the bills.  Mr. Carrier says a similar routine is followed for faculty salaries.  "As I meet with people, I get their thinking," he says.  "I certainly feel free to tell colleagues at other institutions what I have recommended to our board."  Although such comments might be sensitive in light of the federal inquiry, Mr. Carrier and others argue that they clearly show no conspiracy is afoot.  The openness of many schools' budget and tuition-setting processes enables anyone to get prospective data on tuitions well before the date, usually in March or April, when a college announces the final figures approved by its trustees.  "The tuition inquiry amazes me," says Robert Zemsky, the director of planning and head of a higher-education research group at the University of Pennsylvania.  "It's a fundamental misunderstanding of how this process works.  This is an absolutely public process everywhere."  The final tuitions look alike because one school can easily see figures that another's administration is proposing, Mr. Zemsky argues.  Specific figures are often discussed at open budget and faculty meetings and in campus publications as much as a year before the final figure is set.  The March 4, 1988, Wesleyan document, however, indicates that preliminary but accurate information is exchanged just when it would most help competitors -- right before they set their own numbers.  The document lists the 1987-88 and the then-prospective 1988-89 student charges at Wesleyan and 16 other schools.  The prospective charges are footnoted as "final" or "preliminary."  People involved in the Wesleyan budget process say the administrators told the budget committee that they had obtained, on a confidential basis, preliminary figures from the other schools.  Figures for 11 schools besides Wesleyan were listed as preliminary, but they matched final charges exactly at Swarthmore College ($17,930), Wellesley ($17,240) and Williams ($17,329).  The figure for Stanford University missed by only $1 and for Amherst by $5.  For the others -- Dartmouth, Harvard, Penn, Oberlin, Trinity and Yale -- the numbers came within 1% of the final charges, either as listed in the College Cost Book, the standard reference work for applicants, or as provided by the colleges when asked.  Oberlin's Mr. Carrier says he doesn't specifically recall but he "could have been" the person who gave Wesleyan the Oberlin number.  Penn and Swarthmore say their trustees had already acted before the March 4 date of the document; hence, the figures were no longer proprietary.  Swarthmore's president, David Fraser, says its board approved final tuition figures on Feb. 27, 1988, about a week before the date on the Wesleyan list.  He says that, generally, anytime after the board's annual tuition-setting meeting "I would be happy to give the information to anyone who asked," even if parents wouldn't be officially notified until later.  Before the board meeting, he says, his standard response to an outside inquiry would be something like "I could imagine 8% to 11% next year -- we're still thinking about it."  Representatives of all the other schools say they either didn't know how Wesleyan got the numbers or decline to comment.  There's no doubt that anti-price-fixing laws apply to the nation's colleges and universities.  But legal experts say the Justice Department faces several problems in making an antitrust case against the schools.  When price-fixing can be shown to offer some demonstrated public good, there are precedents for excusing it.  At least in the case of financial aid, says Phillip Areeda, a Harvard law professor, the colleges could argue that by saving money on some students, they can aid others and thereby expand access to college -- to the public's benefit.  As for tuition price-setting, Prof.  Areeda says the government's main legal problem may be the consumer choices apart from the elite private schools.  Because "literally thousands" of other colleges charge less, he explains, a price-fixing conspiracy among several dozen schools, even if proved, might be shown to barely affect the overall market.  On the other hand, if the Justice Department can convince a court that the appropriate market is selective schools, it would be much easier to prove that any price-fixing conspiracy was harmful to consumers.  ---  @ Ivy League Costs  @ 1989-90 tuition, fees, room and board  @ Brown $19,510  @ Harvard 19,395  @ U. of Pennsylvania 19,350  @ Dartmouth 19,325  @ Columbia 19,320  @ Yale 19,310  @ Princeton 19,207  @ Cornell 18,670  @ Source: College Board  Grand Union Co., a supermarket operator, announced a management restructuring in the wake of its July purchase by Miller, Tabak, Hirsch & Co. and Salomon Inc.  Miller Tabak and Salomon own 80% and management owns the rest.  Gary D. Hirsch, managing general partner of the investment firm of Miller Tabak, was elected chairman.  Salomon is an investment bank and securities firm.  Floyd Hall, formerly chairman and chief executive officer, retired, Grand Union said.  Officials were unavailable to elaborate on a news release, and Mr. Hall couldn't be reached.  In other moves, Joseph J. McCaig, formerly president and chief operating officer, was named president and chief executive officer.  William A. Louttit, formerly executive vice president in charge of merchandising, was named executive vice president and chief operating officer.  Joseph E. Souccar, president and chief executive officer, and Paul S. Echenberg, executive vice president, resigned from this industrial glass and glassware maker.  T. Oscar Strangeland, chairman, assumed the additional posts of president and chief executive.  CB Pak is 80%-owned by Stone Consolidated Inc. (formerly Consolidated-Bathurst Inc.), a Montreal-based unit of Stone Container Corp. of Chicago.  The resignations follow CB Pak's sale of its two packaging operations, Domglas and Twinpak.  Your Aug. 17 Abreast of the Market discussed the economic and investment outlook of my firm, particularly the recession forecast of our Macro-Economic Index.  I would like to clarify something: The Macro-Economic Index is a proprietary economic model and not related to, or based on, the National Association of Purchasing Managers' survey, as your column inadvertently suggested.  The index began to weaken in advance of the purchasing managers' survey earlier this year.  The Macro-Economic Index forecast this record-setting economic expansion in August 1982 and, in all probability, will prove correct in its current recession forecast.  The lead time of recession signals in our index over the past four decades is, on average, five months.  With regard to the current buoyant behavior of the equity market, to include a new record peak in the Dow Jones Industrial Average on Aug. 24, it is important to remember that the economy and the market were not in any way correlated in 1987.  Just as the October 1987 "meltdown" in the stock market did not produce an economic recession (as we correctly predicted at the time), so the present strength in the stock market does not necessarily mean that the economy will avoid recession.  David B. Bostian Jr.  President  Bostian Research Associates  New York  Alfred C. Sikes once refused to subscribe to the Home Box Office and MTV cable-television channels because he didn't want to expose his two younger daughters to R-rated movies and suggestive music videos.  "I don't think we can be valueless in our approach to broadcasting," explains Mr. Sikes, a soft-spoken man who chooses words carefully.  As the new chairman of the Federal Communications Commission, he is moving quickly to exert influence on the issue of indecency in programming.  Last week, he gave his staff the go-ahead to crack down on three radio stations that aired allegedly indecent material during daytime hours.  The same day, his agency asked a federal appeals court to remand a case brought against the FCC by Action for Children's Television, a Cambridge, Mass., advocacy group -- to give the agency more time to beef up its arguments in support of a 24-hour-a-day ban on indecent broadcasts.  The one-two punch signals the new chairman's readiness to tangle with broadcasters on the indecency issue, even if it means stirring up the controversy over free speech.  His actions also show a savvy approach to dealing with Capitol Hill: In his confirmation hearings earlier this summer, lawmakers focused much of their questioning on the topic of sex and violence on the airwaves.  Off Capitol Hill, the actions raised some red flags.  "He appears to be less of an ideologue than his predecessors," says Peggy Charren of Action for Children's Television.  "On the other hand, I wish he hadn't moved so quickly and so enthusiastically on indecency.  It makes me nervous."  For Gigi Sohn of Media Access Project, the swift move on indecency "shows that the Sikes commission doesn't have its priorities in order."  Because limits on indecency are hard to pin down, Mr. Sikes suggests that broadcasters and cable operators voluntarily adopt standards.  "I think it would be good for people with great distribution power to sit down and think about what standards they want to apply," he says.  "I think it is very dangerous to expect government to act as the broadcaster or as the parent."  Before moving to Washington in 1986, the 49-year-old former head of the Commerce Department's National Telecommunications and Information Administration ran a broadcast-management and consulting company in his native Missouri.  He also has been active in Republican politics and held several state posts in Missouri, including director of consumer affairs, regulation and licensing.  Mr. Sikes's policy views aren't exactly a secret.  He spelled out many of them last year in the NTIA's 672-page report called Telecom 2000, largely a blueprint for deregulation with a goal of maintaining U.S. leadership in communications.  At NTIA, Mr. Sikes recommended freeing the seven regional Bell telephone companies from the grip of U.S. District Judge Harold Greene, who oversees enforcement of the consent decree that broke up the Bell System five years ago.  He also advocates incentive regulation for the Baby Bells, linking profits with efficiency.  For the near term, Mr. Sikes says his top priority at the FCC is personnel.  He already tapped NTIA aides Charles Schott and Ken Robinson for his personal staff, along with Cheryl Tritt from GTE Corp.'s Washington office.  And he promoted FCC veteran Roy Stewart to head the agency's mass-media bureau, which regulates television, radio, cable and satellite broadcast systems.  Robert Pettit, a partner at the Washington law firm of Wiley, Rein & Fielding, was chosen to be general counsel.  The selections indicate that Mr. Sikes isn't veering from the deregulatory path he took at NTIA.  The new chairman is also reviewing FCC staffing levels to determine whether more hiring or streamlined procedures would trim delays in processing various applications.  But he says he needs a complete picture first.  Mr. Sikes takes a big-picture approach on the issues, too.  For instance, he lumps several contentious proceedings together under the heading of video distribution.  "Telephone companies want to do it.  Broadcasters aren't altogether happy with cable, but they don't know whether they want the telephone companies to do it," he says.  To that video-communications list he adds the infant direct-broadcast satellite business and the growing, aggressive wireless-cable business.  He says he would like the commission to take a comprehensive approach, rather than examining the segments one by one.  Just how such a giant undertaking would move through the agency is unclear, but Mr. Sikes is already looking for a vehicle.  The parameters of a study for Congress on the effects of cable deregulation haven't yet been set, and he suggests the study could be quite expansive.  Deregulation has landed his predecessors in plenty of hot water with Congress, and Mr. Sikes hopes to avoid that fate.  Lawmakers have battled the agency over decisions to scrap the Fairness Doctrine --w hich requires broadcasters who air controversial programs to provide time for opposing viewpoints -- as well as over the agency's hands-off stance on many broadcast, cable and telephone matters.  For the past two years, the fighting has been so nasty that the Senate refused to approve nominees to fill vacancies at the five-member commission.  The standoff ended last month with the simultaneous confirmations of Mr. Sikes, Washington lawyer Sherrie Marshall and Illinois regulator Andrew Barrett as commissioners.  Now Mr. Sikes expects those hard feelings to soften.  He says his expectation comes mostly through "insights from friendships" with a number of influential lawmakers.  He is particularly close to Missouri Sens.  John Danforth, ranking Republican on the Commerce Committee, and Christopher "Kit" Bond.  He has campaigned for both men and was an assistant attorney general to then-Missouri Attorney General Danforth.  There is one proposal in NTIA's Telecom 2000 blueprint that Mr. Sikes might not want to follow, now that he has a new job.  The report recommended that the executive branch, perhaps the NTIA itself, should determine the nation's communications policy, while the FCC should merely implement it.  Zenith Electronics Corp., backpedaling on its earnings outlook for the second time in six weeks, said it expects to report a third-quarter loss and temporarily froze salaries of about 6,000 employees.  Blaming lower-than-expected sales of its computers and consumer electronics products, the Glenview, Ill.-based concern also said the new forecast makes it less confident it will report a full-year profit.  At the company's annual meeting in April, Chairman Jerry K. Pearlman said he expected an improvement this year from last year's earnings of $11.7 million, or 45 cents a share, on sales of $2.69 billion.  But the company backtracked in late July, saying it was less confident it would see improved profit for the year.  With Friday's statement, the company conceded that it could have a loss not only for the third quarter, but for the full year.  The news sent Zenith stock down $1, to $15.50, in New York Stock Exchange composite trading Friday.  In last year's third quarter, Zenith earned $3 million, or 11 cents a share, on sales of $681.6 million.  "One thing you learn with Zenith is to expect surprises, because the businesses it's in tend to be volatile," said Laura Lederman, an analyst at Duff & Phelps in Chicago.  The company said that by deferring raises for six months for salaried workers in the U.S. and some workers abroad, it expects to save $6 million on an annual basis.  It also said it's continuing moves to cut costs and improve cash flow.  A spokesman said these include reducing inventories, curtailing purchases of raw materials and extending payment terms with vendors.  Zenith also continues to be hurt by a wrong guess earlier this year on the direction of the dollar.  Because the company incorrectly positioned itself for a fall in the dollar, it couldn't benefit when buying Asian computer parts when the dollar continued to rise.  The company said in July that second-half results could be hurt by a pretax $20 million at the then level of exchange rates, and the spokesman said Friday that projection hasn't changed.  James Austin, a 35-year-old construction manager, twice failed to shake his alcohol and cocaine addictions in treatment clinics.  Back for a third time, he felt he finally was starting to make progress.  But after a week, he was ordered out of the program.  Blue Cross & Blue Shield Inc. of Maryland, which provided his healthcare coverage through his wife's employer, decided that Mr. Austin was well enough to leave -- despite his doctor's objections -- and said it wouldn't pay any more.  Only after his wife, a secretary, agreed to pay $4,000 for the remaining three weeks of treatment was Mr. Austin able to stay.  "Had I been released {early}, I would probably have headed straight for the nearest bar," says Mr. Austin, who adds that he has been "clean" for two months.  A few years ago, Blue Cross, like most insurers, would have paid for Mr. Austin's treatment with no questions asked.  But as the cost of treating addiction has soared -- to $4 billion last year from $1.5 billion in 1983 -- many employers and insurers are cutting drug-rehabilitation benefits.  In a survey of 1,600 employers last year, A. Foster Higgins Inc., a benefits-research firm based in New York, found that 75% have adopted cost controls.  General Motors Corp. limits the number of days patients spend in residential clinics.  Ameritrust Inc., a bank holding company in Cleveland, sets a lifetime limit on treatment.  Pacific Bell Telephone hires cost-control firms to scrutinize claims and treatment plans, and Barnett Banks Inc., Jacksonville, Fla., requires employees to pay a bigger share of the bill.  "We had to have some type of controls put in," says Alan Bowers, a benefits manager for Ameritrust, whose dependency and mental-health bill quadrupled in the early 1980s.  Charles Gustafson, a spokesman for Aetna Insurance Co., which helps companies manage costs, adds: "Employers don't have an open checkbook."  But critics say companies are penny-pinching people's lives away.  Michael Ford, director of the National Association of Addiction Treatment Providers, a trade group in Irvine, Calif., says too many addicts are being shunted to cheaper treatment.  "When you have an ulcerating, hallucinating alcoholic," he says, "you don't say to him, 'See you next week at 3:30 p.m.' They won't be there."  Already, allegations of negligence are making their way to court.  Barbara Stern, director of Merritt Peralta Institute, a treatment center in Oakland, Calif., says she knows of two lawsuits involving patients who died of medical complications after they were sent to cheaper treatment facilities because insurers or employers wouldn't pay for more expensive care.  Ms. Stern declines to discuss details, citing confidentiality rules set by the court.  The cost controls are creating a new class of medical indigents, says Scott McMillin, director of Suburban Hospital's Addiction Treatment Center in Bethesda, Md., which treated Mr. Austin.  "They have jobs, they are insured by their employers, and they or their dependents have serious drug problems."  Under the cost controls, they can run up six-figure bills for traditional illnesses and still be covered, but they must pay for any further addiction therapy out of their own pockets.  Howard Engel, vice president of Mesirow Insurance Services, a Chicago insurance broker, notes the case of a suicidal teen addict who was committed to hospitals twice, at a cost of $65,000.  Because his single mother's insurance has a lifetime limit of $25,000 for substance-abuse and mental-health care (often used for addicts), she now owes $40,000.  And without further coverage, no facility will care for her son, who still talks of suicide.  Employers say they have little choice but to impose controls.  Treating addiction, an enigmatic condition, is hugely expensive.  Top clinics are pricey, with inpatient stays costing $6,000 to $20,000 a month.  Worse, many patients slip back into dependency -- and then treatment -- several times.  Also, employees and their dependents are seeking help in greater numbers.  To curb climbing costs, many employers have lowered lifetime limits for substance-abuse and mental-health benefits to $50,000 from previous ceilings of $100,000 to $500,000, surveys show.  More employees are being referred to outpatient care, which generally costs about $1,500 a month -- less than one-tenth the cost of the most expensive inpatient programs.  With such controls, General Motors reduced its addiction-treatment bill to $62 million last year from $80 million in 1987.  The auto maker, which estimates that it loses $1 billion to alcohol and drug abuse annually from lower productivity and job-related accidents caused by substance abuse, last year fired several employees with recurrent addiction problems.  Almost all were dismissed after two attempts at treatment.  "These employees were fired technically because of poor performance, or lack of performance," a GM spokesman says.  "Almost all of those cases, though, were linked to substance-abuse problems."  GM and other employers also are turning to consultants called managed-care firms, whose psychiatrists and counselors diagnose an addict's condition and prescribe treatment.  If a patient or his doctor wants other treatment, the patient pays.  By monitoring claims and care, a managed-care firm helped Ameritrust cut its addiction-treatment bill by one-third last year to $336,000, even as the number of employees and dependents receiving care rose 11% to 1,730.  For employees these days, to get inpatient treatment when faced with the scrutiny of a managed-care firm or other reviewer, "you essentially have to be suicidal, or suffering from some serious kind of mental-health illness that requires medication, or severely depressed," says Mary Jane England, a physician who is vice president of medical services for Pruden tial Insurance Co. of America.  Those sent to inpatient care are closely monitored and ordered to leave as soon as company reviewers think they are well enough.  With few studies having been done on when to pull a patient from a program, such decisions are subjective, concedes John Roberts, a psychotherapist who monitors cases for GM and other companies.  Insurers contend that the emphasis on outpatient care doesn't hinder treatment.  They cite recent studies showing success rates for inpatient and outpatient care to be about the same.  On average, about 25% of both inpatients and outpatients stay clean for one to two years, says Dr. England of Prudential.  The insurer, which three years ago sent almost all its subscribers needing treatment to inpatient programs, now does so with only 15%.  But some consultants and care specialists say the move to outpatient care has gone too far.  John Erb, a consultant for Foster Higgins, says, "Insurers and employers aren't giving inpatient {care} a real chance; they've kissed it off too quickly."  A recent Foster Higgins study of Massachusetts state employees showed that the longer they stayed at inpatient facilities, the greater their chance of recovery.  All the wrangling over costs and the type of treatment may have one unintended side effect: It gives many addicts "a perfect excuse not to get treatment," says Dr. Rodney Burbach, a Suburban Hospital addiction specialist.  This may be what happened with one 30-year-old maintenance worker in Boston, according to staff members at Addiction Recovery Corp., which runs clinics around the U.S.  The patient, an alcohol and cocaine addict, was referred to an Addiction Recovery clinic in Lexington, Mass., last month.  Based on a phone evaluation of the patient and a consultation with his employer, the clinic thought he needed treatment in a hospital and then time under close supervision in an inpatient facility, an Addiction Recovery spokeswoman says.  But his insurance company said he had to seek outpatient treatment, such as Alcoholics Anonymous or Narcotics Anonymous, before it would consider paying for inpatient care, the spokeswoman says.  "What happened?  We lost the patient.  He didn't show up at AA, NA or here."  Regarding your Aug. 15 Centennial Journal item on Ford Motor's Edsel:  There were about 6,000 names suggested for the Edsel, not 18,000.  Your story also said the poet Marianne Moore was asked to name the car -- that was done as a publicity stunt while surveys on publicly acceptable names were under way.  The car actually was named by E.R. Breech, who called a meeting of the executive committee while the three Ford brothers were out of town.  Mr. Breech, who had referred to the car as Edsel from the outset, rejected the top 10 surveyed names, then phoned Mr. Ford in the Bahamas and told him the committee had "unanimously" named the car Edsel -- a baldfaced lie designed to please.  Ford asked Breech to hold up announcement until he could talk to his mother.  Breech then sent Charlie Moore, vice president of PR, to tell Mrs. Edsel Ford.  She answered the door herself, listened impatiently, then slammed the door in his face.  But it was too late; the name had been given to the Detroit media by someone other than Special Products Division's PR department.  This story was among many in the book, "The Edsel Affair."  I publicized the Edsel, spent two years interviewing my peers a decade later and, in 1980, sent you a review copy.  Too bad you didn't put it in your library; now it's out of print.  Gayle Warnock  Scottsdale, Ariz.  ---  You quoted Ford's old line that the Edsel was the first "all-new" car from Detroit's Big three in 18 years and that Ford spent $250 million to develop it (Ford's propaganda always said a quarter of a billion -- it sounded bigger that way).  Ford did spend many millions, but mostly on ballyhoo and advertising and very little on developing an all-new car.  But the millions did the trick.  The public could hardly wait to see this "innovation."  At my own dealership in Ashland, Ohio, we had a policeman directing traffic for the first two days.  If the car had been only half as new and great as Ford led us to expect, it might have been a howling success.  But this warmed over Ford/Mercury with a "toilet seat" grill was soon nothing but a laughing stock.  Ford Motor showed a profit in 1958, but the buyers got stuck and the dealers lost their shirts.  Duane Smith  Homosassa, Fla.  Is the economy's recent burst of vigor likely to continue for the rest of the year or is it just a temporary blip on the path to slower growth?  Don't expect to find any answers to that question this week.  After a flood of data that created mixed signals last week, the only clues that will emerge in the next four days are August auto sales and July consumer credit.  Neither is likely to resolve any lingering confusion about the economy's future course.  Economists estimate that domestic auto makers were moving new cars at a seasonally adjusted annual rate of more than eight million units in August compared with a 7,450,000-unit annual pace in July.  The healthy sales reflected big incentives offered by the manufacturers as they attempt to clear dealer lots of 1989 models before the 1990 cars are offered later this month.  Consumers had an additional incentive to buy before the new model year starts -- prices of the 1990 models are expected to be sharply higher.  But among analysts who suspect the economy isn't growing nearly as fast as recent data suggest, the August car sales don't carry much weight.  "Even though auto sales were high in July and August I don't think they can be sustained," said Mickey Levy, chief economist at First Fidelity Bancorp. in Philadelphia.  "All they're doing is borrowing from future sales."  The same is true of July consumer credit, he said.  It's expected to have risen about $4.5 billion, led by the brisk pace of auto loans.  Overall, Mr. Levy sees these and other statistics that suggest economic strength as nothing more than a temporary divergence from slower economic growth.  "From February to the end of July nearly all the economic releases pointed toward continued deterioration of economic conditions," he said.  "In August almost all of the releases pointed toward an improving economy.  But economic fundamentals tend to change slowly and the fundamentals are still pointing toward weakness."  He noted that the Federal Reserve retains a tight grip on credit, real money growth is declining and the interest yield curve remains inverted.  "We get away without a recession, but I do see a prolonged period of subpar growth ahead," he said.  Not so, counters Charles Lieberman, director of financial markets research at Manufacturers Hanover.  In his recent newsletter Mr. Lieberman argued that the "soft landing" -- moderate economic growth with lower inflation and falling interest rates -- that so many analysts had predicted is turning rapidly into a "touch and go" landing in which rising consumer spending spurs the economy to faster growth well into 1990.  Mr. Lieberman's view suggests that consumers slowed their spending earlier this year as they struggled to meet unexpectedly hefty tax bills at the same time that they were trying to cope with sharply higher energy prices.  With oil prices down and the tax season behind them, consumers are once again inclined to spend rising incomes.  ---  @ Closely Watched Reports  @ Statistics Released in the Week Ended Sept. 1  @ CHANGE  @ (from prior  @ TOTAL period)  @ Money supply  @ M1 Week ended  @ Aug. 21 (in billions) $779.6 + $4.8  @ M2 Week ended  @ Aug. 21 (in billions) $3,138.3 + $5.3  @ M3 Week ended  @ Aug. 21 $4,011.0 - $1.2  @ Construction spending  @ July, annual rate  @ (in billions) $415.7 Unch.  @ Manufacturers' Orders  @ July, (in billions) $231.26 - 1.7%  @ Manufacturers' shipments  @ July, (in billions) $226.93 - 1.9%  @ Purchasing managers'  @ Index  @ August, change in  @ percentage points 45.2% - 0.8  @ Unemployment rate  @ August, change in  @ percentage points 5.2% Unch.  @ Employment payroll  @ August, in millions 108.9 + 0.1%  @ Farm prices  @ August, index 144% - 1.4%  @ Real GNP  @ 2nd quarter, revised  @ annual rate (in trillions) $4.134 + 2.7%  @ Personal income  @ July, annual rate  @ (in trillions) $4.449 + 0.7%  @ Personal consumption  @ July, annual rate  @ (in trillions) $3.482 + 0.7%  @ Savings rate  @ July, change in  @ percentage points 5.7% Unch.  @ Leading indicators  @ July, index 144.0% + 0.2%  @ New homes sold  @ July, annual rate 739,000 +14.4%  @ New jobless claims  @ Week ended Aug. 19 316,000 - 2.2%  @ Real corporate profits  @ 2nd quarter, preliminary  @ annual rate (in billions) $164.3 - 5.4%  @ Statistics to Be Released This Week  @ New car sales (Wed.)  @ August  @ New jobless claims (Thurs.)  @ Money Supply (Thurs.)  @ Consumer credit (Fri.)  @ July 